false advertising. Although the &quot;technical data&quot; said this pot is safe for the stovetop, when it arrived, its own literature said very clearly that it is NOT safe for stovetop use. The only reason I ordered it was because I wanted something I could move from stovetop to oven or broiler. THis is very disappointing
Missing parts. Recived one filter not two as advertized.  I will not do transactions with this vender again
Just say no. Amazing that in 2005 you can read review after review on Amazon about the poor quality of almost every toaster offered. We hoped this one would be an exception. It was, but only in that it may be the poorest of them all. Ours buzzed loudly whenever in use. Never had a toaster buzz before. We toast bread at least twice a day, and the toasting performance of this unit is horrible. It has no bagel setting (which toasts the cut side more than the crust side), so we ended up with one side burnt and the other barely starting to toast. What's more, it toasts completely unevenly. One corner of toast will be blackened while the far corner will barely be tanned. And it's really annoying when a 4-slice toaster does not allow you to operate the heating elements independently. As far as looks go, De'Longhi did just as bad a job. The photos look cool, but the crumb tray this unit "sits" upon is actually wider than the unit itself, so there is a big uneven gap at the seam. It's the lower line you see in the photos--but they make it look real nice for that! What you don't see is the other side of the toaster where the bottom crumb tray will be sticking out several MM from the side of the toaster rather than being flush as shown. This makes it look broken, like two pieces of something that no longer fit together. If De'Longhi had spent even a second thinking about this, they would have done the opposite: The bottom tray should be slightly smaller than the toasting unit, which would give the unit a seamless look rather than a busted look. (We even went to a store [yes, a real store] to confirm that they are all like this, and they are.) Also, the bread warming rack is another poorly designed element. There are 4 tiny plastic feet inserted into the four metal posts of the rack so it doesn't scratch the metal surface of the toaster. However, two of the feet had already fallen out during shipping, and though they slipped right back in, all four of the tiny feet can easily be removed or fall out (only friction holds them in) and you WILL loose them very quickly--especially if you ever wash the rack. We're happy to pay extra for a quality item--even a toaster--but we expect something in return besides utter dissapointment. Final advice: Stick to the $20 toasters with functions such as bagel, defrost, and dual controls. If it's ugly, keep it under the sink and only take it out when you use it. This one looks broken, performs poorly, and costs a lot of money. If you do buy this model, maybe you'll get ours...we returned it
Pike Street Flannel Queen Sheet Set. Nice and soft but boy oh boy do they loose a lot in the wash. I think if I wash these about 12 times they will disappear
Garbage,  Absolute Garbage. I'd think if I were Dyson, I would recall all of these.Big, Bulky Pricey, and worthless. I thought turbines were designed to spin?It certainly does not compare to the vacuum at all.Bought a real one for $17 (shiping included) Eureka Power Paw, Dyson should be ashamed
better stay away. Bad quality, on/off switch and plastic ring broken after 1 year.
lousy. the electric skillet takes forever to heat up and it does not heat in the corners also it takes longer to cook than an electric  frying pan I would not recommend this product.  thank yo
a poor design. i am very disappointed with this humidifier and its filter. it consumes about 1 filter per month and if you keep the humidifier off for more than 2 days the filter dries up and you might as well throw it away
Not so safe... I bought six of these collars for my five cats. (I bought an extra just in case one of the cats lost one.) I thought the colors were great, and I was happy with the idea of the material, as opposed to cheap vynil. They do look fashionable, I think, and are discreet enough to not take away from the beauty of the cat itself. However, these collars are NOT "breakaway" collars. They enlarge if they get caught on something, but this actually only adds its own problems. Several times my cats came home with one leg through the collar (and the collar extended as far as possible). I hated to think what would have happened if the cat had gotten the collar caught on something AFTER getting the leg stuck. One cat finally did come home without his, and I didn't replace it. Another came home with the collar around her chest (both front legs had gone through), and it was constricting her. I pulled to try to get it off, but it was obviously very painful, and in the end the only solution was for me to cut it off. I decided these collars are not very safe after all--too bad I bought six at once (the reviews at the time were pretty good, generally). I've taken them all off, and now my daughters can play with them on their stuffed animals. They look do look cute! I just don't trust them on live animals.
Very Poor Quality Vacuum. This vacuum worked for about 2-minutes before the brushes stop turning.  I took this to a authorized Hoover vacuum dealer to look at. After finding the problem was some bent pole that supported the brushes to work, they contacted Hoover only to find out there is a recall out for this vacuum cleaner model and the part was not available yet for the repair.  So after purchasing this vacuum on February 1st, 2007, the vacuum is still at the repair shop 1-month later.  Part is still not available. Stay away from purchasing this vacuum.  I only kept it since Amazon.com charges you a re-stocking fee on open merchandise.Lyle....St.Louis, M
Grrrr, this thing sucks!. So, this clock woke me up alright!  The snooze didn't work, and then I couldn't turn it off!  I had to rip the batteries out of it to get it to stop...It is very cheaply made (explains the price I guess), but yeah it works just fine as long as you don't need to use the snooze ever
Filters OK, MyPod not. The filters fit and do what they are designed to do, thought a little costly for what you get.  Unfortunately, the MyPod that they fit just doesn't do anything but make a colored water drink that doesn't come close to EcoPod or the standard pods for the coffee machine
Great Grater, and then... This thing worked like a champ, impressed friends, and lasted all of 6 months...and then, the plastic screw that attaches the handle to the grating drum snapped.  Cheap, Cheap, Cheap! and at $20/per...definately not considered disposable!  Look elsewhere.  The Zyliss will be my next purchase and I will leave feedback.
Nice idea, but that's all. The dispenser is in the kitchen and it dispenses soap sporadically for no apparent reason.  This happens frequently during the day and night.  It happens whether someone is in the kitchen or not.  It makes a noise when the soap is being dispensed so we can hear it from the next room.  I had to put a small bowl in front of the dispenser to catch the soap, which defeats the purpose
Don't buy it if you are intended to protect disks, CDs, tapes and Videos. I have just purchased this chest. The first thing I read from the packing box was this product is not intended to protect computer disks, CDs, tapes, videos. This was not mentioned at all in product description on 3 to 4 website that I checked before I decided to buy it. I was more than disappointed. I feel that the seller was evasive...
Overpriced for a small saucepan. Am I the only one who thinks $55 is far too much to spend for a 1.5 quart saucepan
Not a real tagine: it only looks like one. A real tagine in Morocco has a hole at the top for the steam to escape.  This has NO Hole and therefore cooks like a dutch oven.  The chicken will literally boil to death and drown.  The product is made in Thailand, says so on the box, and is so hot after a half an hour that you can not touch any part of it, unlike it's claim.  This product to me, having been served a chicken tagine for over a month in Morocco, is culinary fraud.  And the price is highway robbery. I do not recommend buying this product at all
terrible quality; a really unfortunate purchase. Two years ago, I purchased this hand-crank ice cream freezer for $130 on the web. My wife and I loved the idea of kids taking turns cranking the handle.But the very first time we made ice cream, we found that the crank would jam incessantly. If I pressed in on the handle in a certain way while cranking, the jamming was reduced a bit, but this was a nuisance. If one did not apply force in just the right way, the thing would jam again. (So much for friends and kids enjoying taking turns at the crank!)The second time we made ice cream, the jamming was even worse, and we noticed that metal filings were dropping down from the gear mechanism and were making their way into the ice cream.When I took the gear mechanism (the "crank assembly frame") apart, I discovered the problem: The gears inside are designed and manufactured badly. The gears are not held in place, but rather have about 1/8" play. That is a lot of play. When the gears drift apart, they jam. The gears in our unit were badly gouged after only two uses! (The gears seem to be stamped from low-grade powdered metal.) The entire problem could have been avoided in the manufacturing by simply using a plastic spacer on the shaft that holds one of the gears, but this was not done.When I called about warranty service, I was told that a replacement gear mechanism would be shipped to me. That never happened. The next time I called, some months later, I was told that there was no record of my earlier call. Again, I was told that a replacement gear mechanism would be shipped to me. About a week later, a replacement handle arrived, not a gear mechanism.The third time I called about warranty service, I was informed that gear mechanism is not actually a replacement part, so that I should never have been told that one could be sent to me. (This is rather baffling: one can buy the part on the web.) I was also informed that the unit was out of its one year warranty. It did not seem to matter to them that my problems with the unit, and my contacts with them, had begun while the unit was only a few months old. Only when I assured them that I was holding in my hand a printed 5-year warranty did they continue to work with me. (Of course the company is fully aware of their flawed product, and of course they are fully aware that the product has been sold with a 5-year warranty. It seems that they try to bluff people who call for warranty service, hoping that they might not have a copy of thier warranty in-hand.)The result of this third call about warranty service was that the company agreed to replace my ice cream maker under warranty. But I was required to pay for shipping of my old unit back to them via UPS (an expense of $20) and for shipping of the replacement unit to me (an expense of $10). So the cost of my ice cream maker is up to $160. Luckily, they don't have any of the hand-crank models available to send out as a replacement, and so they are going to ship me an electric model instead. I'm hoping the electric one will be a better design - it does not have the gear mechanism that the hand-crank model has. But I certainly would not have paid $160 for an electric ice cream maker. My recommendation would be to buy a much cheaper electric ice cream maker of a more modern design from another company.
Very poor service. I bought this cocktail shaker as a gift. The package came on time. But when I opened the package I noticed that the container that had the shaker inside was opened. The next moment I realized that the cover, top and the strainer of the shaker were missing. So I only got the bottom of the shaker in my package. It is very frustrating. I rated it as 1 star, so that I can post the review. Obviously, I  did not have a chance to use it
Like using a big tissue. These towels seem to be of poor quality. They are very light and quickly become saturated. An average size person would probably need two of the bath towels to dry off after taking a shower. Little pieces of fuzz continue to come off the towels even if you wash them prior to first use
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
HUNTERS TOYS. CHEWED THE KNOBS RIGHT OFF.  HELD THE BALL DOWN WITH HIS PAWS AND CHEWED ALL THE KNOBS.
okay coffee, terrible espresso. I received this as a gift a year ago and I like the coffee maker part, the coffee comes out with a good flavor albeit a bit cold but it seems all coffee makers these days make the coffee a little cold. Once you mix in milk or 1/2 and 1/2 it is only lukewarm. The removable tank is nice (you can wash it) but awkward to use if you have the unit under a cabinet. Also the unit has a big footprint so that may be of consideration if your counterspace is limited.I used to have a Delonghi pump-driven espresso machine that worked great. This one has a steam driven espresso that most coffee connoisseurs will advise against. I now know why. The pressure builds inside the water tank as the espresso brews and after 1/2 a shot the machine just shoots out steam. I've tried different grinds and tamping the coffee really hard (you have to buy a tamper with this one) it still builds too much pressure and it shoots out bitter coffee flavored steam after a short while. Also the markings on the pots peel off pretty quick. Not worth the money unless you get it for cheap on ebay.
Tools. These are great towels if you can get them.  They are very soft and a great price but I ordered them in December and they came in one at a time. Took over 3 months to complete the order and still did not recieve the full order because after 3 months they refunded my money on one towel that was out of stock.  When I ordered them they stated that they were in stock and ready to ship.Buy these only if you have a life time to get the
Poor Quality - Overpriced. This Rosle product is made in China, and its quality is very inferior to the German-made utensils.  Rosle is ruining their reputation with these cheaper Chinese-made products.  Too bad that they will prostitute their name and image to make a few more bucks
Fails to pump and top does not attach to base. I would rate this ZERO but that option is not available.  The weight of the stainless steel is heavy, exactly what I had expected for 18/8.  However, the top does not affix to the base.  It seems the threads inside of the top do not match with the threads on the base.  Furthermore, the pumper does not work leaving one to pour the liquid from the base.  That's worse than our original situation with the unsightly bottle of liquid dishsoap on the counter.  Yuck!I do NOT recommend the purchase of this product.
Waffle Maker & Sandwich Grill. I can't tell you how disappointed I was with this Continental CE23711 Waffle Maker & Sandwich Grill. First of all, it was a month late in arriving and was purchased to replace a similar old Black and Decker unit that had grills that were deteriorating. This new unit was so flimsy that the inserted grills kept popping out because the whole unit was bent out of shape. I would have returned it but my husband had discarded the box after checking to see if it would heat. I felt like throwing it away because my old unit was so superior to this one but my daughter switched some of the fasteners around which hold the 2 plates in place and that worked but the unit must be handled carefully - a really disappointing purchase!!
It's ok but definitely not as good as expected. They say this is so amazing because nothing sticks to it, it cooks food better than regular pans, odors don't stick to it, it's easy to clean.  Well, they got 1 out 4 right at least.  It is easy to clean.  But it is impossible to coook almost everything in it because everything i've tried comes out burnt on one side, not even done on the other side.  On the cookie sheet everything around the outsides burns.  In the cupcake pans or the cake pan, the top of the food cooks but the bottom doesn't.  It is very hard to get smells out of it.  And with a lot of stuff you still should spray it with cooking spray or it does stick a little.  I'm sure in some ovens and with certain foods they work great, but my experience wasn't so great
Do Not Buy This Toaster. This toaster projectile ejects your toast right to the kitchen floor, even if the toaster is located at the back of the counter by the wall.  I can not vouch for the toast--we never got to sample any as they all were hurled to the floor.  "Avante" toaster--should be called the "Avalanche" toaster--that's what you get
Chef in Pa. This flan pan is very flimsy, and don't hold up well
Dissapointed. Love the look but they chip very easily, my husband picked up a cup of coffee and the cup just fell off the handle on two occasions.I guess if you have no kids and don't use every day they'd be great but they are not good for a family or daily wear and tear
Disappointing Egg Cooker. I ordered this product based on the reviews that were available at the time. I was sorely disappointed. There is no measuring cup, so all water amounts must be estimated (the unit has three "lines" to help, but nothing that denotes how much water to use if you wish to cook a specific number of eggs); there is no buzzer when the unit is finished, so unless you babysit it, everything ends up overcooking. This is a great unit to avoid purchasing unless you plan to always cook 8 eggs at a time and want them all hardboiled
It's too thin on its' leading edge and warps. I love my other silcone spatula's by Mario but this one is not what I expected.  The edge warps, and it is very difficult to get it under a pancake for example and turn it over.  It literally was sticking and tearing the pancake and I was using a non stick griddle.  I think perhaps it needed to be a little less long so there would be more support for the food item. Not sure what the warping problem is cause I have only used it once...to try and turn the pancake and washed by hand.  I tried putting a weight on the leading edge and leaving it weighed down several days but when I checked to see if that fixed it...it was still warped
Awful...not durable. HiI bought this heater at Home Depot and was very happy initially. It did an awesome job at heating my garage. It would heat up my 2 car garage from high 50s to high 60s in a couple of hours. But, I needed something that could work in the garage for 3 to 4 hrs everyday. A month after we bought it, it broke down....it would not start up...Awful - not durable at all.
Loved it, but it broke. I received this as a Christmas gift, and it really does make opening a bottle of wine fun and easy.  But the pin that holds the mechanism started wearing, and it finally broke after about 3 or 4 months.  So we're back to our handy, trustworthy waiter type bottle opener.  If you want something fun to use at a party, go for it.  But have another bottle opener in your pocket, just in case
I'm Finally giving up on Mr. Coffee coffeemakers. Color me dense, but after going through 8 Mr. Coffee coffeemakers in the past 10 years I'm tossin' in the towel!The longest period of time that one has lasted was about 18 months. I just think that a person should be able to get more than 12 to 18 months of use out of a $40 to $50 coffeemaker that is used to make only one pot of coffee per day. The problem with 5 of these 8 coffeemakers was the heating plate going out...ie just ceasing to heat at all. The problem with the other 3 was leakage...massive leakage, as in an instantaneous rupture in the water tank and the entire content emptying within a few seconds!So, after having cleaned up my most recent Mr. Coffee spill just a few minutes ago, I have finally (duh) decided it is time to give up on Mr. Coffee coffeemakers and never allow one of the foul quality beasts to darken my countertop again!My advise is...if anyone wants to buy a new $40 to $50 coffeemaker every year or so, buy a Mr. Coffee...otherwise steer clear of this poor quality product and shop for another brand. As to which brand of coffeemaker?...I have yet to discover that answer as I type this, but as I am searching I can promise one thing...it definitely will NOT be a Mr. Coffee product!This is the first comment/complaint I have ever written about a product on Amazon, but I was so peeved about this last mess I had to clean up that I felt the need to vent a bit.
These knives are Stamped, not Forged. These knives get 2 stars for being priced like a forged knife set when they are actually stamped (lower quality).Knives come in two types.  Stamped or Forged.  Stamped knives are made by stamping out the shape of the blade from a piece of sheet metal.Forged knives are made by heating metal and pounding it into shape.  The blade on a forged knife can get thicker as it merges into the handle, and really take on any shape.Forged knives are undisputadly better. The metal is stronger, and the blade is FAR less likely to snap because it's tapered and thicker in the handle.  Forged knives are also generally more expensive.   The problem with this Kershaw set is not just that it's stamped.  Stamped knife sets are great choices for people on a budget.  But the problem is that this Kershaw knife set is priced like a forged set.Don't be duped.  Go look at Henckels or Wusthof.  They have some small sets in this same price range that are forged, and are much higher quality.For example - Amazon has "J.A. Henckels 7-pc. Professional Knife Set" which is forged, and MUCH higher quality for less than one hundred $.  Or consider "Chicago Cutlery Walnut Forged 9-Piece Block Set" also on Amazon, also for less than a hundred $.  You'd get much higher quality with either of those options.  Don't be fooled by the "retail price" listed
The Sunflower that never blooms. It is a beautiful mold, and I was excited to make a cake in the shape of a sunflower. I am a pretty experienced baker, and my success rate, even with tricky procedures, is very high. In five attempts to use this cake pan, each ime increasing how slavishly I greased and floured the alleged "non stick" surface, and being careful to remove it per the instructions - after cooling 10-15 minutes on a rack after removing from the oven, I never got it out in one piece. The mold's detailed corners are too sharp to cleanly release the cake. I even tried letting it fully cool in the hopes some shrinkage would help get the cake out. I own other Nordic Ware pans and have had better luck with them, but this particular mold is a loser, which was very disappointing considering how pretty it could potentially be if it worked. If you want to use it for Jello, I'm sure it's fine, but for cakes, it's  a waste of time and money.
This toaster is like jack-in-the-box. Not only does this toaster burn toast on one side, even at low settings, the force of the toaster has a tendency to projectile bagels and particularly toast onto the counter, and if positioned close to the edge of the countertop, on to the floor. We are very disappointed with this purchase.
DO NOT BUY!. When I bought mine there was no reviews. I have the same problems as the other reviewers have. Feathers poking through. I was suckered by the low price. Stay far away from this product
WOW!! This thing sucks. 0 STARS. I just got this thing 2 hours ago. In the middle of grinding a 16oz bag and it stops working. Made it through about 8oz...try again two hours later thinking motor got too hot, nope. Number one, this is nothing more than a typical small "hand held" grinder with a few lights and a cup dial that does absolutely nothing. DO NOT BUY THIS. The others who wrote a positive review must have been lighting the bottom of a spoon before they tried using this thing
Not 18/10. Although The flatware is nice looking... I bought these because they claimed it was 18/10 stainless steel, what I received was 18/0. Be aware
Great concept, needs better material. I bought these because I was sick of creating foil shields on the pies I bake.  I love that these slip perfectly on and off.  However, I've found that since they're made of metal or aluminum, they actually conduct heat and cause the crust of the pie to darken faster than the center--which is exactly what I DIDN'T want it to do.  That said, I have to admit that while the edges of my pies look darker than the rest, it hasn't come out burnt as it would if I were to bake the pie without any sort of shield.I'm planning on buying another brand's--something made from silicone instead
Worked Superbly for 60 days. Bought the primary and then two remote transmitter thermometers.  Was really pleased with the main receiver and its ability to monitor the highs and lows at the primary and then at the two additional remotes.   Then after about two months, the display kept fading and fading, and even with new batteries, the display will come up for a few seconds and fade entirely.   Am very disappointed, will now start the task of contacting the company or Amazon to see what kind of replacement I can get, although once bitten by a product, I generally do not return to it
Eh, they're ok. When I opened the product, the sheets really were soft. But when you're laying on them, they aren't very comfortable.  I wouldn't buy another set again. But they were cheap, so not a horrible buy
As Bad as It Gets. I owned a Salton 3 for All over 10 years old. I thought that with the purchase of this Krups unit I'd be moving up in the world. Boy was I disappointed. The steamer has a detachable nozzle which frequently pops off while frothing milk, splattering everything nearby. The Salton had a 4 shot capacity while this makes only 2 shots at a time, and weaker at that. The Salton for its $99 price included a carafe and steamer jug. You'll have to purchase these separately from Krups. Krups recommends purchase of a separate water filter for the water reservoir for the espresso unit. When it's in place the pump can't draw water through it. I brew espresso every morning. I don't understand how anyone could rate this product favorably if they reguarly make espresso. However the coffee unit works well. I've never written a review for Amazon before. The poor quality of this product motivated me
No suction, brush doesn't work--waste of money. If there were a rating lower than 1 star, I would have used it, because this vacuum doesn't even deserve 1 star.  In a moment of madness, I recently gave my old Dirt Devil to my daughter and bought myself the so-called "new and improved" model as a replacement.  Big mistake.  My old Dirt Devil was a workhorse and was used to spot clean the upholstery and floors in our RV, truck and car, and home, along with cleaning lots of other things such as draperies, pet beds, etc.  I used it daily for 15 years and never, ever had a problem with it.  This new bagless Dirt Devil has never worked right.  Immediately, the revolving brush quit revolving.  I returned the vacuum for a new one; the revolving brush never did revolve on it, even right out of the box.  The vacuum loses suction within a minute or two because of the useless filter system.  The Dirt Devil company won't take the unit back, and apparently they can't fix the brush problem, either, based on what I heard from appliance repair centers I contacted for service.  I've already told my daughter that I want my old Dirt Devil back, but she loves it so much that I may have to bribe her to get it out of her hands.  (I told her I'd give her my new one, but she's witnessed the problems I've had and the ineffectiveness of the model, and she said "No deal.")  Save your money--this is a totally useless Dirt Devil model.  The brush doesn't turn and there's no suction to do your cleaning.  If you want to throw away your money, just throw it my way instead of wasting it on this thing.
doesn't  last. I have had my Magic Bullet for a year, using it almost exclusively for mixed drinks. Others are right - forget about using it for onions or garlic or peppers, it chops them too finely, into mush. The pulse action quit working, and I had to toss it. The cup actually became lodged in the motor unit and I had a hard time getting it out. Have finally bought a Tribest, I'll see how that one is.
Picture is confussing. I was confussed by the picture.  I thought I was getting a 54" crate.  Now I have a divider, with no crate. :
Very, very disappointing!. I don't understand this product, the picture and description clearly shows a bottle with a sprout pourer, yet I only received the bottle without the sprout!Careful how you go about ordering this
Yes good for five uses. I am trying to find the warranty info on this product.  Since this product is not inexpensive it should last longer than the maybe 5 times I used it.  Even though I was careful with it the silicone is now split has exposed the metal wisk beneath. This cannot be sanitary as food can get in the crevices there & cause contamination
Malfunction. After a couple months, the humidity became stuck at 20%.  Even holding it by my humidifier didn't help
You get what you pay for - DON'T BUY THIS SET!!. My sister saw the TV ad and ordered the Miracle Blade III Set. Now I knew the said ad and when she told me I was amazed that she once again used TV shopping to buy cheap products who are no good. What can one expect for that price, it's just too good to be true so people should use common sense and be suspicious. And think about the costs of all these TV ads worldwide, they have to calculate that into the price too so one can imagine how much the actual production cost must be; no wonder they let them manufacture somewhere in China!So the Set arrived and my sister used it often and was pleased at first. I'll admit the blades are razorsharp, be cautious when using them at first, but that's about it. After about 4 or 5 months they start to rust and they get dull too. Logos are falling off and they look terrible. The customer support is just plain awful; they didn't respond to several emails and when my sister tried to phone them she couldn't reach anyone besides the answering machine!!! In the end we didn't even try further to use the so called "lifetime warrant" and diposed the set.Stay away from Miracle Blade, do yourself a favour and buy a real quality set, there are plenty around (I won't mention a name) and for 200$ you get a solid set which will really last for a lifetime.Oh, and to other addicted online shoppers: please do some research on the Net before you pick up that phone and place your order. The ads look nice but these are all paid actors like the silly Chief Tony!
Already broken... I purchased this high-end toaster oven because I wanted /needed a proficient smaller oven for smaller baking needs.  After 5 months of moderate usage, however, the middle knob has malfunctioned and it will no longer bake.  Other than that I was satisfied with the product.  I called their customer service and to get it repaired under warranty, will have to ship it at least 250 miles away, at my expense.  What a hassle.  I may just go buy a cheap toaster oven to replace it instead of spending the time and money on postage.  Live and learn....just because a product costs more doesn't mean it's better.
love other KA but this is a loser. I bought myself one of these and used it minimally and was happy.  I then bought one for my daughter.  She used it about 5 times in a little over a year and it quit.  The blade assembly as per other reviews.  It is going to cost about $50. to repair.  Now mine is smelling.  I am using my old 15 year old Oster and it is still working.  Also to my surprise it is doing a better job.  Just not as pretty.  I have KA stand mixer, hand blender, food processors large and small, emersion blender and attachments for all.  Love all of them.  Will buy other KA but not this again
Butter dish not tall enough. It looks nice but the lid touches the top of the butter and sticks to it
well???. this product is not what I expected.  I was hoping that my daughter would like to help me bake......  well she was afraid to touch the mat, especiall when my fingers were burned by it.  I did't like how it worked.
wrong ptcture. The picture is of the 3.2 cubic foot mode
Took a Risk and Losing So Far... I read the reviews on this coffee maker and put it on my Christmas list anyway. I had a lot of trouble getting the carafe lid off and on, to the point where I wondered whether it was even supposed to come off! After only a couple of uses, the rubber seal on the lid broke. I am going to call customer service to see about getting it replaced. I'll update this review if I have any luck.Other than that, I love the look and compact design (I'm the only coffee drinker in my household), and it makes piping hot coffee! Brew process is slower than average, though
Arrived broken. I like this type of opener very much, and wanted to replace another similar model that had lasted a year before failing.  So I opened the package, and tried to open a bottle of wine, but the corkscrew would not lock.  I'm not even sure I'll send it back given the warranty hassle, shipping costs, etc, given the price.  I just can't recommend this brand to anyone
You get what you pay for. While the high end Riedel glasses are very nice, this set didn't even come close to my expectations. I thought I was getting a nice entry-level set of high quality glasses I could give as a gift. What I got was an undersized, clunky set of glasses that I could have gotten for $9.99 from Target. A total disappointment
STOPS WORKING. I bought this to make meaty stews with rice for my dogs.  It works for a while then stops working, or just goes on warm.  They replaced it three times--everytime it went out.  This seems to be common with cheap rice cookers--see the reviews on the RIVAL RCS 200, they all go out within days or weeks!  I guess Black and Decker and Rival used the same Chinaman to design these useless things.  I can't understand why Amazon et al are still selling these when obviously they do NOT work.  The companies will replace them but all replacements go out immediately. In frustration I bought the Aroma 60-cupper for $125--and after two months that also went out.  Any suggestions on a 20-cup rice cooker with longevity would be appreciated
Poorly designed. I wanted to love this, as I bought this on the recommendation of other professional cooks for its zippiness, simplicity, and sharp blades. I am pretty adept in the kitchen, but this tool is unsafe if you decide to use the flimsy finger guard. Also, the blades were not sharp enough to handle hard veggies, such as carrots, gracefully, so I was left struggling trying to jam them across the blade, the finger guard trying its best to go off track each time. The finger guard should be higher and somehow secure better to the track. Worker's comp not worth the risk--I'll stick w/ Bron
They're too darn big. They are huge, and this is not indicated in the product description. Buy them if you want gigantic wine glasses.  I am returning mine
Luck of the draw. We bought three of these when our building's boiler died, and while initially we were really pleased, a month later two out of three of them have died. The first one was clearly not right from the beginning--every time we turned it on, it blew the fuse. Back it went to the store. We figured it was just bad luck, since the other two were fine. But this weekend I went to turn off the second one and felt a huge static-y shock when I touched the button. Later in the day when I went to turn it back on, the light went on but not the fan or heater. It's dead.The third one is still chugging along, so I guess it's ok, but the thermostat never really worked on any of them--we've just used the high/low setting.End result: Don't waste your money. There's no way of knowing if you'll get a dud
Not So Good. This product I bought and not only did the top break when I opened it, the wipes dried within a day so badly I had to reseal in a ziplock bag.  The wipes leave a milky film on my stainless steel refridgerator that I buff off with a mitt designed to clean stainless steel I got from Bed Bath and Beyond.  Alone this product does not work as they say, I don't recommend it
Terrible to open to fill. I have had these salt shakers for over a year.  They are terrible.  It is a fight everytime you want to fill them.  I am buying new ones
Terrible - Horrible - Pillow. This is the absolute worst pillow I have ever used.  I'm sorry I had to spend so much to figure that out.  It is so understuffed, it is like sleeping on a sheet.  It looks so nice and inviting when you see the pillow on the bed, but when you put your head on it, it just sinks down to nothing.  Maybe that is just the fact that it is a down pillow.  Whatever.  I won't buy another
Too Small. This may seem like a good "aquarium," but it is not.  This is FAR too small for a betta.  Pet shops that sell them in tiny bowls do so because they are an inexpensive way to seperate them.  The pet shop conditions are intended to be ony temporary.  My betta is in about a 2.5 gallon tank and is so happy.  He was once in a small bowl and did nothing. Just lay on the gravel.  About a 3 gallon tank will house a much happier fish, and a more entertaining one.  Do not buy this
Look nice, but... These dishes look very nice on your table, but they have many problems.After about a year, my plates started cracking, directly above the ridge on the bottom.  Same with the bowls.I have never been able to use them in the microwave because the item becomes very hot while the food is lukewarm.If they bump each other while running the dishwasher, they chip.  At least, when I put them in they are ok, but they are chipped when I take them out
Nice shelf- But......... This perch is a great size for a large cat or even two cats together.  It is soft and appears to be very comfortable.  However, the way it attaches is by affixing a strip of velcro to your window sill, which then mates with the matching velcro on the bottom of the shelf unit.  There are two adjustable legs that are supposed to give support as they brace against the wall.  My window ledges are not very deep and so the shelf does not sit level.  The legs are adjusted to fit as closely to the wall as possible, however, mine do not move close enough in so that the legs stay securely on the wall and therefore, do not support the shelf properly.  We have tried putting a piece of folded cardboard under the part that sits against the wall, but this hasn't worked either. So unless you have very deep window ledges, this may not work for you. We bought two of these, but plan on returning one.  On a positive note, my cats love the shelf and took to it right away.  It is a great idea, but this one needs a little better design
Don't waste your time or money. Our dogs didn't even notice it.  We have three small terriers and I thought this would be a suitable device for a few house slippers.  I was wrong - the kept on barking..
Lightwedge. Works OK lights up the page a little, but not greatDoesn't work well enought in the dark
not what I asked for. I thought that I had found the perfect gift for my mother.The description provided was not what I got. When I received my package there were two problems. First, the storage box that I received, while still very beautiful, was not what was pictured nor as big as what was pictured. Secondly, I received no flatware. I immediately called and a new set was sent to me. . same problem...wrong box, no flatware. So I had to send them both back and can't even get the item because no one knows why the error kept occurin
Will not last!!. This waffle maker broke at the two hinge pins within one year of purchase.  Parts are not available.  Top is hinged to bottom with two small plastic caps that are poorly made at best.  Unable to repair had to throw it out
broken. We received it broken..I don't have the oriinal box to send it and don't know what to do so just bought another one in a local stor
The worst Coffee Machine EVER. I bought this because I liked the idea of having the water filter inside. You can't find replacement filters. You can't measure the water correctly. I tried just pouring water in from a cup. That didn't work because it goes right into the water filter so it looks like it is at level 3 when it is more.The last straw was the other day as the water started to brew through the basket, the basket sprang open. I had water everywhere. It also seems to take a while to brew a small pot of coffee. I usually made a 3 or 4 cup pot and it took 8 minutes. I will never buy a coffee pot from this company again.
Ratings- Miracle Blade Knives. The knives are "ok". Could get just as good knives at WalMart.The warranty service is TERRIBLE! You will be saddened to know that you'll have to wait upwards of 2 months (maybe longer) to get your replacement knives. I have placed multiple phone calls to the customer service, only to state that they have not been shipped yet. (of course, the $5.00 shipping charge was IMMEDIATELY billed to my account). I would reccommend as a fellow consumer not to waste your time with these knives. Spend a few extra dollars and get a much better knife, all the meanwhile, not having to deal with the warranty/replacement "guarntee". You'll be upset.
just ok one bowl was broken. The larger of the bowls was broken when I recieved it so it was not packet very well. I have used the smaller bowl and loved it.
falls apart. poor quality.  Feathers everywhere.  I normally dont write reviews, but I strongly suggest you do not get this
Mold. Throughout the years I have used and owned many different versions of the Brita Pitcher Water Dispenser. All of these filtered water containers have been great. The only complaint I have ever had with these filters is size. The Brita Ultramax Water Filter Dispenser was supposed to answer this problem. Unfortunately due to bad design, it introduced a multitude of problems that never existed with past Brita products.Pro:Size: This water dispenser can definitely hold a lot of water. (Ironically, this is really a disadvantage; as you will find below.)Con(s):Mold: If you do not let this filter dry within a maximum of two days, you will get mold. This mold will probably make you ill (sore throat) (Conversely if you look at it from another point of view - it will strengthen your immune system). To avoid this problem, the water dispenser should be washed every week at very least (to safe you should wash it more often). I have never had this problem with Brita's other products (I have friends who never washed their Brita pitchers for months, and there is not even the slightest sign of mold when they do wash it).Left Over Water: Due to the faulty design of the product, there will be left over water both above the filter and below it. Besides turning the product upside down, you cannot dispense all of the water. This is just stupid and hints at the lack of quality assurance testing of this product. Not surprisingly, this helps further contribute to mold growth.Conclusion:Save your money and buy Brita's other well designed pitchers or even Pure's pitchers. (The key word is pitcher.) You will only waste time and possibly your health with this poorly designed product
absolute garbage. This is not even a toy.  DO NOT waste your money on this item.  Amazon will charge you to send it back which is what most will do if you expect even the lowest standards in a "quick" machine.  Nothing about this machine functions well.  Never got an even stitch or a complete row of stitches.  Amazon should not carry this item, it has lowered the quality of Amazon's products in my view
So disapointed. After reading the reviews on this product I thought it would be a great space heater for my apt.  I couldn't have been more wrong.  It barely gets hot - even on the highest setting - and gives off almost no heat!!Perhaps mine is defective or got broken during shipping, but it was a huge waste of money.  I have had to go out an buy another space heater already.It is so frustrating.  One word - don't!
A Complete Misrepresentation. This is NOT a 3 qt. tea kettle. It clearly says on the box 2 1/2 quarts. I returned it
Inconsistency. This is made in China, not Germany. It is an exuberant amount to pay for a product that did not cost much to make
Ignore the star rating. Amazon can't seem to acquire and ship this item. If you would like this item to actually arrive then get it somewhere else. I've been waiting since late January
Not a happy customer. I can put up with the weight, the noise, the poorly located on-off switch, the spinning brush that is cool but doesn't work. What I cannot put up with is how touchy it is to put the cannister back on. It will appear to be on correctly, but if not, the dust collects in the top part of the cannister and will block suction. This creates an unmanageable mess when you try to empty the cannister.Buy something else, I can't wait for this one to die
Manufacturer would not exchange defective item. I received the CitriStar juicer, and immediately after opening it, found that, about 25% of the time, the motor would buzz instead of engaging and rotating.When I called Tribest, they told me firmly that I needed to press down on it using a citrus fruit instead of my hand, and then it would work properly. This turned out to not be true (not surprising, as the juicer does not appear to include sensors and circuitry to insure that the object pressing on it is a citrus juicer instead of, say, a couple of fingers). I called them back, and they said that I could only return it, under warranty, after registering the product. I did this, and called them back yet again. I was then told that they would examine it for possible warranty repair or replacement. When I told them that it was defective right out of the box, and that I did not want a repaired defective item, but a new item, they informed me that they simply don't do exchanges under any circumstances, and that they could not help me. I am currently taking care of this via my credit card company.The thing is, I really liked the product based on its description, more powerful motor, and so on. If only it worked as advertised, or was cheerfully replaced with one that worked as advertised. Oh well
Mess, Mess, Mess. I don't understand how anyone cooks with this. It blows out an immense amount of gooey steam water! I cooked brown rice, followed directions exactly, even soaking for an hour first. It was only 2/3's of the capacity, but it blew junk out the sides of the lid and out of the little blowhole and left a large puddle of gooey rice water around and under itself. A MAJOR mess.I haven't even tasted the rice. So what if it's good? You can't cook with an appliance like this unless you put it in a giant sink or outdoors somewhere. What in the world is the deal? I don't even know if I can clean it up enough to return it....
Not a safe collar. I bought one of these for my small cat.  When I looked the collar over I found I was able to pull on one of the two adjustable portions and the collar tightened.  While that is good for adjusting size, it also would choke the cat if just this part of the collar was snagged.  I tossed it
The color sticks!!. I got these sheets and was very pleased with them at first. After a couple of days I observed color sticking to everything around. The worst, it painted my matress in RED color!! I tried my best to remove the color but it wont go away. Now I found the best place for these sheets - in the attic
Lot different to the Actual photographs shown on site. I was really impressed by looking at the pictures but when i recieved the product it was totally different. The material looks different and it was a used product
Naturewood teakettle. Although it looks very nice, this item is a failure.I found it to rust inside after about a month.Once rusted, no matter how you clean it, it will rerust.I have quite a few items from the "Naturewood" collection as it is our pattern and this item is one of the rare bad items
Pet Paw Chime. In December 2002, I purchased the pet chime and paw &amp; two additional paws.  I was extremely satisfied with them until the past couple of weeks.  In the past couple of weeks 2 paws have stopped working for unknown reasons and repeated emails and phone calls have gone unanswered by Lentek.  They're great, IF THEY WORK
Not worth the money - - look for something more solid. This product is a great idea, unfortunately the design is just really poor. Installation went pretty smooth, the problem is that the thing is really unstable. It flexes, bends and wobbles - basically it's just not supported very well. To add insult, the cover that came with it doesn't fit. I'd strongly recommend you look for one of those mini table top irons if you want something to do touch ups
Worked great--at first. We've had this vacuum less than a year. This Bissell worked great for the first few weeks then the pedal that holds it upright broke. Then it started losing suction despite emptied canisters and cleaned filters. We also notices a fine layer of dust on vacuum no matter how many times we wiped it clean. Now, the motor is acting up. I even changed the belt, though it looked fine, without any results. I'm afraid it will catch on fire because of how fast the motor is running now--it makes a sickly high-pitched whine. Our only choices are to have it repaired or buy a different brand. We're thinking of going with a Dyson or a Kenmore now
marvelous cookware set. I love the cookware set.  12 pans to do 12 different meals.  They are very durable and holds up well to the heat
Misleading... The picture shows pillow cases and another sheet but this only comes with 1 fitted sheet
not worth the price. The Down from the comforter is coming out,causing lot of discomfort and allergy......
Just pass this one on by... I admit that the cup sizes and the reservoir are great.  But the coffee tastes like plastic.  This is not good.  I took this back the next day.
Zero Stars for a Complete Rip Off. This can opener is complete garbage.Other reviews have told the story about how this thing does not work. I tried it three times, each time with new batteries, and it grunted to a stop after a millisecond.Had to battle with the thing all three times, twisting and turning the stupid can opener to free it from its grasp on the side of the can. The seam broke and leaked juice all over the counter.The "handy" screw to back the can opener up, was of very little use.You are better off with a cheap electric can opener any time, or a hand crank can opener.With this device, you might as well throw 20-bucks out on the lawn.This piece of garbage ended up in the garbage.Completely worthless.DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY
Kind of tricky to use... I bought the shark with hopes that it would save my kitchen and bathroom from hard to reach grime and stains that wouldn't come off any other way. It was sadly only a mediocre help to my housework. The shark does a good job of removing the grime that lives around faucet handles and in the jam of the refrigerator, but I found it totally useless when trying to clean the stove, or any expanse of tiles that was more than three or four inches. The process of cleaning takes so long, a person would go mad before they cleaned all of the tiles in the bathroom! I was thrilled to buy this product, but it didn't live up to my hopes and dreams
poorly built. I bought this power mop for my daughter for Christmas, and it broke the first time she used it
Poorly designed kitchen item. The silicone splatter screen itself is about twice as effective as a traditional splatter screen, but the removable handle is very unstable and does not stay attached to the screen.  This design flaw basically makes the device unusable.The label accompanying the splatter screen notes that, "The handle is specially shaped for comfort and to assure a good grip - the removable handle does not heat up during cooking - the removable handle makes the screen easy to store."  These statements may be true, but if the handle doesn't stay attached to the screen then using the screen poses a threat of grease burns or worse. Frankly, I don't feel this device rates even one star.
not worth the money. Not only did this product have no effect on the manic barking of our own dogs, but the company also refused to provide a refund/replacement after the product arrived with a broken chunk out of the cheap plastic casing.  After sitting out in a rainstorm, the Super Bark Stop shorted out and is now totally worthless.  Find another product - You'll thank me later
Just an FYI - not a long lasting product. I bought this product for our home office. When I plugged it in - it popped and started smoking. Apparently the fan motor "blew". I did get a free replacement from the Sharper Image store, but didn't get around to getting it out of the box and up in the office for several months. I finally did and although it made quite a bit of noise and there was condensation inside - it was better than walking up and down the stairs for something cool to drink. However, after just three months - I started to smell something burnt in our office and low and behold - it was this frig. I'm assuming the fan motor went out again. You might be better off looking into another product
Food Crusher and Sprayer. Worst product ever...don't know how it passed through initial testing.  When you turn the crank to dispense cereal, it crushes it and sprays it ALL OVER the room.  Awful, just awful.  Too embarrassed to even give it away so put it in the trash.  Waste of money and space.  And we tried dog food, which is too hard for it to crush so it just got stuck.  Really made me angry that I wasted the money.  False advertising.
needs frequent brew seal replacement. We have been enjoying a cup of Capuccino every single morning for at least 9 years. Our old model broke and needed to be replaced. We chose the Krups XP 4000 based on it's 15 bar pump setting and because our previous very old machines were from Krups and we were happy with them.What a dissapointment! Yes, it works, but the pump is very LOUD. The biggest problem is that the Brew Head seal needs to be replaced frequently (part 620342).We got our machine in May 2006 and make 2 cups each morning. We are at our 3rd (!) seal; that's a seal replacement roughly every couple months. One needs a very short srewdriver to do this. I would never buy this machine again, wish I never had and regret I didn't return it when I still could.
A big dissapointment. If you're of Italian heritage and you grate a lot of cheese, don't waste your time with this one.  When the quantity of cheese in the grater gets low, it tends to be very difficult to turn.  It also didn't last as long as I expected.  Try a different one instead
Buyer beware... Amazon advertized three used and one new Dyson...  What would you think?  I thought I was purchasing a "new" Dyson from Amazon as seller.  When it arrived it was the reconditioned unit-- I am 63 years old-- (health not great) and old hands tore the box up getting it open-- don't have the resources to get another box and wrappings to return.  Stuck-- hope it works and last a long time.  Very disappointed in Amazon advertising. Buyer beware..
Arrived chipped/broken. I, too, received this item with chipped corners, scratches, and broken pieces. Unfortunately, the cost & hassle of shipping it back is not worth it, so we'll have to live with the damage.It's a nice-looking desk otherwise, but beware that the keyboard drawer does not fold down completely and may cause problems typing on the keyboard for long periods of time
I should have spent a bit more to get a better one!. Not too happy with this small pizza stone--before I ordered this one for a long time I had a set of flat bricks in my oven that were made for pizza baking and bread baking.  I couldnt find these bricks again--I had them for a long time and they were cracked and hard to clean by now BUT they were so much better than this small round stone!  My bricks made my pizza crust so crispy--and this stone is a poor substitute for this!  My bricks were square and made a beautiful large square on my shelf--if anyone knows what I am writing about--PLS email me and let me know where these set of bricks can be found and their name!  I am not happy with this pizza set-the rack is of no use--the pizza cutter is a cheap one--they really should put the money into making a better product than giving extras
NOT Impressed!. I bought the med. and XL size beds for my 2 dogs.  They both had about the same amount of stuffing making the medium bed nice and fluffy, but the extra large bed is flat and the stuffing moves around so much inside it my dog ends up lying on the hard floor with the stuffing out at the edges.  Trying to wash them was another headache!  The first time i opened the medium bed to wash it, the zipper came apart (it wasn't fastened together at the end so the pull came right off) and cannot be fixed!  I had to permanently sew it together to keep my dog from pulling at it and chewing on the edges=fixed the problem, but now impossible to wash.  Also the interior did not hold up in the dryer.  Even on low heat the lining melted and stuffing was everywhere! Again i had to sew the holes together.  I will say that the beds' covers are attractive (i ordered the suede paw print) and the hair vacuums off of them nicely.  But i will never order these beds again when they need to be replaced, which will now be sooner than originally anticipated
It is not microwave safe. One of the plate I bought broken during a 50 seconds medium heat  microwaving, so I doubt it is really good for microwave. When I called Lenox, their rep. simply asked if I want to order a replacement from them as if the bad quality was not their problem. Disguesting.The design pattern was nice though
A Piece of Junk. I purchased this device specifically to juice wheatgrass. First of all, the suction cup at the bottom is worthless and the clamp is clumsily engineered and can only be used on a counter with a BIG lip on it, which in my kitchen, is in front of the dishwasher with the dishwasher's door open, which looks rediculous.  Then, in order to get any yield whatsoever, one must crank then reverse then crank again to have anything come out of the tiny hole near the crank (another design flaw.) On top of this, it takes almost a whole 18x24" tray of wheatgrass just to make two one ounce shots, and that is with the compression cap screwed on the end. Something is wrong here...they only use half that amount at Wild Oats with their Champion juicers. Juice leaks out the handle, out the front and everywhere else except where it's supposed to go...in the cup. After doing this a few times and making a HUGE mess of grass clippings, green (staining) juice all over my countertop and me and a tedious 20 minutes to set it up, juice the grass and clean up, it's better I just stay with going to the local juice bar and spending the three bucks. I know I should not be angry because "you get what you pay for" but geez, this device was endorsed by the Hippocrates Health Institute and I trusted that endorsement
save your money. My cats have showed no interest whatsoever in this toy. But I think if I remove the corrugated and ball I'll have a nice palette for mixing paints
don't waste your time. honestly, i tried to find something good to say about this vacumn cleaner. alas, i could not find a big enough positive that would offset all the negatives.the predominant minus is the heat factor, this unit gets way too hot! as with any size motor, overheating will drastically reduce the motor life. the hepa filter may be a good thing, but the constant cleaning of it is time consuming and messy.it is cheaply made, definitely not built to last very long. i could say more,but i believe the overheating aspect should convince most folks not to waste their time or money on this unit
If you're willing to pay this much, get a full-automatic machine. I checked out this machine at a local store.  It's little more than a basic drip coffee maker bundled with a basic espresso machine.  For that functionality it would be far cheaper to buy those two things separately.Regarding this Delonghi machine, on the drip coffee side, metallic coffee filters are a royal pain to work with-- paper filters are far easier to use when disposing of coffee grounds.  On the espresso side, you have to grind the beans and tamp them into the strainer for each cup you make, and then empty the strainer when you're done.  The optional filter pods are a really expensive way to buy ground coffee. For only a bit more money ($500 or so) you can get a full automatic espresso/cappuccino maker. I bought a full-automatic several years ago and my family loves it! Full-automatics grind the beans for each cup, they make excellent American-style coffee as well (simply by increasing the amount of water pushed through the coffee), and you dispose of grounds once a week.  The only disadvantage of full-automatics is that like every espresso machine, they do only one or two cups at a time.  So if you want to make more than two cups of drip coffee at once, you'll need a plain old coffee maker like the right-hand side of the Delonghi
Piece of JUNK with a neat name. This isn't even worth it if you can get it for half the cost!I recently bought the DC15 All Floors model for $295...SCOREThis vacuum is fantastic.I really wanted that turbo tool though.That would turn my "all floors" into an "animal", I had to have it, I had to see for myself, even after all the single star,bad reviews given here.It just couldn't be that bad..Well it's junk, I defiantely (yes defiantly) saw for myself...You will do much better using the 3 tools that came with the vacuum and are readily available on board.The Turbo Tool does stop when it touches the intended cleaning surface.The suction isn't there either with the filter on the side and the holes in the adapter area.If you didn't waste your money yet, DON'T!
Not interested without addititves. I bought this product because of the great reviews, but my cat was totally uninterested in this toy. He loves other toys similar to this one, but just was not interested in the bouncy pieces of card board at the end of this toy. I went ahead and attached a feather to it and that peaked his interest, but he still prefers the ones on the rod rather than this wire. I guess it just depends on the cat
Aeroccino is an unreliable gadget. When Aeroccino works, it works great. It is quick and quiet, and produces excellent foam. Clean up is very easy. But, there is something inherently unstable about Aeroccino machines.  Since August, I managed to kill three of them and I am not sure why. Part of it is the nature of the machine: because it is constructed like a water kettle, one should not submerge it into water.  But because it is designed to heat milk, the manufacturer allows putting it under running water as long as the bottom of the machine remains dry. If you get the bottom wet (and you will), the machine either trips (and heals itself after fully drying) or dies. I suspect, my first two Aeroccinos died such deaths.  My third one died today.  I frothed milk with it, refilled it and tried again (without cleaning in between) and the machine did not work.  I tried again and it worked for 20 seconds and stopped. I tried again a couple hours later and it worked for 10 seconds and stopped. I am not sure why it is so, but I suspect it has to do with the magnetic foaming brushes you must insert into the machine to make it work. If anyone has ideas why this is so, let me know.On the positive side I keep calling the company and they keep sending me new machines. I really like Aeroccino when it works. But I suspect it will be the good old microwave when I finally run out of warranty.
Doesn't fit. It needs to be further specified which models this fits. Not mine
DON'T BUY!. Doesn't work too well.  Watch out for factory serviced/reconditioned stuff
Liner breaks easily 4 of 5 shattered within 12 month period. after owning a number of thermos' and other insulated bottles, this is the best at maintaining temperature and the easiest to break!parts are available thru zojirushi web site but with shipping and cost of gasket and liner ($3.90 and $8.60, respectively), cheaper to get another carafe.  after buying 5 total during the past year, i'm down to my last one.  thats it, going to another manufacturer.I did prechill the carafe before filling with ice-water and ice.  i put a cup of cold water in the bottle after a prechill of an hour.  Followed carefully with ice.  Upon putting the 1st cube in the bottle, the glass liner loudly shattered.  I have never seen liners break so easily.  I did notice on the last bottle i have left, before using it, the glass liner was rather loose in the carafe.  i took it apart, and hand tightened everything.  so far okay. this is the last carafe i'll buy that is zorirushi made
cheap. I thought I was getting a good deal and a good product at a cheap price, but instead I got what a paid for and nothing more.  Cheap product at a cheap price.  Only used a few times, literally 2-3 times, then one time when my girlfriend put the glass down on the table it broke and wine went everywhere.  Luckily we acted quickly or else a bunch of carpet would have been ruined.  They feel really cheap too.  If you only want to use them a few times, get them, I know we will never get these again
USELESS...... I rate this negative five stars. I just purchased it, thinking, after reading all the reviews, that it was great. What a crock!!!! It's absolutely worthless. It DOES NOT clean the water. It's been plugged in for a whole day and the water is absolutely filthy. The water flows and the motor is running, the charcoal is in place but it doesn't clean the water. I'm better off with a bowl that I clean every day. This thing just swishes around dirty water. Don't waste your money
cat sitter 2 is for the birds... I bought Cat Sitter1 for my 3 cats, they enjoyed it so much I gave Cat Sitter 2 a go. What a disappointment!!They were bored within 5 minutes of it being on!  The entire dvd is of birds and only birds as compared to Cat Sitter 1 that has a variety of animals that catches the cats attention span in short segments. Trust me, if you have to choose between the two, don't spend your money on on CS2, however, it may appeal to the (human) avid bird watcher...(?)
BEWARE. This unit can only dry HALF of what it can wash, which is not that much.  It takes a total of 4 1/2 hours to do one load of laundry if you only put 11lbs of wash in.  I have a family of five and I am over-run with laudry because of this machine!!
This product sucks. If I could enter a 0 for this product I would.  The back of the matress pad is slippery and moves when you turn in bed.  Also the binding around the sides is non-existed.  This is by all means the worse product that I have purchased at Amazon,co
invisible splatter screen. I was told by the manufacturer that they could not send me this screen aad so have not received any splatter screen.
BEWARE, TAKE CARE, DO NOT BUY THIS ITEM - NO!. I HAVE OWNED...6 ESPRESSO MACHINES THAT I CAN RECALL IN MY LIFE.1 GAGGIA, A HEAVY ITALIAN MACHINE WHICH I SHOULD HAVE TAKEN MUCH BETTER CARE OF - WHICH MEANS WIPING OFF THE STEAM NOZZLE WHEN STEAMING MILK ALONG WITH RUNNING THE STEAMER WHILE WIPING, AND DECALCIFING WITH VINEGAR WHICH IS SMELLY BUT UNCLOGS MINERAL SEDIMENTS WHICH PRECIPITATE IN THE WORKINGS OF THE MACHINE.  THESE STEPS MUST BE PERFORMED ON ALL ESPRESSO MACHINES PERIOD CASE CLOSED.  THE GAGGIA I BELIEVE I GAVE AWAY OR THREW AWAY.1 PROTEO GRANDE, ANOTHER HEAVY ITALIAN MACHINE WHICH I NEGLECTED TO DECALCIFY BUT SIMPLY STORED AWAY 10 YEARS AGO.I HAVE ALSO OWNED 4 KRUPS MACHINES.  2 OF THESE KRUPS WERE THE VERY INEXPENSIVE VARIETY THAT LACKED A PUMP, BOTH OF WHICH FAILED BECAUSE THE PRESSURE VESSEL FOR STEAM BEGAN TO LEAK AND OVERHEAT.1 KRUPS MACHINE, A PUMP MACHINE MODEL 968 WORKED VERY VERY WELL FROM DECEMBER 1999 THRU FEBRUARY 2006.  MODEL 968 MADE EXCEPTIONAL ESPRESSO: (YOU GOT A VERY NICE CREMA LAYER AT THE END OF THE DRAW).  SIMPLY BECAUSE A LITTLE HANDLE IN FRONT WHICH SELECTED WHETHER OR NOT YOU WANTED STEAM, OR FLOWING WATER SNAPPED OFF, I WAS FORCED TO USE A KITCHEN KNIFE IN THE GROOVE LEFT BY THE SNAPPED OFF SELECTOR BUTTON, AND BECAUSE THIS CAUSED THE MECHANISM ITSELF TO PREMATURELY WEAR MADE THE UNIT UNUSABLE.UNUSABLE IS WHAT KRUPS XP 4000 IS, FOR SOME REASONS NOT PREVIOUSLY STATED.1.  ATTENTION XP4000 USERS: TAKE THE PLASTIC WATER STORAGE UNIT OUT AND CHECK THE BOTTOM OF THE UNIT.  MOST LIKELY YOU WILL SEE 1/4 TO 1/2 INCH OR MORE OF WATER THAT HAS LEAKED FROM THE WATER INTAKE VALVE.  NOW WITH THE MACHINE OFF! COOL! AND ALL WATER TRAYS AND TOP AND BOTTOM GRILLS REMOVED SIMPLY TURN THE UNIT OVER 90 DEGREES AND DUMP THE WATER OUT.  REPLACE THE PLASTIC WATER STORAGE UNIT, AND EVERYTHING ELSE.  THEN USE 'NORMALLY' IF YOU CAN FOR A FEW DAYS OR A WEEK.  THEN TAKE THE WATER STORAGE OUT AGAIN AND CHECK FOR WATER SEEPAGE AND LEAKAGE INTO THE MAIN PLASTIC HOUSING.  YOU SHOULD FIND THE SAME LEAKAGE PROBLEM.THIS IS AN UNACCEPTABLE DESIGN DEFECT WHICH PREVENTS WATER FROM COOLING THE BOILER, AND SERVICING THE STEAMER.2. AS WITH ALL THE OTHER REVIEWS THE STEAMER SIMPLY LEAKS A DRIBBLE OF HOT WATER, NOT ENOUGH TO MELT ICE.  IF YOU LEFT A PITCHER OF COLD MILK UNDER THE STEAMER AND RETURNED 15 MINUTES LATER YOU'D HAVE: WATERY LUKEWARM MILK!3. OTHER REVIEWS STATED THAT THE FROTH STEAMER ATTACHMENT CONSTITUTES A HAZARD AS IT FLYS OFF UNEXPECTANTLY.  KRUPS MODEL 968 HAD A SIMILAR ATTACHMENT WHICH I REMOVED AND THREW AWAY.WITH MODEL 968, THE STEAMER WORKED VERY VERY WELL WITHOUT THE FROTH ATTACHMENT FOR 6 YEARS.  OCCASIONALLY IT WOULD CLOG UP AND I'D TAKE THE END OF A SAFETY PIN TO UNCLOG IT, OR I WOULD SIMPLYUNSCREW THE PLASTIC HOUSING: IT WOULD REMOVE NICELY AND I'D PLACE THE STEAMER NIPPLE IN SOME HOT WATER AND VINEGAR OVERNITE,AND THE STEAMER WOULD PERFORM PRETTY NICELY.  NOTE: THIS IS MODEL 968 NOT XP 4000.  DO NOT TRY TO UNSCREW THE BLACK STEAM NIPPLE FROM XP 4000 SEE NOTE BELOW!!!YOU MAY USE XP4000 WITHOUT THE FROTH ATTACHMENT, AND IT WILL STEAM MILK OKAY, BUT IT MUST BE FUSSED WITH POKING THE HOLE IN THE BLACK STEAM NIPPLE OVER AND OVER AGAIN. BUT:--FREQUENTLY HOWEVER STEAM PRESSURE GOES DOWN SO LOW YOU HAVE TO PUT THE SELECTOR KNOB TO THE 90 DEGREE POSITION, ALLOW WATER TO FILL IN THE MACHINE AGAIN, CLICK OVER TO 'HEAT UP', THEN WHEN THE LITE GOES OFF YOU MAY CONTINUE STEAMING.KRUPS XP-4000 IS A PERFECT EXCUSE FOR BEING LATE TO WORK, OR ANYWHERE ELSE IF YOU CANNOT LEAVE THE HOUSE WITHOUT YOUR LATTE.  AND I WILL NOT LEAVE THE HOUSE TO GO TO STARBUCKS FOR ANY REASON WHATSOEVER UNLESS MY MACHINE FAILS.  WHICH IT DID!NOTE:  XP 4000 CANNOT HAVE IT'S RUBBER NIPPLE UNSCREWED, YOU ARE FORCED TO STICK A SAFETY PIN OR OTHER SHARP OBJECT IN IT TO UNCLOG THE MILK STEAMER.  THE HOLE IN THE NIPPLE ITSELF IS MUCH TOO SMALL: IT IS SMALL TO OVERCOMPENSATE FOR THE LACK OF PRESSURE FROM THE PUMP, KIND OF A WISHFUL DESIGN INTEGRATION TECHNIQUE WHICH FAILS OH SO MISERABLY!3.MY XP 4000 STARTED LEAKING MASSIVE AMOUNTS OF WATER AFTER LESS THAN 45 DAYS OF USE.  I SENT IT TO A LOCAL KRUPS REPAIR FACILITY AND I IMAGINE I'LL EITHER GET ANOTHER XP4000 OR THEY MIGHT HAVE THE COMMON SENSE TO DISCONTINUE THE XP4000 AS A BAD DESIGN MISTAKE FROM BEGINNING TO END IF ANYONE UP THERE LIKES ME, AND KRUPS MIGHT UPGRADE ME TO THE MORE EXPENSIVE XP4050.SO NOW YOU HAVE IT.SO THERE I WAS ESPRESSOFIEND WITH NO JAVA, AND I'D RATHER PULL OUT MY FINGERNAILS THAN GO INTO STARBUCKS FOR LATTE.  ONLY I CAN MAKE THE PERFECT LATTE.  WHICH EXPLAINS WHY I AM SINGLE!SO, I TOOK OUT MY 10 YEAR OLD PROTEO GRANDE FROM UNDER MY SINK WHERE IT HAD BEEN STORED FOR 10 YEARS, AND SAID A PRAYER WHILE CLEANING THE COBWEBS OFF AND DECALSIFYING, ANDWOULDN'T YOU KNOW IT: IT WORKS!  JUST FINE!  BUT THEN AGAIN, THATIS WHAT I'D EXPECT FROM A HEAVY ITALIAN MACHINE.MORAL: IF YOU WANT TO SAY BYE-BYE TO STARBUCKS FOREVER, AND BREW THE PERFECT LATTE OVER AND OVER AGAIN, SPEND AT LEAST $200 ON A QUALITY ITALIAN MACHINE.  KRUPS DOES MAKE NICE COFFEEMAKERS, EVERY ONCE IN A WHILE.WHEW!  I HOPE THIS HELPS SOMEBODY!
Tropix 16 oz. Dolphin Tumblers-Set of 4 16 OUNCE-SET OF4 4 Piece Set. One of the tumblers was broken when received. Overall, they are as advertized, but smaller than expected and are not used very often.
Great pottery, ruined expectations by Macy's. We love Fiesta Ware pottery.  This is a quality product made of tough clay with well matched durable glaze. Because of this and its famous assortment of sumptious colors, I will buy it every time.  However, when buying this product from Macy's I found the following to be true:1.) Items or colors listed as in stock and shipping (the pizza plate for example)get listed as backordered after you purchase and languish for months before the order is inexplicably canceled.2.) Items that are seconds quality being sold as first quality. On average, 10% of our orders included slay slubs, glaze missing in spots and other imperfections.3.) Range of products severely limited4.) Color choice from available range severly limited.So, in short, buy Fiesta Ware. A quality product, made in the United States, of charming beauty--but reconsider Macy's as your Amazon supplier
Not happy with "silverwear marks". I bought a huge set of these, some from Amazon and some from Marshall Fields. Unfortunately, the plates and smaller dishes began to show tons of silvery/gray marks from silverwear almost immediately. I was so dissappointed that I asked at Marshall Fields and the employee said that the glaze is not thick enough on the stoneware and that she had heard similar complaints from others. The only way to get it off (and not even completely) is to scrub them for a long time with "BarKeepers Friend" or a similar powder. I thought I was going to have this set forever, but I'm now shopping for something new. I'm almost embarrassed to serve company with them. The plates are quite big and rather heavy. But the shape of the bowls and cups are nice. Too bad
Don't do it save your money. I was sent a pacific coast brand comforter filled with about three feathers in it.Don't waste your money you'll just end up paying extra to return it
Whoa! Don't even think about it!. Buy the "Office Fish Tank" only if you want to end up sitting around at work and watching your dead fish float around at the top!This "tank" doesn't even hold a full gallon of water. The "decorations" take up an ungodly amount of space in it and have sharp edges which can be harmful to your fish. You can't just "rinse and refill" an aquarium either. You need to treat the water first, or you'll kill your fish even faster. But maybe that would be a blessing for it, when compared to having to live in those conditions?If you're going to spend 25-30 dollars on a fish tank, just go to Wal-Mart and buy their 10 gallon kit! It's not much more expensive, and your fish will be MUCH happier with you!
I think it sucks!. The Design of this knife is HORRIBLE!  Not all people are as careful as they want to and we know what we will get (painful cut!). This brand is not taking people's security into consideration. The corner close to the handle is general really sharp and some items even have a curve that is making it worse.I am really unsatisfied that the sharpness of this brand's collection is good enough while you may get a few stitches on your skin easily
SAVE YOUR MONEY !. STILL CAN'T FIGURE OUT WHAT THIS SCISSOR CUTS ..............IT SURELY IS NOT POULTRY, OR MEAT OR FISH................I WILL HAVE TO TRY IT ON PAPER BUT THEN I DIDN'T NEED ANOTHER PAPER SCISSOR !!!!!
Very dissapointed with this Power Mop. I was very disspointed in this product. It is much heavier than I thought. The scrubber head moves as described but doesn't remove dirt from crevices with any efficiency. A sponge and elbow grease would do the job faster.  The bottle that contains the liquid gets jammed so the liquid is unable to squirt on to the floor. The lever that switches the mop head to scrubber is awkward and retracts at times.  There isn't a good thing to say about it
Dangerous!. I purchased this toy for a friend's dog a while back. The dog loved it, he played with it non-stop (quack! quack!). When he finally destroyed it though we were shocked. Inside of this toy in addition to the stuffing we found a rubber band and parts of a plastic bag. My friend was fortunate enough to get the toy away from the dog before he could consume these items. We did complain to the manufacturer who said they'd look into it, but I would still be wary of this toy.I think this would be a great toy for a dog that loves it's toys, but doesn't rip them to shreds! There is no guarantee that what you find inside will be safe!
Not The Best.... This is a neat food storage idea, but the quality of this product leaves alot to be desired.  Although this was very easy to put together, it is shaky and doesn't seem very sturdy once the food is in the containers.  The flexible plastic (it's like a silicone material) that is in the bottom of the container that "controls" the portions that come out actually crush some pieces of cereal (I used Multi-Grain Cheerios and also Cocoa Crispies).  The top is just a loosely snapped on top.  I thought it would have more of an air-tight seal.  There is a small flexible plastic cover to put on the bottom of the container (where the cereal comes out) and that seems to have good seal, too bad they didn't do the same type for the top.  As a side note, the one I received appreared to be more of an off-white than white.I'm still going to use the product - my little girls love seeing their cereal in the containers and having it like a candy dispenser.  If (or when) it breaks, I don't plan on replacing it.  I'll go back to using the Rubbermaid/Tupperware containers
do not buy. I suggested better than this vacuum.1. Buy balloons. (balloons are much cheaper than this vacuum.2. make round balloons on the carpet (dust will be attached by balloon because of static electricity)That's it. this is more clean and much faster, and much cheaper.
Weak Product and Wretched Customer Service. The problem with this product is two-fold. First, the washable center plate is fragile and can break easily.  Second, the company's customer support is terrible.  I ordered a replacement from the Cuisinart Webstore, but they did not pack it properly so it was broken during shipping.  They refunded the price of the plate ($10), but would not refund the shipping and handling ($5.95) or the return shipping for the plate broken because of their poor packing ($8.45).  I would not recommend buying any products from them.  I am out $14.40 and have nothing to show for it except my original cracked plate.  I contacted several departments of theirs and received no reply
Won't make thick froth so don't bother. I purchased this BonJour frother to replace my old AeroLatte frother.  The difference between the two brands is startling!  The BonJour frothing tip is a solid wavy metal tip which actually OVER-froths the milk.  This causes the bubbles to keep breaking down.  I can only achieve a very thin layer of foam and it won't last long.  On the othe hand, the Aerolatte frothers(also widely available with several models on Amazon) uses more of an open-metal mesh tip on their wand which must be responsible for how thick and dense a foam it will create.  I'm buying another Aerolatte and will use the BonJour wand for things that don't need thick foam (like mixing salad dressing)
I've hated this can opener - twice!. My entire kitchen is Kitchenaid. I bought this can opener three years ago. It was awful...difficult to use, shredded the paper at the top of the can's label, and was very difficult to get started. Because I love Kitchenaid products so much, I assumed that this was just a defective can opener, threw it away, and bought another. The second one was even worse! It worked okay the first couple of times, but now it barely cuts at all. It grinds the top of the can, making dents, but won't actually make a cut. Once I can get it started, I cannot finish it because it "messes up" the can pretty badly. This one is going in the garbage as well. :
Large Burner Failed. Large burner failed after about 12 months use.  I opened it up the wire between the plug and the resistor had burned.  Not only is it broken, it is a fire hazard.  I lost all the paperwork that came with it and I probably voided the warranty by opening it.  I think I can fix it but I am not going to risk a fire, so I will try another brand
Looking for a Waffle Iron? Don't stop here!. What happened to the research & devolpment team for the Cuisinart WAF-R Traditional Waffle Iron? They must be out eating waffles at the notorious Waffle Lady house of Waffles. The noise this waffle iron makes when your waffle is done sounds like a smoke alarm going off and oops, they forgot a volume control. You will burn your hand on the handle. If you put in too much batter, plan on the batter going in to the many cracks and crevices the design team thought they would add just for annoynance sake. The waffles we made turned out flatter than any pancake we'd ever made. Boo, hiss. Come on Cuisinart, you can do better than this
disappointing. I was so excited to receive such a beautiful pan for Xmas. However, if my experience today is representative of how this pan performs, I won't be using it often.The literature which comes with the pan describes it as pre-seasoned, and the recipe included instructs for the bread to be brushed with olive oil but mentions no prep for the pan except to heat it over low to medium heat. On the first try I had some cheese burn onto the pan and the bread seemed to cling stubbornly in spots, though I was able to get it to release with a pancake turner. The scorched cheese was very difficult to scrub off, even with soaking for awhile.On the second try I oiled the pan and the press and carefully oiled the bread, so as to not have any bare spots. I still had sticking! Ditto for clean up.This thing weighs a ton, too. It is awkward to transfer off the burner; the instructions warn "lift, do not slide" on a glass top stove.I think I'll continue to use my non-stick griddle with a cast iron pan on top for a press. That always works great!
Don't waste your money. If you're cat is an indoor cat, yes this product will work well for you. But if your cats go outside like mine, FORGET IT! Yes Advantage kills fleas that are on your pet immediately. But it does not keep them flea free for 30 days, like they advertise. I've tried Advantage on my cats a few times. The fleas that were on my cats did die within 12 hours. But within ONE WEEK they were biting and scratching again like before. I'm picking fleas off of them after only a week and a half. If the product wasn't so expensive, it might be worth the money. But don't waste your money, because it only works for a few days
Disappointed. I recieved this item in a timley manner.. I found that I believe that I have been shipped a used or returned item.. Unlike the other pan I recieved this one had obviously been opened and had the attaching parts for the handle opened with pieces missing.I am very disappointed as they clearly state that returned items would not be accepted if opened.
Square glass = dribble glass. I was served in square glasses at a friend's house and must say that they are visually beautiful.  There is something about the square shape which is very appealing on the dinner table.  However, figuring out how to drink from these is somewhat of a challenge.  Drinking from the edge is somewhat risky since there is nothing to channel your water into your mouth.  Unless your mouth is especially wide, it is easy to wind up with a wet lap when your drink flows right past the corners of your mouth.  Drinking from the corner is more satisfying, but somewhat uncomfortable
Defective. This feeder only worked 1 out of 3 times, and left our cat hungry for 2 whole weekends while we were away.  After the first use, the feeding mechanism broke, the timer no longer worked, and the time of day reset itself the second it was set to feed.  I do not recommend this item
Don't  Waste Your Time. We got this rice cooker as a Christmas gift. We've tried cooking rice in it three times, and all three times the rice has burned. It simply gets too hot. Like some of the other reviewers, we added more and more water, but it didn't help. The cooker finally does kick into "warm" mode, but by then it's too late. We were thrilled when we realized it was non-stick, but what good is non-stick when the rice is scorched beyond edible
Was too small to fit on my stove even!. This pan is Small.I have a gas range with heavy grates, and this pan was hard to get it to fit even, it kept falling through the grates till I could just get it right!(took some time)It came with a very good recipe, but to me this was such a pain in the neck to make these, I just took out my big double Calphalon Griddle and made pancakes, which turned out great, and tasted the same as AebleskiversWhen I did make Aebleskivers and put the jam in the middle , it seemed to disapeared and I had a hole where the jam was!! I then used fresh apples, that worked out better, but I still like pancakes, allot easier to make
more "made in China" junk. After just a few months of occasional use the lever to lower the bread would not stay down.  I see now that others have had this problem.  Typical "Made in China" junk.  No more T-Fal for us
Extremely poor quality, not really Le Creuset. This is another product that had the name brand, but not quality.  First, it is not the normal cast iron Le Creuset products.  It is made of a thin layer of steel, with some enamel like paint on it.  It does not heat up evenly, and food burns and sticks to the bottom.  Second moth of using it, the enamel paint start to chip off the bottom.  I did not use any abrasive cleaning products, and always used wood or nylon utensils.  Contacted the manufacturer about warranty, and never heard back from them.I bought it for $40 when it was on sale.  Definately not worth even that, let alone the normal price
Disappointed by what arrived... I was in the market for a dehydrator to make fruit leathers for my kids who are sensitive to red dye 40.  This is an ingredient found in all of the fruit snacks in our grocery store.  I ordered this one and when it arrived I was seriously disappointed.  Construction was subpar and the fact it is a passive dehydrator meant it required an extraordinary amount of time to process the foods we wanted dried.  It also required rotation of the trays, something I did not like.  I immediately returned it and ordered the Nesco American Harvest FD75PR with the fan in the lid and the powerful 700 watt heating system.  I highly recommend passing on the Ronco unit and spend a little more on the Nesco.  I wish I had (could have saved on shipping)
POOR QUALITY. I order'd this vacuum after reading other reviews.One hour after placing my order I happened to find the identical vacuum @ a Target store and was extremely disappointed with its quality.  I came home immediately to cancel my order.  I spoke with two customer service reps and was told that I would receive an e-mail within 24 hours to confirm the order was suspended after notification was sent to shipping.Twenty four hours later, I rec'd an e-mail notifying me that the vacuum had been shipped.  I was very upset at this news, as I had purchased this item as a gift to be sent to someone who is not capable of handling such transactions on her own and I now had to suffer the inconvenience, frustration and embarrasment of handling the mistake with her and the shipping carrier.Usually, I am thrilled at the speed of service from Amazon with all other transactions.  I just wish there was more than a two hour window for cancellations
I love it because it produced a lot of moisture but it broke after 2 weeks. Shortly, i had no negative feelings about the work of this humidifier. The only problem was  that while it was really quiet most of the time at certain periods it started to roar - pretty noisy. it woke me up one night. but it didn't happen often.Then, after 2 weeks, it stopped working. Probably that roaring was the sign of some existing deffect. I sent it back to amazon and ordered a new one, not Honeywell this time.
Organize-Everything is a poor supplier for this product. I ordered about 10 of these boxes to place family photos in. I obviously could have continued to store them in the cardboard boxes they were in, but I wanted something better for treasured items.I did receive them promptly, but the box they were shipped in was not packed properly and all of the boxes were damaged. That I could live with, but one of the boxes had obviously been sitting for a long time in some warehouse because it had mold on the inside and the two metal rivets inside were rusted. The inside of this box smelled like an old musty basement.I emailed my complaint and stated I would like some type of adjustment because of the condition. That was over a week ago and no response.Since then I see the local Menards store has them on sale for $2 each when you buy two at a time.I won't be buying anything from this vender again. Problems occur, and not everything can be perfect, but what makes all the difference is SERVICE, and with this vendor, I've gotten none
The most horrible experience ever, but a happy ending so far. We purchased the combo a year ago. We did it in spite of the mixed reviews on epinions.com, and the negative advice of the sales person. He warned that the product has very bad reputation, that he would not accept returned. We decided to buy it regardless based on the stories from our relatives in China that Haier is very good brand name in China. The company offers excellent services in China. They tried to the extreme to make their Chinese customers happy.Less than a month after the purchase, the combo broke down. It was a fuse problem, and common one with the machine. The repair personal came to fix it. The machine stopped working roughly a month later that the dryer stops working. The repair personal had to order parts to fix it. He did fix it again. After about a month, the machine's dryer stopped working. This time, the repair personal declared that the machine is beyond repair. He promised to report to Haier America, and request a replacement on our behalf. However, we could not reach the repair personal again.Ever since that we started long saga of talking Haier's service center in America. They always appeared to be nice and promise to look into what happen to our complains. But they never fulfil their promise.When the warranty is about to expire, we tried to contact Haier China, they promised again, but to no results.Finally, our relatives in China had to call Haier China. This time, a reliable manager took action. His staff called us, and arrange the replacement. We just got the replacement machine. But we're still worrying when it will break again.It seems Haier may be really trying, but their business model, an d volumn in US may not be able sustain the level of quality that they are used to provide in China. It's a challenge to Haier USA to achieve the scale of ecconomy, or invest to provide good services to attract enough customers.Haier should really appreciate those early adopters and treat them well for their own sake
DeLonghi customer service is AWFUL!. I purchased this toaster oven because I loved its exterior design and thought it would look great in my kitchen.  It did... until the middle knob came off after less than 6 months of use.  I've been using a pair of pliers to turn it on for the last 5 months while I await my replacement part.  I have followed-up on my request with DeLonghi customer service on a number of occassions and they offer no solution other than to continue to wait.  I even left a message with a supervisor and received no response whatsoever.  I vow to never buy a DeLonghi product again.  Still waiting for that knob..
partly good. i really like the look of the toaster, and it does a nice job; on one side. the toasting elements on one side in each slot do not fully heat up so it toasts one side more than the other - will be trying to get it repaired, or likely, will have to get a new one.
Simply Re-used Parts By VillaWare!!!!. The problem with this is that (as it appears to me) VillaWare has tried to cut corners by re-using all but the plates as it has on it's Panini Grill (which for the record is an excellent product - which I have given rave reviews).  Check out the Panini Grill - unless you had these products in front of you & were able to open them up, you'd never be able to tell the difference between them.  I would say, don't write off VillaWare products just because of one poor one, as I said I also own the Panini Grill & LOVE IT!!!!!!!!  However, don't waste your money on this one - I hope VillaWare does right by their respected name & pulls this off the market completely.One thing I will say, the "audible warning sound" that was mentioned in a previous review is actually a click - the same as the Panini Grill, but listen carefully or you'll miss it
Bad Construction. Nice looking lamp but the adjustable arm on this lamp cannot hold the lamp's weight. Therefore it just bends over. What a piece of junk
Microwave Safe?  Only if it means it doesn't explode in there... I own the graphite style of this set.  I was originally very happy with the purchase - the set looked great, didn't chip easily, and was a great size.After a year of use I've come up with a list of problems:The clear glazed surface on the plates and bowls can be scored by utensils which allows water/dirt to penetrate to the porous ceramic below leaving stains that cannot be removed.The semi-matte finish acquires a "powdery", almost bleached, look to it after many washings (says dishwasher safe, guess that means the colors don't wash away immediately)My biggest complaint:  We bought these because they were "microwave safe".  I don't know what microwave safe means to most people, but it means to me that I could put a plate, bowl or cup in the microwave, heat up the contents, and then safely remove the object and use it.  In the case of the set I purchased, it only seems to mean that the item placed in the microwave will not explode.Unfortunately in the case of the Sango Graphite set, it means that the contents of the set are sheilded by the (plate/bowl/cup) and that the contents will emerge warm at best while you burn your hand attempting to extract the (plate/bowl/cup) that has soaked all of the energy up from the microwave.  They get VERY hot!  (Cup of water heated for 2 mins results in water temperature of 120F while cup surface is 170F!) I've only broken 2 items from the set, both times I dropped the items after getting them partly out of the microwave and realizing that my fingers were being burned (first time I thought it was a fluke, second time I learned my lesson) and dropped the item on the hard stove surface below the microwave.I emailed Sango several times and received no response at all.While I liked the set a lot initially, I have been very disappointed over time with its quality. I will never purchase another from Sango again
You need three arms... I returned this--absolutely unusable. Could not keep bottle engaged WHILE pulling down the two rather unforgiving arms
Horrible suction.... I am SO disappointed with this vacuum!  I will say, it does wonderfully for picking up all that dust and little bits of dirt that get into your carpet, but don't expect it to pick up anything that is big enough to be visible to the human eye!  Also, I have a cat - so I have pet fur on my carpet... AND I lose a lot of hair myself, and this vacuum doesn't pick any of that up... I can vacuum, run my hand over the carpet afterwards and come up with a handful of human and cat hair.It would be useful if you are just looking for something to get the dust and such out of the carpet... it seems to do that very well, though you are having to constantly stop and empty the vacuum, shake the filter out, etc, because it gets clogged VERY fast
Didn't receive item. I didn't get this order, did you credit my credit card if so email me with the conf. number and when the credit was given.
Horrible. We ordered 4 of these to use for a small work function, and 2 of the 4 worked for about 15 minutes.  The other 2 would not push the chocoloate thru the auger at all.  By 30 minutes, all 4 augers were inoperable.  We cleaned them off and added more oil to already tempered chocolate, hoping even thinner chocolate would help, but no luck.  We ended up pulling the fountain part off, turning off the auger and using them as mini crock pots to keep the chocolate warm.  I do not recommend this product
Very disappointing. I bought this for my husand as a gift and it is awful. It fell apart the first time we used it. It even caught his hand when it fell apart and drew blood. I do not recommend this product at all.
A good idea in theory; cheap handle broke the deal for me. I was so excited about ordering this (sad, I know!).  I liked the idea that this vac was human-powered, and that it would allow me to do quick clean-ups between regular vacuuming.I was disappointed at how cheap the handle was, and how easily it came apart.  Basically, in order to ship the thing in a small box, the handle comes in 3 pieces.  You have to put them together -- the round tubes just "slide" into each other.  Unfortunately the pieces are not threaded, and don't stay together terribly well. If I had a really old vac that needed to be held together with duct tape, that's one thing.  However, I'm not keen on having to duct tape brand new things.The pickup was okay, but not great.  After a few passes, there was still dirt on my tile floor.  It occured to me that I had not found the magic vac of my dreams, so I ended up sending it back
Low coverage. We now have the 4.2 gallon humidifer, as well as the air softener, all Vornado, and this one is most disappointing.  The construction is a bit flimsy, but my biggest complaint is the area coverage.  The unit is supposed to support at least a 600 sq ft space.  We have it in our master bedroom which is smaller than this and the air still feels very dry in our bedroom even after we've been running it for 2 days now non-stop on the high setting.  Granted, I have a pretty heightened sensitivity to the moisture in the air in our bedroom given I have a cold and nasal congestion, but I expected more from this unit given our satisfaction with the other.  We run the air softener on our 1st floor, which covers several rooms and it definitely maintains a level of moisture there very well.  The 4.2 unit is in our basement, which again covers several room and that one also has met our satisfaction.  We bought this because we needed one just for our master bedroom and we are pretty disappointed.  We have radiator heat and are suffering through the cold winter of Chicago right now.
poor value. Product is stapled together.  Doesn't seem to be consistent with the quality of other Wusthof products
SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!!. I'm not a big guy, so I was surprised that within a few weeks the pillow had already started to loose its shape. In the end it caused me so many problems with my back that I had to stop using it. Such a waste of money
Beware of Lacrosse Atomic Clocks - Bad DST Adjust. Many if not all of Lacrosse atomic analog clocks have received bad reviews on how the clocks do not adjust for DST
What a mistake !. The lid drops in half the time you're trying to put it on. The first six meals or so smell "bad" (spoiled)as they are cooking.. I think it's the sealing ring ! What a God-awful smell for a kitchen
Worked for one week. It worked for one week and then part of the heating element went out. Thiscaused the egg on that side to spill over into the water. (this was apoached egg) Even though this is a nonstick surface, i couldn't get theegg to come off. I tossed the unit. I had a Cuisinart for seven yearsbefore it quit. Will buy another Cuisinart
Does anyone make a 5-star oil mister?. Desperate for an oil mister a few months back, I checked around and found that no mister available anywhere on the Web for less than $25 was getting good reviews. Almost everyone had something bad to say about the mister they'd purchased.When I found the Norpro 790 on Amazon there were no reviews, but it looked nice and the price was right, so I thought I'd give it a try.After a few months of use, here are my findings--Pros:* Good looking.* Decent price.* Stainless steel exterior rather than plastic.* Good size.* Works, but...Cons:* Like many misters, you can blow out the bottom if you pump it too much.* In order to get a fine, well-spread mist you have to pump it to the point where you almost blow out the bottom.* When pumped, the cap will not sit flush. Ruins the look.* The nozzle itself is not of the best quality.* Can be inconsistent in its performance for no apparent reason.So overall, it's okay, but nothing to write home about
Haven't received it. I still haven't received the trivet, therefore can't use or review the casserole dis
Save Your Money. I was sleepless and willing to try anything.  I mounted this device on a pole facing the the neighbor's back porch, where he left his dog all night to bark incessantly.  Despite all my hope, I couldn't detect any change in barking with this device deployed.  In fact, I had to abandon that side of the house until I hired a lawyer to pressure the neighbor to do something about his dog
Mediocore light. I had high hopes for this nightlight after reading other reviews, but it isn't so hot. The light isn't very bright and quite diffused, and the light sensor isn't sensitive enough - it stays on in all but the brightest light. I ordered two, but have only opened one, and the other is likely to stay in its packaging
Too firm. I had originally tried the Isotonic Ultra Contour pillow and wanted a cheaper version of that pillow so I decided to try this.The description certainly made it seem as if this would be a worthy runner up to the Isotonic memory foam pillow. Boy, was I wrong. This pillow is extremely firm, to the point that it hurt to even sleep on. I didn't feel that it contoured to anything! It also seemed to build up heat. The overall experience was terrible. In fact, I woke up in the middle of the first night of having it and went and packed it up for return. If you are looking for a rock hard pillow, this is great I guess but if you are looking for something along the lines of the fantastic Tempurpedic pillow (or Isotonic) do spend the money and get those instead. The difference is astounding
Poor quality. Like others here I bought the 5 piece set on the gold box deal.  What junk.  These are made in China knives that can be had for a dime a dozen at any discount retailer.
Nice Frowntain : (. I opted for the cheaper black fountain rather than the copper one.  Same experience with the floating chimes getting stuck and the chimes are kinda loud.  We have ours in a larger foyer, but often the chiming disrupts TV watching etc, so I actually just took them out.  I'm happy with the end result eventhough I wished the product did work.  So I guess I'll wait for the prosperity to kick in to off set the cost :
BEAUTIFUL!. The set is lovely and coordinates perfectly with my OCR china set. The box is also beautiful. I wish they'd give you a diagram for placement of the flatware in the box for those of us who are first-timers.
Beware - DeLonghi does not support its products. As a long-time home espresso brewer, I was delighted to receive the EC140B as a holiday 2004 gift. It was a nice upgrade from my existing machine.Well, it's been less than 2 months and I'm glad I didn't toss the old machine when I got the deLonghi because without it I'd have no morning brew. The rubber grommet that holds the screen snugly within the filter head has completely fallen apart rendering the EC140B unuseable for want of this little piece of rubber.I've visited deLonghi's website, but it's incomplete (doesn't appear to have been updated since it went online in March 2004) and the Customer Service phone number in the documentation that came with the machine is "No longer in service." I'm willing to accept a percentage of product failure, but deLonghi can't or won't stand behind their product quality. Beware
Does not Grind as promised ... The grinder is beautiful but the mechanics sure need some work ... I use a french press and according to the manual it should be set at "1" for a french press ... the grind is so large no water penetrates it.  So if you are using a french press you need to set it at 6 or 7.  This is fine as long as you NEVER want espresso
your coffee carafe would do a better job... this is a worthless item--it is truly thinner than my krups coffee carafe and the markings are harder to read than that as well.  this item will NOT hold up to daily use and i will feel lucky if it doesn't break in my hand and cut me to ribbons.  save your money and/or pressure pyrex to make a 6-cup size
Just Doesn't Work. Ordered this at my wife's request.  She's tried cleaning silver earrings--run multiple cycles--added detergent as suggested.  It just doesn't clean.  An old toothbrush and toothpaste works much better.  A very disappointing piece of junk
Dont wash. These are nice use&throw type blankets. Originally I purchased it for occassional guests. Now I can not after a single wash. Really bad quality! [...
Hercules would have trouble with this. I had wanted a cordless can opener and received this as a gift. Sadly it did not live up to the reputation of Hamilton Beach. My husband and I have limited mobility with our hands; he has arthritis and I have carpal tunnel syndrome.One needs Herculean strength to attach the can to the opener, push it down and get it to move around the can and ultimately open it and release. I put mine away for GOOD
Makes no appreciable difference. I've given up on this product after using it for several months in various rooms as it seems to make no appreciable difference in stopping or limiting my cat spraying
went together poorly. This looked great, small enough for the space, still able to hold a lot of stuff. I was extremely disappointed in the way it went together.  I had to make some adjustments, which I should not have to do for a brand new piece of furniture. If I could, I would give this no stars. It is very unfortunate, because I have purchased the sofa table, and that piece of furniture is quite nice and sturdy.
Terrible!. Don't let the description on these plastic crate pans fool you. "Years of use" and "durable"  These pans crack and break within weeks of use.  The manufacturers have gotten cheap and don't want to make the metal crate pans anymore.  It's as simple as that.  If you can find one, get a metal pan.  Plus lots of dogs hate the slick, flimsy feel of these plastic pans.  It will actually make them hate going into their crate!  Avoid these at all costs
Worthless Juck. This product is a poorly designed piece of crap that is destined to fail from the first day you use it.A friend had purchased this item a few months back and asked me to look at it when it died recently. (I have been repairing electrical and electronic equipment for almost 30yrs). This is a perfect example of a "throw-away" item. If more care had gone into the design and a few more dollars into producing it you might have a product that could last a few years. Neither was done. Look at how many reviews mention the item failing after only a few months... and even the positive reviewers usually have only been using it for a month or so-Do yourself a favor and buy a commercial grade hot plate from a reputable manufacturer. You will pay more but you will likely still be using it many years from now. (Not too mention that the operation will be better also). How much "VALUE" is in a $20 hot plate when it is headed to the landfill a few months from now? It is a shame that so many people are willing to accept low quality products these days and think it is OK if it lasted a few months (note the reviews...)Good Luck-
Vaccuum is Absolutely Horrible!. I bought the Dirt Devil a few months ago. I read the reviews on it and despite some bad ones, I decided to go for it. How bad could it be...as long as it sucks up the dirt, right??? Well,                                                                                                                                                                                                     guess what? It doesn't even do that! Its awful on my rugs...I just want it to pick up the cheerios my children eat...instead, the vacuum takes the cheerio, breaks it up into smaller pieces and then spits it out the back! I have the same problem on my tile floors. If I vaccum the kitchen while barefoot, I can feel the dirt getting spit back out towards my feet!I strongly strongly recommend NOT buying it. I am so disappointed and angry that I spent my money on this vacuum
yes sharp edges. Be aware that this can opener cuts the lids off cans below the ridge creating 2 sharp edges...on the lid and on the can itself.  Otherwise, it is a good concept for anyone who may have difficulty in using manual can openers or for those who need the counter space
What are the colors made of?. As this is a consumable food product, I'd like to know what each color is made of.  ???????????
Disappointing. Upon first removing it from the box I noticed that the set felt very fragile and it was. The cup broke (from a very slight bump) the first time I washed it, making the set useless. The top part, the teapot, is not very attractive on it's own and it dribbles when you pour it, so you can't really use it anywhere you don't want to mop up spilled tea. For me, this is a very disappointing waste of money.
Worst vacuum I ever owned. This vacuum looks great and promises a lot.  But it doesn't deliver.  The unit is heavy, stiff, and awkward to move around---this applies especially to the wand.  The powerhead is too big, making it hard to maneuver into smaller places.  The dust cup is rather complicated to detach and empty.  WORST OF ALL IS THE SUCTION---there is very little suction (unless my unit was defective; a possibility, considering how crappy the suction was). I often had to pass over the same crumb multiple times to get the thing picked up.  I was so unhappy with this vacuum that I practically gave it away
crap. I'm not even sure how it works?  Its not that convenient for everyday use.  I really just wanted a sheath for 1 knife.
It leaks!. I've had a lot of problems using this, my sister has one and loves it! but for me, it leaks
light weight. I found this set of flatware to be to light weight for my taste.  Would be ok for a beach cabin or camping set
Burrow Bed a Flop. We ordered this bed for our miniature dachshund.  She was very interested in it but, every time she crawled in, it would tip over when she got to the back to turn around.  The sides were just too rounded and she couldn't get out without help
Good while they last but it has a short life span. We purchased our first Haier 1700 at Brandsmart for $137.00 three years ago along with an extended warranty. After one year we turned it in for a replacement because the temp. was unstable. The second one lasted two years before the door broke, and the convection fan stopped. I love the price and the size. It accomodates a 1/2 size baking pan. It's great for about a year or two at most
Disappointed. There is one huge problem with these sheets -- they are not permanently pressed.  There is no way to get out the wrinkles, other than by ironing them.  Otherwise, they are fine.  But who in the world wants wrinkled sheets!  You should be able to take them right out of the dryer and fold them with little or no wrinkles -- like your average sheet.  These sheets are full of wrinkles and they look just terrible on the bed.  I cannot believe you are actually selling these things on-line
Not a great product. I've had this for about 3 months now, got it at Target.  I've found the design poor, the plastic gears are grinding themselves up.  I have white powder (ground gear) all over the base.  I am throwing this away.  I am trying a different brand.  It also comes with unuseful attachments.  I am a person who has a berry smoothie every morning and I find this thing a chore and I hate using it.  It's loud, as most blenders are, but with all that loud noise is inconsistent power.  Not reccomended
Deluxe dog trainer. I purchased this product because my dog likes to take off and play in the street.  I am always outside w/ her so I decided to opt for this particular model rather than pay hundreds of dollars for an invisible fence.  When this product works it is very effective.  I have found though, that many times I will depress either the sound or the shock buttons and nothing will happen.  The batteries are new so it is my opinion that this product chooses when it wants to work.
Still waiting for hardware. Ordered (1) chair (1) Loveseat and (2) ottoman.  Recived in 4 seperate shipments at 4 different dates.  Chair was first to arrive but did not have hardware or instructions to put it together.   Been 3 weeks now and I have called several times.  You have to contact the manufacturer directly.  At least they have an 800# so as I call EVERY day it's not costing me anything.  Loveseat came with a little damage, that I can touch up myself.  Overall for the price I paid for all this den furniture, I would have rather seen it in a store and taken delivery myself
Don't buy. I have returned this item TWICE. Their tray is not pulling out, so you have to -suck- out the water from it. It doesn't hold all types of coffee, sometimes I had water coming out from the sides, or straight into tray. And I suspect that the pressure is not sustainable because I'm getting different results - sometimes coffee is good, sometimes  you just can't drink this
A quiter. I loved this juicer from the get go.  I Used it almost daily for 2 months until it stopped on me.
not what i hoped it would be. ok. maybe my hopes were a little high for this product to work. but, it ain't great.first, let me start off by saying it does not fit C's or D's. i tried to cram my C sized bra inside but unless i wanted to bend the underwire, the thing just wasn't going to fit. maybe it will fit B's or A's,but i don't have any of those hanging around to try out.desperate for this product to work, i tried wrapping a bra around the outside of the largest of the two ...er... compartments and then securing a garment bag around that to keep the bra in place. that did NOT go well. the bra became unraveled and a mess by the time the spin cycle was through.i ended up using these items underneath my bras to support them while they are drying flat.it's a great idea, but it needs serious improvement.
Poor Performer. These are the worst pans I have ever used.  They discolored after the first use.  Be prepared to spend a lot of time with an SOS pad if you want to maintain the color.  Wearever stainless is a far better option
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
Pike Street Solid Flannel Queen. Nicw soft sheets but will wash away after not too many washings. One of the pillow cases is already coming unthreaded after just two washes
Haven't a clue .. never got the product. I received a broken crockpit .... returned it for you to send me a new one, unbroken, and never received it.  Didn't get credit on my statement for my return either.I have sent you several unresponded to notes on this topic
Enjoy it while it lasts. I bought this heater at Lowe's after returning another Delonghi model to Amazon.  It's great for a bedroom because it is practically silent.  The heat is effective and it did what it was supposed to do...allow me to turn down the heat in the rest of the house at night while keeping the bedroom pleasantly warm.  That was the good news.  The bad news is that after a few months, it broke down.  It turns OFF when you increase the heat by turning the thermostat up.  As another reviewer said, it is now an attractive retro paperweight, but that's about it.  I was considering having it fixed but after reading the parts hassle that others are having, I'm not going to bother.  After battling with Delonghi over other retro products, I'm giving up.  I won't buy any of their stuff anymore.  By the way, if you want a great, silent heater, try the Bionaire Micathermic model (BNRBH3900U).  It doesn't have the snazzy styling of the Delonghi but it works great and still runs afer a year
If you have a PS2, or a DVD player, DON'T  buy this!. I was very excited when the box first arrived at our doorstep.  My eight year old son and I managed to get the unit put together, after a little tugging to get some of the screws to go into place.  We carried it up to his room, and put the T.V. and V.C.R. into place.  My excitement turned to bitter dissapointment, however, when I tried to fit my son's PS2 games into the shelves desighned to hold CD's or VCR tapes.  The PS2, and DVD cases are too big to fit into these slots. I had just not realized that they would not work with this model. The whole reason I ordered this unit was too try to organize some of the mess in his room, so this will not work for me. I will probably try to return it, and order the newer model
LG should be ashamed. My wife bought this one from Best Buy without me reviewing it 1st. Amazingly, I would have bought it after reading the reviews here. I'm starting to wonder who writes these things ... LG employees? The microwave is fine - no complaints. The toaster, however, is an unmitigated disaster. I am of the opinion that you should rarely combine appliances - this appliance is a poster child for this thought. The toaster browns extremely unevenly and inconsistently (sometimes you should toast the same piece of bread on 5 and sometimes as high as 10!). More importantly, the toaster broke after 31 days (coincidently the Best Buy return policy ends at the same time - Best Buy has an unacceptable return policy but with a guy named "Ricky" managing the store what can you expect?). LG picks up the phone quickly and they honor the warranty. The problem is they can't think outside of the box. They had me get it repaired but I have to inconveniently drive it out there and pick it up - OK ... no problem. One day later? It breaks again. It is an extremely poorly built appliance and the repair people thought they had fixed it and had not. That's how bad it was. LG will not budge - have it repaired again (great option - costs LG money, me more travel time, and it won't do the job) or do a rebate. The rebate requires me to buy another LG or Goldstar product. Huh? So you create a shoddy product and rush it to the marketplace (they admitted they don't have a detailed enough repair history because it is too new) and then don't stand behind your product. You backend me into another LG or Goldstar product that I would not have otherwise bought. How does our government allow these atrocious foreign companies to business here? Our we so bad as a manufacturer that we can't top this? Their supervisors were very hardlined and there was no getting around this. "You can cal Korea but they won't change their policy" they said. I will never willingly buy another LG or Goldstar product and I highly recommend you do the same. Shame on you LG - you could have had me as an appliance buyer for the next 50 years and now your name is mud to me
rotates too slowly for my taste. I had forgotten you had to wind it up, but it works ok; I had just gotten spoiled when I visited my dad who had a micro with a build in turntable.It was great
Buyer Beware of this fountain. It was a nice idea and the large black bowl makes an attractive centerpiece but soothing, comforting it is not. In operation, the floating chimes miss 4 out of 6 stationary chimes producing a monotonous, high pitched tone. The floating chimes can get stuck as they travel around the bowl. Not a nice feature unless you like having to jump up to free them. For the price, it is just not a quality product. Yankee's Customer Service is not sympathetic to the product's flaws. They just offer to replace it with another ill-designed unit. Save yourself the trouble and buy elsewhere. There are plenty of decent fountains that do work as promised even if they don't chime
Maybe it depends on the cat... I adopted a feral cat who was easily frightened and skittish all the time.  I bought this spray and the diffuser and was very disappointed to find that neither one worked.  His behavior hasn't changed at all...he is still as anxious as before.  Maybe some cats just don't react to the "facial pheromones" found in Feliway.  I think this product is a hit or miss
bad product!. Okay - there's something wrong with Brita filters. They don't always fit into the pitchers - when I tilt the pitcher I can hear the filter shifting inside - and yes, I am aligning it properly. It may filter out impurities contained in the tap water, but only to replace them with thick black carbon particles. I've followed all the instructions and replace the filters every second month, but darned if there isn't a problem with every single one! Don't buy this - look for another alternative
Broken after 3 times used. My mother bought me this for Xmas... Used it 3 times... Worked great...Then, no longer functioned at all.  Called customer service... waited on hold for approx. 30 minutes to be told there was nothing they could do if I didn't have the receipt.  (My mother is 80 and didn't save the receipt.)   The woman in customer service suggested I just go out and buy a new one... I said, I think I'll do that, but it won't be a Toastmaster!  I'm not impressed at all
If you like burnt toast, this is for you. Personally, I don't like burnt toast and hate this toaster.  I thought buying a Cuisinart toaster would insure a lasting appliance.  I may as well have spent $10 at a discout store.  I have had this toaster for a bit over 3 years.  We don't toast often, but for the last year I have been tolerant of popping up the toast half-way through to see if it is ready as if I wait for the machine despite any setting it will burn.  Very disappointing for an appliance that is supposed to have a good reputation.  Two starts as it did work fine for 2 years.
If you order this item, prepare to wait more than a month!. I ordered this item and received several notices postponing its delivery.  Eventually, I cancelled my order because more than a month has gone by, and still, no table and chairs
Spatula Blisters With Use. OXO has always been one of our favorite kitchen implement manufactures because of their high quality--NOT THIS PRODUCT.  Incredibly, the first time this was used to make pancakes the edge of the spatula blistered and melted.  We tried it on hash brown potatoes with the same result.  A call to OXO customer service elicited their willingness to refund the purchase price only if we returned it--which simply isn't worth the time and trouble.  Maybe it's only the blue ones this happens to?  We're rethinking our opinion of OXO
Worked great, for 3 days. Bought this for my wife for Christmas.  Very simple to use and made a great cup of coffee (per my wife, I don't drink coffee).  It lasted a total of 3 days.  On the third day all it would do is flash two of the blue lights.  Wouldn't beep, would'nt pump water, nothing.  Believe all the negative reviews you keep reading and stay far away from this unit
ice bucket review. Received this as a gift.  It is real classy looking but very small. So ok, you have just a few friends over for drinks- evem then I question functionality??- The cover is very difficult to replace securely and it is not insulated, so how well will it work??
No fleur-de-lis. These dishes are everything they say they are EXCEPT the embossed pattern does not in any way, shape, or form resemble a fleur-de-lis, but rather looks much like a scorpion or bug, complete with a body and legs. The smaller pattern in between the insects resembles a marijuana leaf. So...if you want to impress guests with bugs and pot leaves on your serveware this is the set for you
DO NOT BUY THIS COFFEE MAKER!. I gave this machine 1 star because the carafe does not drip -- and this is important!  However, for a household that brews several pots of coffee a day and likes a good, rich, bold cup of coffee, the Cuisinart Grind & Brew is a poor choice.  The grinder doesn't have the bean capacity for 10 cups (however, the carafe is really closer to 8 or 9 six-oz cups).  WEAK COFFEE.  If you grind a batch then turn it off and grind a second go to make a suitable pot, it is STILL weak.  Somehow the brewing process wastes coffee.  It backs up into the grinder and makes a royal mess.  Of course if you want to brew another pot in an hour or two, the grinder has to be hand-dried after you wash it with a bottle brush to get all of the wasted, caked, wet grounds out of the grinder.  Now here's the real kicker that nearly drove my husband over the edge.  Say you've washed the grinder and it's drying in your drainer so you decide to brew a pot of GROUND coffee, you still have to use the grinder!!!  It won't brew without it in place! so all that condensation flows right back up into the grinder, which stays perpetually WET and begins to pool in all the indentations here and there in the grinding chamber.  It's a mess.  The coffee us terrible -- even if you use plentiful, bold Starbucks coffee!!  Gosh!  We might as well have flushed $150 down our toilet . . .
Noisy. This filter does seem to work well, however, I am returning it due to the excessive noise that it makes.  If you look at the other reviews (for the HFD-130) you will see the noise described as "white noise"; let me explain the noise that it makes a little better than that.  The unit does make a white noise that is associated with the moving fan blades.  However, underlying this noise is a lower pitched motor noise that is more of a whining sound - like a vacuum cleaner.  This noise is less than the white noise on the low setting, about equal to the white noise on medium, and overpowers the white noise on high.  The other quality of the whining noise is that you can hear it from a further distance than the white noise.  So when you have the unit on high, you can hear the whining noise resonating throughout my home, i.e. through the floorboards and through the walls.I think that one of the greatest considerations with an appliance such as this should be noise.  I cannot understand why the Honeywell engineers have not done a better job considering this
No manual in the box, no manual on the website. I bought the HM630 yesterday. Today, the unit tells me the filter needs replaced. After one day! So I went to read the manual and then remembered the box didn't even contain a manual. So then I went to the Holmes website listed on the box, and their website doesn't even list this unit as one of their products.VERY impressive, Holmes. Veeery impressive
This thing doesn't suck!. The one item in your house that you really wish would suck and it certainly doesn't! This thing blows more air than it sucks dirt. What a useless thing. I'm looking for one that will actually pick up the dirt from the recessed areas of my prefinished floor. This thing certainly doesn't do it! If you're looking to buy this thing, look again -- there MUST be something better if not just your regular broom
Great Machine but very delicate. This is an awesome machine and it looks hot in your kitchen.  However, unless you plan on using it only sparingly, don't bother with it.  I live and breathe espresso, so I used it at least three times a day or more.  It worked perfectly for about a year and then it just stopped working one day - without warning.Id say if you wanna buy it for the looks and plan on using it only once or twice a week - its a great purchase.  Otherwise skip it and buy something like the Rancilio Silvia; which Im planning to purchase to replace my non-working Granos
Don't waste your money. This is an over-hyped piece of junk.  It does not have much suction and does not hold but a thimbleful of debris
Tools. These are great towels if you can get them.  They are very soft and a great price but I ordered them in December and they came in one at a time. Took over 3 months to complete the order and still did not recieve the full order because after 3 months they refunded my money on one towel that was out of stock.  When I ordered them they stated that they were in stock and ready to ship.Buy these only if you have a life time to get the
Don't waste your money. I bought this product hoping it would solve my problem with my barking terrier. He didn't even notice it was there. I put it near his crate and it still didn't stop him from barking.  I pushed the manual button and still nothing.  It promises to stop annoying barking, but it didn't stop my dog for one minute.  It was a complete waste of my money
Not worth it. I have owned this unit for 2 years.  The water seems OK and definitely better than from the tap.  However, every 4 months or so we have to change the filter because we start to have a chlorine taste coming back.  The replacement cartridges are very expensive.  There is a little knob on the faucet that you pull to switch from tap to filter, and this knob recently has broken off.  We cannot seem to access the company's website to get a replacement part.  I am thinking to get a different water filter system altogether.  I would not buy again.  (Also, I have had lots of problems with their water bottles...leakage, breaking, etc.  I won't buy any product from this company again.
Melted mess. No scent that I could tell, and totally melted down all over everything in less than three hours.
Looking for a new vacuum...forget this one!. I bought this vacuum cleaner less than a year ago and it has been in the repair shop more than it has been at my house.  The belt has broken at least 4 or 5 times and the self-propel system keeps breaking down.  When I took it in just last week to be repaired again, the repair shop owner pointed to the back room and said over half of the vacuums they repaired were this model.Actually, when the vacuum works, it does a decent job...although I don't think I would buy a bagless type again.  Emptying the container creates a mess unto itself! So my recommendation is stay away from this Hoover model
Hamilton Beach Eclectric coffeemaker, apple. I didn't even use this coffemaker.  The apple color was so ugly (reminded me of the avocado in kitchens of the '50's & 60's) and the pot was so heavy & clunky, I decided to donate this to a charity.  I read the other reviews & everyone loved the color in their kitchen.  Maybe another color would be better but I will not try
Compact size, good storage, poor aesthetics and finish. Functionally, this product holds plenty of media in an easily accessible manner.  It is not attractive to look at however.  My walnut finish was closer to a cheap mahogany, there are multiple areas where the finish migrated along the seams and left areas with nearly no finish, the varnish is very high gloss, and the knobs are low-grade, mismatched junk.  I believe the build is solid, but only time will tell.Final word....pay the extra money for a hand-crafted cabinet where you can pick the finish and you can talk to the craftsman personally.  This just isn't worth $300
Very Disappointed. This product had adequate suction while it lasted which was about 4 months.  One day it just stopped working, I can only assume that the motor died
When a plus is a negative. My previous Back to Basics model expired in less than two months when the teeth engaging the blade simply stripped. The lightweight model pictured here fared less well, lasting for one smoothie: when I tried to use it a second time, it was, to quote Dickens, "dead as a door nail."  If the same happens to this "Plus" unit, you'll have on hand more useless items than the blender itself. (The good part is its distribution by Amazon, assuring no-hassle returns and refunds.)It's a nice concept--make your smoothie on the run, and have one less glass to wash.  If you still want to try a small-sized blender, I've had surprising success with the cheap and tiny Hamilton-Beach personal blender
Truly Disappointed. I was really excited to try this cage out for my 6 lb male maltese.  It is a perfect size and it seemed really well made.  My dog doesn't really like cages and was able to chew right through the zipper seam.  He is NOT aggressive and does not chew things he shouldn't, so to my surprise about a week after my husband and I bought the cage, we found him out of it.  We were truly disappointed.  It is a cute cage and has a very sturdy frame.  If you are not planning on zippering the cage or your dog does not chew through zippered seams, it is a great cage.....but overall, i was disappointe
absolutely uncomfortable. When I got these for my daughter, I was shocked at how rough they were.  She really likes Thomas, so I kept them for a while.  Yet now that we've had them for a time, even she- at 2 1/2 yrs old- says they are scratchy.  They are at the bottom of our sheet rotation and ONLY used when absolutely everything else is dirty. I plan on making some sort of wall hanging craft out of them soon
poor execution in design. Seemed like a good idea.  however, the spring-loaded arm is too strong, so it actually squeezes the paper towel roll too hard, so i couldn't remove a sheet.  had to return it.  i suspect they didn't test one out before production and distribution.  i plan on getting a pendulum model next
Fantastic concept, but... I pre-ordered this right after I saw it on "I Want That Tech Toys" and it finally arrived just after Christmas, after nearly five months of waiting. The first few days had serious set up issues where the water wouldn't drain. My cats were interested in watching it but since the water wouldn't go out they were not interested in using it for its intended purpose. I had it sitting next to their Litter Maid and they wouldn't use the new box. Their excessive use overwhelmed and burned out the Littermaid motor so it had to be thrown out. Now, with just the Cat Genie I hoped they would adapt. They did not - they pee on the floor, poop on the floor. Finally one of the four was willing to use the new box... then it stopped draining and even that one cat would't go near it because it was full of water. I am at my wits end, plugging and unplugging trying to reset it. I have made two attempts to contact the parent company who makes these with no return calls or emails. I am very tech saavy, we have lots of robots around here... roombas, scoobas, spotbots and others so this cat genie was ideal but I guess it isn't ready yet.
It leaks!!!!. The reason you should not buy this shaker is because it doesn't do what it should (keep a tight seal).The cocktail shaker looks very nice, I got the blue one.  However, the problem is that the lid does not form a tight enough seal, so what happens is that the liquid leaks out and gets all of your hands.  My remedy has been to put a kitchen towel over it while I use it (not very fun).  Also, condensation has built up in between the plastic insulation and the metal tumbler.  That's not really a big deal to me, but it may be to you
wrong size. I was very disappointed when I saw this plate. It said salad plate. It is the size of a bread & butter plate. Not a salad plate which was what I wanted. And the pattern is not at pretty as it looks in the picture.
Don't buy this coffee pot. I got this coffee pot last Christmas and it worked great for about three months. Now it takes 45 min to brew 8 cups and it sounds like I live by an airport. I have cleaned it but that isn't the problem. I did have to buy a new one since I couldn't deal with the noise or waiting so long for a cup of coffee
An Experiences User. I am a very experienced user of Innova.  Innova is I guess you can say is the parent company of Ultrex which is a line of nonstick cookware.Innova is not know for quality and this product is no different.  There is a 25 year warranty on the Ultrex, I had mine for 6 years and the nonstick coating is off.  You can return the product for another but yes, you have to pay for the shipping and if your pot is oversized, you have to pay UPS or whomever to make you a box and thats another charge.The customer service is not world class.  I had to wait almost 3 months for a replacement.  The workmanship is horrible, the product is made in China, however, I've had other things made in China that were of great quality, so I don't know what is up with Innova.I suggest that if you find a product made by Innova, avoid it!  Save yourself the aggrevation!  This product doesn't deserve 1 star
Ultrasonic Jewelry Cleaner a joke!. This thing does nothing!  Aside from the fact that after using it, instructions are to polish it with a soft cloth, even then the jewelry was not clean.  So it put it in my old jar of jewelry cleaner, used the little brush, dried it and went on my way.  Took much less time and did a much better job.  They shouldn't even sell this product!!!! And, I had to spend $10 to send it back. Do yourself a favor and skip this one
Very cool but didn't last long. I bought this underwater lighting system with four laser beams and when i installed it one of the beams came defective and didn't lit on; i didn't matter because they look beautiful underwater...    one week later i noticed that another light went off and two days later the other two shutdown too; i replaced the beams but they stop working days later. it's my opinion that this is the worst product you can buy to your aquarium. (unless you only want to use it for one or two weeks)
Not up to Oneida's usual standards. I just received mine and they look like Oneida seconds.  The edges were poorly finished (for Oneida, though no snags or obvious rough unfinished patches) and quite a few have an off centered Oneida stamp.On the plus side, they are solid and attractively designed.  They're a decent value at Amazon's prices and acceptable for everyday use
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
toxic heat. I bought this in November, 2006 and wanted to use it in my bedroom while I kept the thermostat down in the rest of my apartment to save money.  A plus for this item is its three settings, but the thermostat is very confusing to use.  I can't say if the heater has saved me money or not.  However, a BIG NEGATIVE is that it gives off a lot of fumes.  the brochure says it only does this when its new but that seems to be very untrue.  It smells a little like kerosene combined with a funky musky odor and it emits this constantly.  I found myself getting sick: chills in my hands, feet and legs as well as shortness of breath.  the heat it gives off is very good, a strong radiant heat that heats the whole room (my room is about 12' by 12'), but the fumes are actually a health hazard and I believe this heater should only be used if you are able to ventilate your room while you are heating it (which kind of doesn't make much sense)
Dimensions are different. Beware...the dimensions of this item are not 12 inches as stated.  It is actually 10 1/2 inches.  I was told that the 12 inch plates are no longer available from the manufacturer
Deceptive advertising. Well, they do scratch.  With a metal fork to turn eggs, they scratch.And though the company claims on their site not to contain Teflon (of course not, Teflon is Dupont's trade name for PTFE), the product is coated with nonstick PTFE - which is known to kill pet birds.  I believethe government is also researching the health effects on the public from PTFE.
fuzzy, yellow, and not cute. I bought this for my cavalier after watching the Petsmart commercial. I understand it is not the same toy, but it bears some resemblence. It came in a dreadful yellow color and was not extremely well made. It was a soft, somewhat cottony/furry texture, not loofah! I couldn't tell you if it is durable, because he hasn't played with it enough to actually rip it.It contains two squeakers that scare him.My guess is some dogs would like this toy, the shape is pleasing to dogs, I think my dog just didn't like the texture.I reccommend anything by Fat Cat Inc. in place of this toy
Country Roses Bowl. I ordered this in September and still have no received it.  It is now the middle of November
outstanding product. I am extremely happy with this product.  It works like a charm for making pancakes and they never ever stick.  It's a superb design and I am very pleased.  I would highly recommend it
very disappointed. This product looks much better in the picture than in person.  The brush looks very full in the picture but actually very sparce in person.  Bristles already started falling out before I even used it.  It comes unwrapped just thrown in a plastic bag for shipping
Do not buy!. I usually buy OXO products because their quality is excellent. This product misses the mark however. The workmanship was shoddy and it broke before it was even installed! The idea behind it is a good one but I bought the ratchet paper towel holder as a replacement and it is the best
Ugh. I needed a good cheap flash light  to read vin numbers. one of the worst 10 flashlights I ow
shattered pot. I purchased a Krups thermal replacement pot for an electric coffee maker.  About two weeks after I bought it, I made coffee one morning only to discover the coffee running all over the floor.  For no apparent reason, the glass inside of the thermal pot had completely shattered.  I will be returning the pot this week
It's better than them being in a tiny cup. I agree that this product is too small to be the best home for a Betta, but I think the Betta would say, if it could, please put me in this instead of the tiny cup I am in now!!!! I have had Bettas in 10 gallon tanks and in small bowls and some do like the smaller bowls better.
Don't Bother. OK...this is quite possibly the most retarded device ever crafted. It barely picks up even simple dirt and debris, and when it does it fills the filter up and gets clogged in seconds, not minutes.Also, it is about as easy to return the device to its charging stand as it is to hack into Bank of America and swipe a few mil. Really, its like cracking a safe to lock in back into place to charge. Stupid....stupid...stupid design. The same goes for returning the filter to the device and putting it back together...its like a rubics cube.A true waste of 40 bucks. Don't buy this! It doesn't even look very cool
Tend Skin is PURE ALCOHOL. I called Dr. Rosen the president of Tend skin and asked him about his product.  First off, he is not a nice person on the phone and was very abrupt with an interested consumer.  I asked him about how much PURE ALCOHOL was in Tend Skin and he literally BLEW UP ON ME!  Hey-I was just wondering if it was the amount of PURE ALCOHOL that caused my skin to CATCH ON FIRE.  I guess so because he caught on fire:)
I received white too!!. I placed my first order for the red casserole in March.  It was not slated to be delivered until May!  But, I waited patiently for it.  In May I see that it has finally been shipped and delivered to my house, but I never received it.  So they send a replacement.  And it is white, not red.  And apparently they no longer have red
THEY RUST!  Big disappointment... I have probably seen hundreds of tea kettles by now and still love the look of this one the best.  Only problem is that they RUST!!!  I had mine a few weeks when I noticed the rust spots on the interior.  I don't imagine the enamel could have been chipped on the inside of the pot, so it must have happened simply because I leave water in my tea kettle at all times.  The directions that come with this kettle say not to do so, but any serious tea drinker like me knows that's unrealistic.I threw mine out and am very disapointed that something that cost so much money didn't last long at all.  I thought Le Creuset was supposed to be really high quality but I'm officially disillusioned thanks to this tea pot
Only a masochist would ever buy a Shark!!!!. This product works well for me (I have a very small one-level house) but getting the HEPA filters that go with it is harder than finding that needle in the haystack. You used to be able to get them at most retail stores--now, Euro-Pro won't even supply them to the vacuum specialty companies.  I've made tons of calls and all they've done is echo my complaints.  The ONLY way I was able to find them, besides on this site, was through Euro-Pro itself.  They try to get you to sign up for their "filters for life" program first on their site, which is a ripoff.  If you just order their filters, they don't give you an 800 number to call--I found one in an old filter box--they want you to do it all over the web.  Why?  Because they're in India, at least the "customer service" people are.  While waiting on my filters to arrive, I borrowed another model Shark vacuum from someone, and I couldn't even get to the air filter to clean it--the instructions say it should just pop out--ha, ha.  Clearly, Euro-Pro doesn't want you to keep their products for a long time, which is why they stop making the parts easy to get after a few years.  I have only had my vacuum for three years, not thirty.  It should be easier to get filters than this.  Much, much, much easier. I spent a minimum of eight hours trying to get these filters over a few weeks. Next time, I'm buying a Bissell
Sheet set. Very unhappy with sheet set i hate them so much I wont even put them on bed Ill probably throw them awa
Awful. As a Starbucks employee of almost 2 years at my college... I know how to brew espresso and properly make drinks.  My roommates got this for me as a Christmas present at the Field Days Sale so I could make coffee drinks for all of our late night study sessions.  After about 2 months of use... the steamer ceased to function properly and steam came out of the espresso head instead.  I contacted a service advisor at Krups' website and it turns out that I would have to ship the machine to the nearest service center in Illinois on my own dime.  No thank you!  I'll find something better
It Broke!!. I was so excited about this product.  I love simple appliances and this one fit the bill.  However the filters were impossible to find and the whole thing stopped working after a month of use!  Don't buy this product.  Spend the extra money and get a better humidifier
Not a good item. Item worked for 1 minute before breaking.  Very difficult to get the correct grind.  Definitely an item to keep away from.  Am returning as defective
Not one but TWO were defective. I had one that was great for a couple of months, then started blinking "E" and some error number. Got it replaced. Now after a couple more months, the replacement started blinking "E" and "3" (the E3 error that others have reported). Will return it again. What a piece of junk, and for such a high price
Good blades, poor handles. Based on the user reviews, I ordered these knives.  The blades are, as advertised, sharp and well designed.  The handles, however, are very thin and poorly shaped. After a few minutes of slicing strawberries, my hand began to cramp. The knives are very lightweight, which can be a problem because you have to provide all the cutting power yourself. This is one of the very few items I have ever returned to Amazon.
It is not microwave safe. One of the plate I bought broken during a 50 seconds medium heat  microwaving, so I doubt it is really good for microwave. When I called Lenox, their rep. simply asked if I want to order a replacement from them as if the bad quality was not their problem. Disguesting.The design pattern was nice though
Do not buy. King means stander size pillow, and expect it a week after what they quote. You only get One pillow not the set. Not worth it
Ordered June 8.. Its July 10 Still havent received it. I ordered a Tailchaser for my cat before and I had no problems with getting my order but not with this one. Its been over a month and I still havent received the 2nd one I ordered!  I will never order from them again
Save Your Money. I was sleepless and willing to try anything.  I mounted this device on a pole facing the the neighbor's back porch, where he left his dog all night to bark incessantly.  Despite all my hope, I couldn't detect any change in barking with this device deployed.  In fact, I had to abandon that side of the house until I hired a lawyer to pressure the neighbor to do something about his dog
-. The fryer worked good for like a week. Then the inside started to peel apart.
Don't waste your money on this. Owned it for about a year. The nonstick coating has already started chipping off ever since a couple of months old. It sticks sometimes. So, it's not exactly nonstick. I have never used any hard tools on it. But the quality is horrible. Calphalon no longer the brand name for the quality. Worst of all, I sent it back under the so called life time warranty. But I haven't received it for over a month now. I am asking myself, why I spent so much money for such a piece of junk with no warranty at all!!
waste the money. i bought this rice cooker last year it worked only for few months.the nonstick coating was gone within 4 to five months only.again i took out my old panasonic rice coker to use  b'coz that does not stick the rice as this one don't waste your money buying this
laminate floor use. this product does not pick up dirt on laminate flooring at all which was not my impression when it was advertised
Not worth it- Watch out for the rust. I bought the 13 block set about a month ago and now over half of the knives are rusting. Mind you, I only hand wash and dry. Regardless, this is very embarassing for dinner parties. These are just NOT quality knives. I wasted $120 on them please do not do the same.
Too small, and not safe!. Bettas need a tank with a heater, as they are a tropical fish. That means at least a 5 gallon tank, as it is difficult to heat smaller tanks safely. They can survive in smaller containers like this, but will not thrive. I noticed a big difference in my betta when I moved him from a 1 gallon (which is larger than this betta bowl) to a heated 5 gallon--he is more active, and his colour is brighter.Also, bettas are known to jump out of their tanks, which is why every reputable source of information on bettas recommends that their tanks have covers. This small betta sphere has no cover
Great espresso, but not for long.... I really liked this machine -- the espresso was very good and the steamer heated quicky....until it broke less than two years after purchase.  For the cost of the X3, I expect more longevity.  Since I am beyond the one-year warranty, the repair is at my expense, which is estimated to be $300, plus shipping and handling both directions (around $20 each way) -- which is almost the cost of a new machine.  So, in spite of the nice brew, I can't recommend this machine --it's simply too costly for you and the environment to purchase a machine that breaks so quickly.
Sentina by Datexx. Don't waste your money on this junk. I bought six and within 6 months, three turned out to be defective. The manufacturer , Datexx, would not even answer my emails , let alone replace the units. Find another product if you need safety lights, the quality and customer service of the Datexx Sentina leave to much to be desired for the exorbinant high prices they command. Run, do not walk, AWAY from your decision to buy these lights.
Almost really good... The shaker is very good about keeping your hands from feeling the temperature of the drink as well as nice styling-- that is until you wash it in the dishwasher.  I should have listened to the other reviews, it does condensate inside the shaker so you can see water droplets under whatever colored material is used to make the outside of the shaker, and the stainless steal of the inside.  Of course, there is no way to seperate them to clean it.  If looks matter, it shows that stainless steel is probably still the way to go if you want quality
BIG difference between old and new!. The other reviewer is right about old Revere Ware; its great stuff that'll last forever. However, newer Revere Ware, like what's being advertised here, is total junk. I own an old 2qt saucepan and a brand new 4.5qt Dutch oven. The Dutch oven is  flimsy and the lid doesn't fit well. If you want good Revere Ware make sure it's from the USA (not Indonesia, like the new stuff) and OLD. Try yard sales or ebay. The only thing to recommend new Revere ware is the 25 year warranty. That is the only way the old and new products are comparable.
They still haven't fixed it yet. I've been watching this item for a while to buy for my wife.  I saw the reviews about it stopping and basically not working correctly and figured that this was a pretty serious fault and someone in a factory somewhere would be working on a solution to this.So it's been many months since the last review and I decided what the heck, I'll take the plunge and buy it and we'll see if they fixed it.Nope.  It's still broken as detailed in the other reviews.  At times, it simply will not go off.  Your best warning is when you stop hearing the ticking.I still give it 2 stars though because the wife loves how cute it is.  She doesn't even care that the thing fails to serve it's primary function.  I guess if you are looking for a figurine rather than a timer, this could be a winner
Form over Function. I bought this blender based on the reviews here, as well as its great-looking design.  When I got the blender, only one of those factors came through.First thing I noticed:  both blender jars leaked badly.  After reseating the seal in the glass jar and tightening it as hard as possible, the leak was slightly reduced.  The metal jar still poured out liquids from the base.Second thing I noticed:  this blender cannot make a good smoothie.  Even after a couple minutes of blending, there are chunks of ice and fruit which have been totally untouched by the blades (regardless of how little ice is put in the smoothie).  For a blender of any price, the DeLonghi does a poor job making smoothies.  For a blender that costs what the DeLonghi does, this performance is totally unjustifiable.But, hey, it does look really good
Didn't work. This thing never worked out of the box.. not worth trying to RMA it for the low cost of it, but dont recommend it.
Cuisinart mixing bowls. As of today, 3/24 I have not received this product.  Very disappointed with delivery
Beware. This is not made in France -- most of the Le Creuset line is from a centuries-old factory in France; this pot is not.  When I saw where it was made, I returned it.  Buyer beware
Unimpressive. One of the 1/4" rings snapped the first time I put it on my rolling pin.
Bad design. I prefer my spoons to stand upright. Many of my spoons fall out of this one, I guess it depends on your shape of the spoon
This is a piece of junk!!!!. Buyer beware I purchased this tv stand and when I got it home it was cracked and pieces were broken.  I will never purchase furniture from target agai
NOT worth the price....Much better knives out there!. First of all, let me say, I'm a loyal Amazon customer and do most of my online research for items on Amazon, so when I really like something (or not, in this case) I feel compelled to speak out. I don't like to give negative reviews, but this knife is just simply so-so, nothing special and at this price, it should be SPECIAL. One particular thing is that in all of Rachel Ray's TV shows (and I watched a lot of them) I have never once seen her use this knife!!  What's with that? Why put her name on something she doesn't use?  Cash,maybe? hmmmm That's disappointing. The handle is orange, and feels okay, if a little heavy in the hand. The blade is heavy and just feels too thick to me, and it doesn't cut easily. I have average size hands. I have since purchased a set of four of Wolfgang Puck's knives with a wooden block for less money than the price of this knife and that was the clincher for me. His knives are outstanding! I always reach for Wolfgang's knives now...they are perfectly balanced, very sharp, and I couldn't be happier with them.
Cheap junk. I bought one of these can openers today. The mounting screws stripped out even before I got it completely mounted. The screws thread into soft metal tabs instead of nuts, making it impossible to mount securely. I don't know if it would open a can, as I never got that far, but it looks difficult to locate the can properly. It's a piece of cheap Chinese made junk
Buyer Beware. When I purchased this item there were 4 dishes shown on the picture.  I ordered a quanity of 2, however when I received the items I received only 2 dishes not the total of 8 that I expected
WARNING - DO NOT BUY!!!. WARNING - DO NOT BUY this waffle maker. I trusted the positive reviews posted here for it, and bought one. WHAT A MISTAKE! Even on the darkest setting (5), the waffles come out limp as a noodle, and with the insides of the waffles tasting like warmed, but RAW, batter! If your idea of a good waffle is raw batter, you will love this machine. Now I get to re-package it and mail it back. Isn't that always fun? The people who have given this a positive review here need their heads examined! Don't be deceived by them like I was. Believe me, save yourself the expense and the aggravation, and DO NOT BUY this piece of garbage!
Actually 0 stars -- pass this one up!. After a while you'll never get those &quot;rugged concentric grooves&quot; clean and you will be grossed out by your own cookwear.  I'd never recommend Circulon cookware because of this, especially since there are so many high-quality, smooth-bottomed pans on the market
Terrible Product. After about a month, it started producing cool-mist that smelled funny, like something bad had rotted in the room. The filters are a nuisance. I think I'm much better off with a steam vaporizer
VERY DISAPOINTED. I ordered the 5 piece ble set on MARCH 18th and still haven't received this. I keep on getting an email that it is on back order and I now won't get it until JUNE 30th. Costumer service is ridiculous, I was told it would take 3-5 days that's why I ordered it. DON't get it, if you need it within one yea
Dyson disappointment. I got this item to control pet hair as I have 2 dogs that shed.  It is ok, but not the performance I expected from dyson.  I love my vaccuum cleaner and figured this would be just as awesome.  Worth using, but not at the nearly 80.00 price tag.  If you can get a used one for half this price- then maybe
Unraveled after First Washing :(. I ordered the towel for a present for my husband and was extremely disappointed that the hem came unraveled after the towel's first washing although it was not in a bag with or washed with anything that had a button, snap, zipper, catch, or anything else that could possibly have snagged it.It was not nearly as soft as I expected for the price either. It was better than what you'd expect from your standard hotel towel, but it wasn't any softer than my towels from the JC Penny Collection.The redeeming quality is that the size is great for larger people and those who simply want to be completely wrapped up in a bath sheet
No blade pizza cutter. I thought I was ordering a pizza cutter.  When the order arrived I noticed it didn't have a blade, or maybe you call the wooden edge "a blade"!When you combine the costs of the pizza cutter with the shipping and handling it's the most expensive piece of wood I've ever purchased.I was looking for a real pizza cutter, not a block of wood to hang on the wall
Disappointed. I purchased two of these and was very disappointed. I could tell no difference. I have 2 dogs and 2 cats and was hoping for a little help keeping the indoor air "fresh." No such luck
worst new idea. I bought three of these mugs based on a recommendation by Mens Health Magazine. None of the mugs works correctly and the chrome ring on the cover has come off of each one. Initially this looks like a great idea but if the slots don't line up just right the mug will not work.  I have three of these mugs and each set of slots lines up differently. Stay away from this product if you wish to avoid agravation
BAD COFFEEMAKER. Coffeemaker just quit yesterday makes cold coffee now unable too use. got a three year warranty and lasted three months. Biggest waste of money yet. Now call customer service get a busy signal last 15 minutes. never buy another hamilton beach product.
Not a good investment :-(. The product description was great and I was looking forward to a cosy and heavenly blanket :-)  To my dismay this product was nothing like that...  It is ultra thin and like a paper thin foam sheet used in packing material ... lol..  It's both funny and disappointing... The thing is not a blanket at all... The sides are cut as if someone did that with a pair of scissors... the sides look real tacky.. This is one of those types of blankets that will not trap your body heat inside.. infact since you can see your hand from under the blanket, the cheap blanket will give way to any body heat emitted and the heat will easily escape from the blanket.The other thing is that this is no twin blanket... Being single I sleep on a twin bed, and its nice and cosy.. got three heavy duty blankets to keep me all warm in the winter... all of them are quality and ultra cosy and heavenly!  So these three blankets are exactly the same size - all by different manufacturers... which tells me that there is a standard size for twin blankets......  Though this blanket is quite a bit smaller in width than my three blankets.  It's so silly... to call such useless things, blankets...Save your money and please invest in something that will enhance your sleeping experience.. after this bad purchase experience I went to a Sears store in close to my home and purchased a nice blanket :-)  and love it
Not OXO quality. When I thought of OXO I though of great grips.  Nice soft quality weighty feel.  When I got this corkscrew I was shocked to find out that it was flimsy black plastic.  Looks like OXO in the picture but it is nothing more then cheap plastic bits.  OXO degraded their name with this product
a waste of money. I had a Hoover Windtunnel Supreme bagged upright vacuum in 2000.  It worked very well until sometime in 2003, when I replaced it.  I have a dog and two cats, so I need a good vacuum.   I replaced it with highly rated vacuum, that also worked well for three years until it started going downhill.   So I got another Hoover Windtunnel Supreme Bagged Upright.This new on is a piece of junk.  I've had it two months, gone through 2 belts, and I'm ready to throw it in the garbage.  It's lighter weight than the last one, and doesn't seem to work as well.  It doesn't even hold together well - for example, the end keeps coming off of the handle as I vacuum.Did I mention it just doesn't work very well?  Because it really doesn't.
Just as good as the price !. Pros:1.) Cheap2.) Looks PrettyCons:1.) Polyester - Not good to sleep in. Buy this only if you want to use it for decorating a bedroom/guestroom. Polyester fabric feels rough and coarse and is not at all worthy to sleep on.2.) Less thread countOverall, its just as good as the money it asks for !If you want to have a good sleep, then spend some more money on a 100% cotton comforter.All the comforters from Malibu seem to have the same properties
Didn't work at all. One of my cats peed on a pair of leather shoes. I soaked the shoes for a half hour (figured what did I have to lose?), let them dry, they still smelled. I soaked them again, using the remainder of the gallon jug, this time for an hour, they still smell. Good luck with the "guarantee" printed on the bottle. I have called customer service 4 times over the past week and was on hold for over 20 minutes each time, and gave up. I e-mailed them three days ago - no answer. So, don't plan on getting your $ back if this doesn't work for you
"Stainless" Steel. Though this item may be a piece of junk, I just wanted to clarify something for everyone. Steel will always rust, even the "stainless" steels. However, it is more resistant to rusting so long as you care for the item. For example: Dont leave in a the sink for too long, dont leave it outside in the rain or a puddle of water because it will rust.
A Lesson Learned....... Being lost without a timer for everything!, I purchased this to replace one that jumped into the dishpan......  Having a clock and the ability to time three events at once are great features, but the alarm is too soft. I have hearing problems, but even at a distance to 12-15 inches, the alarm is easy to miss.  Even my sharp eared children agree.  I wish I had read the reviews before purchasing.... a lesson learned for me.
same problem. Bought two spoons and within 2 months both had split along the glue lines.  The spoons were hand washed.  Get spoons but I can't afford to replace them every two months
Handles and temperature knob cracked and falling off!!. I only have used this about 8 times for just my husband and myself.  I took it out yesterday and the temperature knob fell off in two pieces in my hand.  Then I noticed the handles are all cracked and ready to come apart.  VERY DANGEROUS.  This gets very hot and if lifted it would cause a real problem
Nice design, poor materials. I purchased this coffee grinder in July of 2003.  I love the design and the color matches our other teal accented kitchen items perfectly.  It does a decent job of ginding coffee, but after only 5 months, of once a day use, it started to develop vertical stress cracks in the plastic casing around the top.  As of right now (January 2004), more cracks have developed and the initial cracks have become even longer (going down below the interior stainless steel &quot;bowl&quot;).  Because of all the cracks, the lid now fits very loosely, and I'm afraid that with more use, the cracks will continue to extend downward, rendering the entire unit unusable.  The stainless steel cased version may be the way to go, but since we don't have any stainless steel accessories in our kitchen, I will be replacing my grinder with another brand
So-so dry vac, not so great wet vac. We bought a well-reviewed carpet vacuum from Amazon last year, and absolutely love it. After that positive experience, we were looking for something for our kitchen, bathroom and hallway floors and came upon this cleaner.Starting with the dry vac part, that seems to get smallish pieces of dirt fine, but anything Cheerio sized or larger it pushes around on the floor unless you lean the vacuum back. Which would be fine, but if you lean it back too far, there is a suction filter thing (made for the wet vac part) that sticks and you have to turn off the vacuum and wait about 10 seconds for the suction to release that piece before you can continue. Anyway, the small dirt and dust are really picked up quite well, but if any of you have small children (we have 3 boys under 6), don't have any expectations of this getting up mealtime messes.Now, onto the wet vac part, which was the main reason we got this. Very disappointing. We used the included cleaner, warm tap water, etc as the directions indicated, and both my wife and I swear the floor is no cleaner than when we started. It doesn't look cleaner, shine more or even have a nice smell that we could even close our eyes and pretend it was clean. Spills or stains that normally take 1-3 passes with a mop are taking 8-12 passes with this machine. We bought this to save time and/or get cleaner floors, and I can honestly say that this machine did not do either.As briefly noted above, if you have children, do not expect clean floors out of this, and I can't recommend this at all. This product may be suitable for people who have no children, no pets and only small dust particles and light traffic; I just know this isn't our house
DeLonghi won't stand behind their workmanship!. Although their coffeemakers do an excellent job of making coffee, DeLonghi WILL USE ANY EXCUSE NOT TO HONOR THE WARRANTY IF ANYTHING GOES WRONG! Here's my experience: When I ordered my coffeemaker from DeLonghi, it was "backordered" and took over a month to ship. A little over 10 months after I received it, the coffeemaker broke! (The heater coil went out and it would no longer make coffee.) Since it had been over a year since I ORDERED it, they said the one-year warranty was expired, despite the fact I had proof I had received it less than a year before (I still had the shipping confirmation). I explained this numerous times. For a couple of months, the various people I talked to kept telling me they would "look into it", but they never called back. Finally, when it actually WAS over a year since I had received the coffeemaker, when I called to check on the status of my warranty claim, they said, "Your warranty has expired. You've had this coffeemaker over one year. There is nothing we can do." I highly recommend you find a coffeemaker from a manufacturer that stands behind their product! I have a Cuisinart now, and it is WONDERFUL!
Black and Decker Power Mop---- not for me or any one but an athlete. had trouble finding  out how to put it together--- then the motor started and would not stop--- had trouble getting the bottom  in the right angle to stop it and then the slightest movement and it would go on again.I would return it but it is too heavy to move--- heavy to move to make it change to mop part from brush part and making the motor stop was a formidable task.I will let he battery run out and try it a few more times and try to use it just as a heavy mop.  that should not take too long
Already broken. Seemed like a nice chair initially, however after 3 weeks of use it is now broken. Don't lean back. The plastic armrest which is also what attaches the back to the base snapped clean off on the right side
replacement filter does not perform like original. The original filter that came with the unit worked fine and it was easily able to humidify two large rooms.  This replacement filter, however, does not seem to wick water very well.  It can barely keep a 17x12' room at 30% humidity with the door closed, windows shut and heat turned off.  And it's in the 40s -- not even very cold out.  In fact, it wicks so badly that for the water level to change in the tank I have to flip the filter every hour or so.  I called Hamilton Beach but they said it wasn't their problem because the filters are manufactured by 3M.  Of course, this is the only filter offered for use with this unit
Very Disappointing. I had never heard of Bamboo Cutting Boards and was impressed by the pictures and advertisements posted on Amazon.com. In addition, in person the wood grain and various interlaying colors of this item are truly beautiful.  However, I was very disappointed in the quality of the craftsmanship.  Some of the various seams between the wooden pieces in the cutting board had large open gaps while others exposed wood glue that had leaked out and dried.  It also appeared as though during manufacturing some gaps in the wood were filled with glue or sealant, creating an unsightly blemish on the item.  Even more noticeable were 1/2-inch areas located in various spots around both sides of the cutting block that appeared to be rough or un-sanded/unfinished exposed wood. I do not recommend purchasing this item through the internet.
These shears don't cut it. The first use wasn't too bad. It cut things well but the lock locks too easily, without something even touching it, so it had to be unlocked multiple times during use. Safety is nice,but that is just annoying.The biggest problem is the coil/spring is NOT stainless-steel so the inside of it rusts, even if you take it apart for each washing. Once it gets rusty it becomes very very difficult toclose the shears, making cutting a real pain, literally. I soak the spring regularly in rust remover but I can not use it no more than a single piece now without horrible aches in my hand.My prior shears lasted for 10 years, but these I need to replace after a couple of months..
Cheap garbage Not cheap price!!. Buyer beware!! Don't bother buying this. Terrible quality. If you bought one at a local dollar store you would be better off and a lot easier on your wallet.
Does not work in extremely dry homes!. I bought this unit because the humidity in my apartment on extremely dry days and nights was 15-20%.  The Air-O-Swiss 7135 was rated top by every web site I visisted and researced before buying this product.  It is also rated to work in rooms up to 600 square feet, and the biggest room in my apartment is less than 500.  Well to summerize:- hygrostat consistently says 25% even though my bedside hygo says 15%.  The best I can get out of this machine is 30% humidity according to my own hygostat, as the one built into the unit does not move past 25%.-  the above situation is in the smallest room in my home, which is 170 square feet, so the 600 square feet rating is totally not true.To close, please be ware that this unit does not work for extremely dry apartments and homes like mine.  The other reviews must be in homes that are already at 30-40% humidity.  This is not worth the money you pay for it.  I will try running it non-stop for a few days to see if it helps, but if not then this unti will be going back.
Very unsatisfied. Just bought this thing...filled it up once - worked great - had to fill it up again and it's so awkward to hold - it slipped and cracked completely.  Called to order a replacement tank and they don't even have any!!!!  So, basically I threw all my money out the window!  Very upset.  They said to call back in two weeks to try to order the part
Cute, but dangerous... I received these as a wedding gift.  Not, five of my tall glasses are broken, and two short glasses...none of which were from dropping them.  One broke as I was hand-washing them, and cut up my hand.  Another literally broke as a guest was drinking out of it.  I was so embarrassed
Didn't last long:  BAD service. This was a fine machine until 2 months after the warranty ran out.  Then I began to get a ERR 6 error.  Cleared the thread, still no luck.  I took the machine to a Brother certified service center.  They advised they couldn't find anything wrong, except that it didn't work and could not help any further.  They advised to return it to the manufacturer.  When I called Brother, they advised my only alternative was to take it to another Factory Service Center.  I did, same story.  It appears that neither Brother or their Factory Service Centers care if their products stop working once the warranty runs out.  That type of service I can do without.  This one went into the trash, a $180 lesson in what brand NOT to buy.  I don't yet know what my replacement will be but it will absolutely not be a Brother
Don't waste your money. I have a few brown spots on the bottom of my le creuset.  I have never been able to get them off.  I thought this product would be the magic formula, but it wasn't.  If you're thinking about purchasing a le creuset you might think about purchasing the cleaner too to catch any stains as they happen, but once they're set nothing will take them out - not even this cleaner.
Great while it lasts. This filter worked great for about a year. then cracks developed in the top of the filter and water started spurting all over the place. Now i'm stuck with a bunch of unused replacement filters.
UNDERCABINET LITES. Not as expected. Does not give off enough lite to read cook books. Appears to be strictly decorative
DOA. Sigh. Was so excited to receive this item and it arrived today via UPS in pieces. I should have heeded the previous reviewer's warning. Doh! Oh well. Live and learn. Live and learn. Refund, please
troublesome. The poaching cups are small. It took several tries to learn to make eggs that didn't spill over; sometimes I had egg white in strings all over the machine when it was done. If you buy smaller eggs it helps.Now that the machine is a year old or so, it has started malfunctioning. The buzzer keeps going off as the eggs are cooking; I think the lid has gotten just warped enough that a seal isn't quite forming? For whatever reason, the machine keeps on thinking it is done, buzzing, and shutting down, so that I have to stand over it pressing down and trying to shift the way the lid fits on. It works well some days and gives me fits other days.I don't know if we put the parts in the dishwasher or if it's just a troublesome little machine; but if you have multiple family members taking turns washing dishes you may not have control over whether the egg machine gets warped.When it works, it's a favorite kitchen gadget--and I'm NOT fond of gadgets
Expensive Pitter. This pitter is a nice looking stainless steel pitter. If you don't mind wasting your money, this pitter is for you. After pitting a pound of cherries, effortlessly, the pitter's pin stopper broke....which meant the cherries had to be pulled off of the pin, slowing pitting. It was, pardon the pun, the pits
BEWARE.  Sharp metal spikes inside the docks!. Firstly, this product is useless as is - the dock will not stay above water.  You must silicone it to your tank for it to remain stable.That being said, it is inappropriate for this usage as well.  It is made of styrofoam which a turtle with claws will rip apart (and will eat the pieces.)  My adult RES broke off the entire corner of the dock and there was a LARGE METAL SPIKE PROTRUDING pointing in the exact direction the turle climbs from.  I suppose this is the inner armature - it is not a blunt-edge metal wire, which would be dangerous enough, but a thick VERY SHARP spike.  I actually broke skin by touching it while trying to photograph it (sending a letter to the company.)I consider myself very lucky that my turtle did not impale himself.  Stay away from this product.  If you would like a ramp, I suggest getting a piece of cork bark and siliconing it to your tank
Overpriced. This pan fails to deliver. This pan is the black sheep of the All Clad line. It is made of solid stainless steel and is not an aluminum triply pan as it is advertised. It is also made in Korea unlike the other All Clad products which are made in the USA. Shop around there are better products out there for half the price
Bad supplier. I would not buy Sango products from Amazon if I were you.  Their supplier is terrible.  There is nothing wrong with Sango products, it is just that Amazon and the supplier do not care about product quality or customer happiness.The first set that I received had bubbles in the glaze and it was easy to send it back.  However, the second set I received came broken.  Things like this do happen in the mail, but what upset me was the fact that there were wrapped up pieces and notes from a previous customer.  What this told me was that the supplier was sending out already returned broken items and trying to pass them off as new.  I brought this to Amazon's attention twice and all I received was a generic response.  I recommend you buy your Sango products elsewhere
RUST on bottom appeared after first use!!!. I was disappointed by this toothbrush holder after putting it to use for just one day - any drops of water that run down the side of the holder or end up around the bottom edge due to splashing/runoff from the bathroom sink immediately seem to trigger the bottom of the holder to rust! I tried to keep the splashing to a minimum but this thing started leaving a rust-ring on my bathroom counter within a couple days. I still use it since it's a nice-looking & easily cleaned toothbrush holder but I keep a coaster under it to protect the sink/counter. I wish I could give it more stars since I love the look & functionality of it but I have to give it only 2 stars since I think making it rust-proof is only common sense for something that sits next to your sink. I wonder if all the steeltek "stainless-steel" products rust so easily??
False Advertising. I received my order today and don't believe the product description.  There's NO stainless-steel steamer basket included and the instruction manual states that this pressure cooker is NOT dish-washer safe.  While I plan to keep my order, I'll be more cautious ordering from Amazon again; if I order from them again.  Don't believe everything you read.  Caveat emptor
Door Opens - Clunky & Loud. I am not fond of this particular microwave because of the loud clunky sound of the door opening.  Poor in my opinion.  I can't believe that I will probably put up with this for years as I use my microwave several times a day.  My husband just complained that the start button is hidden on the user display among the other buttons.  Seems like there should some sort of user standards for display input.  Like Power buttons in the upper left corner.  Most-used buttons should be large.  maybe in a special color.  I like the web 2.0 look that is developing on user interfaces.  No user interface should make the user feel stupid is my thought.  I asked my husband what was the brand name and he said "Sharp" so even if cheap I think Sharp ought to protect the brand image.  But I see that I am in the minority of opinions here.  Maybe my advice is not order on line till you try this item out
Can't get the order straight!!!!!!. They sent me a BLUE Hudson Jacquard Diamond Love Seat Slipcover 3 times. I gave up after the 3rd time. What really sux is that they did send the Olive sofa cover!!! So now they don't match!!!
review. coffee warmer only keeps coffee lukewarm.  so i am still in the market for a coffee warmer
Too small for a betta. Caring for fish in a very small bowl like this one is stressful both for the fish and the fishkeeper.In a small bowl like this, the fish's waste will build up rapidly (espcially since there is no filter). This causes suffering (for example, eye and skin irritation), sickness, and even death. You can try to prevent this by changing the water frequently; however, frequent water changes are also stressful for the fish. (Not to mention a pain for the fishkeeper!)In addition, the temperature of such a small volume of water will fluctuate rapidly; another source of stress for the fish. You cannot use a heater in a bowl this small.Bettas are tropical fish. They need a tank heated to 80F; there is no way to safely heat a tank smaller than 5 gallons.If you'd like to care for a fish, please read some of the excellent websites out there and learn all you can. (Ignore manufacturers websites, since of course they will say their products are great, even crummy products like this one.) Get the largest tank you can afford. If you can't afford a large enough tank, please don't get the fish.
It shouldn't be marketed. All I wanted was to have an easy-to-use vacuum for my studio apartment. So I got this one for it's cheap and good for bare floor. Yet it died off at the first time I used it-rather tried to use it. It was on just for 20 mins, not continuously though. I had already emptied the bag for two times and my back was virtually broken when I used it. Anyway, if anyone from the Euro-Pro is reading the reviews on this product, they should recompensate all of us because I believe marketing such a product is kind of abusing customers! Don't waste your money on this product
Poor sales. I ordered some replacement batteries and was told that they would be here last Wednesday.  It is now thursday of the next week.  I have emailed them and told them to email me or call me to let me know where my package is and to no affail, no call.  I will never order from Petsafe again!!
Duvet not as advertised - do not buy. The duvet is barely flannel - it is so thin I can't believe it was advertised as flannel. The sham is much thicker than the duvet. It was also received with a layer of thick dust on the folded up duvet even though it was zipped up in a clear plastic bag. I would recommend staying away from this product
Does not work more than 1 foot away. I just got this from Amazon - working on returning there is no range between the PAW and doorbell chime. Even at 2 - 3 feet away with brand new batteries it seems to have issues. I thought it would be more usable than a hanging bell and easier to install with less holes and hardware. The PAW is more like a toy so you have to mount it and since there is no range u have to mount the reciever directly above it. With the range of the one I have it would of made sense to combine the two
Look nice, but... These dishes look very nice on your table, but they have many problems.After about a year, my plates started cracking, directly above the ridge on the bottom.  Same with the bowls.I have never been able to use them in the microwave because the item becomes very hot while the food is lukewarm.If they bump each other while running the dishwasher, they chip.  At least, when I put them in they are ok, but they are chipped when I take them out
Garbage. It broke after one month.  It was fun while it lasted, but I would hesitate in purchasing this if I were you
Received only half a hutch!. After reading countless poor reviews of the Dolce desk and hutch, I was quite skeptical about ordering it online. ... I gave in and ordered the set from target.com. The desk arrived in almost perfect condition (a few smudges in the stain); however, only half the hutch was in its box! The entire drawer (left side of hutch) was missing, the hardware was missing, and the assembly instructions were missing. ... I recommend calling your local Target store to check the Dolce collection's availability (and the parts inside!) before you waste the time and gas to get there. Aside from the missing hutch, the desk looks really great in my home office.
very tiny bowls. These are not at all what I was expecting.  To me, these are tiny bowls -- they measure 5 1/4 inches across top.  [...
so small. This is so small it barely fits a quarter stick of butter. Rip of
Repairs taking over 3 months. We bought this model Nov. of 2006. It quit in Feb 07, and Hoover doesn't have part available to repair it, says it could be May before we get it back.(They say it's the on-off switch, it won't turn on) They are very sorry and extended our warranty for a year.  I've owned Hoovers for 25 years but will never buy another one.  Before it quit I did like the extending wand.  It was a mess each time you emptied it, and we had to empty it every time we vacuumed or it plugged up
Made in CHINA!. It is NOT "Made in USA".  It is made in CHINA
Dead out of the box. Never got it to work.  All i get when I hit the on/tare button is "- - - -"In the trash it goes
I hate it. I really wanted to like this product.  I love my cappucino and used to own an express maker like this that worked well.  The Mukka Express never worked for me.  Coffee squirts out the sides (I cleaned the lip and gasket with a Qtip to make sure there was a good seal!) and no matter how I clean it or dry it, the material oxidizes like a 63 Ford in a Cleveland winter.  I just threw mine in the trash
Littermaid Poor Quality. While this product cleans the litter box well when it works, the problem is we've had two of these stop working in 2 months.  Apparently the motor driving the rake is weak and burns out easily.
Ok quality. I bought this only because I wanted a pair of stainless shears. You do need your muscles, though. I am using it to remove the fins from fish. Good luck
Not a durable surface. I purchased this fry pan in June of this year - and it is almost to a state where it is ready to be thrown away as of December 1st.  I would have expected the nonstick surface to be of superior quality and durability from All-Clad, but the sad truth is that I have had cheap grocery store pans that have maintained the coating far longer, and a small fraction of the cost.  After just a few weeks the surface became scratched on this pan and the coating started to come off in the food - ick!  I love the uncoated All-Clad, but I will be looking elsewhere for nonstick in the future
Not as great as I was hoping. I'm not sure exactly what I was expecting, but I know this wasn't it. My dog can't play with it because it is way too big and the throwing device doesn't work any better than my own arm
Mikasa missed on this one. This is an ugly vase.  So ugly we are returning it the day we received it.  It does not measure up to Mikasa standards at all.  It looks and feels like a cheap vase one would buy at Target.  We were very disappointed.  Stick to the clean, lean lines of other Mikasa crystal vases
Great, if you like false alarms and being woken up in the middle of the night for nothing!. Garbage. We have 6 smoke alarms in our house. Two of them are First Alert. This one, and another model. The ONLY ones that repeatedly false alarm are the First Alert. This one is the WORST. Randomly, for ZERO reason, it goes off. Usually in the middle of the night. Called Customer Service and they tried to tell us it was because it was near a bathroom with humidity. Yea, right. Moved it downstairs, near NO bathrooms or kitchens and it STILL falses.  GARBAG
Not happy with this machine. Christmas morning and the slow, ongoing leak, which we worked around over the last year, finally gave way and voila! hot coffee and water and grounds all over the counter and floors. And yes, we clean our coffeemaker daily, and yes, we know how to properly run the thing too. (We gave up on the water filter soon after purchase--it kept falling into the coffee grounds.) Why the two stars? We wanted to love this machine! We wanted it to work! It is a handsome machine with a handsome pedigree (a Mr. Coffee!). The clock is nice. The thermal carafe is lovely. Until the BIG LEAK, we made do with its daily dribble and sputter. But really, after examining the unit carefully before its trip to the trash can, we realized how foolish we were in keeping this fire hazard going as long as we did. That's why I've bothered to write this review. It is not an inexpensive machine; the quality isn't there. Sorry.
Savings lost on shipping. The price entices you and then you lose any savings on the outrageous shipping charges
The price is right, but.... I bought this dish about 6 months ago and use it on a regular basis.  However, when baking some fish at moderate oven temperature (375), it split into two separate pieces with a loud "crack"; there was no extreme temperature changes either.Go figure
Cute, but poor quality. I have to start by saying that this is a review for the sheets only, not the whole set.  But since no one else has yet to review the whole set, I felt compelled to educate buyers on at least half of what they were purchasing. :o)I bought this sheet set for my toddler because they look so adorable, and they are. They're vibrant. But when I first openened the package, I was disappointed to feel how uncomfortable they were.Naturally, I hoped that they would soften up after a few washes...but after 5 washes, they still felt rough. And to add insult to injury, the elastic edge on the bottom sheet started to unravel and create a 4 inch hole.I'm no expert on thread count when it comes to sheets, but I would guess that these are around 100. The weave is so loose that you can see through the sheets and it reminds me of gauze.It's a shame that they are of such poor quality b/c I really do love the pattern. I ended up just making curtains out of mine.Although not advertised in the description here, the tag on my sheets say Dan River and I noticed that this company produces a lot of the cute sheets for Star Wars. So I'd say that there is a good chance that many of the Dan River sheets are made with the same quality, although I don't know for sure
Nice as a one season sheet set. I have to admit that I love this set. Especially since I found it hard to find white flannel sheets. Most have some ridiculous pattern on it like snowflakes or snowmen! So when I found these and at this price I was quite happy. They feel great, not the best flannel but nice all the same. But after washing it 3 times within one month the fabric really weakened and the flat sheet tore. Later the fitted started getting holes. So since this was rather cheap I am not horribly sad about it. So if you are looking for comfy warm sheets for one season and then want a selection of rags for the rest of the year for housecleaning, this is the set for you
Didn't work... my nextdoor neighbor's dog merely ignored it. Super Bark Free didn't work in the least to stop my nextdoor neighbor's dog's extremely irritating ear-piercing loud barking - he merely ignored it (though fortunately my neighbor was good about trying to keep the dog quiet). I'm mad that I wasted a lot of money on a totally ineffective product.If you decide to purchase Super Bark Free, be sure it's returnable for a full refund if it doesn't live up to its claims. And in the meantime, shop around for a more effective product
What was Hoover thinking?  Messy!. The vacuum has great suction.  However, suction is the only good quality about this vacuum.I purchased this vacuum at Sears and got a good discount during their vacuum sale.  But I have gone through 3 of these vacuums and have returned or plan on returning each one.  The 1st vacuum got so much dirt stuck behind and in the hepa filter, the vacuum started making a sound like it was going to break.  The 2nd vacuum had a handle that was assembled badly so with each forward and backward pass the handle felt like it was going to come off.This vacuum is hard to push.  You have to put the carpet setting at close to high for low carpeting. On hard surfaces the vacuum is hard to push too!This vacuum has a large dust cup with 2 sections. The small compartment in the back of the dust cup is (1" high X 5" wide X 6" deep) for the dirt.  The large front section collects the hair, crumbs and other larger things you pick up off the floor in your home, however dirt and fine particulate dust is what I collect in my vacuum, and Hoover only gives you that little compartment for the dirt so it gets caught in the vacuum behind the hepa filter.  You spend more time cleaning out the vacuum than you do vacuuming your carpet. Today I had to pick up the vacuum and shake it over the trash can to get most of the dirt out from behind the hepa filter. Even my husband noticed that this vacuum takes too much time to empty and clean out.  Yes lots of dirt falls onto the vacuum when you remove the dust cup and is messy to clean up.I have tried Kenmore, Eureka, and Fantom in the past. I plan on returning the 3rd vacuum once I get my Dyson I purchased from HSN
Perhaps they mean "Extreme Power" as in rechargable battery. When I found this listing, I thought the "Extreme Power Stick Vacuum" meant the suction was powerful.  I apparently was wrong. This vacuum won't even pick up dust bunnies off the tile floor. Purchasing this item was a waste of my time and my money.
DO NOT BUY!!! RUSTED IN THE SECOND DISHWASHER WASH!!!. The pans look very nice and very durable-but they are NOT!!! SAVE YOUR MONEY DO NOT BUY THIS!!! I had to put them through the dishasher a second time to remove some more of the sticky residue on the bottom of the pan from the label. When they came out of the dishwasher there were RUST SPOTS all over them. I am going to try and return mine as soon as I get a chance. I never even got to use the pans before they rusted. It should be noted that a)The pans were NEVER left soaking in water or in the sink b)There was not ANYTHING even the TINIEST bit rusty in the dishwasher with them to have "rubbed off" rust onto them or anything like that. HORRIBLE, HORRIBLE pans-they should be ashamed to make or sell these!!
Dull after (or during) one use. I bought this and one of their wooden pizza peels. I thought it would be ergonomically advantageous, which it may be.But on the first pizza I cut (on the Mountain Woods peel), the edge is now folded over a bit, rendering the edge much, much less sharp than out of the box.So, I would suggest you save your $3 and the out-sized shipping costs and buy yourself a cutter that may last for a while
they don't function. i hated these shakers. i got them as a gift and 1. they are too big and take up too much space and 2. the rubber stoppers were not a tight fit so the salt and pepper was always leaking out the bottom and 3. the holes in the top are too big and too much comes out at once. finally one broke and i was thrilled to toss them out. the other, smaller fiesta ware ones -- the round ones -- are much much better
Don't bother!. Horrible!  Only two cutting wheels.  Does not fit on bottles with an extra wide neck.  Flimsy. I would guess that this will break in a month or two.  Stick to a Screwpull
not happy!. Bought one and did not work, returned for another and also did not worked.I called for assistance and tried and tried but ended returning it. I also bought one for my daugther for Crhistmas and told her not to even open the box and try it, so returned too.  Amazon had credit me for one W. Robotic but still waiting for the credit on the one I bought for my daugther.  I bought 2 together and returned them also together. Don't know why I am not getting the credit. Bad experience...
Don't buy! Doesn't work well!. When we first bought it, it worked nicely and smoothly. Thought we do not need to buy another opener again. Boy were we wrong! After the third use, it will open only a small gap and the handle will just keep spinning. Reminds me of a car turning it's wheels will all smoke and noise but no results. Glad we still kept our old opener from a much lesser known brand. This opener certainly does damage to the KitchenAid name
Space Heater. The heater does not give off the heat I thought it would.  You have to be sitting right next to it to really get any warmth from it.  It does not have an element that radiates heat so there isn't a lot of heat for the fan to send out.  I would honestly recommend spending a little more and going for a larger unit.  I did like the on and off timer feature though and the fact that it turns off if knocked over.
Poor quality control. Unfortunately, I should have paid attention to previous reviews when I placed my order for Plum Fiesta ware.  Of the 11 items I ordered, 5 were defective (most had serious scratches, and the salt shaker was missing the bottom plug).  This indicates a serious lack of quality control.  Why would those people responsible for filling an order choose defective merchandise to ship out?  I placed this order as a wedding gift, to make matters worse
Faulty. Hinky open/shut mechanism. It takes persistence to get the latch to click correctly and open. If it weren't so heavy, I would've returned it long ago
overwhelming reputation, underwhelming performance. The machine produces an extremely wonderful cup of espresso.  It's main and constantly irritating flaw is this turbo frother sleeve.  It has too many pieces to clean, and worst of all, the sleeve does not remain securely attached to the the metal steam pipe.  Several times I've had the frother explode off the machine in a cloud burst of half-steamed milk that sprayed all over the kitchen.  I've had various other problems with this complicated design.  In fact, the company provides a detailed, additional page of instructions on how to troubleshoot with the frother sleeve, which suggests to me that the company is already aware that the design is flawed.  I have to ask the question: why not produce a simple, metal frother that doesn't break and require such special care?This is the second Gaggia machine that I have purchased this year (the previous was a full automatic with a faulty sensor), and this is the second Gaggia that has left me disappointed.  I agree that the espresso quality is very good - but I remain underwhelmed for the prices I've paid, given the design flaws I've encountered
Too Big for Oven. This is a wonderful pizza pan...nonstick, durable, and sturdy.  BUT  it does not fit in my oven!! Unlike other 14 inch pizza pans, this one has a wide rim, causing it to be much more than 14 inches in diameter. Measure your ovens before buying it, because it is actually 16+ inches
Aesthetically pleasing, but too heavy. I must say I'm a big fan of Calphalon.  I own several pots and pans from both their tri-ply stainless steel and non-stick contemporary series and I love them and highly recommend them.I bought these knives assuming that their quality in cookware would translate into cutlery.  I ended up returning them after several days... here's why.PROS:Absolutely beautiful knives that are well crafted with very rigid stainless steel (more rigid than Henckels and Wustof).  The Santoku knife is a nice addition.  I loved that the steel construction went all the way to the end of the handle.  The steel provided with the set supposedly actually SHARPENS the knives as opposed to only HONING them.  Who knows.CONS:1. Very heavy.  Compared to the German knives, these are not agile at all and can be painful on the wrists especially when using the very substantive chef's knife.  I thought the weight would add to the cutting ease but it really did not.  On top of that, the weight was unevenly distributed making the knives feel unbalanced.2. Short handles.  As you progress to the smaller knives, the handles got annoying short.  This just compounded the weight issue.3. No sharpness advantage.  I ended up purchasing the Henckels twin cuisine set of knives as they were similar in design (and also has a Santoku in the set!) to the Katana series.  I noticed that even though the "VG Japanese steel" was supposed to be even sharper and stronger than the German steel, I felt like the Henckels knives were still sharper and cut through everything with much more ease.4. Slightly harder to clean.  The integrated bolster design makes it slightly hard to clean since any sponge you use against the blade tends to snag on the sharp end of the bolster.  All the other German knives have a rounded bolster.  This is by far the least important con.All in all, I think the Henckels Twin Cuisine knife set is extremely similar in price and design, and additionally does not suffer from the deficiencies of the Katana Series knives
One can, not cans!. Why state cans, lids, and list two sizes when it is only one can
2 1/2 Stars ~ Good concept, Poor excecution. Got this tea kettle for a gift recently.  It's discontinued on Amazon but they sell it at Home Goods for $ 24. 99.PROS ~* Asthetically pleasing (looks pretty)* Removable top for wide area to fill with water AND makes it easier to wash* Removable whistle (I can't stand the sound of a whistling tea kettle, so I remove the "plug")CONS ~* It'd be nice if the tea kettle had a flip up "plug" on the spout instead of the removable one (I'll lose it eventually, the other Le Creuset models have the flip up "plug" that opens with a press of the thumb)* The poor design of the spout is dangerous.  No matter how slowly I pour the boiling water (even with the small amount I use, only 4 or 6 ounces at a time), a few tablespoons of water "blub" out very quickly - sorry I can't think of a better descriptive word.  The spout opening is WAY too small, but the width of the spout itself allows more of a flow of water, so the first few tablespoons GUSH out.  So when you pour the water, do it as slowly as possible, put the mug on your counter or another surface that won't get ruined when wet, and don't hold onto your mug as you pour the water because the "blub" of boiling water will burn
broke first time using. Update:Just found out there is a 10 year warranty. They sent me a new one right away. I'll give it one more try.Old:It lasted about 5 minutes then registered high only. I used it on in a grill cooking a filet. Did nothing special, grill was not set at its highest temp.This is the second one and the last one I try
Lipper Beechwood Lazy Susan, 13 inch. The problem for me with this beautiful beechwood lazy susan was this:  No edge around the perimeter to keep the various condiments, etc from sliding off
Not one I would buy again. Mine only lasted about 3 months before the gears stripped.  And I didn't use it much
Sheds lint even after washing. I purchased a 4 towels, 4 washcloths and 2 handtowels as a gift for my brother.  After the towels, etc. were washed several times they still left lint on him and the wall the towel rack was on.  Needless to say, he gave me my gift back.  Now I'm stuck with the towels.  If I could return them, I would.  This item should not receive even 1 star but since 1 is the lowest, that will have to do
Felt like canvas. These sheets are very heavy and stiff - they feel a lot like canvas.  Also, they do not fit deep pockets mattress at all.  I returned min
Was this a tease?. Perhaps with such an amazingly low price ($30) it was bound to be too good to be true, but this item stayed on order for more than a month before I was told it was out of stock
Leaky Bugger. I love the concept of ironing this way, I just needed a machine that didn't leak out all of the water for steam all over the table
do not buy. It does not melt chocolate effectively at all. This was a total waste of money.
Don't waste your money!. Both of these broke...one after another the first time I tried to use them on a regular sized wine bottle.  Buy the Zyliss ones instead - 4 for $7.99.  Zyliss ones are great
kinda small.. Disclaimer #1: I love my All-Clad pots. Love love love.Disclaimer #2: I don't own this.But isn't three quarts kinda small to make Cassoulet?? When I make it each fall, it fills the largest of my roasters (and even mounds over it). I have no idea how I'd get a mutton shoulder, a pork shoulder, a duck, a pound of sausage, and five (when dry) cups of beans into such a wee thing -- unless I had several of them
Server only. This item is for serving only, it will not keep the liquid hot or cold more than 30 mins
Destroyed in 20 minutes. My Lab mix had the rope detached from the tennis ball material in less than 20 minutes.  In the same time, she'd broken some of the individual strands of the nylon rope, so if one thing hadn't broken something else would have.  Not durable, not recommended
Looks good/Produces bad toast. This toaster looks good on your counter and is very sturdy.  However, the toaster's raison d'etre is to produce toast, and at least mine produces very inconsistent toast.  When I set the toaster on 3 (out of 8) and put a piece of wheat bread in, it is usually 'well done' on the side that faces the center, brown on the top part that faces the outside, and barely done on the bottom part that faces the outside.The bun toasting feature, which works pretty well, is its only saving grace.My Sunbeam toaster that I bought for 15 dollars was better than this one
M from Connecticut. 5 stars for the looks and 0 stars for the noise that these sheets make. I couldn't sleep first week, and considered to ship it back, but I've already ordered a matching bath curtains from Balard Designs, so I will keep it
Not good for proper tempering. I bought this for chocolate as I have tempered chocolate before using a double boiler and this seemed easier. When melting it says it will melt up to a pound of chocolate but you are only supposed to fill the bowl to a certain line and when it melts you have about a third of a bowl of chocolate not a full bowl as picture shows. It formed tiny lumps before it melted and after it cooled to 85 I poured into molds. It never set fully, most stuck in the molds and others went crumbley. Instructions have you melt and cool to 85 only, nothing about cooling and then reheating to 85 as it says on this site. I also melted some yogurt coating which worked fine other than the fact you could only fill to a certain line although you could keep adding as it melted. Good for kids maybe or just for coatings but not to temper real chocolate
review of flying squirrel. the thing did not work right from the beginning and now the tail fell off would not recommend it to anyon
It STINKS. -It only heats the outer edge of the pan and not the center and this   burns and dry's out the edges. Also the NON STICK FLAKES off after a half dozen uses. YUM!!YUM!!!Eat those little flakes and scrub a bit HARDER to clean it!!!  Not to mention the burnt area's!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!I cook a lot of thing such as meatballs in speghetti sauce and vegetable soup for 12 hours +++++. Sorry about my luck..
Sticky wok. I bought the same wok from bed bath and beyond. After only 1-2 times, the non-sticky coat started peeling and eventually came off completely. Unless you plan to do very simple stir-flying, I won't recommend this wok
USELESS. Don't understand previous review.  It was quick to heat up but only produced a very small amount of steam.  You had to HOLD IT IN ONE SPOT for it to actually do anything, which was very little.  Would still be here till the next ice age getting out wrinkles. TOTALLY USELESS
DONT BUY IT!. My cat hates it,,i think he is scare  of it,,the first time he saw it he was curious  like any cat would be but once it was built all he did was go in ,smelled it and left .HE NEVER PLAYED IN IT AT ALL, i hated all those people that said to me that thing was fun for all cats.Its a lie,,that thing was out in the middle of the room for weeks and he never showed interest in it.He likes other toys like feather teasers and chew on toys,maybe thats why.The thing is so light that when i tried putting him on top of it ,it seemed that thing was going to break,,it was sinking in because of the weight of my cat.My cat got scared probably thinking it wasn't going to hold him and the minute i let go of him he took off running to hide.HORRIBLE.WASTE OF MONEY
Teeny tiny. Nowhere in the description of this product did it state that it was only six inches tall, and made three (4 oz) cups.  What a disappointment
Too flimsy!   Light also not that bright. Being somewhat of an insomniac I read well into the hours of the night and a book light is essential to me.  I therefore purchased the itty bitty booklight.  If you do use this light it is essential to purchase the power supply for two reasons.  Firstly, there is no auto shut-off so if you fall asleep reading your batteries wear down very quickly.  Secondly, when using batteries, they start dimming rather quickly making it hard on the eyes and difficult to read resulting in the constant need for new batteries.  This light is also extremely fragile.  Over a couple of years I went through 7 of these!  I would not recommend this light - for the amount you spend on the never-ending purchasing of batteries or the expensive power supply, and the constant new purchases after it breaks, you might as well splurge and buy a decent book light. I now have the Tri Lite by Capstone Enterprises (available at Barnes & Nobel - come on and get it in stock Amazon!)  It is terrific!  It has a clock with an alarm and a timer.  You can set it to stay on for any period of time and once it reaches that time the light flashes.  At that time you can extend the minutes.  If you don't do so, for example you're sleeping, it will automatically shut off.  It also produces much more light and is much brighter than the Itty Bitty Book Light
Save your money. This item is cheaply made and I sent it back.  The picture looks cool but it's deceiving.  The minute hand was so loose that when it was on the right side, it flopped down to the right and then when it was on the left, it plopped down to the left.  It couldn't keep the right time
Terrible to put together. Mine also had scratches upon delivery.  But putting it together was a nightmare. I should say IS, because I am still trying to put it together!  The slots do not line up well with each other, causing you to try numerous times to get the pieces to fit together.  Also the decorative pieces that go on the upper sides do not slide completely in, so I was forced to (with great difficulty) get them out again and leave it with these empty slots on the side looking rather bad.  The idea of this item would have been great and very convenient if it had not come with scratches and was much easier to put together
Nice desk...if it's not broken when you get it. Save yourself from disappointment...this desk doesn't ship well. When I got mine the front corners of the desktop were totally smashed. Shipping it back is a hassle because it's such a huge package, and you can't return it to Target retail stores. Basically, this is just a waste of time and shipping cost
feedbackl on wine glasses. These glasses are VERY cheap. I sent everyone of them back. When i recived them 2 were broken. They are very thin
Not as advertised.... I was very impressed with the infomercials on this product and was about to buy the set before I read a very detailed and thorough online review at http://www.epinions.com/content_180924944004.  The reviewer gives a blow by blow review challenging all the claims made by the commercial for this product.  Among her pet peeves:* things do stick to the product - use a flour cooking spray for better results.* odors do stay with the product* not easy to clean - the reviewer says she found a special plastic cleaning product helps.* size of the pieces are small* the pieces are so flexible that if you don't place the food neatly in the pan, you get some unexpected lumps or misshapened results.* you can slice through the product easily.* guarantee is shakey at best* and so on.....There are one or two pluses but not enough to warrant buying in the face of all the negative issues brought to light.And more importantly, I personally wonder how safe it is to cook food on silicon surfaces at high tempertures on a day to day basis.  I for one, definitely will not buy this product.Please consider this recap of another's review a public service.Buyer beware
2 out of 2 - Kaput!!!. Absolutely love the design, am heartsick that my first unit and the replacement BOTH quit working after about 3-4 weeks.... local service NOT existent.... Amazon replacement policy super.... but basic design problem, methinks.... water flows all over occasionally and pc board stops working when wet with coffee..... just wish unit would work, and;or service center would be avail.... unit probably should be recalled.......Ron Romansk
Works well, briefly... As far as whisks for non-stick surfaces go, the silicone-encased wires are very flexible--a far cry from the hard, thick plastic whisks with only a few wires.  They are ideal for non-stick surfaces except for one problem.  The silicone is soft and not durable.  After a few uses or getting banged around with other utensils in the drawer, the silicone gets easily cut.  The silicon then easily peels exposing the stainless wire inside which defeats the purpose.  I have been very careful, but this works out to probably $2 each time I used it
useless, falsely advertised junk. One of the worst products I've ever purchased.  The top isn't secure so that it leaks; so much for travel
Didn't last very long. I had confidence in the brand as I've had a number of Holmes humidifiers in the past, all lasting between three and six years (winter only usage). This model quit producing mist in less than three weeks. Thank goodness for Amazon's easy return policy
Doesn't last. I use this every Sunday - the hinges broke after 5-6 uses.  I will be buying the Waring Pro next
Hard, inedible rice. I bought a few of these on Amazon thinking that it would be nice as gifts. I tried one at home first, since I hate breaking out the rice cooker to make rice for 1 person.I followed the directions, and put it in the microwave. I ended up with hard undercooked rice, and a mess in my microwave. The water boiled over and went everywhere, and since it is rice water, it was starchy and hard to clean. Now I have 2 unopened boxes waiting for the Salvation Army. What a waste..
Mediocre Tea Pot. This teapot is not the greatest.  When pouring, it leaks and you end up with tea stains on your counter.
Very poor quality, do not recommend. When I washed this flatware in my dishwasher some of the knives and forks seemed like they were rusting or the silver on the flatware was coming off.  I called Oneida and they are willing to replace the pieces that are a problem but the same thing keeps happening.  Oneida said that if you have hard water where you live then this can happen.  I had an oneida set prior to this one that I had for 8 years and this never happened.   I would not recommend this flatware to anyone.  The more they get washed in the dishwasher the more it starts to rust.  Very disappointed and surprised in the poor quality of this flatware
I'm Steamed!. I have really enjoyed the quality of all of my other Cuisinart cookware.  Unfortunately, this tea kettle does not belong in the otherwise excellent product line.  The kettle's shape makes it very difficult to pour.  The handle conveys all of the heat of the boiling water, so you are not able to touch the handle without a hot pad.  I have given up using the whistle attachment for two reasons:  first, it is not made of Cuisinart's stainless steel (it appears to be made of plastic with a silver plastic coating), and so it has cracked and peeled from the heat; and second, it is impossible to remove the whistle when the kettle is hot so you are unable to pour your boiling water (often all that comes off when attempting to remove the whistle is the decorative ball on its tip!).  I really wish that I had returned this tea kettle
Misleading product. I should have taken more time to research this product.  After opening the box tonight, I realized that what I got was NOT the fountain, it was just the resevoir. I will be returning this item
I wasn't happy with the quality. I didn't buy this for myself, it was a gift.  Honestly I doubt I would have purchased it for myself because I wanted a *serious* pepper grinder.  I use my grinder every day and I like a lot of pepper.  I found this grinder to be a pain because of how light the output was-- I had to sit there squeezing for what felt like ages.  In addition, the grind isn't adjustable, although it was supposed to be.  Finally, the handle simply broke off one day.  I didn't drop it or anything.  I guess it's not for serious use.
Worst product I have ever purchased!!!. This was the worst product I have ever purchased. After two times using the skillet and once in the dishwasher, the nonstick coating already peeled off of the bottom. It went in the trash. I would not waste my money on this product
Doesn't work as promised. I followed the instructions, many times, but still can't get the cork pulled out of the wine bottle.The Oster wine opener cork-screw goes in just fine.  However, instead of pulling out the cork, the cork-screw just reverses direction and comes out of the cork.  I'm 75 and bought this after reading a review on how great it was for older folks with arthritis.  Well, maybe I have a "lemon" but I certainly would love someone from Oster tell me is I'm doing something wrong.Thank you for the opportunity to bring this to someone's attentio
WORST EVER. Heavy ball on bottom weighs down the curtain and the curtain comes right off the rod every time I'm stepping out of the shower - pass on this and just buy the cheap rings...you won't be sorry.   I didn't even buy these for myself, but they came in the apartment I moved into.  Quickly replaced them!  Horrible.
didn't last long. This stopper came apart when I tried to remove it during it's second use. When I first put the stopper in the bottle, it was loose, although when I opened it a few days later, the seal was enough to cause it to break (with a weak pull). It also adds about an inch to the bottle height which could cause storage problems. I recommend a stopper that has a lever on top that fits the stopper to the bottle opening (and also doesn't add as much height). I had an inexpensive one from Crate and Barrel that worked great but I can't find it (guessing it got thrown away).
Quit working after 11 months. I purchased the ORBI in April 2006 and two weeks ago, the teeth quit "gripping" the can rendering the product useless.  Considering most good old-fashioned openers last for years, I think the fact that this one barely lasted ONE year says everything you need to know when considering to purchase this product.  Choose something else
RUSTS....in less than a month of use... HOW CAN THIS BE STAINLESS STEEL????. Title is self explanatory, I'm very busy to write reviews but I needed to make this one, make sure nobody gets fooled by brand name , at medium prices and ultra low quality. I've bought a 5$ nobrand knife from TOP and is WAY better that this
Disappointed. I bought this fryer 3 months ago and was thrilled with it at first. It has all the features I was looking for-- in particular that it was fully washable and it had a drain spout. The only thing I didn't like was that the temperature selections were pre-set and I couldn't vary  the temp to EXACTLY what I wanted. It wasn't that big of a deal though. But after using the machine about a month I started getting an error message on the LED screen and the machine would shut off. I always reset it pretty quickly so I could continue to use it. The messages came more and more often and today I cannot use the machine at all-- it instantly goes to the error message and I cannot use it and I cannot cook my lunch the way I wanted to. I'm very disappointed that this machine didn't even last me 3 whole months. I've emailed DeLonghi--- I hope they'll help (I never send in product registrations but I think this time I've learned my lesson
didn't work. I thought this would be a great way to train my puppy to ring the chime when she had to go out. I was so excited to get it... and the chime didn't work. Oh Well
worthless Junk. This steam press didn't get through the first day of use in working order. I would definitely not waste my time or money ordering one
Not the Bunnykins that I remember. I returned this item as it was not the Bunnykins Children's set that I expected.  This set is no longer manufactured in England it now comes from Taiwan.  The quality and the coloring is not the same.  I am very disappointed that this set is no longer made in England.  I will not purchase another one.  I am willing to pay more for English goods.  I am tired of cheap goods
Not as advertised. We bought the scale for starting Weight watchers but it does not do  weights in fractions i.e. 1/4 lb etc. Also it was not as pictured. The look of the scale(in the photo)was appealing because of the retro look with the red dial, ours came with a black dial which is just plane boring.Average thought...its just an average scale and nothing more
DO NOT BUY FROM AMAZON. Consider yourself warned: DO NOT buy this set from Amazon!  I ordered it on 5-28-2006 and Amazon has since then emailed me EVERY 10-20 days to inform me that there has been a delay in the product's arrival.  In order to keep the order active, you have to go to the Amazon site and approve the delay.  This is what I've been doing for 5 months now!  I've emailed Amazon twice about it, and they credited me $5 and STILL DON'T HAVE the product in stock that they are supposedly selling to people.  Save yourself the headache; Amazon doesn't actually have this product.  Buy elsewhere.  (Submitted 10-25-2006
TERRIBLE!. These items worked for about 4 times each.  The plastic insert on the top  that the metal lever rocks on to seal or unseal the stopper broke on both stoppers.  The metal on the lever actually cuts into the plactic insert when you push it down to seal the bottle - cutting the plastic insert  in half.  When the plactic insert breaks, you can not seal the bottle.  Don't waste you money.  This product needs to be re-engineered
Not Practical. I followed the directions to the letter and cured my new pan as instructed.It's a great idea, but it just doesn't work.The cornbread sticks to pan
Total junk. Firs of all I rarely write negative reviews, but this deserves it.  I bought one of these, and within a week it stopped working.  While it was working it was fine, but one day it just stopped working all together and the LCD went blank.  I returned it, and got a new one, and the new one stopped working within 2 days.  Same result.  There no reason for the malfunction as it was being used to control a 25 watt light.  The Non LCD one by timex worked for a month and stopped working properly (the time was always off, even when adjusted).  Try to find a different brand time
poor quality bottle. The lower bowl part will last forever but the water tank lasts a month outside. Between the sun and cold air, the plastic get weak right away and the slightest touch will crack the top. I have gone through 3 of them. All with exactly the same results.
Avoid It If You Can. This comforter set is a big disappointment. It looks much better in photo than in real. The thread-count of the comforter is very low and it feels like rough plastic. The 180-thread-count kid's comforter I had feels a lot softer and smoother than this. Also, the King size comforter is SMALL. This list price is a joke. Do not recommend, not even for the guest bedroom
Does NOT fit all 2 1/2 qt pans. Does not fit Calphalon Commercial Hard Anodized Collector's Edition 2 1/2-Quart Shallow Saucepan with Li
flawed directions. As great as it looks, I can't get past the incomplete directions (only printed outside of the box; no directions inside) to get it installed on the wall:  it says "pull out the plastic end cap"...haven't a clue what the plastic end cap is, nor how to pull it out nor how to install the screws that hold it on the box.  may have to return
A Piece of Junk!. The quality of construction is very poor.  The sprayer only streamed the oil no matter how long I pumped.  The rim around the bottom began to leak every time I pumped.  I had to throw this sprayer away after using it for just a few months.  I recommend you purchase Chef Mate's oil sprayer.  The container is glass, actually mists the oil, and it only costs $6.95
Worst Popcorn Popper Ever. I received this popper as a gift, and while it looks nice, it only pops of 30 percent of the kernels the rest just sit in the bottom of the machine. I have tried numerous times letting the device warm up for several minutes and also tried different types of popcorn. Nothing worked. If I had the receipt it would already have been returned. Since I don't, it is going in the garbage. Also for some reasons hot unpopped kernels will fly out of the machine. Stay away from this machine
Completely Disappointed!. Like many others I waited patiently for this item to be available.  Once I started putting it together I was disappointed to realize the holes were drilled incorrectly and in would not properly fit together.  Also, if many of you are under the impression that it might match your dolce collection, don't buy this item because it does not.  Also, unlike the dolce collection this items layer of stain peels off very badly
Cannot review this item. The item ordered 7/19/2006 has not been received as of 8/19/2006
Great taste but do not last... This product seems to only design to last max 1 year as it will start to leak like crazy.  Luckily in Australia they offer 2 year warranty so I got it replaced. But I will not go back to this system, turn to the jug one instead
Doesn't work for very long. I bought this coffee maker and after only using it 6-10 times over the course of 13 months, it stopped working.  I called the number for service that was listed in the booklet and was told it can't be repaired & I should just throw it away!  I had already purchased nearly 100 pods and now those and the coffee maker are useless!  Buy one at you own risk
ARRIVED BROKEN. THE SOUP CROCK ARRIVED BROKEN.  HAD TO RETURN ON RECEIPT.  HOPEFULLY THE ITEM WAS CREDITED AS WELL AS CHARGED.SHIRLEY ROBBINSPS GRANDDAUGHTER WAS DISAPPOINTED
Did the job until the battery died!. For about 2 years (with very light usage), this DustBuster worked well enough. Its not powerful, but for the price, it helped with basic clean-up of dirty carpets. After 2 years, though, it stopped charging. Now it can't last at full power (which is only 4.8 volts) for more than a few seconds. I should have just spent more money on a better quality vacuum cleaner in the first place
YEP&lt; Its the hinge!. Got two waffle makers for Christmas.  (the list you know) Really liked this one because it looked nicer and the brand gave it the appearance of being more expensive.  We kept the other one, as we like to make a bunch and freeze them, so two would work fine.  Well we had a problem with this one right away, and my DH called B&D and they sent us a replacement.  The replacement broke, guess where? , at the hinge!  So we've been using it for the last 6+ months like it is.  Am currently shopping Amazon for a professional one like I saw at Costco.
Way Too Big!. The picture of the item is deceiving as its taken from the side, so you can't see how enormous it really is. It takes up too much storage space too. I recommend seeing if the Singer case might fit better
Waste of Money & Time. Bought two for my sister's reception.  I fought with these things all night!  I used the belgian chocolate, added oil - to no avail.  After cleaning them, I put water in to test.  It could not even pull water through!
did not fit well. They were advertised as having deep pockets but found it almost impossible to get the bottom sheet on my queen size mattress-almost sprained a finger getting the last corner on. This was after only one washing in cold water. Smoothness was o.k., but too much work getting them on the mattress.
Disappointing item. I bought this item about 6 months ago. After 2 months the handle fell off. On phoning the company, they said plastic parts were only guaranteed for 1 month, hence they would not replace it. After another 2 months, the unit stopped working altogether. I then got in touch with the company and managed to speak to a very rude customer service representative, who said I would have to send it to the company and pay for shipping and handling myself, yet it says in the handbook that the company would pay for the shipping. I am truely disappointed with the lack of customer care and the appliance. I do believe I have a faulty appliance but the compnay is not at all bothered to keep its customers happy. I do not reccomend that anyone buy this item, save your money and all the hastle
Anolon Shipped Damaged Skillet. First the good news.  This is an extra heavy skillet with durable finish and good handles.  It easily handles two quarts up to the bottoms of the rivets and distributes the heat evenly across the bottom of the pan.  But for the bad news I would give this skillet four or five stars.The bad news is that someone at the Anolon plant damaged the pan BEFORE it was placed in the Anolon carton.  Neither the Anolon box nor the outer UPS shipping carton showed any damage when I received the skillet.  It wasn't until the the following day, after I threw out the packaging, that I noticed the a small sharp blow had been delivered to the rim of the pan which deformed the pan slightly.  True, I should have been more attentive when I received the pan,  but I never suspected Anolon would package damaged goods.I'll live with my mistake but will not purchase anything by Anolon again!
If you don't like Pepper, this mills for you... Very hard to get any actual pepper to come out of this thing.  I just put some pepper on eggs and it took over 10 squeezes.  Imagine trying to grind pepper out for a stock pot full of soup.  Impossible
Bad Idea. I got the filter for the humidifier I also just bought. Upon placing the filter in and turning the unit on, a strong odor filled the room. I had to open the windows to air the room out because I didn't think inhaling the smell was a good idea. Being that it was for my bird's room, I feel sure that it would result in him getting sick or worse. I believe the problem lies in the Protec antimicrobial treatment. I would never have bought it had I known about this.
nice idea. poor execution. There's supposed to be a little button on the front that locks the top and bottom portions of the box together. The plastic was molded poorly, so mine never connects and can't lock properly. Hence, trying to pick the unit up results in the thing falling apart. I lived with this for a month or so. The bag ran out, so I had to buy a replacement. The bag replacement is so poorly designed that turning the wheel never exerts enough force to pull out any more bag. Now I'm out $25 for the box, plus $9.99 for the replacement that didn't work. What to do now? Risk buying another replacement? Or just junk this piece of trash? Learn from my mistake; save your money
I bought TWO!! Aughhh!!!. It looked like such a good idea on TV but that's the thing about TV. They didn't fit well on my stove at all and I couldn't even put my other stock pots on my back burners at the same time. Also the bottom scratched after a couple uses!
Not so hot. Although it is effective as any similar heater, it has some annoying design features.  The display only stays on for a few seconds after changing a setting.  I don't know why it can't stay on all the time.  Like it isn't running on batteries after all.  Its bright red pilot light stays on as long as it's plugged in but there are no indicators to tell you if it is on, off, or on thermostat.  You would have to walk over to it, bend down, and attempt to read the dark display to figure that out (you might need a flashlight).  They foolishly use the same button to start the oscillation and turn it on and off.  To turn it off you have to hold the button down for several seconds (a short tap starts it oscillating).  Fortunately I have found a quicker way to turn it off.  I just tip it enough to engage the tip-over safety switch and it goes right off.  Much quicker than holding down the stupid button.  If you're not easily annoyed, you might like this heater
WRONG SIZE. This item is not nine inches wide.  It is the same width as the seven stick cornstick pan, but costs ten dollars more.  So you are paying ten dollars to get two extra cornstick molds of the same size.  Hopefully, the item description will be changed soon.  Now, I have to pack up and ship back several of these, but at least Amazon is paying the freight.  Lodge Logic is the greatest for cooking and baking though.  I think this is just a random error.  Just be sure and buy the seven stick pan for 7.99.  The cornsticks will be the same size
"Hard Anodize" gone after one use!  BEWARE!. I bought this pot new and used it once to steam some fresh green beans.  I was shocked that after using it one time, the inside was bare aluminum.  The dark grey "Hard Anodized" finish was completely gone.  My Caphalon hard anodized cookware just gets better with use.  Beware of this phony product
sent it back. I didn't open the box, and I sent it back.  The box said--not for synthetic corks.  So many of my corks are synbthetic these days.  I didn't feel like experimenting to see how long it would last since I already had tried another one which did fail with synthetic corks
I Expected Better from This Company. The price was great and I was already familiar with the quality of this company's merchandise, having used some of their pots and pans for years since marriage.  When the stockpot arrived, it was just so pretty and I couldn't wait to use it.  The first time was great.  However, this time I was putting together a black bean soup and as I scraped the bottom of the pot with a wooden spoon, I became aware something had happened.  A day or so later, as I took all the soup out to transfer to a bowl, there on the bottom of this pan was all the enamel coming off in big pieces.  I couldn't believe it!  It is ruined and I will never be able to use it again.  It's just so pretty and the perfect size, so it's a big disappointment.  I won't buy LeCreuset again
Too loud. People cliam this fan is quiet, it's not quiet.I wanted a fan that will circulate the bedroom air during the night, it's too loud and keeps me awake
would not recommend to anyone. provided little to no heat, and I live in Mississippi.  it wouldn't even take the December chill off.  definitly not worth the price.  i returned the Vornado and purchased a much less expensive Holmes heater which produces three times the heat
Can't believe the hype. I read the other reviews of this coffeemaker, plus many other, plus a list by someone named Neil (I believe) and even he recommended anything by Zojirushi over many more recognizable names.  I fell for the "rave" reviews.  I ordered.  It arrived two days ago and was taken back to UPS the next day for return.  Complete disappointment - main reason - coffee not hot, and I mean NOT HOT, not even lukewarm (hardly) when cream was added.  Someone had mentioned (and it was in the attending info booklet) about warming up your cup before pouring.  My husband thought this absolutely absurd and said that before he would have to go to so much trouble just to have a nice, hot cup of coffee with his morning paper, he would just do without.  I did like the size, the simplicity of operation,(reason for the two stars) though some features that would have been nice were missing (and I already knew this when ordering) - no automatic shut-off, for one.  The price was excessive (nearly $75.00 with shipping) which was nearly nine dollars to get here and had to pay another nine to send it back.  $18.00 down the drain and still have to look further for a coffeemaker that will actually make HOT coffee.  I am not talking about scalding here, just good and hot, adequate enough to still remain hot after cream is added.  Have been told one of the coffeemakers - Cuisinart Brew General (I believe that is the name, spelling probably wrong) that was "bad-mouthed" by this fellow with the list of recommended coffeemakers, would be an excellent choice.  Two people I have found today who have it, and say it produces HOT coffee.  So much for listening to others in these online reviews, and especially when having to order an item, and then have to return it if not what was promised.  Zojirushi Zutto 5-cup Drip Coffeemaker?  -  NO,  NO,  NO!!!!!!
. kitchenAid 5 ply was not what I expected.  Plus its all made in china.....GET THE ALL CLAD and spend the extra 100 on the 9 piece set
No noticeable difference. I should have listened to my sister, the vet tech, instead of people who swear by this stuff. I see no noticeable improvement, but it was worth a try. Next step Valium............for me AND the cat!! :
Bad product and bad service. my Holmes humidifer was broken (no mist) after 3 months.  I did send it with a check of $7 more than 2 months ago, and haven't receive information from Holmes.I emailed to ask my case and they tried to fool around.I am desperate!Very bad product and bad service!  I never buy Holmes product again
Great price but poor quality. I was shocked how cheap this set was, but now I know why.  The first set I got 4 of the glasses were already broken so I was sent a replacement set.  The truth is they are just thin and easily breakable.  I guess you get what you pay for
Im still cold!!. I agree, this heater ssssllloowwwly warms the room.I'm still sitting here freezing my buns off!
Very weak vacuum. This sealer does not use a piston pump like most other sealers use.  It removes the air with a fan.  There is air left in the bag, it doesn't create a vacuum.  The bags are not ribbed and you have to fit them over a hose under the lid.  The bags are folded on a roll and you have to seal three sides to create a bag.  I was also dissappointed in the weight of the bags.  They are thinner than Ziploc bags.  You cannot use canisters with this one
wrong size. suggested by Amazon after selecting the correct size - cheaper so purchased - had to return it since it didn't fit.
Cheap, cheap, cheap. But it makes coffee. First the bad news -- the Amazon product description is misleading. Well, flat-out wrong, in fact. This coffeemaker doesn't come with a thermal carafe. In reality, the carafe is very thin aluminum, like lightweight metal cookware that you buy for backpacking. So -- not just not thermal, but this sucker gets HOT when it's full of fresh coffee.Also, it doesn't have a "permanent filter." It has a standard plastic swing-out filter basket, and comes with a reusable nylon filter. Nothing wrong with that (it's nice to get one packaged with the machine, actually) but the above description of a "permanent stainless-steel filter basket" isn't accurate.The water tank maxes out at 28 oz., which is enough for two big (16 oz.) mugs at my house. Since I'm the only coffee drinker, this is fine.On the other hand, it was as inexpensive as it is cheaply made. Despite the ridiculous, deliberately misleading retail price listed (as of March '07 as I write this, it says it retails for $85.99!) I got it for ten bucks plus shipping, and it's worth about that. Add shipping cost, and it was under $20, and it's programmable. It's worth noting that the programmable function turns off the hot plate after two hours, but if you use the coffeemaker manually you have to remember to turn it off yourself so that you don't, I assume, melt the cheap metal carafe.It looks nice on the counter. It makes coffee. For me, it's a perfectly acceptable replacement coffeemaker that I bought on the spur of the moment when my previous machine broke -- but that's all it is, a temporary replacement. In this case, you get what you pay for, and I'm saving my pennies to get a better coffeemaker in a couple of months
cork screw stinks. This does not work. The screw goes through the cork and into the bottle and does not pull the cork out of the bottle. I have had several people try it and they have had the same result. Stick to a good manual rabbit cork screw opener.
Don't waste your money. This was by far the worst coffee pot I have ever purchased.  At first it made fabulous coffee.  However, things just never worked correctly after 3 months.  It wouldn't continuously brew a full pot of coffee for whatever reason.  It was an arduous task to clean it.  It was a great day when I got rid of this coffeemaker.
Bada BAD!. I bought this for my cat a few months ago, because he just loves playing with a laser pointer. The whole concept of this toy was great but they should've expanded their ideas a bit more. For the size of the toy you would think that it would point further out than it does. I'm not sure about others but most cats I know like to run back and forth a room chasing the laser, maybe even jump up the wall. As opposed to with the Bada Beam that just goes in a circle, reversing its direction every once in awhile. My cat never avoids the laser pointer, when he sees that red light he jumps right up! But with the Bada Beam, he will just sit and stare at it. The whole point is so that you don't have to hold it and let the cats go crazy! NOPE! It's one thing for me to be disappointed, but it's clear that my cat was more disappointed.
Overhyped product that doesn't deliver. I reviewed most of the juicers on ... and many other major sites and decided that the KitchenAid was the best product on the market.  After receiving it, I changed my mind.  Although it promises to be an easy cleanup with a "special tool", it is way too hard to clean up.  The pulp basket contains a ridge that makes it next to impossible to get out all of the little strains of pulp.  The special tool is great for getting out the big stuff, but not the little stuff.  Also, there is a TON of juice left over in the pulp that gets thrown away.  This is a result of the poor design, which filters the juice through the pulp before exiting.  The product had a nice design and looked good on my counter-top, but it did not deliver.  I would recommend buying Jack LaLanne's Power Juicer that is available on other sites
The "convenience" isn't convenient at all. Cuisinart's ad copy and product directions claim that the charger can be kept plugged into the wall so it's always ready for use.  However, this is a nickel-cadmium rechargeable battery.  Plugging it back in to recharge before you've fully drained it is DEATH to NiCad batteries!   This stupid design decision on the part of Cuisinart almost guarantees a poor user experience
Don't Buy. This sweeper worked fine for the first few times and then in the middle of a task, it wouldn't turn on. I contacted the company and they said it probably was the battery. They sent me a new battery. It didn't work. I called them again and they said I had to charge the battery before it could work. I couldn't charge the battery because it does'nt work. I called them again and they told me to send it back at my own expense and include payment of $16.95 to return it. I told them that this was a new machine and I didn't think I should have to pay again. They waived the $16.95. I am still waiting for it to be returned. I bought it two months ago and so far I have only had the use of it for about a total of ten minutes
JUNK. Twice I had to return this product to the retailer.the manufacturer placed a protective plastic tape on the front of the timer, which when removed leaves a dull film on  what should be  a nice shiny plastic cover on this timer.however, most importantly, the alarm that should be loud, is so quiet, you can only hear it if it is within one foot of your ear.I contacted the manufacturer several times, WITHOUT A RESPONSE.Never again.!
There Are Better Ones Out There. I have been using gold coffee filters for years for all my coffeemakers, however I was very disappointed with this one by Krups.  I love my Krups Aroma Control with stainless steel carafe, but the Swiss Gold filter is far superior to the Krups 049.  You can find the Swiss Gold brand all over the web -- the #4 is the same size as the Krups 049.A good gold filter will give you the best coffee because it allows the coffee's oils to brew into the pot.
No way!. I purchased this vacuum based upon how it was rated by Consumer Reports.  What a disappointment!  It is supposed to work well on hard surfaces.  It simply shoots out the back what it picks up in the front.  A total bummer since my house is all tile!  I would not recommend this vacuum
Broke after 2 months... The espresso compressor broke after two months so we had to return the product. The former was hard to use, too, never warm up milk to the temperature we wanted to be.For brewing coffee, it worked fine, but then a normal coffee maker is enough to serve that needs
Batteries don't last long enough. I used this light at my computer desk because I wanted something that would give off a soft light so I could still see to type after everyone went to bed and less than a couple of hours later the light began to fade, the batteries (brand new) died
OK, but already looking for a new hand vac. I bought this vacuum in 2005, mainly to keep the couches clean of dog hair.  This vacuum works OK, but only gets a little bit of the hair. Cup fills up real fast.  My mom has a Shark and that just sucked up the dirt and hair.  So I will probably replace this with a newer Shark
Doesn't fit all Krups 10 cup coffee makers. I was very unhappy to find that when I put the filter in the filter basket I was unable to close the filter door. It was just a bit too high. I have a aromacontrol 10 cup drip and I expected it to work, as stated, on all 10-12 cup drip coffee makers. Otherwise, I think I would have really liked it
works good enough but. Mine worked good enough for window cleaning until it stopped making steam after first on-and-off 30 min use
wrong item delivered. My daughter needed this item for an event and the wrong item was delivered.  By then we were under a time crunch so I talked to customer service but there was no way Target would expedite shipping the correct item to arrive in time.  I had to order the item from another supplier and pay for 2 day delivery.In the meantime, the online pathway for getting a shipping label to return the wrong item lets me spend time putting all the information in but then shuttles me to a "Try again" screen.  I try half a dozen or more times and give up.  An hour later I try again with the same dead end.  I email customer service to just send a label by email but have yet to receive a response.  The next day I try again with the same dead end.  I have wasted a lot of time for something I don't even want.  I think I will let my credit card company know to not pay, and let the supplier ship me a return label when they get around to it.Can you tell I am not impressed with the 'service'
A little unhappy. Slightly above a toy but definately not a sewing machine for anything serious. I ended up hemming my sleeves by hand. Bobbin is loose. Doesn't pull the material through very well. Not at all what I had hoped. I will end up giving this away and buying a real sewing machine. One that will handle a hem.
Very disappointed!. I opened one of the packages and there was blood on the card that the sham was folded around. I promptly called Amazon and they replaced it. It was a waste of money, the first time I washed them, white patches appeared all over the shams as if they dye washed out. I was very, very disappointed with the quality and will not order them again. Don't waste  your money
Not what I expected... Not what I expected...    I thought it did duo patterns of rosettes, but only does one.  I can't not use other Rosette patterns with the set.  It doesn't remain the heat, so it took longer to make the cookies.
Wireless Intercom. The unit did not recieve or transmit half the distance that was reported across a flat surface.  100ft. would be pushing it
Broken from the start. Although the product description seemed promising, this product had an electrical problem from the start. As soon as I set it up and turned it on, I noticed a loud cracking sound coming from the unit, about every 10 seconds or so. I looked inside the unit and a visible blue spark could be seen.  It appeared that either the product had a problem with a fuse or a bad connection inside the unit. Luckily, I was home when this happened- what if the spark had caused a fire? I returned the product immediately and have since bought another air purifier.  This one is not worth the money and is a huge safety hazard!
Caution. I ordered this griddle and on the third use the teflon coating burned off onto my glasstop stove.  I called faberware directly since I was out of my return period, and after explaining my situation, they sent me another (different model) griddle, free of charge.  The first product didnt work out, but the mfgr made good
Only sprays intermittently with my cocker spaniel (15 lb.). Sometimes it sprays when she barks, most of the time it doesn't. So I would say its effectiveness has been rather low. It's not the battery or the fill level - maybe it just depends on the dog. I can bark into it myself and it sprays just fine. (My children found this amusing.
Stay Away. Otherwise trustworthy Bionaire has produced a defective model. I've been through two of them now, both with similar problems. They tend to shut off despite enough water being in the tank, and no other visible problem. First one never worked right, the second lasted for two months before it continually flashed the reset light. Customer service could offer no solutions. Stay away
Loses suction. While this vacuum is easy to use, it loses suction after only 6 months. Don't buy this to waste money.
Cheap construction is a deal-breaker. I just finished unpacking my oven and plugging it in.  I am so disappointed by the quality of construction that it's going right back in the box and back to the merchant.  The door is not square with the frame and jiggles back and forth on its hinges, the pushbuttons are cheap chrome-plated plastic with dimples in the middle from a shoddy molding process, and the control panel label is stick-on vinyl that doesn't fit properly and is already beginning to peel up.  The stainless steel cabinet is so thin, I can see dents in the side where the screws go in.  I'm surprised Farberware has put their name on such a piece of junk
I am returning this product. Initially, my dogs found the sound interesting and slowed down on barking, but after a couple of days they acted like they didn't even hear the sound. Now, they are back to "bark all you want"
It doesn't suck; it blows. I bought this vacuum less than a year ago, and use it weekly or bi-weekly on a small two-bedroom apartment with cats. It was very loud, so much that it scares the dickens out of the cats, but it worked well until three months ago.That's when its suction was working less and less. I kept thinking, "Wow, I have to vacuum more often, maybe the cats are shedding," or "I can't believe how dirty we've been lately." As it turns out, the vacuum wasn't really picking up items so much as it was either redistributing them around the carpet, or collecting them in the nozzle. As soon as I'd turn it off to store it, things came out all over the place.I'm frustrated to have to buy yet another vacuum in less than a year's time.   No more Dirt Devils for me
DONT BUY THESE. I just received the silverware, and was blown away by how flimsy they are.  There is almost nothing to them, and they bend easily
Didn't work for me, but your mileage may vary. I bought this device in the hope of eliminating or significantly reducing the noise emanating from my neighbor's mutt.  The offending dog is often left on the neighbor's porch, where it harasses just about every living thing that passes by.Before ordering, I had read varying accounts of its range in terms of how close the unit must be to the dog in order to attain the desired effect.  In my case, the neighbor's porch is about 35 to 60 feet aware from mine.  Unfortunately, this was not "too close for comfort" as far as the dog was concerned.Having read a number of very mixed reviews of this and similar devices, I was not overly optimistic about the prospect of it actually working.  Alas, it did not.  Some dogs just don't hear them.  In my case, it was probably due at least in part to the distance.My suggestion is to go ahead and pick up one of these devices if and only if you are within 20' of the target.  If it doesn't work, go ahead and return it to the manufacturer for a refund (which is exactly what I did).  By the way, you don't need an RA (AKA RMA) number to return the device.  Just send it to the company along with your receipt, and a note saying that you would like a refund (not an exchange).(...)  I sympathize with anyone having this problem, and wish you all the best of luck.  No one deserves to have their peace and quiet disturbed without good reason, and the argument that "dogs bark" simply does not hold any water
Poorly made. I purchased these sheets for my daughter in law for Christmas.  She washed them as directed and went to put them on her bed.  Each corner on the fitted sheet the threads were pulling out.  Very poorly made
Stupid Piece of Tin. This is the most useless tool ever! I got this last Christmas and it was in the garbage by Valentines day. It leaks, and gets rusty. It get clogged very easy and does not spray like it is meant to. Don't waste your monsy on this piece of trash
Hate this coffeemaker. I've had this coffeemaker for two weeks. I bought it because I had an old Mr. Coffee that worked fine, but was white and stained.  I liked that this was black and looked sleek.  The very second time I used it, the off button stuck, so you can no longer turn off the machine, but have to wait for it to turn itself off.  Also, EVERY pot has grounds in it.  I'm using the filters that came with it, and have never even filled it to capacity, and I can't figure out why there are ALWAYS grounds in my coffee.  Piece of junk.  Don't buy it
WARNING!!!   WARNING!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I went to used my today.  It was on the stove, I was canning some meat.  When the time was up, I went over and shut off the stove.  Next thing I knew I was on the floor.  IT BLEW UP, HAD GLASS AND MEAT EVERY WHERE!!!!!!!  Had to go out to the ER.  So if you buy, be very carfully.  It might blow up on you.  I had steam burn's on face 2 drgeer and many cut's.  Thankfully I had my glass on, so my eye's was not hurt
Horrible stovetop cookware. I have several visions pieces.  I only keep them because they are handy to use in the microwave; on the stove the only thing they are good for is boiling water.  They heat VERY unevenly and develop terrible hotspots.  If you drop them or the lid you stand a fair chance of shattering it.  The fact that they are transparent has never been useful to me
Very poor product. I cannot believe what an ergonomically ill-fitting and horribly working product this is. The best thing I can say about it is that it looks pretty. Some others are satisfied, so I can only surmise that there are vast differences in the quality of the products leaving the assembly line. Unfortunately, this brand-new can-opener is going in the trash.
Do not buy. if i could get my money back i would ask for it back, for this is the most useless Vaccum that i have ever gotten. it will not pick up very good at all. you have to run over the floore 8 or 10 times befor it will pick up and then it will not pick up everything.save you money and look at somthing els
Only lasted for 5 months. I had my first machine for 5 months - a gift from a friend. When it started to let steam out all over the place, I went out and bought another one. I thought I was just unlucky with the first one. It also only lasted 5 months like the first one. I cleaned it - vinegar etc... like the instructions said - no luck. Steam came from everywhere. It would not warm the milk anymore. I took it back. Never again.
Nice product but doesn't fit as advertised. I bought this double boiler specifically for my 2 1/2qt Calphalon Professional Saucepan thinking it would fit together nicely as it was advertised "fits all Calphalon Professional and Commercial 2 1/2qt saucepans".  Wrong.  Not only is there a decent sized gap around the edges where the double boiler pan should snuggly meet the saucepan, but the bottom of the double boiler sits directly on the bottom of the saucepan, not allowing for any water barrier, and essentially, defeating the purpose of using a double boiler.  I'm very disappointed.  The product itself is well made and feels quite durable and sturdy but it was mismatched with my saucepan. I mistakenly threw out the packaging before realizing this and am now unable to return it....anyone need a double boiler pan and want to take a gamble that it will fit your saucepan?
Dissapointed. I was kind of disappointed with the Black& Decker Power Mop, it is to bottom heavey to flip the scrubbing brush easily. You have to use two hands to flip the brush down and two hands to push the brush away.I have already told friends "don't bother to spend $49 for this mop, it isn't worth the money.Get a women to design this product.  I can't believe a women would have found this easy to use.
Worst quality coffee maker ever!. Clock started losing time the first day. Great tasting coffee. No problem with the carafe. Unit stopped working all together after about 10 days. Returned it to DeLonghi & they promptly sent me another. Clock started losing time the first day. Great tasting coffee. No problem with the carafe. Unit stopped working all together after about 10 days. This could get real old...
Worthless trash. The item arrived fine and intact, but upon opening the box I found myself staring at what I can only assume is someone's sick and twisted joke.  I spent 45 minutes trying to "assemble" the rack, with the side pegs falling out on me every time I tried to put another piece in place.  I finally got down to the bottom and the last side and noticed the piece meant for the bottom is curved in a way that makes it impossible to put in place.  I'd attempt to bend it straight but it seems about as brittle as dead tree bark.  I finally just figured with a bottom that brittle it would be all of a week before it was broken anyway and threw it in the trash, which is where it belongs I feel
A piece of junk. I'm astonished at the good reviews this appliance has accrued, the primary reason that I bought it. It's possible that mine was a dud but just about everything was wrong with it. Once you plug the appliance in, the red light is supposed to go on. Mine never did. The appliance smoked so heavily that the smoke alarm went off in the apartment. The manual warns of "slight smoke and odor" upon first use. The smoking never stopped. Since I had already taken the trouble and prepared a waffle mix, I decided to remain undaunted. The green light is supposed to go on when the waffle/sandwich maker is pre-heated. Mine did not go on. 20 minutes later, with smoke billowing all around I decided that the green light was not about to give me the go ahead and I should assume that the appliance had pre-heated. Somewhat daunted but still determined (with the family now desperate for breakfast) I decided to lay on the mixture. No lights to tell me when I could expect results, no automatic shut-off switch, so 2 minutes later I opened the lid and peered inside. Nada. Nothing. Still runny. I shut the contraption and waited again. I lifted the lid on and off several times over a period of 10 minutes. Finally the waffles looked done so I tried to prise them off. Sorry! The waffle maker seemed too fond of its waffles to give them up.  I took a sharp knife to them and and tried to yank them off. I was rewarded with waffle shreds. I tried to lift off the waffle pan entirely so I could attack it in a more convenient location. Instead, it attacked me. What looks like safety handles on the sides are not safety handles at all. OUCH! Burns! Yeah, if I wasn't so dignified, I'd be sueing a particular company. Bruised, hurting and irritated, I was still not about to give up. I allowed the pans to cool. I washed them out. I doused them (literally) with cooking spray. I tried again. This time it worked. The waffles tasted fine except by now it was lunch and I'd already depleted  the mixture in failed attempts. It still took about 10 mins to bake 2 waffles...  I'm returning the appliance to Amazon today. I'd love to pay more and get a really high-end waffle/sandwich maker but there seems to be nothing in the market. The way to go is to buy separate gadgets methinks.
Why?. Why would you use this item when any type of ball works?  Tennis balls are my choice, and they can even be spritzed with some fragrance
Poor Quality. The pitcher is made from poor quality materials. We have two pitchers and have never washed them in the dishwasher. In less than a year, both pitchers cracked along the seam that runs from the spout down the side of the pitcher. If we attempt to use them, tea immediately leaks all over the counter. Since other pitchers are not compatible with the machine, our ice tea maker is useless. We have owned two previous Mr. Coffee Ice Tea models in the past ten years. The pitchers lasted for several years before eventually cracking. Mr. Coffee chose to use inferior materials with this model. I am very disappointed in the quality and will never trust their company again. I am now searching for an ice tea maker that uses quality materials
Disappointment. I've had two of these now, and they both had one serious flaw: the trumpeted "brew and pause" feature DOES NOT WORK.  Pull the carafe out during brewing and treat yourself to a steaming hot waterfall of coffee that would almost be comical if it weren't such a relentless pain in the neck to clean up.Also, it's hard not to spill some water on the heating plate, either during filling or brewing, creating a consequent sizzling sound that adds a lot of ambience -- if you live in a steak house.Considering how many other coffee makers are available out there, these flaws make this machine a mistake.Too bad, because some things are done quite nicely: the controls are good and easy to set, and the overall styling is sleek, euro-cool, and compact.  Unless you live in a community where calcified sewage runs through the taps, the water filters do about as much as a rain dance.Pass on this one
The "Everything Sticks" Griddle. I bought this griddle under the impression that it was non-stick - it is everything but that.  I only cook with butter (no sprays), but that does not matter.  Even with butter the eggs stick every time.  Even pancakes stick.  This is the worst grill I have ever used
defective unit returned. I was very disappointed with this machine. My brand new X5 leaked water from the first day. Talked to the company's US service center (don't bother email, she will just tell you to call and it is a one person operation); service center person said it was probably a gasket and that she would send a replacment, but they were on backorder. Makes you think they are having other problems besides me! Also, I found the product manual to be poor (why does it take THREE manuals, plus 1 photocopied insert to find the information you need to set up?). The crema was dark, but that may have had more to do with the leakage of water.It is a pretty machine, but nothing else was pleasing about it.Update: Six weeks later, the company sent a replacement washer for me to repair the machine with. Of course, I had long since returned it to Amazon, who quickly credited my card.
Try before you buy. This is an expensive machine that locks you into an expensive proprietary cartridge system. There are competing systems which make just as good and hot a cup of coffee without wasting this much plastic per cup and for much less money (Senseo, Melitta and others). Some other systems such as the Nespresso are just as pricey, but make significantly better coffee.That leaves us with this in-between system, way overpriced for the mediocre coffee it produces. Unless you're absolutely enthralled with the taste of Flavia coffee (or one of their other beverages) there are better, cheaper, less wasteful alternatives
Six dishes turn to one!. I had the same problem as the first poster.  By all appearances, this item is advertised as 6 souffle dishes.  Heck, the item number ends in dash 6 !!
Loud and obnoxious. After returning my first L'equip because the blade assembly broke, my second blender showed up after a long wait. Like the first one, it is obnoxiously loud and doesn't do a good job of mixing anything but liquids. It has a hard time with bananas. To me, it sounds like it's broken and I feel like it probably will soon. The RPM meter is just an electrical current meter for the motor, so it doesn't accurately count RPMs--it's just for show. Maybe I got unlucky twice, but otherwise, I can't see what all the 4 stars are about
Form over functionality. Plastic internal pump cracked within a week.  Soap leaks from top down sides in multiple streams.  Looks great if you don't use it and keep it away from water.  Better keep it empty too
you get what you pay for. I was a little disappointed with the fountain.The water sound seems to come more from within but then it cost so little...I should have known.I have never had any disappointment with things from Amazon before
Poor Quality. For 600 tc, I expected alot more.  Sheets started to pill after only a few days.  Were not the soft quality that I thought they would be either.  Felt like the standard 180 tc ones.  I returned them
Maybe not for small dogs... My pug Ginger got this for xmas and the toy is cute but she can't get her mouth around the toy's belly because it has the retractable reel inside it for the squirrel's tail.  I don't have a lot of room inside to really through this guy around but maybe outside it would fly farther because I'd have room to really fling it.  I am keeping an eye on her when she does play with it because the string from the tail might tangle up or snap.  You never know
Was below-average for a while, then jammed. I received this blender for x-mas last year.  It has some nice design features (good heavy base to prevent tipping, measuring cup built into the cap).  However, I experienced the same problems that others here have -- the blender doesn't do well with anything thick like milkshakes.  It just shoves everything against the sides of the pitcher and spins helplessly, forcing you to stop and manual stir everything back towards the blades and restart.  While it worked OK for a while, the cutter unit mysteriously jammed after about 9 months
rips at seams. bad buyin two days it started to come aparti am sooo disappointed,looks good but quality is poradvice-dont buy i
no horse power. i got this because of it's size. so i could take it on trips being a guy i never pack things right so when i get to where ever. i needed to iron most of my stuff.i hate to iron. so anyway. right out of the box i balled up four of my best shirts as a test.it fixed 2-1/2 of the four before i needed to refill it.it gets hot in about three min not bad but it only has two holes for the steam to come out.by the way this is the frist thing i ever got without reading any reviews bet that won't happen again. i give this thing a  three out of five but because of it i have not trashed anymore of my shirts thanks to  conai
Bad quality. I got the expensive one rather than the $14.99 Aroma cooker, thinking it will be better quality. Wrong.  I only used it twice, not only the rice get burn, after i clean in and out of the cooker, it still look dirty. The quality of the material was really bad. I think the Store where i got this products knows the problem that they take my return even it past 15 days requirement.Do not waste your good earned money on this one.
Terrible Packaging!!!!. The item itself was lovely and of good quality, the problem was most definitely the poor packaging. The beautiful metal cradle that is included rattled around and dented and even chipped the wooden bowl multiple times. I ordered this product twice even giving the reason for my return of the first salad bowl. The second one I received was packaged even worse. This was very inconvenient since it was to be a Christmas gift. I suspected it the second time so I asked the UPS guy to stay til I looked at the item itself. Lo and behold it was once again damaged and I sent it on its way on the spot. Anyone ordering this product I advise you to do the same! This situation forced me to do what I was trying to avoid, last minute holiday rush traffic jams everywhere shopping
Assault on the Environment!. This hamper is okay, but Amazon was very irresposible in how they shipped it.  I ordered four, and all four shipped the same day from the same warehouse.  How did they arrive?  In four giant shipping boxes; each one contained one hamper and about 3 cubic feet of air filled plastic bags!  It took me 20 minutes just to break down the boxes and the plastic bags.  I live in the city where recycling and trash space is scarce, and this really an insult to me and to the environment.  There is nothing fragile about a compressed laundry hamper.  According to the packing list, the shipping cost on each was $6, which means that due to Supersaver, Amazon was skinning their shareholders to the tune of $5 per hamper.  Amazon, shame on you, you could have shipped all four in a large envelope!
Gift for daughters new apartment. After one washing of the pearl grey towels, they are ruined :(  They look as if they were washed with bleach.   Terrible streaks running through them.   Now they can not be used if guests are coming over.  Its true, you get what you pay for. I will replace these with a better product. I  gave this product one star because that was the least allowed, but it should get zero stars
Physics is against the pestle. As you can see in the picture, the pestle (the part you hold in your hand) has quite a wide bottom.  Unfortunately, this spreads out the force that you can apply to any single location, making it practically impossible to grind seeds (e.g., cumin) to dust.I tried it once on cumin seeds, and gave up
Too Hot to Handle. The vacuum I received quickly overheated and became too hot to hold or handle. The suction was great and the size very convienent. But the heat from the motor made it impossible to use safely
poor quality. Poor quality of wood,poor quality of workmanship,evidently these foreign makers don't have any idea what sandpaper is. Very surprised Henckels would allow their name to be put on this item!!! Would rate it less than one star if possible!!
Avoid this one. My mother-in-law bought this to make coffee for visitors. It worked fine at first but, after one or two months of use, started to experience water leaks of increasing severity. At first there were drips outside of the carafe. Then the leaks streamed around the carafe and out of body joints. We put the whole machine on a metal tray--to make clean-up easier. Finally it got so bad that, fearing an encounter with boiling hot water and/or the risk of an electrical shock, we stopped using it.In the end, I was able to make coffee by removing the filter basket (it's a circular one-piece with a tiny hole in the middle) from the machine and placing the basket carefully on top of an empty mug. I then inserted a filter, coffee, and poured in hot water from a stove-top kettle. While this sounds ridiculous, it's a lot easier and less stressful than facing unpredictable streams of boiling water and the rancid smells of coffee residue trapped in the seams of the machine.My recommendation: avoid this machine. It's disturbing that Black and Decker would produce a product so dangerous and lacking in quality
Bad performer. Loses grip on can and the can slips off ...bad product. Do not buy
It has its problems, very poor customer support. As others have mentioned, this product becomes too hot to touch so I just use potholders when handling it.My crock pot was part of a recall because of the handles cracking and breaking. I followed the instructions to get the part replaced at no charge. I waited eight months for the new part and had to make numerous phone calls. I heard every excuse from they were back-ordered to my order was never received. Friends told me just to go buy a new one because it was the principle of the matter that made me persevere and wait for the recalled part.When the food comes up and simmers, the lid bounces around on top and spews steam, creating quite a mess. I have to wedge a toothpick between the lid and the pot to prevent this from happening. It needs some sort of venting system.The cooking pot itself is rough on the the bottom and has scratched the living daylights out of my stainless steel sink.On the bright side, it does actually cook the food
Disappointing. Shortly after I got this product, the thermostat in the Max Heat option blew out.  So, I can only use the Min Heat option (only 2 options) and it will stay on for days - no problem.  This is obviously too bulkly to easily ship back to Amazon - and I didn't keep the huge cardboard box that covered the manuf. box.  Wouldn't do it again for that reason
Item was defective and this was te second item received. Item was defective and this was te second item receive
!!!!! BEFORE BUYING THIS - READ THIS  !!!!!. I really should've done some research before buying this.All of the reviews are 100% correct.  There is considerable mold growing under the water dispenser area, despite diligent washing 2-3x per week.  God knows this water isn't healthy!In addition, water leaks under the main water dispenser area, so this is a huge negativeLastly, there are areas where the water doesn't drain
Buyer Beware -- Controller Malfunction. I had the same problem as everyone else -- after less than a month this blanket is useless because of the malfunctioning controller.  No way to fix and unable to return to Amazon because it was ordered longer than 30 days ago (Xmas gift for one of my roommates).What an incredible waste of money - the first time in 10 yrs I have been disappointed with Amazon service (or lack thereof)
TERRIBLE!!. This is NOT a high-end luxury towel by Grand Patrician and is not ultra in ANY way. Even if they were firsts, they are second rate. Mine started to self-destruct after the first wash, and never had the absorbency of a wet dish rag.Am disappointed Amazon would carry this product, which would be a bad deal at half the price. Next time I will look for more reviews
Martex Egyptian Wash Cloth. Very poor quality!  The material is very thin and even after multiple washing, the fabric continues to "bleed" every time it's used
OUR CHICKEN'S TIME RAN OUT!. We've had this timer for a couple years now, maybe a little longer. It's really cute. It does ring really loud. But lately it's taken to STOPPING before it should, i.e., it just STOPS! No ring! Nothing! We've known our food is done when we've smelled things burning! And it never WAS very good at timing things for less than 10 minutes...it often did the same thing, that is, just stop, without ringing. But it was SO CUTE! We kept it and dealt with it. But not anymore. Nope! I'm on-line today looking for a different style chicken timer
What a piece of junk. I'd have put no star if I could have.This thing is made from cheap plastic that's not sturdy enough to support a kitten, much less a full grown cat.  The rings came loose upon sitting it down onto the toilet so there couldn't be any stages unless it were taped together.  The setup won't fit onto a standard toilet without modification.  Do not buy this unless you want to know what "design flaw" really means
Not a good buy at any price!. When I first received this vaccum, it was great--the suction was wonderful and worked beautifully.  That all ended about 3 months into owning it (I've had it about a year).  I have 2 cats and the hose gets plugged every time I use it (my cats are not that furry--I've resorted to using my crappy upright and it NEVER gets plugged).  The only way we've been able to unclog the hose is to use water to flush it, which really isn't a good idea, but it's the only way we've been able to get it functional again.  As well, we've had problems with the carpet powerhead and the small upholstery components of the machine--the beater brush does not turn on for some odd reason, but only sometimes.  Another rater stated their machine was "moody", and they are correct, as sometimes these two pieces will work, and sometimes they will not.  And the retractable cord?  Forget it retracting after about a dozen uses.  It's a piece of trash and I agree with the rater who stated, "Hoover should be ashamed of themselves!".
Buy from someone else. I checked the ProFlowers site and it said I still had 3 days to order the flowers to ensure they got there before Christmas.  It's now the day after Christmas and they still haven't gotten them
Poor Quality. We bought this chair/ottoman about six months ago.  It looks quite nice but we find it pretty uncomfortable and the quality is fairly poor.  The fabric doesn't hold up well - the cushion looks pretty saggy and the fabric is stretched already.  It filled a gap in our living room furniture set-up after we moved into our first house but we're looking at paying some additional money for a hardier piece of furniture and moving this up to our bedroom.It's okay for the price - but nothing to write home about.  We've gotten better quality furniture from Target
Terrible can opener. This is the worse can opener I have ever bought.  It has failed four out of 6 times I have used it!!  When it "fails", it stops "walking around the can" and you have to locate a little screw and get a phillips head screw driver and turn that till the opener releases your can! Needless to say, I am stuck with a useless can opener and am out $20
Don't buy it. I loved the design so decided to buy it, 4 yes 4 coffee makers later in one year, I have given up on getting another one. All of the four have had problems with the electronics.  The coffee will brew and then instead of going to warming, the machine shuts off and and starts blinking as if it is in the timed setting, the clock itself stops competely and the coffe gets cold. The machine is locked in that mode and the only way to get it back out is to unplug it and reset time, timer.  One of the four just completely died after doing the routine once.  At first I could not believe that we got that many lemons so I bought a surge protecter for the outlet, that did not stop it from going into the same routine so I do not believe the cause was other than poor quality.  The warranty is for one year but you have to send the machine to them which involves a shipping expense so beware of that also. There is also a problem with the handle breaking and it does leak ( I would put up with the leak if the thing would just work otherwise
Poor Quality, highly overrated. I bought this blanket after reading the user and editor reviews.The quality of the blanket is far from what the reviewers have rated.First of all, the quality of the cotton used in making this blanket is very poor, it looks cheap and dirty, not a smooth material.  The kind of good quality cottons that you get these days is amazing, this blanket is no where near to it.Second, the honeycomb pattern is not well woven, it gets stuck in finger and toe nails and can come off easily.Would never buy this blanket agai
Anti-microbial feature is false. Item states an anti-microbial feature.  However mold buildup ocurred in about 2 weeks.  Thus have to replace every 2 weeks instead of the manufactured recommended of 2-3 months.  This 2 week replacement frequency has been consistent for the last 2 months for me.  Will look into getting another humidifier that is not made by Honeywell.
If only they would arrive in one piece!. These are really nice - substantial weight, classic design, functional.  The white is a slightly blue-ish white - not at all creamy (if you've been looking at a lot of white dishes you'll appreciate the distinction).  The problem is that the manufacturer or distributor doesn't pack them with enough care.  I ordered two sets to try them out before putting them on my wedding registry. Both arrived with broken bowls.  Then I ordered replacements and one of those arrived broken.  So, after calculating that I'd have to field up to 32 boxes to get 8 intact place settings, I gave up.  Fortunately Amazon is very good about returns for broken merchandise..
What  a mess!. My steamer worked well for all of 5 mins.  The pole went from upright to a 45 degree angle without hanging anything on it and would not straighten out; the defect appeared to be at the connection where the pole screws into the machine.  Then within minutes I had water all over my hardwood floors. I had the same problem as other reviewers, the water tank kept leaking.  So off to the returns department we went.  I guess it steamed well for the five minutes that it worked? Not worth all the mess and hassle of returning it.
slipcover. The slipcover barely covered my sofa, will not cover the lower front and it barely hangs over the backside.  It keeps sliding off, where I have to adjust it several times during the day, if I could I would get my money back
Not a fan of plastic mugs, I guess. It fits in the cup holder and holds a lot. It's plastic inside and doesn't keep coffee or tea hot for very long and because it's metal outside you can't put it in the microwave. It's OK for a short drive to work, but not great for long drives where you want you coffee to stay hot
Not as described. Walnut Tradition Kitchen Scissors (ASIN: B00005AM7R) do not have "Comfortable wood handles secured with triple-brass rivets", they have unattractive chocolate-brown plastic handles.The bottle opener and screw driver extensions are a poor design feature, and simply get in the way.
Rival crockpot piece of junk... Probably have bashed this product enough, but it is insulting to still see &quot;Sturdy lid and side handles for improved grip&quot; advertised.  In no time at all, the handles broke off like peanut brittle; glad I wasn't carrying it around the kitchen. No wonder no one carries replacement handles. Don't know what's better, but sure won't try Rival again
Worst can opener I've ever owned. This with a doubt one of the worst can openers I've everowned!! I bought it because it is attractive and willaccept tall cans. It is attractive, but not veryfunctional. It is so very difficult to get the canpositioned just right, so it will open, that it takes5 or 6 tries just to get it to work. The "lid catcher"blocks your view of the mechanism so it's almostimpossible to position the can properly. In additionwhen removing the can, the cutting arm mechanism slidesoff the opener most of the time.Don't but this poorly designed product!!
disappointed. I bought the timer for a lamp and a hotplate for shabbat. It worked well for the first 5 or 6 times, then it completely stopped working
very missleading ad. I have purchased 3 I thought its feather bed pad something as the description but its end up to be only a cover so its just not good to buy online " on Amazon"because you can't really expect what you are gonna get. please becareful
Sheds lint even after washing. Please see my review of the Martex Egyptian Washcloths, Burgundy
Same Burner Problem. We bought ours some time ago and have enjoyed it.  However, the large burner does not work now.  Based on the problems getting it serviced and the real possibility of yet another failure, I plan to break into it and try to fix it, even though it's in warranty.  Would definitely not recommend the purchase
Nice set but awful linens and the duvet is too thin. Positive comment first - It was great to buy these sets and not have to individually purchase all items. It saved me a lot of time. Pillows, pillow covers and mattress toppers are perfect!On to the negative - the sheets however are of a really poor quality. They are thin and after only one wash they have already started to fray and there are even holes in the stitching of the fitted sheets. They also wrinkle really badly. The duvet is also thin and too small for the PINZON flannel duvet covers I bought.
good looking, poor quality. I bought this dish rack yesterday after weeks of researching for a stylish, big enough for my need dish rack, I was drawn to this one because I love the look of stailess steel on practically anything, but I am returnig it today, this piece of junk has started to rust after a few dinner dishes, I don't have a dish washer and I hate to hand dry dishes, therefore my dish rack is always on the counter, airdrying itself and the dishes, and I found out this morning, that a few drops of water left on the so call stainless steel rack has rust stain on it, definitely not a good buy, I am heading to target for a less sophisticated but more practical one after I return this junk
No Chocolate Twice. I ordered this item for our kids as a Christmas gift.  When it arrived, there was no chocolate in the box.  When I contacted Amazon to ask to have the chocolate shipped, they said they couldn't do that; the item needed to be returned and a new one would be shipped.  The second fountain arrived and still no chocolate.  I once again called Amazon and asked to have the chocolate shipped, but they cannot do that.  To their credit, they refunded the price of the fountain, but overall is was a hassle.  Would not order this item again
Not a true Wusthof! Sharpens into a butter knife!. I should have listened to the reviews! I just received it today and was very excited. But that ended after it dulled my knife.First of all, the instructions sound easy...run your knife across the two ceramic wheels. Several times until your knife it sharp. And wala, your knives are sharp!Not the case for me. I have the Wustof Grand Prix II knives. I was still practicing how to use my honing steel and didn't want to continue putting my knives through my torture training. So I thought I could use this ceramic wheel until I got the hand of the honing steel. I gripped the piece as told, and ran it through with very gentle pressure. Pulling my knife through it was heartbreaking! You could hear the knife resisiting the pull. You'll hear a "screeching" sound and NO the ceramic wheels do not move when you are pulling it. The knife just runs on top of where the two wheels connect and you pull. Yes, your knife might scuddle and jump as you pull, it is resisting the sharpener. NO matter how light you pull through!! I never dishwash my knives or let them airdry so you can imagine my dismay. I just thought that is normal. So I stopped running my chef's knife through this and instead, tried my smaller and easily replaceable paring knife. Same thing! Upon closer inspection, you could see curved scratches along the side of the blade! And little knicks along the blade. It made my paring knife dull, after only 3 runs! Very disappointed. The wheels even look like they are about to fall of the piece! The two wheel screws are so loose that with enough pressure for your knife, I am convince it would eventually fall off. Do not buy this! You might as well just run your knife along your steel kitchen sink! ... You'll probably get a sharper edge than this junk! Buy this only if you are stubborn (like I was), and ignored all the reviews and if you have want to junk your good Wusthofs for the super dull supermarket knives. Then go ahead, have fun destroying your knives! Wusthof should be ashamed of themselves to put their quality known name on this piece of JUNK! Now I have to send my knives to Wusthof for sharpening! ARG!
Revereware, in name only, no quality. I returned them beacause they are nothing like the good old revereware made in the U.S.A.They are very thin and cheap.I do not recommend anyone buying them, you willonly want to return them
Very messy and sticks to inside. I bought this grinder after using a Braun for several years.  Its not much quieter (if at all) and is so messy I'm buying another from Amazon today.  I spend much more time getting the grounds out than I do on grinding the coffee.  Don't believe the hype
Hard to Open. This is a great shaker, the largest I could find, and it feels very good in your hand. The problem is that it is just about impossible to get the top off.  It's hard when it's dry but you can get enough grip that it's not to bad, but when it's wet you can't get a grip and it is so hard to get off that it's not worth using.  You should pass on this shaker unless you are going to get the boston shaker version
Happened to me too. I got this pitcher about 5 months ago and sure enough I ran into the same leaking problems like everyone else. I should have checked    up on this pitcher before the purchase from Target. Good thing my mom bought it and not me
not so convinced about these filters. I have been using these filters for years.  My first impression with them is that they are very expensive.  My second impression is that they might not work as well as I thought they did.I recently bought a water distiller and I have been experimenting with different sources of water in it.  I have used hot water directly from the tap, cold water directly from the tap, and Brita filtered water in the distiller.  The Brita filtered water left the most residue in the distiller, which is very disconcerting.The filters let out small amounts of carbon all the time into the top of their proprietry resevoir.  In the directions, it says to slowly add water to the filtering well, which is what I do, but it still leaches at least thirty little pieces of carbon in the prefiltered water.  I want clean water, not water with small pieces of carbon floating in the filling well.I have always wanted to believe the filters were working, but now am very skeptical.
Disappointing. I have a shep/akita mix, but I bought this more for my coonhound, who will eat ANYTHING.  Anything!  Especially if it's made out of food.  :)  I put the treats in the ball thing and she licked it a couple times and lost interest.  The problem with this toy is that it's hard for the dogs to get a grip on the thing.  The shape is putting them off.  She later tried to knaw on it with the side of her jaw, but got so little out of it (a taste but nothing to chew on or savor or act like a reward) that she lost interest - which is saying a lot, since again she will go to great lengths for the smallest crumb.Finally, I took the treats out of the ball and offered them to the dogs - instand results.  They are working away at them right now.  I think the lesson here is that this toy will only work well for dogs that enjoy chewing on hard objects that don't break into pieces easily if they do at all.  Some dogs love this!  Not mine, apparently.So if anyone wants to try it with their dogs, email me.  I have one, never been chewed!  Maybe your dog will like it more than mine.  Five bucks!  ;
Leaked Everywhere and Froze Me to Death!. It arrived cracked and leaked all over my stand and soaked the carpet.(Of course I was supposed to test it in the bathtub for leaks and didnt)But before I discovered the leak (It is flimsily made), I had it on one night and it made my room so cold it was unbearable.So I returned to Amazon and am awaiting their receipt and refund
Poor product. This steamer performs very poorly.  The wrinkles in my shirts just laughed when they saw it coming.  Now it sits in my closet collecting wasting space
Save your money. Very little to no suction on the dry side.  Wet side had good suction but difficult to push forward making the task more difficult.  Sprayer stopped working after just 2 uses. Since I hate repackaging for returns, the unit is sitting unused in a corner.  I thought I had found the perfect lightweight cleaner but I am still searching
Not what I expected. I have been looking for one of these for a couple of weeks.  For the price, I thought it would work great.  First, It was the size of a salt shaker (did not read description well enough).  Second, upon first use while trying to apply a coating of powdered sugar on my funnel cake, I thought I was going to throw my shoulder out.  The sugar just will not come out of the fine mesh in the lid.  I had higher hopes for this.  Unfortunately, It is now packaged for a return journey back to Amazon and I am continuing my quest for the perfect funnel cake shaker
Good idea, poor engineering. This is a really cool concept, poorly executed.  The clear sleeve slides up and down on an aluminum cylinder.  The top of the cylinder is a rubber gasket that seals the sleeve, thus preventing leakage between the sleeve and the cylinder.  All of that works fine.The problem is that at the bottom of the aluminum cylinder is a plastic ring of a larger diameter than the cylinder.  This ring stops the sleeve from sliding below the top of the cylinder, and also acts as a foot so you can stand the measuring cup.  Unfortunately, the ring is made from a fairly hard plastic, which can become brittle and crack.  But it doesn't break away cleanly - so you're left with a measuring cup that won't stand up straight.  That might be fine if you're measuring things and dumping them straight into a bowl, but if you have to sit the thing down while it's full, forget it
It sucks but not in a good way. I have bought two dust busters in three years.  They do work great for small things like lint and hair, etc.  However at some point within a year maybe a year and a half with little usage (a couple of times a week for a couple of minutes at the most) it will not charge anymore.  You do get what you pay for and I will be buying from another manufacturer
You get your $15 worth. If you are looking for something with great sound quality or even great accuracy in measurment, this isn't for you. The radio is hard to use since it doesn't have any indication of what frequency you are on, and every time you move it gets overwhelmed by static. The pedometer function is marginal at best. But its what you would expect for $15.
No value for money. Ordinary looking steel mug. It does not have a lid which defeats the purpose of having doube insulation. I did not find the quality of insulation that great either. Too pricey for the features it offers.
Don't toss your knife & cutting board. This slicer seems easy enough and is easy to clean.  Hard part is you have to press the blade over the food to be sliced.  Potatoes and most foods used with this tool are oval shaped and do not stand up on end without slicing them.  Once you have gotten the slicer over the food, you have to press it through the slicer sections manually.  It is a better idea to get the box style cutter for about the same cost which is easier to use, has a shaped press to push the food through the blades and dishwasher safe too!  I wish I had not found this item first
Exchanged immediately for stainless. After buying an aluminum I read about the leaching of the mayerial into the food and the health risks involved. I was advised to spend the extra money. Since this is a stock item, I took it to Wal-Mart and traded it for a 6 quart Stainless. Boy was I surprised that a whole chicken does not fit as I used to have a sixx litter European and a whole chicken fits just fine. Anyway, I can't recommend this, because of the material and because of the size. If I could afford it, I would go for the electric pressure cooker with at least an 8 quart size of stainless - Cuisinart or other brands check Amazon around $150 and up. You get what you pay for
Can get MUCH better elsewhere!. I bought these candles because I thought they would look nice on my end table near the couch.  At first, they did look nice.  However, when I lit them they melted so much within the first half hour that the wax spilled all over the plate, off the edge of the table, and on to the floor.  It took me an hour to get the wax out of the carpet!The plate and rocks were ruined too, covered in blobby candles and melted wax.My suggestion if you buy this set - DO NOT BURN THE CANDLES!  Use it as a decoration only
Not here yet. I'm sure it will get a 5 star if I ever get the item. I placed the order on 2/6/07
The Leaking Fountain. This product worked well for about one full month before he started to not work anymore and the thing would leak onto the floor. I made sure to clean it very well but still it only worked for one month
Crunchy, Loud, No Head Support. I bought the four pack of these pillows and kept finding the pillows thrown in other rooms.  My husband informed me that he hates the pillows.  They are not soft, and are crunchy and loud when you lie on them.
Bodum Travel Press. I owned the older version of Bodum's travel press and loved it, so thought I would get the one of the newer ones.  I, too, have had nothing but problems with it sealing. In fact, I thought it was a defect of the one I ordered, returned it for another one, and still have the same problems.  Most of the time, the lid pops off and I get hot liquid all over me. I love the concept, but this particular design is not good
Mr. Coffee TP3-1 Replacement Iced Tea Pitcher. The heat from the original machine warped the plastic replacement pitcher during the first use.  The pitcher is now unusable
Don't waste your $$$$ - like grinding a duck!. When I ordered this product, it had a 4 star average rating  - how that happened is beyond me. Were a zero star rating available, this product wouldn't even deserve the string of uncolored stars!I purchased it, thinking it would certainly do better than the plastic "freebie" grinder that came with some peppercorns about a year ago. After many refills, that all-plastic grinder has finially started to wear out and peppercorns get stuck in the "gears", the grinder has started to squeak and spits out chunks of pepper.So I order this one -- it's attractive, low/mid priced and offers a warranty against wearing out -- and guess what? I'm still using the plastic worn-out grinder! This MIU grinder was a total waste of money and I just can't bear to listen to it squeal when I attempt to use it. Its adjustement is loose enough, that's not the problem.   What good's a lifetime warranty against wearing out if I'm not going to use the grinder at all?Now I'm stuck with it, unless I want to pay to ship it back and lose free shipping discount on the original order, so basically, I may could get a few bucks back. Which is probably what I'll do because this grinder isn't worth 2 cents! I wouldn't even give the thing away.Maybe pepper grinders are one of those things you just need to feel and buy in person. I'll certainly not purchase another one online.If you like the sound of fingernails scratching a chalkboard, buy this grinder. Buy a second one for your salt while you're at it. You'll love 'em!(Update 1 month later - I tried to give this thing a chance and the god-awful squealing is becoming less consistent. Which might be even worse, as it now takes me by surprise as it lets out a high-pitched jag every so often. It's gotten quite worse, however, with spitting out various sized chunks of peppercorn ... from fine grind to quarter-corn sized pieces in a few turns. Not recommended at all. I might try switching it over to salt, maybe it can handle that better.
hurts my feet!. I thought this mat would be good for catching the litter my cat flings out of the box but really it just ended up catching some of the litter and looking like an ugly eye-sore. It also hurts to walk on with bare feet. Having wood floors, I hate sweeping 3-4 times daily because my cats get a little too over zealous trying to cover up their waste in the litter box, so I thought I'd give it a try. Helped some, but overall I'd say not worth the money
Low setting went out. It worked well until the low setting went out.  I had it a little over a year.
a disappointment. We have used Krups products for years and been highly satisfied with them. This coffee maker has two problems. (1) Its spout is badly engineered. It is impossible to pour out the last 3/4 of an inch of coffee without taking off the lid. (2) It is a thermos; so the machine does not heat up the coffee, but the pot preserves it at the temperature with which it is brewed. I like hot coffee. After the first cup, I find that I have to heat up the remainder in the microwave. This is inconvenient. I would not buy another of this model
Good design; poor performance.  Very disappointing. This model is a nice little pepper mill: relatively easy to fill, easy to use, and reasonably priced.  Unfortunately, performance leaves a lot to be desired.  Turn the handle one direction and the pepper is very coarse; I would described it as cracked rather than ground.  Turn the handle the other direction and it grinds so fine that nothing comes out.  Perhaps if the mechanism were adjusted it would work; unfortunately I can't figure out what that adjustment would be.  Based on other reviews, I'm guessing my experience is a quality control issue.  If it worked I would be happy.  As it is, I'm purchasing yet another pepper mill.
LEAKY. Had somewhat higher expectations, given that this was a Lennox. Got the shaker home. tried it out, IT LEAKS. No matter how hard you hold the darn thing together, it leaks. I am a materials engineer so I gave the product a more than cursory examination. VERY, VERY POOR QUALITY.  Also Made in China (if that has anything to do with quality ... hint hint wink wink) DO NOT BUY
Scratchy sheets. The sheets and comforter in this set are very scratchy and stiff and you can see right through the sheets.  I would not recommend the set, very poor quality.  I don't even use the sheets on my son's bed because they seem so uncomfortable
Furi TechEdge Pro Knife Sharpening System. 1. Expensive.2. Fatally flawed (as of January 2007)The sharpener system works well for my knives BUT the method of attaching the rotating handle to the base is fatally flawed.  Both sharpeners I received had to be returned after 1-2 uses because the handle separated from the base holding the fingers.  If Furi redesigns the base and handle I'd buy another one
Wusthof. Wusthof is high quality stuff, but there is no lifetime guarantee and the handles aren't dishwasher safe.  If I was going to chose a set, Cutco knives are by far the best knives in quality and price.  They also have a comprehensive lifetime guarantee that makes that 10 times better than this large wusthof set
Hamilton Beach Eclectric coffeemaker, apple. I didn't even use this coffemaker.  The apple color was so ugly (reminded me of the avocado in kitchens of the '50's & 60's) and the pot was so heavy & clunky, I decided to donate this to a charity.  I read the other reviews & everyone loved the color in their kitchen.  Maybe another color would be better but I will not try
Not worth the price. One reviewer mentioned that rust spots occurred. The same thing happened to us even though it just sits in our kitchen. Also, the foot pedal broke on it after about 10 months. Why bother paying all that money if it's just going to break and look awful? You might as well just get a $15 one from Walmart - it last about the same amount of time. The closing machanism is quiet however and it is easy to remove bags from the can
Very disappointed. I ordered this table based on the reviews I read and boy I will never do that again.  This table is such poor quality and is NOT worth the money.  I am so disappointed in it that I shoved it in a corner where no one can see it and put a plant on it. It is not a sturdy table so if you are looking for something that holds up this is not one to buy.  I would say this table is worth $20 and no more...........
NOT water proof!!!. Although this item is advertized as "waterproof", it is not!  It stopped working the moment my dog went into the water.  Otherwise worked fine.  The DOGTRA shock collar works better and is waterproof
Horrible!. Ordered this item as a gift for my daughter..arrived quickly and did not appear broken or used but would not work at all..appliance would not activate.. very disappointing...probably why it was such a deal..shipping was as much as the item! Valentine Surprise failed
Not Scientific, and Not Positive. The Gentle Leader is advertised as a scientifically designed, positive training device. It's neither. So before you buy into the hype and purchase an item you'll eventually discard (if you love your dog, that is) you should know that dogs hate this device. It feels totally unnatural to them. Its so-called "scientific" design is based on the way a supposed alpha wolf enforces his authority by aggressively gripping a subordinate around the muzzle with his teeth. (Nice, huh?) Since we now know that the alpha theory is false, the rationale behind this torture device for dogs is equally bogus. (Wild wolf packs do not form dominance hierarchies or spend time trying to show each other who's boss by grabbing each other around the snout; such behaviors are only produced when wolves are forced to form unnatural packs while living in captivity.) A device that mimics a totally unnatural act of aggression cannot be considered positive.As a dog trainer, and just as a human being who loves dogs and hates to see them being mistreated, I cannot stress strongly enough that this device should not be used on any dog, ever.So what do you do to keep your dog from pulling? Dogs don't really pull on the leash so much as they get pulled on by things in the environment that stimulate and attract their instincts. So the trick to training a dog NOT to pull is to play games that will make YOU more interesting and more appealing to his instincts than the things in the environment are.
Pitcher Leaks after Minimal Use. We had this less than 10 months and used only two of three Ultimate filters we purchased separately, that's how little use this pitcher got. Started leaking everywhere one day and I couldn't figure out what had happened. I thought I hadn't put the innards back in right, after changing the filter, but in the end I decided either a seal or a seam failed.I'm not the first person to report the leaking problem with minimal use, so I believe it is a design or manufacturing flaw. What a waste of a good $60, with the additional three filters purchased.While it worked, we loved its sleek design, how much water it held and how great the water tasted. That's why it gets the two stars I gave it. Too bad it turned out to be a piece of junk.I see the item is now not available here at Amazon and I guess that means someone monitored the returns or complaints about the product and made changes or pulled the item from sales rotation.What I want to know is when we will be notified by Pur about the problem, and given coupons or rebates because of it; if you sent in your warranty card or registered the product online there is no reason Pur couldn't offer somehting in exchange for their poorly designed item.Mine's now in the trash where it belongs. Don't buy one if you are considering it. Go with a good quality, faucet-mounted or under-sink mount filtering system and you will be glad you did, despite the more expensive price
Arrived broken, looks cheap. This item arrived broken -- not surprising, since the bars appear to have been attached with a hot glue gun. Not recommended
Looks nice, but "spring-loaded arm" is useless... While this is an attractive looking paper-towel holder, it isn't very functional.  At first glance, it looks like it should work as implied: 'spring-loaded arm puts pressure on paper towel roll, regardless of how many towels are on that roll at the time, allowing you to easily rip off a single sheet with one hand'.  Unfortunately, this model doesn't work that way...at least, not the one I received.I started with a partial roll, and it was obvious this wouldn't work, so I put in an extra-large roll of top quality (very thick roll) paper towels, and still, they don't come close to reaching the spring-loaded arm.This arm is no more effective at preventing a number of sheets from pulling off the roll than the old wooden one I had with no arm at all.  I'm very disappointed.  Before deciding on this model, I had viewed some very similar models that were higher in price...maybe this is a case of "you get what you pay for".If you are looking for a paper towel holder that looks nice, and are not concerned about "function"...it may be worth the price.  If you are looking for one that looks nice AND can offer you an easy one-sheet-at-a-time-with-one-hand quick pull, I suggest you look for a different model.  This unit won't do that job
I really wanted to love this!. I bought this at a store, and thought it was such a great deal. And it was, until I lit the candles. The candles are made of such crappy wax, that they dissolved within the first hour or so of burning. I gave one to my coworker, and it melted down and burned a hole in his desk. If you purchase this, DO NOT LIGHT THE CANDLES! Let them be for looks only, and if you're happy enough with that, you'll be happy
Looks Nice...Breaks Easily. Being a huge fan of KitchenAid products, I was happy to see this item at Target.  When I took it out of the bag at home, I noticed a chip on the edge and a crack starting to run the length of the side. (The item was not broken when I purchased it. It must've broken when my daughter dropped it on the driveway.)  The plastic is hard, not flexible. Very disappointed in this KitchenAid product
Fun Toy. This was a great toy.  I would drive it around the fish tank, pretty easy to control and lasted 5-10 minutes on a charge.Unfortunately something happened with my charging base after about 20-30 uses (few months), and it stopped working.  Not sure what happened
Too Small. I have no idea where they came up with 3 cups on this because it will only take about 8 oz. of water. They must mean demi-tasse cups. It is really too small to use if you are making more than just one small cup of coffee. I love the idea of a "French Press" coffee maker but after you bring your water to a boil, pour it over the grounds, let it set for about 5 minutes, then press it out, I would like to have more to show for my time and effort
Not as wonderful as I thought it would be. I purchased this product and much to my amazement, the dual controls are installed backwards!The control with the service label information is supposed to operate the right side of the bed, the unlabeled control is supposed to operate the left side of the bed. Not so. My side of the bed was too hot, hubby's side was too cold. When we swapped the controls to the opposite of what the directions said, we had the desired results. I purchased this product during the winter months, and needed it too much to send it back to the factory.....at my expense....for repair or replacement. Make sure any electric blanket or warming pad you purchase has at least a 5 year guaranty
Good idea but... An attractive, well priced and bright idea, however we are returning this item. It is too tall to fit in the space between my counter top and the cabinets below. We liked the way it looked so we thought we'd clear out the bottom shelf inside one of my cabinets. Being the dispenser was so tall we needed to remove the shelf above as well. When I realized how much room it took up and how many things it was displacing I realized it was defeating my original plan. So back it goes
Broke after about ten uses. The first couple of times I used this cheese slicer, the wire stretched out, making the slices thicker than they're supposed to be.  Today I finally cut through a hard hunk of sharp cheddar and POP - the wire broke.  For $20, I expect more.  Next time I'll buy a non-wire cheese slicer.  VERY disappointed as I expect more of OXO
Toasts unevenly. This appliance has several good features, but they are outweighted by the fact that it does not produce a decent piece of toast.  At the lowest setting one side of the toast comes out too brown, the other side barely toasted.  The inner side of the bread toasts faster than the outer side. We did manage to get a decent piece of toast by inserting the bread, setting a timer for 1 minute, pressing cancel, reversing the bread, and slowly counting to thirty before pressing cancel again.  Far too much work
ok wok, not big of a deal. Order the wok and got it damaged (off-shaped). The packaging is horrible. Basiclly they put the bare wok in the box filled with the giant air bubbles. The wok can move around freely in the box. Guess the damage is caused during shipping.Return and reordered the Typhoon Carbon Steel wok, similar size and design, $3 cheaper. When I got it, I am very pleased with the quality:*) properly packaged, plastic cover on the top, sheet of paper on the bottom; fitted in a box designed for it;*) thick steel: 2.5mm rather than 1.8mm from joyce Chen;*) handles are welded on the wok, so no dead spot when cleaning;*) seasoning instruction are well documented, in 8 different languages, even thou I use my own seasoning way, not like joyce chen's one thin sheet of paper with not so clear instruction.overall, Joyce Chen's wok is like the one you can get from Chinatown supermarket, and Typhoon one is like from Macy's
Relevant information missing. I own a ceramic (smooth top) stove. No where it the advertisement did it indicate that the Aebleskiver pan could not be used on the ceramicsurface. Being unfamiliar with the pan I could not know in advance. i was very disappointed
This opener is a piece of junk. Don't buy it is about all I have got to say for this piece of junk.  if there had been one minus star, that is where I would rate this thing.Mine went in the trash yesterday, and am now here looking for something that hopefully works
Don't bother. The bowls are too small, the mugs are too big and the tops are a waste of time.  Save your money
Poor Quality. Spend a few extra bucks on somehting that will last longer than 10 min.  Within 10 min of putting it together my friend (average size) was sitting on it and a large crack was heard, on of the slats snapped in half with no more than regular sitting... verry poor quality, only reason i piced it was becaus of its size... not worth it
Zelco Real Wall Clock. Clock is smaller than I thought, and is only intended to take up about a square foot of wall.  Made of cheap materials, definitely not worth $25
THIS SWEEPER IS AWFUL ! (not my first Bissell either). Only good thing is it's light weight as I am in a wheelchair. I was attracted to it by the price. Well, you get what you pay for. It doesn't pick up things. I am using it for small scraps and threads and the usual fuzzies and dust on a carpet. It's AWFUL. Wish I would have returned it. It makes my work harder. So, be aware......before you buy
Cooker just died!. At first the cooker was great and I was excited with it. Then one day, just before one year of use, it just died. No power, nothing.Useless equipment!
going back to my george foreman. We registered for this to replace our old George Foreman grill and I thought it would be nice to be able to take out the plates and put them in the dishwasher.  It did not crisp or cook our food as well, things tended to stay soft and just get warm and the plates never got fully clean in the dishwasher anyway.  I had to ask my mom to give me back my George Forman grill, I'll never stray again.
Wouldn't Recommend. I purchased this set of spoons because they are narrow and can fit into any number of spice jars.  I also wanted them because they are hinged and nest inside of each other & take up little space.  After first use, the pin fell out and the spoons became unhinged.  I tried to reassemble and the pin keeps falling out - wouldn't recommend
6 weeks!. After 6 weeks of waiting, customer service said it was going to be another 3 weeks!  Forget it!  Cancelled order
Worked great for one day. I loved it until it broke after using it for a day.  Now when I turn it on the sound will not turn off.  If it actually worked correctly I think I would have given it a better rating
Low quality and noisy- I don't know if they help allergy sufferers. I have not yet washed these, and maybe my opinion will change with washing. After just opening these they seem "disposable" and thin. They are also very noisy each and every time you touch them. Forget about moving your head about on these. IF they do in fact help people with allergies then they are a great product, but I was really looking for some nice soft, washable pillow covers and these are not it. They remind me of the blue disposable shoe covers that doctors wear before going into surgery. Also, they do not look like the picture shown, they are darker (almost yellow) and striped.
Nice Look, Horrible Performance. I was originally looking for the Bosch Turbo Jet vac but found out that Bosch is no longer making the Turbo Jet under their name but they are now making the Turbo Jet for Vax. I purchased mine at Best Buy. I really like the looks and the features however this vacuum does an extremely horrible job on carpets. The brush roll assembly unit automatically adjusts to the height of the carpet however this is one if the major flaws I noticed that hurts it. When you push forward on the vacuum, the brush assembly tilts up toward the air preventing the brush rollers from making contact with the carpet. There is no way you can manually adjust the height of the rollers so it will make contact with the carpet. You also cannot tell the carpet is vacuumed after numerous runs over the same area due to the tilt angle of the rollers. The emissions is also bad. The vacuum does not emit a "fresh" air smell but instead emits the smell of plastic and carpet. The filter does a horrilble job emitting clean air. The last item that I think hurts this model is the hose unit. It is an akward design that is hard to use because the hose length is short and hard to pull which makes the vacuum fall forward at times. I returned the vacuum to a different Best Buy than the one I originally purchased at. The rep at the returns counter informed me that they have only been carrying Vax's for only a few months but they have had an extremely high return rate on Vax compared to their other brands. I walked over to the vacuum section after I was done with the return to replace it with the Eureka 4870 which is one of Consumer Report's top three vacs and beats the heck out of Dyson's. There must of been at least 7 used Vax's on the floor being sold as returns. The Eureka is amazing and blows away the Vax at one hundred dollars less.
Great Machine- ** NO Support ** Its the service after the sale that counts. I confess, I like Starbucks. I like to have my cappuccino made for me. I also like to make my own on occaision.This machine worked well for a while and then it seemed to be clogged after a couple of months of not being used. There were two available options for service. One company in my whole state who was 2 hours away and the manufacturers rep in NY. I chose NY. I didn't get it out until after the year was up, although I had gotten a number at 10-11 months.They charged me $70 to fix the machine, claiming that --I-- did something to one of the hoses.Gaggia Esspresso is a great machine, but don't expect service if something goes wrong. I laid out over $200 for the machine which I rarely used. Then another $70-$80 bucks to get it fixed when it should have been covered by warranty.Next time I'll buy another brand. I won't reccommend any other one, because I don't want you to think I work for a different brand. I don't
Small and fragile. I bought this item brand new and in hot pink colored (caught my eye). Flashy, small & cool looking! However, it contains 1 LED light which is bright but not wide spread. So when reading it lights up only the center of the page. You will have to constantly reposition it to keep from straining your eyes.  The constant bending and reposition will affect the fragile wiring on this thing.  About 10-15 uses after buying this product, I noticed a flikering (very annoying).  It slowly worsens the more I used it. In fact, I put the thing away and haven't used it again b/c of the annoyance. Thank goodness I didn't pay much for it. Value for the money is about a "7" because you get what you pay for.  Spend the money and try something else with more than 1 LED in it. My next bet is finding something with a real light bulb in it or maybe I will just annoy my husband at bed time and read with the lights on :
Not Scientific, and Not Positive. The Gentle Leader is advertised as a scientifically designed, positive training device. It's neither. So before you buy into the hype and purchase an item you'll eventually discard (if you love your dog, that is) you should know that dogs hate this device. It feels totally unnatural to them. Its so-called "scientific" design is based on the way a supposed alpha wolf enforces his authority by aggressively gripping a subordinate around the muzzle with his teeth. (Nice, huh?) Since we now know that the alpha theory is false, the rationale behind this torture device for dogs is equally bogus. (Wild wolf packs do not form dominance hierarchies or spend time trying to show each other who's boss by grabbing each other around the snout; such behaviors are only produced when wolves are forced to form unnatural packs while living in captivity.) A device that mimics a totally unnatural act of aggression cannot be considered positive.As a dog trainer, and just as a human being who loves dogs and hates to see them being mistreated, I cannot stress strongly enough that this device should not be used on any dog, ever.So what do you do to keep your dog from pulling? Dogs don't really pull on the leash so much as they get pulled on by things in the environment that stimulate and attract their instincts. So the trick to training a dog NOT to pull is to play games that will make YOU more interesting and more appealing to his instincts than the things in the environment are.
Its fun and all......BUT...... I am a recently instant step-dad to a 6 y/o rottweiler and thought I'd get her some fun new toys.  This Nobbly Wobbly looked cute.  Opened the box yesterday morning, and she was sooooo excited to play with the ball....BBBBBUUUUUTTTTTTTT.....DON'T BOTHER!!!!  This ball lasted not even 24 hours, before it was torn apart.  Kind of bummed I didn't read the customer review before hand.  Sorry Charlie...we'll find you a new toy
Very Disappointed!. My mug arrived with several areas of glaze chipped off. I'm not about to send it back though because of the shipping charges. I'd be paying for the mug threefold if I did and probably would find missing glaze on the replacement. I wasted my money. The store that sells this mug via Amazon didn't check the merchandise prior to sending it.The box it arrived in was in a larger box with packing foam. But the inner box that the mug was in was opened and was in bad shape. Not good for Amazon either. I hope the powers that are in Amazon see this review.
Nice, but not as advertised... Like the other reviewer, I ordered these and was disappointed to find they are not 18/10. Nice looking set, but not the quality I expected.
Oxo finally messes up. I've bought a number of Oxo kitchen accessories, and found them to be sturdy, remarkably well designed, and easy to use.Unfortunately, this timer is an exception.It has the usual features typical of timers at this price point: clock plus timer, ten number keys for input, memory, etc. But instead of being flat with a magnet on the back so it can fall off the refrigerator like other timers, it's round like a traditional wind-up kitchen timer. It's solid-feeling and has nice non-skid feet on the bottom.The problem is the display. It's horrible. For three reasons:First, the numbers are small -- smaller than any other timer I've seen. They're about 1/4" high, half or less the size of those on comparable timers.Second, the numbers are recessed 1/8" or more beneath a clear plastic cover, not on the surface -- it's dark in there and feels like looking down a well. It desperately needs a backlight, but there is none. Unless the light source is shining directly into the display, there's a large dark shadow covering part of the numbers. But that causes the third problem:The clear plastic cover over the numbers is both curved and highly reflective, and it's virtually impossible to arrange things so that there isn't a reflection shining back into your eyes .The bottom line is that I have to fiddle around to get the timer, the light source, and myself into a position where I can read the small, dark, shadowed, and reflective display. Not what I need when I'm trying to cook.It's just not worth it. Since I have several other timers with displays I don't have to strain to read, I use this one as a paperweight. I'd have to say it works very well.I just don't understand how Oxo managed to let such a flawed design out the door
broken. This was a wedding gift a little over a year ago.  With one time daily use the basket is broken (It had been limping along for 6 months) and has always filled the water meter with bubbles so I had to get used to knowing how much water I was putting in by estimation.  This is cheap, I am so sorry my grandma paid so much for this unit.  She was trilled with it because she thought she was buying me a coffee maker I could have for a long time.  I will be buying a bunn.
Poorly Functioning Grinder. I've owned this grinder for more than 2 years. I found myself use it less and less. The reasons being: 1]. It doesn't grind beans in a consistent fashion. The top beans are coarsely grinded and the bottom beans are Turkey-Coffee-Fine grinded. No matter how hard you shake during the grinding process, it doesn't help. Coffee still comes out that way. 2]. You cannot grind many at a time. Putting too many beans in the grinder will only worsen the outcome. 3]. As previous posters said, it is very difficult and messy to 'pour' out the coffee (if you can call it pour). I use brush, spoon, folks, chopsticks, and everything in between to take the coffee out. But there is ALWAYS something left behind. 4]. The machine cannot take grinning time continuously anything longer than 20 minutes. If you work it this hard, it simply stops work. You have to wait for 10 minutes to have it work again.Rethink about buying this grinder
They arrive broken!. I love the dishes.  I ordered 3 sets (12) square plates, 3 sets (12) round salad plates, 1 set footed round bowls (4), 2 sets rimmed bowls (8) and 2 sets (8) mugs.  So far, the plates arrived but in 1000 pieces.  Sent them back and they only have 1 set to send me. It hasn't arrived. One set of salad plates was broken, but has been replaced.  The 4 footed bowls arrived fine.  One set of rimmed bowls was chipped.  One set of mugs was broken.  I haven't received the lable to send them back.  So, now I have 12 salad plates, 4 mugs, 4 footed bowls, 4 rimmed bowls....and no hope of owning a complete set.
Nice idea, but... I have to agree with the previous reviews that this dispensses honey way too slowly.  Additionally, it is much too difficult to fill without making a mess, since you cannot have the top open without having the bottom open as well.  This dispenser is just not worth the trouble and mess, no matter how great the idea
Didn't last long. No problem with the shams or bed skirt and I loved the color, but the feathers in the comforter started coming out very quickly. It really looks like I plucked a chicken on my bed. I was less than pleased with the set, but for the price, I guess I got what I paid for.
Why did they sell this garbage. Ok i have a couple of these tongs sitting in a box and trust me that is where they belong.They are hard to use because when you move the slide lock up they open completly wide and if you want to quickly lock or unlock then forget it there are beter ones on the market that can be locked and unlocked with one hand not two like these require and the metal feels cheap and they are very light a slight wind will knock them right onto the floor.Spend a little more cash for the OXO locking tongshttp://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0000CCY1L/qid=1122017598/sr=8-1/ref=pd_bbs_sbs_1/002-9480983-6492045?v=glance&s=kitchen&n=507846Trust me you will like them bette
DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT. the pin is not properly secured to the body of the pitter. after a few uses it will pop off. i've gone through three of these pitters from my local linens 'n things. how could the designers be so inept
Read carefully!!!. This is very misleading. this item is only half of the package. after its delivered you will find that you must also order more parts to make it work. very disappointed in amazon for allowing this
Tall heap of c***p. This fan is made of the shodiest pieces of junk. Cheap badly painted plastic just waiting to break. It looks really junky.  Even the romote doesn't have the direction indicators for the batteries...Worst was the performance.. After a few hours of use the fan started to make loud clicking sounds and a few hours later the fan stopped oscillating from side to side..It's not worth letting into your house.
place settings. While the examples of place settings are lovely, they are not for me - interested in &quot;busier&quot; patterns.  country-type patterns  Thank
Broke after 9 months. After 9 months of reasonably good service, the entire faucet apparatus started leaking and becamse unusable. The leaking water came out of the plastic seams on the sides of the device, to it definitely appears to be faulty construction.The most annoying thing is that I just bought some 3 replacement cartridges for the unit... which is now useless. What a waste of money. I'm looking for a better alternative
Rancilio died after 5 Months. this machined worked well. It was quick, until todayWe tried to use our Rancilio Espresso Machine this morning and it would not heat.  I am reserving judgement as to whether I will be able to get this thing repaired under some kind of warranty.
Ditto (Disappointed). I suppose it's my own fault, but I too am disappointed to find that this item is not as versatile as I had thought.  It's not to be used on the range - microwave or oven (oven for tea?) only.  I researched the product on Le Creuset's site first, but didn't pick up on the fact that their statement concerning suitability for use on stovetops was for their cast iron products, not stoneware.  Again, my own fault, but it would have been helpful to have this info. stated explicitly in the product description section.  And how happy am I that I paid extra $$ to have it expedited?  *groan*  That aside, it is a very attractive red, looks good on the table, and does not get too hot to handle out of the microwave
Bad quality. Too bad that I didn't read the review of this product before I bought. The size is smaller than described and it's not handmade. will not buy anything from Greenland again
useless. This cutting board falls into the sink very easily, making it only suitable as a decorator item.  I am very disappointed with it. I much prefer an over-the-sink cutting board I purchased from The Container Store, even though it's white plastic board is not pretty to look at
hate it. i got this fryer only yesterday i fryed some chicken wings and french fries the fries came out with so much oil and cooked for 10 min for a small batch i have been frying for about 10 years and know how to cook very well and i have to say this is just as bad as frying on the stove. i put the oil to the max fill line and with cooking the two things the oil went down to the min line do not buy.
Not as wonderful as I thought it would be. I purchased this product and much to my amazement, the dual controls are installed backwards!The control with the service label information is supposed to operate the right side of the bed, the unlabeled control is supposed to operate the left side of the bed. Not so. My side of the bed was too hot, hubby's side was too cold. When we swapped the controls to the opposite of what the directions said, we had the desired results. I purchased this product during the winter months, and needed it too much to send it back to the factory.....at my expense....for repair or replacement. Make sure any electric blanket or warming pad you purchase has at least a 5 year guaranty
total JUNK. THESE RINGS ARE MUCH TOO BIG  AND TOO LIGHTLY MADE FOR EGG MUFFINS AND THE EGGS SPILL OUT THE BOTTOM OF THE RINGS. TOTAL JUNK. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THESE RING
Zipper will not stay zipped. The zipper on these bags will not stay zipped, therefore the air will not stay out of the bag and the bag will not stay compressed.The first time I tried to zip the bag, the zipper holder fell off.  I put it back on but it didn't help zip the bag.  I then zipped it by hand, making sure I tightly zipped every bit of the zipper.I used two extra large size bags, one for a queen size comforter and the other for 4 accent pillows.  Neither bag would stay zipped.They are a waste of money.
Bought it, tried it, returned it. One might imagine that the whole concept of vacuuming-flip-mopping is progressive in some way, but it really does not make the job of cleaning the floor easier.  Especially when the product is heavy and hard to maneuver with poor pickup.  I'd much rather go over the floor with a good vacuum, and then follow with a functional, well-designed good mop (like the old SteamMop they discontinued). These things function better as seperate units, which is why there's no washing machine that's also a dryer.The Flip-It is a very loud machine--so loud, that I didn't hear my phone ring in the same room.  This makes it difficult to listen for my 3 children, too.  It's difficult to push and feels like it's gripping to the floor.  It doesn't fit into any tight places or under any low chairs/cabinets with it's big fat part-vacuum head.  And, when you're finished, it's a pain to clean out the nozzle and the filter(which you're supposed to keep dry somehow) so you can look forward to a second job once you've finished the job of cleaning your floors.  And, because of the "flip it" back and forth design, the thing has no equilibrium...it fell to the floor at least 3 times, even when I was so careful to rest it against something...once when this happened, the "dirty water" recovery tank hit the floor, fell off the machine and spilled the dirty water all over my just-cleaned floor.  A true nightmare.  I bought this product because I could no longer buy replacement filters/pads for my Bissell SteamMop, and I thought I had better give the latest and greatest a try, but, sadly, I was disappointed.  I don't review things often, but I felt a responsibility to warn others out there who are shopping for a good mop to keep their homes clean.  This contraption is not your answer.On a side note, I wrote to Bissell to bring back the SteamMop (what an excellent product), so I'm hoping that they will one day
Disappointing. First of all, I've searched for months for black furniture and found there to be little to choose from. So I bought this table in white, and spray painted it black. It looks great with a $1.38 can of paint over it. But wouldn't you know a week later it's available in black. Go figure.But all of my excited anticipation fizzled when I went to put it together. It's quite easy - few pieces, simple directions, obvious connections - but the predrilled holes and slots for the drawer bottom don't line up at all. I fought the thing for too long and got disgusted. I came back to it a day later determined to finish my project. The wood on the bottom shelf cracked as I screwed it into the leg. How wonderful. So I'm using it with no shelf, which would have been a support to the legs. I'm hoping the legs don't bow out and drop the drawer!Sure it was inexpensive, but I wish I never spent the $49.
Worse waste of money!!!!!!!!!!!. I thought it would be so cool not to be cleaning my grinds up everyday.  Boy was I wrong, This is the worse mess, to clean-upI dream of my Mr. Coffee.  I spent so much on it I can't get rid of it yet.  Do Not Bu
not happy. The LCD display do not work right line are missing from the display.
Buy several flashlights and leave them where you need them!. This looks like a good idea from Westinghouse, but if you read the warranty details, the krypton bulb is not covered under the 10-year warranty.  $10.00 for a bulb that is warranted for 10 years - but not really?  What is the point?  Extra tape isn't even included when the first strip fails.I suggest you use a flashlight
Lost order. It took almost a month the actually get what I ordered. I was charged for them the day after I bought them and heard nothing from the company for over two weeks... then it said it shipped... but a week later there was still no tracking number and no package. Very dissapointed in the customer service... at least I got what I ordered
Wonderful Waffles But Quit Working on The Second Use. We were able to use our waffle maker twice and it produced some of the most amazing waffles ever.  On our third time using this product, The waffle maker simply would not heat up at all.  There is another review with this same problem and Amazon sent them a replacement waffle maker.  I am in the process of requestion that Amazon do the same for me.  Will report back on the results of this request
GREAT LITTLE ITEM. GOT THIS FOR CHRISTMAS AND IT WORKS GREAT.I DID ALL MY SHIRTS MUCH QUICKER THEN USING AN IRON.THE STEAM ONLY WORKS WHEN STEAM LITE IS ON.A TIP ONLY USE DISTILLED WATER OR HOLES WILL PLUG UP WITH LIME DEPOSITS,YOU CAN GET THIS WATER AT WAL MART.
3 Honeywells, 3 very disappointing exeriences. Enough is enough.  I bought this heater and it failed within two weeks.  When it fails, the light will come on but neither the heating element or the fan will work. Thankfully Amazon is awesome at returning products and they had another one in the mail before I even put this one in the mail to ship it back.  The new one arrived and it ran for about a month before stopping.  When it failed it failed in the same way as the first one.  Since it was Spring, I just threw it away and took the loss.Convinced that it must have just been a defective model of Honeywell, I ordered the HZ-315 Quick Heat Ceramic Heater.  This one actually worked for almost one whole year before dying last night in the exact way the other two did.  The moral to the story is this:  Honeywell heaters are garbage.  Unfortunately, I begin this whole Honeywell nightmare only after my Holmes heater died after 5+ years of it running night and day during the winter.  SPEND THE EXTRA FEW DOLLARS AND BUY QUALITY WHICH IS NOT HONEYWELL
Poor design. I assumed because this is Cuisinart that this would be a great product and worth the $50.00. It has turned out to be a total waste of money.The design is poor because there are no vent holes in the top of the popper so it fills with condensation which in turn makes the popcorn soggy. Im pretty ingenious so I thought that if I drilled a few holes myself in the top this would take care of the problem. It did not help at all. I tried several types of kernels to see if that would help the situation and it did not. I use coconut oil always and did not change that. I think because the surface area of the popper is much smaller then other poppers that contributes to the problem. I never had a problem with the traditional dome top poppers and im going back to that style.
Switchblade Steak Knives?????. Never would have bought them if I'd realized they looked like switchblade knives.  Poor choice on my part...
Are u a deep sleeper?. O.k. I bought this type of product in the past but it was a COTTON material - it works perfect.  I tried to save a few bucks and ordered this cheaper version and the first night I had it on it sounds like your sleeping on trash bags or newspapers like my girlfriend says.The product works as intended.  Quality is good. Zipper is strong. But I just hope your a sound DEEP sleeper or you'll be awaken everytime you move your head.  Just pay nearly double more for the COTTON version - I wish I had this time around!!
Against a wall. This piece definitely isn't what I had hoped for.  However, it was easy to put together, and it is sturdy.  You pretty much have to have this piece up against a wall, as there is no back piece on the main frame to hide the back of the drawer.  &#60;br /&#62;The allen wrench it came with for assembly became 'rounded out' before I could finish with all the hex screws. Be aware that you may have to pull another one out of your toolbox to complete assembly. &#60;br /&#62
Buyer Beware. I ordered the Flying Bird Cat Toy.  The color combination they sent me was unbelievably hideous: Purple base and pale pink and pistachio green bird!  Their delayed response to my dissatisfaction was I would have to pay shipping back to them for credit.  Thus I would have two shipping charges to return this item.  Why would they produce an item that is so ugly, especially when their ad shows a lovely color combination?  Do not order from these sellers without clarifying exactly what you will receive
furminator the more efficient tool. i got this for my cat (ocicat breed).  he's a short-haired cat that doesn't generally need much grooming except when the season changes.  shedender worked just like the commericals.  one brush and fur goes flying everywhere.  it does remove hair however the teeth of the comb are not deep so the removed hair goes either flying or stays on top of the fur towards the back.  as u can see in the picture the tool is small.  if you have the patience and extra time (and if your pet has the patience too!) u can think about saving some money with this tool.  if you want something more efficient, invest some extra money and go for the furminator instead.  i bought both and compared them but i'm keeping my furminator despite the much higher price
Do not buy this!. This coffeemaker does not keep coffee hot and fresh for hours as the user booklet says, even if you first fill the carafe with hot water and let it set before brewing.  If you want a cup 45 minutes after brewing, it is luke-cold! I was emptying the carafe right after brewing into another thermal carafe that actually keeps coffee hot just to avoid reheating cup after cup in the microwave! It is hard to clean and very loud
Disappointed. I had a bad impression of this item.  The handle broke off in my hand; the machine did not charge well...eventually didn't work at all.The experience turned me off completely to Euro-Pro products
Wearever Anodized 10-inch covered skillet. While the pan handle stays cool, the lid handle heats up with the pan.  You need a pot holder to use the cover.  I didn't like that.
Cheap junk!. One of the wheels fell apart the first week we had it (and it does not move in our house so I know we werent too rough with it)and the darn thing keep leaning to the right! I would return the item for another one but target will not take it back (even for store credit) because I unfortunatly trew out the box. Ugh! I would not buy this item again
Does NOT work - DO NOT BUY IT. It is hard to believe - but IT DOES NOT OPEN CANS.  Seriously.  Christmas morning with food preps well underway we discovered our brand new opener would not open cans.  Unbeliveable!
Piece of garbage. Third time I used it, the rubber knobs on the blade drive coupling broke off.
Broke before I ever used it. The legs were a bit tricky to put down, and when I did, I busted the mounts. Never even used this thing & threw it away. Coleman makes one that I bought that's better built, and Excalibur Electronics has one available as well that I also bought - I like Excalibur's better, but both are better than this piece of junk. All 3 brands are in the same price range. Interestingly, there aren't a lot of portable ac/dc fan options out there... I bought these for camping in Florida
Bad toaster. This toaster lasted for about 8 months before it started to burn toast on one side, even at low settings.  We are very disappointed with this purchase
non rolling roll top. The bread box is very nice looking but the roll top will not open.  I had to return this item because it was useless
Bad product. This is a poor product.  It never manages to really get the air out of a bottle of wine (which you can tell because there is no real "pop" when you remove the stopper) -- and after a few months, mine broke.  Find another brand
Royal Albert Rose Cameo Collectible Teacup, Green. This teacup has a beautiful design, but I was very disappointed when I received it.  The cup and saucer were much thicker than I would have expected for a china teacup!  It also had a problem with the scalloped design for the foot of the cup as this caused the cup to rock as it sat on the saucer.  I sent it back as I could not imagine trying to drink tea from this cup
What a piece of crap. This is the worst pan I have ever had.  We love mini muffins and have had Wilton and other pans.  They are hard to clean so I thought I would buy this one and cleaning would be a snap.1st.  The silicone smell was horrible.2nd.  The pan warped in oven.  I used the sled it came with and followed directions3rd.  I washed in hot soapy water 3 times and still muffin residue4th.  The muffins did not come out.  I used spray I waited until cool and still they stuck.I will never buy silicone anything.  Don't waiste your money
Terrible. This product wasn't delivered to me for at least 2 1/2 weeks. After one review, the customer service rep from Allergy Be Gone emailed me bribing me to take my review off. He mentioned that Amazon would be reviewing his company, and he didn't want Amazon to see the negative comment. He promised me free filters and offered me a $20 gift certificate if I removed the comment. His name is Jason P, and he goes by judahp for his email account. What a jerk. I will never buy from Allergy Be Gone again
water still tasted like chlorine ... started to drip. I wanted to buy something that would remove the taste of chlorine from the kitchen faucet but even with the Brita it still tasted like chlorine. After about 2 weeks it started to drip from the where the Brita screws into the faucet. So now you don't have filtered water. My husband replaced washer and it still dripped. If you accidently put the hot water on while someone in the house just before used the filtered part the filter is ruined
Lack of quality control=  No Buy. I bought this as my second fryer. The third time I used this fryer, the oil went up and came out of the fryer then the lid wouldn't close properly and that's the end of it.Prior to buying this fryer, I had the presto fry daddy for years and it worked fine.
disappointment. While I still Love the pattern and the color was just what I'd hoped, I received two sets of these dishes and both had air bubbles in the glaze on the plates - showing bare stone in tiny circles all over the eating surface. While Amazon was good to exchange and then return them and provide a refund, I am unfortunately out a large promotional gift certificate and very disappointed with my experience with these plates
It broke on the 19th day of use. We got this for our new baby.  We loved it until tonight... it just up and died and I've only had it 19 days.Taking it back tomorrow
VERY VERY DISAPPOINTED... We bought four sets of the Victoria Collection 600 thread count queen size.   The fitted sheets do not fit on our queen bed.  It seems like that were made for a full size not queen size... list this as a reject.  We are VERY VERY disappointed
Don't waste your money. Bought for my wife and it is usless. Short battery life and poor suction. A total waste of money
Home owner. I was expecting a big fluffy fill and warm comforter. This is not the case with what I got. I will go ahead and keep it to use when I laundry the one I went to Bed bath and beyond and bought to replace the one I bought from you
Item is Not as Described!. I ordered two of these pans.  One for myself and one for my sister.  We DID NOT RECEIVE A STAINLESS PAN! We received an aluminum pan with a non-stick black coating on the interior.  The pans we received were from the MC2 collection.  Amazon sent me a new pan but I received another MC2 pan.  So now I have to return two pans and my sister must return one.  We are both collecting the 3-ply All-Clad stainless cookware.  I am very dissapointed.  Amazon will not honor a comparable sale price on a stainless pan
Do a test run. I bought this machine and a Dyson the same day. This one I bought for our lower level family room. After assembly I found it was very hard to operate and heavy!I now see why they store models are put so high up out of the consumers reach. The upolstry tool is worthless. I find the dust and debis collects around the filter until the machine will absolutely clog up and stop. the Dyson? Worth every penny and I should have bought 2.
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
very poor quality. I have used Wamsutta for years and have always been pleased with their quality and softness.  But I sincerely regret having bought these sheets.  I purchased one set, and, after the 2nd wash, there was enough pilling that they were uncomfortable to sleep on (all the little "balls" felt scratchy).  My husband asked me why we were using the "old" sheets instead of the new ones because they looked so worn!  I was so suprised that I called Wamsutta directly, and the very nice lady there assured me that I must have gotten a defective set, because that simply "doesn't happen with their sheets".  So I exchanged them with an identical pair.  And the end of the story is that I am returning this set for a refund because it is doing the exact same thing.  What a disappointment.  Absolutely do not recommend, and am now very wary of all Wamsutta products
Not as good as I expected. We bought this rice cooker because of the reputable brand name. We have been using it for about 4 months now. It cooks good rice. However, the rice does not stay fresh for over 3 days sometimes regardless of what other reviewers said. We've got spoiled rice in it a few times already with no understandable reason. And the rice was in "keep warm" mode at all times. In addition, if you forget to stir the rice and leave it in the "keep warm" mode for a day, the top layer becomes very hard and the bottom layer becomes very soggy. So, you do need to stir the rice quite often to prevent the dryout. I haven't tried cooking porridge or any other kind of rice besides white rice. If I were to decide all over again, I would stay away from this rice cooker. I thought I've bought a top-notched product, now I regret that I spent this much on a rice cooker
Very Disappointed. I was all excited that I could put any solution i want in it and that it had a scrubber, but when i got it.  It was so hard to put together.  Then the cleaner i put in started to leak. Then the handle part kept on coming apart.  Then it didn't look right.  The mop pads are a joke, they don't just come off when you turn the knob which i can't even do that.  It does not take any mop pads because the swiffer wet jet mop pads are my fave and I had to put velro on the bottom so that they would work on it. And most of all the thing is so heavy.  You have to have some upper body streanth just to move it. The scrubber head is no were near how big it look on Tv.  It was a very big dissapointment not to mention it was my Xmas present to my self.  Black and Decker should stick to power tools and leave the mops up to swiffer.  I love my Swiffer wet Jet.  Best Mop I have ever used.  Wish they would make it so i could use any cleaning solution that i wanted though
Dangerous Product. I've had two Hamilton Beach products. The first was Brew Master, which we wanted because the coffee is dispensed through a coffee carafe at the top of the machine. However, the carafe is plastic with seams and after 4 months began to leak all over the counter. Hamilton Beach replaced the carafe, but the new one leaked again after 4 months. We then demanded a Stay or Go Thermal Coffeemaker. I had it for two or three weeks and then as I was washing it out with hot water and a bottle sponge, the glass vacuum liner blew up with a bang! Glass shards scattered all over the sink and kitchen floor. I was lucky not to have gotten shards in my eyes. Please look out for this one! I'm only buying stainless steel carafes from now on
Cheap. The plastic lip broke in several places while I was getting out of the bubble wrap.  I tried to salvage it, but the cardboard inside was so cheap I gave up and threw it out.
Are these defective products?. I have a few pieces of the Wilton Armetale Reggae line, which I purchased from a department store and which I enjoy.  So I purchased two of these petite trays from Amazon, and they arrived looking like defective products, both of them.  I expected the petite trays to have a smooth, bright shiny surface (like my others).  Rather, both trays are dull gray and the surface is the texture of an orange peel!  In addition, the carved design around the edges should be filled with black ink (or whatever that is), but portions of the carvings are not even colored.  In short, I was shocked and disappointed in the quality of this product.  I wonder if Amazon is selling defective goods that didn't pass the muster for a department store.
It's Junk. I had this toaster for under 3 years when I came home one day and it smoked and died. I have to agree that it didn't toast evenly but at least it looked cool and worked. Now, Kitchen Aid wants me to pay $52 for a pro-rated replacement (which is supposed to be Half Price)and I can buy it here for $63.  I always thought people paid more for Kitchen Aid because of the reliability factor. A one year warranty on a $100 TOASTER makes no sense. I wanted something better than the $9.99 drugstore models and got a mediocre (though cool looking) toaster that lasted less than 3 years. I am VERY dissatisfied and will not buy another Kitchen Aid product.
Too small for a betta. Caring for fish in a very small bowl like this one is stressful both for the fish and the fishkeeper.In a small bowl like this, the fish's waste will build up rapidly (espcially since there is no filter). This causes suffering (for example, eye and skin irritation), sickness, and even death. You can try to prevent this by changing the water frequently; however, frequent water changes are also stressful for the fish. (Not to mention a pain for the fishkeeper!)In addition, the temperature of such a small volume of water will fluctuate rapidly; another source of stress for the fish. You cannot use a heater in a bowl this small.Bettas are tropical fish. They need a tank heated to 80F; there is no way to safely heat a tank smaller than 5 gallons.If you'd like to care for a fish, please read some of the excellent websites out there and learn all you can. (Ignore manufacturers websites, since of course they will say their products are great, even crummy products like this one.) Get the largest tank you can afford. If you can't afford a large enough tank, please don't get the fish.
Overpriced Garbage!. I find it more than a bit ridiculous that Pur charges 40 dollars for their product and 20 - 25 dollars for their replacement filters.  I have owned 3 Pur sink mounted water filters and every one of them has ended up in the garbage within the first year of use.  Why?  Because they begin to leak at the faucet connection and this leak grows progressively worse over time.  Tightening the unit does not help and in fact may make the leak worse.  Removing and reinstalling the unit does not help.  I have become so frustrated by Pur water products that I will never again purchase anything made by them.  I just installed a Brita filter on my sink a couple of days ago and no problems yet and even if any do occur the Brita is more reasonably priced at up to 15 dollars cheaper for the sink mounted unit.  Do yourself a favor and avoid this over-priced piece of junk at all costs
Rice sticks. The pan doesn't have a non-stick coating so the rice sticks (go figure). Not a bad brand from what I hear - I just prefer a cooker with a non stick coating
False Alarm Problem. I have had serious problems with false/"nuisance" smoke alarms with this product
Very hard. The pillow is very bulky and very hard... It makes it too difficult to get a good night's sleep... I tried it for just one night and then switched back to my old one..
Annoying inconsistency. Th product features and editorial review spell Germany as the origin of manufacture.  But the one I got was made in China
Look elsewhere if you plan to make fries. I found the following issues which put this purchase into the local landfill:1.) Once you get a successful potatoe to cut through, the ends of the fries are stuck in the thick grids.  Getting them out is a real pain, you need a lot of careful tugging and wiggling to remove them without breaking them.  Just a mess.2.) If you are slightly off 90 degrees when you start pushing through the potatoe, you are in a very dangerous zone.  Think of a lot of force applied to sharp blades that is going in the wrong direction.3.) Maybe my set was off tolerance, but the blade would not stay in the housing by itself.  I had to hold the blade in the housing and push it on the potatoe simulateously.  Not a big deal, but that for me sealed the 1-star rating.I guess the bottom line is, if you expect nothing out of it, you might use it, or if you are slicing something softer than potatoes.  For me, I've decided to get one of those Vollcraft units.  It's on order
Don't bother!. Don't waste your time.  I bought these for a birthday gift for my mother because they matched her bathroom perfectly.  Believe it or not, her bday was december 12th.  They still haven't even been shipped.  Don't waste your time it's not worth it
U-SCRUB. I WOULD RATE THIS ITEM -0- STAR BUT IT IS NOT AN OPTION.THERE ARE TOO MANY STYLES/MODELS. IT IS VERY CONFUSING. CHECK ITEM SPECIFICS CAREFULLY TO AVOID GETTING THE WRONG STYLE/MODEL.THIS VACUUM HAS STATIONARY BRUSHES. SAVE YOUR MONEY AND PAY THE DIFFERENCE FOR THE MODELS W/ SPIN-SCRUB
Filtration System Problem. The power filtration system (motor) burns out in about 1 year.  Eclipse does not sell the system as a separate accessory so you can't replace the item without buying a whole new aquarium system
Nice idea, but disappointing!!. I received this model as a gift and thought it would be great since we only brew a few cups at a time. However, as other reviewers noted, almost immediately the clock started losing several minutes every day. I wasn't intending to use the delay feature very often so I didn't bother to return it. Now, just short of a year after I received it, it suddenly started working, so I'm shopping for a replacement. I might try another Mr. Coffee model with better reviews, but not this one
Not for hardwood floors!. I bought this vacuum and it was fine on carpet (though a bit noisy.)  It was awful on hardwood floors - it blew the dust everywhere.  Stay away if you plan on using it on anything besides carpet
Split in 6 weeks. This cutting board developed a split only 6 weeks after I got it.  It has had proper care and minimal use.  Don't buy it.  Shipping was timely - no problem there
Not worth even a penny - TORTILLA REMAINS UNCOOKED IN THE INSIDE. I read the review for this product on Amazon. Lindsey who is one of the 2 reviewers of this product actually had posted a video of the product usage and I was very much convinced by that. I thought the product is good and ordered it immediately. The product arrived in 4-5 days and was in good condition.The most important problem with the roti maker is1. the roti/tortilla is not cooked properly. It remains very much uncooked. Even though you see it puff and everything from the inside it remains uncooked which actually causes a lot of acidity problems.2. Also such an uncooked tortilla when left for a few minutes becomes very dry and difficult to eat. You have to eat the tortilla immediately within 10-15 minutes of the making.Just imagine if you are making 5-7 tortillas the first one will be come dry and difficult to chew.3. The product works as described but the tortillas are not at all good for health since they remain uncooked in the inside
You get what you pay for!. I bought this item because it seemed to be the right size for my family and the price was right.  As I've been using it, I'm finding that even though it comes with a dough blade, it doesn't knead bread dough well at all.  The dough builds up under the blade and pops the blade up, stopping the kneading action and allowing the motor to run at a very right rate.  This overheats the motor within a matter of seconds.Second, with the chopping blade I've found that unless the items being chopped are of a dry nature, the machine simply pastes the food together and whirls the unchopped food around in a circle above the blade (dried fruit, for example).  The food has no chance to reach the blade at all.Finally, the 10 cup capacity is a deceptive label.  The actual liquid maximum level is about 4 cups, but if you put  more in the processor after the liquid (as in flour or other ingredients), the liquid will come out onto the counter through the center hole.  The blades do not seal the center opening, so to say that this machine holds 10 cups is quite misleading.  When making salsa, I can only make small batches at a time or the salsa spills over through the inside of the workings and ends up on the counter and plugging up the blades.Be advised, there is one speed and one speed only.  The pulse feature is not a true pulse, but just a quick on and then off of the one speed.  It takes several seconds for the pulse to wind down, just the same as it takes the main speed to stop.I will continue to use this machine until it breaks because I already paid for it, but I will not buy another one.  I expect that the leakage through the center of the bowl will cause enough internal damage that I'll be in the market for another processor in a short amount of time.
Supplemental Use Only. I use this vacuum to supplement my Dyson as I have 2 dogs, 2 cats, and 2 children.  It works well on wood floors and even my basement floors where I  keep my cats' litter boxes. However, the cord is short and it does not work very well on carpet. Sometimes I'll vacuum closet spaces or use it on our stairs; however, I would not recommend using this as your main source for sweeping up after your pets.  My Dyson is a miracle worker compared to this, and the customer service department for Dyson is much more efficient. When one of my children broke my Dyson hose, I called the customer service department and they sent me another hose at no charge.  The Shark filter costs nearly $18 to replace, and because the Shark is a small vacuum, it does not take long before the filter needs to be replaced if you have pets who shed a lot.  I have even rinsed the filter, but it still bears replacing.   It's great for sweeping up small jobs, but if you are looking for something to suction up a large space or after pets and children, keep looking
Innova Dutch Oven. Have purchased the 5 QT version of this Dutch Oven. During the second use of it, the bottom layer developed a bubble, separated from there, making this utensil totally useless. I am now trying out the warranty and see if there really is an exchange for it
Bad fit. The tin is too small for the box and moves around leaving scratches on the corners. The supplier was great great but the product is cheap. Also, it is way to big for most counters
Upright Spoon Rest. It is really not practical, especially when you are cooking on all four burners of your stove since there is only one small hole to put your spoons in.  If you put it on the stove it be careful, because it gets hot by the vent on the oven
Bad Quality. This is really shoddy. One rod broke after the drying being used less than one month. Bad Quality
Not as cool as I hoped. I really wanted this cereal dispenser to ease the morning rush. Unfortunetly it is just messy,annoying and takes up counter space. When you turn the nob it crunches the cereal and much of it flies in every direction. If the cereal is too big (honeycomb size) it doesn't come out easily. If it is too small (fruity pebbles) it comes out too easily and gets everywhere! I definetly would not buy this product again. At one point I even had ants crawl up my counter into the dispenser and had to throw all the cereal away. The time saved by not getting the box of cereal from the pantry is spent cleaning cereal of the counter
smelly. We bought it and returned it because of the caustic odor. Tried to clean it but the inside smelled strong. It would be a good ottoman if you had a poor sense of smell.We also tried buying another to see if the smell would be better. It was not. It's hard to notice in the store with all the other smells.
not worth the price. The Down from the comforter is coming out,causing lot of discomfort and allergy......
Extremely disappointed. Wish I could give it zero stars. I bought both the paperback size and the one for hardcovers. Haven't opened the hardcover one yet and don't know if I'll bother. The paperback one does not provide much light at all, though the page is readable. Just not what I was expecting. But the worst part is the annoying and very distinct wavy pattern on the pages -- it's like an overlay of a printed pattern that covers the entire page. Not at all pleasant.I would never, ever recommend this product to anyone
False photo. The photo shows a whole box of jars, but they're only selling one.  Don't be fooled by these jokers.
Better timers are available. Best thing about the Timex timer is that it will accept a grounded (3-prong) plug. But it is not very precise unless +/- half an hour is okay for your needs. It is also a bit difficult to move the time setting tabs to their on or off positions (my wife broke a fingernail doing this). Not recommended
forget it!!. This item is not good and does not deliver what it promises. It has no power and could not suck the air out of the bags. I was very disappointed and would not recommend buying this product. Spend a few extra dollars and buy something different, you'll be disappointed too if you dont
Safey issues for little fingers!. The stool is great as far as it's ability to function.  It is quite thin which makes it easy to store.  It does have a safety issue!!!!! My 3 year old son got his finger pinched when we were adjusting it to push it together.  I almost got my finger pinched as well on more than one occassion.  My husband welded it together and now it remains in the open position thus, no more pinched fingers.  I would think twice before purchasing this one if you have toddlers around.  I was right there when  my son pinched his finger and it was difficult to open the stool back up to release his finger
The plates would have been nice IF THEY WEREN'T BROKEN!. DO NOT BUY PLATES FROM AMAZON! Don't get me wrong, I love Amazon and have had no other problems with their services...but...this was crazy. I ordered these plates and they came in a box with a piece of brown paper as packing material!! Then I returned them and the 2nd set had some bubble wrap, but not nearly enoough - broken again!! Not worth the time or money! I must also say that I ordered several other glass kitchen items and they were fine.
Know your colors. These covers are not even close to being red.  The are wine or burgundy in color
Not even remotely as posh as the picture. The picture makes the exterior 'look' like it is suede-esk, but it's actually a cheap thin mixture between fabric and plastic.  The heat barely radiates through and only when the cat is inside (although the bottom of unit is always toasty).The cord is the best feature.  Very sturdy and assuring.Would not suggest this product.  Over priced
Not the regular commercial nonstick. I bought this recently for gifting. Came in white box. So using it myself.It doesn't have the quality of commercial nonstick that I am used to. Size/form is right. But the pan is very thin unlike the other pans in the line. Don't think it'll last.Not recommended. It is probably worth ten bucks. Paid twenty
Good Grip - Too Short on Business End. I've broken a few corks with this tool, as the "worm" doesn't reach the bottom of some corks. Other foil cutters are easier to use. Like most OXO tools, this one feels comnfortable and steady in the hand. If you're opening an older bottle or one that has a particularly long cork, use another corkscrew
too small, rusts. I actively dislike this dishrack. As noted, plates and bowls slide out because of open sides, it's too small for anything but VERY casual use (don't buy it if you do all your dishes by hand), and contrary to the PR, it does indeed rust. Water catches in the bottom and has nowhere to drain, so you end up with an unsanitary pool of water under your dishes. Not recommended
Too delicate for regular use. I actually bought one of these in the store and was browsing Amazon for a replacement. The fact that most of the ones in the store display were broken should have been a tipoff. The wires that do the slicing were all broken. These were all the had, so I thought I'd give it a shot. It didn't even make it home. Several of the wires came unattached from the ends. I'm hoping maybe they just had a bad batch. Though I usually like KitchenAid products, I certainly wouldn't recommend this item to anyone
DO NOT BUY DELONGHI. If you want to make 30 cups of espresso then go ahead and buy this.  It makes OK coffee.  If you want more than this though go buy something else from someone else.  The steam tap on mine jammed and it has been at Delonghi for repair now for over four months (YES MONTHS) and I still don;t know when it will be returned, if ever.  Customer service know (or share) nothing. I have since done a lot of internet research and it's littered with tales of disgraceful customer 'service' by Delonghi.  (I wish I'd done this before buying.)  Don't waste your time and money like I did
not heavy weight at all. I was disappointed in this towel set advertised as heavyweight.  It looked to be WalMart type quality.  I would have been better off buyingfrom Linens and Things
Crumbled to bits on third apple. The third time I used this slicer on an Apple, it broke apart, giving me the opportunity to see that it's construction is flimsy
Beware of Mold!. I just threw this item away after finding the filter clogged with hairy, dirty, black and green mold again! I changed the little bulb that is supposed to prevent mold and the filter often. Each time I changed the filter, I found it clogged with mold!I have never had a problem with mold with any of the warm mist humidifiers I have used for years. This was just plain awful
I feel let down!. I really trust the reviews I read before purchasing an item! This one was a letdown!!The sheets were soft at first. I washed them before putting them on my bed and there was an enormous amount of fuzz and pilling of the sheets. On the second washing, no improvement and probably worse!! I am so disappointed in the quality! The only good thing I can say about them is the color is pretty and has not faded with the washings, but so what with all the pilling, and fuzzs that accumulate at the foot of the bed!!! Avoid these
Unsatisfied. There are helpful recipes on the bottle, however the stopper is not secure. I do not feel safe storing fresh made salad dressing in my refridgerator in this bottle
Tree Spirit Salt & Herb Box w/Lid. The wood is very dry, even after applying oil treatment it was rough on the hands.  Also the magnet that keeps the lid in place is constantly falling out of position
not working. When i first got this item i loved it I used it 4 times and it stopped working
Bad DeLonghi Experience. We purchased a DeLonghi toaster oven and both the toaster and oven functions stopped working right after the one year warranty expired. We barely used this product. When contacting customer service we were told that there were no replacement parts available for our model and there was nothing we could do and nothing they would do for us. My $20 toastmaster lasted more than 15 years! This is the lsat time I buy a toaster based on appearance
Tiny and Bursts Into Flames (!). 3 cups? I don't know where this teeny thing would equal that- not even 3 demitasse/espresso cups.Amazon really should make the 'See larger image' say 'See life size' (try it)... or better yet show something for scale- like 10 coffee beans- the amount it holds.So, I'm already kinda down on this Liliputian trinket and I check instructions to see if I can heat the water in the microwave- like I do with my other 'real size' French press (without the top).No, nothing saying that should be a problem...2 minutes later the rubber bottom mat is burning furiously in my microwave !I'd hope Hugo had a 'BonJour' because I certainly didn't..
The Crazy Dog Bumble Ball is not so Crazy after all. I couldn't wait to get the ball, having an extremely active Boston Terrior. The package arrived, opened it, and there were stickers all over it saying supervise your pet and not to let them chew the rubber tips off! I reviewed the add on Amazon and nowhere did it say that they should not chew off the tips. Dogs are dogs, if they catch something jumping around the first instinct is to bite it. I think the J-B Wholesale Pet supplies should have a warning before buying item page
?. ordered this as a xmas gift on 12/13 it is now 1/18 and still hasn't arrived.
Didn't hold up. I got this blender with high hopes of really having something with staying power.  I got it about a year ago and it is already headed to the junkyard.  It smells of smoke when it runs, the sealing ring around the top has already come off (into my smoothie - had to throw it out and start over) and the whole thing just doesn't work very well.  I wouldn't buy another Tribest
The quality is lacking. These are not what you'd expect from Wusthof. The Wusthof symbol on the handle is a STICKER (!!!) which bleaches out after washing. Also, after 1 months use and washing, we're getting rust spots. While these knives are sharp, they are not holding up appearance wise. Very disappointed
VERY DISAPPOINTING, BURNT EVERYTHING!!!!. All these reviews are right on the MONEY!! IT GETS TOOOO HOT!! I bought this crock-pot to replace my old Rival crock-pot that is the same size because I liked the idea of the timer and keep-warm setting. I have used it 3 times and it has over cooked all three meals! I put a beef stew in it today on LOW at 9:00AM and by noon the potatoes were mushy and falling apart and it was BOILING, I hate to think what it would have been like if I let it cook for the recommended 8 - 10 hours! GOOD THING I WAS HOME TODAY!I had also bought my daughter one for Christmas, because of her busy schedule sometimes she does not get home in time to turn her crock-pot off and thought the KEEP WARM setting would be GREAT for her. But I just called her and she told me she tried cooking a roast in it this week and it come out burnt and she only cooked it on LOW for six hours!!I rated this one star because the website would not let me rate it ZERO
Cheaply Made. I tried this knife at Sur La Table at the Furi demo. They appeared to be very sharp. However I did not like these knives for the following reasons1) I dont care much for the cheap plastic-like orange handles2) The finish on the knives appear to be cheap. Furi implies that these knives are made in Germany. However they are cheaply "Made in China". Now generally I dont care that much .. everything is now made in China anyways.. But when I am paying so much money for a product, I was hoping it was made in Germany or USA.3) The case is even more cheaply made.Personally, I would wait for a sale on the Global or the Wustof knives
Use a knife!. This is just junk.  I purchaced this on sale, thinking that Kitchenaid was synonymous with Quality.  Not this time.  It balks as soon as a potato was even with the height of the blade.  Being a stubborn man, I leaned on it and it started to move again.  Little did I know that the metal blades were slicing through the flimsy plastic instead of the potato.  The apple slicer worked much better, lasting 4 apples before breaking, instead of 1 potato.  The item won't slice, but it will break.  It looks very nice, so it is only suitible for giving to annoying relatives that get you cheap crap for Christmas.  Don't expect to get any use out of it
What a terrible unit. I have had this unit for almost a year.  The dryer first started to leak water during the dry cycle, and eventually stopped working all together.  The repair company told me flat out they could not fix it and would have to call the manufacture.  This was after ordering parts on two different occasions and them coming out about 8 different times.  I have yet to hear back from the company.  Haier America refuses to call me back about replacing the unit or repairing it.  I would not recommend buying this unit to anyone.
Too Expensive. All the bad reviews are right on. We may have to use this and put up the cash because i havnt found anything else, but the filters only last a short while if cared for perfectly. If not cared for perfectly you risk hurting your kids health.
Takes space away - doesn't create it!. How does it create space? If you have a cabinet that is 12 inches high, 15 inches deep and 14 inches wide, and put this large plastic item inside it, will that give you more space or take it away? The manufacturers must not be very logical or are trying too hard to sell you something you don't need.
Why No Free Shipping?. This product is not eligible for free shipping, yet it ships from the Amazon warehouse along with the humidifier that IS eligible for free shipping
broken on arrival!. I ordered this from Amazon and received it in about 2 days.  Unfortunately the foot pedal is broken, so I have to return it.  My other DeLonghi has lasted for about 20 years, so I will get a different model
Do not order from this company. I have tried to order twice from this company.  The first time I waited over eight months and cancelled the order.  I accidently ordered from them a second time, but when they mentioned a delay, I looked them up.  Do not order from them
Same problem. I bought it from another store, turned it on to toast it did nothing. Changed setting to bake and soon after it started to smoke. I smell a recall
Shipped item does NOT match description. This item is not shipped as depicted in the pciture/described in the description.Spin Duster: This item does NOT ship with a spin duster.  On the side of the box was a sticker reading:"Bonus items including SpinDuster(TM) are NOT included in factory refurbished models.  To order, please call 1-800-282-2886"  The replacement parts lists has the SpinDuster attachment kit for 29.99.Turbo Nozzle: I can not find it in the box.  Probably a "bonus item"  Replacement list is $15There were no extra filters to be found in the box.  Replacement filter is $20.Plus $5.50 S&H from Eureka, You're looking at 70 bucks to obtain the missing items.Bottom line, buy this because you are OK with it missing half the "goodies
NordicWare 10 Inch Micro Go Round. Microwave turntable did not work properly from the time it was received - it would cease turning after less than a single revolution after being 'wound'.  VERY disappointing
spice rack. I bought it some time ago for much less, also  from Amazon. It is not worth $24.00. May be $6.9
OVER HYPED. ACTUALLY I WOULD NOT RATE THIS ITEM WITH ANY STARS.INSTRUCTIONS WERE CONFUSING AND IT WAS MORE TROUBLE THAN IT WAS WORTH. AN ORDINARY SHARP KNIFE LEFT THIS ITEM IN TEE DUST.I HAD TO RETURN IT
NOT WHAT I EXPECTED. The Service from Amason and follow up was 5 stars but the product it self is not as good as I hope
Stck with teflon. Things stick to it, no matter what you use. Go with teflon
Seal Leaves A Lot to Be Desired. I bought these because they matched my dishes.  I really wish I'd kept my old ones, even though they were black.  The size of these is nice for flour, sugar, etc.; however, the rubber seals in them aren't great.  The seal on my flour (biggest one) falls in every single time I take the lid off.  They're pretty, but not very functional
Shorted out on first use... I don't know who else bought this but I can't imagine what would have happened had we waited to actually get INTO the bed before we turned the thing on...IT FRIED.  Then they tried to charge me the postage and handling when I returned the item.  They did get that quickly straightened out but it was a very frightening purchase.  Always test a product before you risk it on your self or others
Forget the Rabbit, buy Le Creuset. I bought a plain rabbit a couple of years ago, and though i liked it, it did, at times, take a lot of strength to get a cork out.  Then it broke in the sense that it would pull the cork, but not take the cork out of the corkscrew afterward.  So I went shopping for a new rabbit, and read a featured review quoting bad experience (not unlike mine) and recommending the le Creuset &quot;screwpull&quot;.  Though it cost more, I did buy the Le Creuset, and love it.  It is way easier to pull any cork than the Rabbit ever was
Beware!. Before you order, you need to know these are plastic plates.  They are NOT stoneware or quality plates.  I did not see any references in the description of the plates that they were anything other than a natural plate.  I now have to send back everything that I received, and the prices of these plates are priced the same as quality stoneware plates, such as Fiesta - which is what I intend on replacing them with, except I will go to a department store and purchase them - I wasn't expecting anything but quality platewear.  Very disappointed in the lack of description on these plates.All I can say is if you're expecting a quality stoneware type of plate, this is not the one
Do not buy more than one from Home & Beyond!. Buyer Beware!  If you are purchasing more than one of these at a time, do not buy from Home & Beyond!  Despite what their shipping rates say in the description, they charge the full shipping rate for each accusharp you order.  I wanted to get 5 of them, and the shipping was almost $30!!!If you are getting more than one of these at a time, order the one called "ANS Accusharp," shipped from Jazebra.  My shipping charges from them for 5 units was only $7.95, more than making up for the slightly higher price on the sharpener.  Always check your totals in the cart before clicking to finalize your purchase in your cart to be sure.
dual means "two". The bed warmer was described as "dual" controlled.  It comes with only one control.  The entire bed has to be at the same temperature.  The reason I wanted "dual" control was because my husband is always warm and I'm almost always cold --- hence, seperate controls were needed.  Since we had the coldest winter in years, I adapted the product to work because there was no time to return and request what was described. It does heat well though
Defective On Arrival. I hate to rate something so low, but my experience warrants a low score.The larger burner was defective from the onset - the knob turned but the burner remained on, and at full it seemed, regardless of the knob's setting.  I had to unplug and plug in the unit to turn it off and on.  The smaller burner worked!Amazon was nice enough to refund me in full and even paid for the return shipping as well.  Packing seemed fine too, guess it was a manufacturing defect.  Hopefully this doesn't happen to many others
Dualit Percolator not so good. We purchased this purcolator Christmas 2003, and ended up returning the first one after it did not work out of the box.  Amazon was great in sending us out another via exchange.  The second percolator worked.  However, I wished I'd have saved my money.  The coffee basket allowed too many coffee grounds to end up in the coffee.  Don't take that last cup.  You will also need a carafe to store the coffee in after percolating.  The percolator maintains the heat too high when ready, and boils the coffee continuously.  Mmmm, burnt coffee!
Beautiful design but questionable quality and durability. When we first got this set, we were both very pleased with the unusual and striking design.  We thought we would continue to be pleased for quite some time.  However, after minimal use, we discovered that the finish just didn't seem to hold up to everyday use.  The finish is so marred now, especially with the dinner and salad plates, that we would be too embarassed to use these dishes for company.  Our previous older dishes now look much better than this set.  However, we could recommend the coffee mugs as a separate purchase
Not very durable. I have purchased a total of three of these collar. They seem to work great for a while then they they need the dog to bark louder and more often to get them to activate. Then, after a few months, they quit working altogether. I check the charge and the batteries and that's not the problem. I don't think they are for large outdoor dogs
Ok But I wouldn't buy another. This product lights the page very well but...It is uncomfortable to hold & inconvenient to move with each page. I have only had mine for a short time, only used it on a few occassions and it is already terribly scratched and even chipped despite my efforts to be careful with it.  I have been using book lights for years and this is one of the worst I have ever owned. I will definitely go back to a rechargable clip-on
TOV400 No Heat. After less than 1 year, I bought an oven thermometer to find out why the oven was cooking so slowly.  After 45 minutes set at 450 degrees, it only reached 200 degrees.  Consumer service is a joke, unless you like listening to a computer.  I never could reach a human at Toastmaster/Salton.The elements come on, nice and red, but no heat
you get what you pay for. If I could give half a star I would.I had this unit for exactly 93 days and it just wouldnt turn on one day.I used it less than 3 times a week. There are several drawbacks to this unit. It draws ALOT of electricity to run it. I could use the same socket to run anything else while this on. Water gurgles/spits out of the spout while its boiling and I have gotten burned. The spout is also poorly designed, the water doesn't come out in an even stream, it goes where it chooses and even out of the seam of the lid. The heating element is exposed inside the pot and makes it almost impossible to properly clean. The water does get really hot in a short amount of time but its not worth it.I just bought the Braun WK200B about a week ago. It is everything this kettle isn't and so much more. Read the reviews on that one before you buy this one. Its a better choice all around. Save the shipping costs, time & headache, just buy the Braun first and pass this one up.
Bad design. I prefer my spoons to stand upright. Many of my spoons fall out of this one, I guess it depends on your shape of the spoon
This is the worst piece of garbage I've ever bought!. I'm an engineer and I cannot believe that any company would, in good conscience, fob off such trash onto the consuming public.  The reasons for the faulty performance are all based on fatally flawed design.  A product with this many problems does not reach the market by accident.  They had to have known it was junk, but chose to sell it anyway.  Dirt Devil deserves the strongest form of rebuke and condemnation
Do not buy this wok. I received this in Christmas, the 2nd time I cooked pork chop with it (the type with bones attached), I washed it right after I cooked the food, scratches were found. I never used any utensils to scratch it. I couldn't believe any wok would easily scratch like this one. It's a piece of junk. The bonus bamboo streamer is useless really. The only thing in that set I think is the most reliable is the bamboo spatula.
Skimpy. This comforter might fit a full size bed, but it was way too small for a queen
Great Coffee Until The Bulb Breaks. Allow me to be the 30th person to say that the lid is terrible.  My bulb (the plastic thing on top) finally broke after a year, and about 10 hours of searching later, I still can't find a replacement.  The coffee was great, but not good enough to make up for the crappy lid.
Falls apart. I bought this blanket several years ago and only recently went to use it. I figured since it was sitting in a bag, I'd wash it first.Well, what I got was a washer FULL of lint with what looked like a needlepoint canvas. The thing fell apart in the wash!I called their horrid customer service, and the jerk I talked to refused to acknowledge that this could happen. He wanted me to send him the lint! Five pounds of lint?? It took me an afternoon to clean the crap out of my washer!I'd strongly suggest that anyone who wants a blanket that lasts steer clear of this blanket. That, and the absolutely awful and nasty customer "disservice" of this company
Doesn't heat very well. I can barely feel the heater when I'm laying right next to it.  I expected much better from Sharper Image
Don't bother. This thing is a joke.  It's barely tall enough for the cat to get into it.  Would you want to have to sit under a contraption that looks like a 1800's Conestoga wagon when YOU use the bathroom?  Your cat won't either.  It's bad enough when you try to change the cat's litterbox.  But you're asking for trouble putting this poorly designed contraption on it.  What's even worse it trying to wrestle with removing and reinstalling it should you need to do anything to the box.  It's bad enough the top half of the "Mega Elite" doesn't firmly attach to the base.  But the little poles on this cover tend to get stuck in their mounting holes and pull up the base when you try to remove the cover.  So then you're faced with the hassle of putting the top back into place before you can reinstall the cover.Basically it seems like a good idea but in practical it's a huge pain in the, well...  just avoid it
Junk, Junk, Junk!!!!!. This blender is a piece of junk. I used it maybe twice, each time it smelled like it was on fire, which kinda worried me since my Cuisinart coffee maker did catch fire. Last night I tried to make milkshakes and the turning wheel broke in half (the part under the carafe which hooks into the base to make the blades turn). It broke because it was starting to melt in the center where the screw goes through. I will never ever buy another Cuisinart product as long as I live. I still have their toaster, so I am alerting our local fire department
Good Lord. This is hands down the worst electric skillet that I have ever used.  I noticed after the first time I used it that the non-stick coating was flaking off.  I thought surely it was just a fluke so I used it two more times and every time I used it after that, I had to throw my food away because the coating flaked off into my food.  Absolutely horrific
NOT FOR LONG TERM USE, would not buy again. I should have paid more attention to the reviews...I was warned ahead of time that this crate shouldn't be used as an everyday or long-term solution. We've been using the crate for LESS THAN three months and already the zipper one one end (that we use all the time) is screwed up and half the time it doesn't open. At least one of the two zippers on that end can still move so the dog can get in and out, but I'm afraid of the morning when I try to open it and both zippers are fully stuck. (We leave one end open and place the crate up against the bathroom so the dog can at least have a little room to roam plus still have her crate to sleep in. When she gets a little older, we will leave her in her crate all day.) We could still use the zippers on the top, but we don't like those since the dog can't get in and out at her leisure.Although in general it's a nice crate, I probably would not buy this item again just due to the poor quality of the zippers--hence the two stars. I am completely surprised that we only got three months' use out of it before the zippers bit the dust. We've already purchased a different, sturdier, latch-style crate that we're much happier with...and we should have bought to start with
Not so elegant sheets. After only one usage and washing pilling of the material made reusing them uncomfortable. When I tried to return them I was refued because 30 days had expired. We hadn't used them until then. I have a balance in my account to use. Other than that we will not be buying from Amazon anymore. Imagine if we were to buy early gifts for someone which had been in our plans. Also, I have since read other complaints of the product with similar responses, yet you still sell them
MagnaSharp Mouse Knife Sharpener. I couldn't tell any difference in the degree of sharpness on the knives before use and after use..
It is NOT bone china, but FINE CHINA. I received it but with great, great disappointment.  The bowl was not crafted from fine bone china, but from fine china.  The apperance was not as white as bone china.  And on the bottom of the bowl you may find it said "FINE CHINMA".By the way, it is made in Indonesia.
Stoped working after 1.5 years. Wished it lasted longer. My wife got this Cuisinart Classic Toaster oven as a wedding gift. We liked the appearance and had it on our registry. We used this toaster oven a lot because it cooked very well. Toast was perfect, and the oven cooked nice and hot. We broiled meats and made all kind of things in it. We found it hard to clean. We would take the baking pan/and crumb tray and use our regular self cleaning oven to clean those, but it would take a lot of scrubbing to clean the glass and interior of the oven.Then after about 1 year one of the plastic feet broke off when simply adjusting the position of the oven on the counter. I glued it back on with super glue. It broke again and seemed to become more brittle over time because of the heat so I had to fix this plastic foot a few times.Then another problem arose. The toaster and the one light would shut off a few second after pressing start. So to make toast we just used the un-timed bake function, but then we would have to watch so we did not burn the toast. Still we lived with it.Then after about another four months all of the controls stopped working. So it does not bake. I think I knew this was going to happen because I would hear a strange buzz and see a little smoke come off when ever I turned the dial to bake for a while.So therefore I think the electrical wiring was not heavy duty enough or the electrical system was not soldered well or protected well enough to last. I would have expected better quality. Considering how long we have been making toaster ovens, I think that it would have not been too hard for them to have made a more heavy duty electrical system for the controls.So like other reviews say, it does cook well and evenly, but it is hard to clean and does not last. If I were to have rated the product before the problems started I would have given it 4 stars. I wish that Amazon and these sites had a section for long term reviews that would rate the quality, because most of the reviews seem to be written soon after receiving the products.We are now looking into T-Fall Convection Toaster oven, but after reading those reviews we do not know if it cooks as hot as this oven and we want to get one that cooks well and lasts.______________Since writing my review above I tried to fix my oven to no avail, but I have gained more insight into its design and perhaps why it broke.My recommendations are as follows. Since I know that the rotary controls and the circuit board of this "Classic" model product can over time get dirty and stop working, I recommend that people who own this oven keep it far away from any other cooking products that create grease or steam such as range tops, rice cookers, deep fryers, pressure cookers, or kitchen sinks. Especially keep the vents near the controls on the right side of this unit away from these sources of moisture and grease.I recommend consumers to consider the newer models with digital controls, which might have a different mechanism inside or the models with the controls beneath and therefore the electrical components and cooling vents underneath the oven and not in an exposed location. This might make the unit last longer.The newer Cuisinart models with the knobs or digital controls beneath the oven might be a design improvement to correct the sort of problem I had. Or perhaps other manufactures have solved electrical component problem other ways. Maybe 1.5 years is average life, or maybe the fact that my oven was placed near the cooking range in my kitchen made my unit more susceptible to malfunction. Reviews of lots of other brand models show short life spans for these products. From the reviews and my observations above, I think the Krups models and the improved Cuisinart models might last a longer time than this classic model that died on me.
very tiny bowls. These are not at all what I was expecting.  To me, these are tiny bowls -- they measure 5 1/4 inches across top.  [...
Ineffective & Dangerous. My husband and I purchased Comfort Zone plug-in to alleviate bad behavior from our  aggressive kitten that we recently adopted from the SPCA.  It was very expensive and there was absolutely no change in our kitten's aggressive behavior.  We plugged it in and a couple of days later, as I was passing the electrical outlet that contained this plug-in, I noticed that it was leaking oil - all over the outlet!  I immediately unplugged it and threw it away.  Like throwing 40 dollars in the trash.  Just glad our home didn't go on fire
POOR DESIGN. I bought this item to use in lieu of my steam iron when my carpal tunnel flares up. I haven't tried using it on a wrinkled garment--only to touch up after ironing. My complaint is that the water reservoir cannot be fully emptied after use so water stays in it. Two small screws inside the reservoir are rusting after one use. I used it about 2 weeks ago and it still has water in it. I called Conair customer service and they told me you have to use all the water by steaming it out. There is a small plastic cap device and that's the only means of putting water in or taking it out. It's the same type of cap used on pool flotation devices. I'm returning this because of the water reservoir problem. It needs to be redesigned. If it were actually good for removing wrinkles, I would be afraid the rust from the screws would ruin my clothes
do not buy. this thing is the biggest waste of money i have ever seen
buy the Brittany!!. I have loved every Le Creuset product I have purchased with the big exception of the Whistling Teakettle!  I did away with it a couple of months ago and bought the Brittany model to replace it.  The Whistling kettle burned my hand on several occasions, as the design of the spout allowed the hot water to spit and jump right out of the pot!  The whistle is removable and you must put your hand near the spout to remove it for pouring.  Even after waiting a minute after taking the water off the heat, the water would still jump from the spout.  While a little larger than I would have liked, the Brittany does not have the same problem and the whistle can be safely flipped up before pouring.  I have been very pleased with my new kettle and would recommend the Brittany by far over the Whistling
Waste of money. Waste of money.   I read the reviews and purchase the board anyway.  I figured if I condition the board first with mineral oil it would last longer.  I had the board for 7 weeks before it broke in half.  I wish it would have broke sooner so I could have sent it back.  Buyer Beware, don't buy this!!  I should have taken the advise from the people who purchased this before me
Waste of money. This is the worse leveler I have ever used.  You would be better off using a knife and eyeballing your cake.  The problem is the blade is very flimsey and bends as you cut the cake.  So your cake actually turns out MORE unlevel!  And for making layers, the blade will bend and you will get a very uneven layer.The smaller wilton leveler works better for making layers, but either one works well for leveling cakes..
One serious problem. Works until the batteries go dead without warning.  Then it's impossible to remove from a partially opened can in spite of instructions to the contrary.  Avoid this product as it'll last only as long as your first set of batteries
Waste of money. After this percolator stopped working, we were instructed to send it to Dulalit's service center for repair (Electra Craft, Inc.)  Customer service at the repair center was very unprofessional -- they would tell us the package was shipping out to us, and nothing would arrive.  It was only after persistent calling that they finally shipped the percolator to us and it arrived in worse condition.  It took them four months to return the percolator to us.  They refused to replace the percolator because we owned it for more than 30 days.  Amazon was very helpful and understanding and assisted us with a refund.We unfortunately own two of these percolators and when the lid broke on the second one, I had to contact Electra Craft, again.  They were able to provide the part, a simple stainless steel lid, for $25.00 plus shipping and handling!  I'm sure their other replacement parts are overpriced as well
Simply Bad. This is horrible at keeping coffee hot. It gets cold quick.Buy another brand. I bought this model and a larger Zojirushi 1.9 liter stainless steel model at the same time. They both are bad and leak heat vapor out like a hissing snake with no off switch. The 1.9 ltr one also leaks fluid out even before you press the open button.  Also it is the worst stainless steel I have ever seen. It stains instantly and for ever. I had another Zhjirushi for more than a decade and it was fantastic. But something has happened over the last 10 years, their quality has really gotten bad
Strangly unpredictable quality. I bought one of these about 6 months ago and it worked beautifully.  No problems.  Moved out of state and accidentally left it behind, so I replaced it with another.  Will not cut.  At all.  I don't get it.  Was there a recent lemon run of these things?
worst coffee machine I've ever purchased. This coffee machine brews the weakest coffee I've ever had- doesn't grindthe beans well and to clean it makes you wan't to store it in the garbagecan.  That's what I did I'm going back to the melitta machine toda
Go witht the traditional "cheese plane" type. Like in the other reviews, the wire broke after only a few uses. I just emailed OXO and asked for a replacement. I hope they honor the satisfaction garantee
Poor seals. Generally speaking the design is a good idea.  Too bad the bottles don't seal well.  The lids are poorly maufactured/designed and do not seal properly.  As a test, I put water in one of the bottles and put the lid on nice and tight then turned the bottle on it side and watched the water run out.  This is not good for spices as they will not keep well if the container is not sealed
Too much too little. I expected a lot more from this machine. Now that I have it, I still use my old $5 drip coffee maker. The wife is still mad at me for spending our vacation money on it.Any impulsive male buyers out there: Steer clear, the wife would rather go to the carribean
FUN FOR A WHILE !. WANTED TO TRY IT............DID.................THE COFFEE IS TOO EXPENSIVE........CAN'T USE ORDINARY COFFEE...........HAS TO BE VERY VERY FINE GRIND. OH WELL, THE LOCAL THRIFT STORE WILL FIND A NEW OWNER
Very disappointed!. I opened one of the packages and there was blood on the card that the sham was folded around. I promptly called Amazon and they replaced it. It was a waste of money, the first time I washed them, white patches appeared all over the shams as if they dye washed out. I was very, very disappointed with the quality and will not order them again. Don't waste  your money
100% Dupery - DOES NOT WORK AT ALL. I've bought a used car, and while the ashtray was clean and new, and there was no smell at the moment of purchase, this was just due to the pre-sale preparation (deodorizing procedure). In a couple of weeks I started feeling the disgusting residual cigarette (or may be cigar) smell...I tried EVERYTHING, including Febreeze, and even a special "smoke grenade" that they put inside the car and start the A/C in order to circulate deodorizing gas through the whole system. Nothing worked. I didn't believe in this thing from the start, but was desperate, and tried...Guess what: after 3 weeks of persistent presence inside the car (all instructions were followed) NOTHING changed. So do not throw your hard-earned 35 bucks away!Leo, P
Merely Okay. The bad news about these 300 thread count sheets is that the threads must be so thin as to qualify for supermodel status.  This causes the fabric to be so thin, you can just about see your hand through it.  Also, out of the dryer they are quite wrinkled.  The good news is that the red border color that I chose did not bleed in the washer.  Further, they did not shrink at all.  I don't know how they feel to sleep on, as they are for a guest bed, for occasional use only.  Just by the way they look, if I were to use them daily I would have returned them
Not a Serious Kitchen Knife -- Buy Something Else. Pros: Low price, looks good in the package, adequately slices and dices small pieces of meat and thin veggies.Cons: Flexible thin blade, extremely lightweight, and air pockets are too small to be effective -- veggies stick to the blade.Conclusion: If you regularly need to use a Santoku knife, spend a little more and buy something with more weight/heft and deeper dimples.  This is more like a disposable knife that you might take on a vacation or use in a pinch.
Not as good as it should be. We love using the microwave for rice - not faster, but simple, easy to clean, leaves the stove top free for other dinner preparations. BUT this version is not a good choice. The two-part top leaves a layer of boiling water when you take it out. The plastic pot gets a little soft and flexible. And finally, it breaks easily when it falls to the ground. Oops. Different one next, hopefully like our old faithful from Chinatown that lasted for years
Too bad so sad. Like everyone else it seems the item I got was also defective and did not work. Only the rotation and nothing else. Not the fan, not the heater.  BOO
I tried to like them.  I really did. I ended up with three of these litterboxes...from other people who hated them as well.  Here's the thing:  With the grate in, they're very cramped for even the tiniest cat.  Your cat can just deal with it for your convenience?  Not so, my friend.  Because of the cramped quarters, your cat will inevitably end up defecating or urinating on the grate...which makes the entire "sifting" action of it virtually nil.So, as it stands, I'm yanking the grate, covering up the drawer hole, and using my reliable old scoop.
Don't bother...... The buyer was great but this product didn't help at all. The light shined in a circle pattern. No light at the middle. I returned them and I got notification of a credit to my credit card
Did not work. I have ordered this unit twice this past month, the first one did not work properly in one of the units, the signal was distorted. After returning it to the supplier, I ordered it again from another Amazon supplier and one of the units did not work at all. I will now look for another brand
A Terrible Hand-Vac. The old Dirt Devils that I used to own were awesome - they would last forever even when taking lots of abuse.  So I bought this updated one with high hopes.  What a mistake!  The biggest problem is that the agitator brush is air-powered, rather than electric or belt powered.  Consequently, the brush stops turning whenever it hits anything soft (high carpet, plush upholstery) and is even less likely to turn if the filter is clogged up from cleaning.  Time to find a new hand-vac manufacturer..
Cannot adjust for coarseness. The description says you can adjust for coarseness of the salt/pepper, but there is no such knob on the mini grinders. We replaced the store bought salt with sea salt and now the grinder doesn't work. Disappointing
Terrible product from Rival. Don't bother with this skillet,the non-stick coating is non-existant. After a couple of uses the coating starts to come off and you know it's coming off on your food. Good idea from Rival (removable pan) but terrible product and a waste of hard earned money
DeLonghi DFH2550TB Safe Heat Fan Heater. The heater that I received was defective. I down loaded a return label from amazon.com and returned the heater. I received my refund very quickly. I have two other DeLonghi heaters of a different model that I am very happy with but are no longer manufactured. This was my first experiance with this particular model
Received 2. Both Leak from the top. I received two of these for Christmas.  I tried them both.  Both leaked liquid from 3 different spots when turned to pour.  Also, the plastic tops had touches of gray, worn-looking plastic on them.  I returned them both and bought 2 of the Zojirushi Champagne Gold Series Tall Thermal Carafe, Herb Cacao Carafes instead, which work great
yup,  it works good but not worth the additional aggravation. The worst part of this purchase was that it was a gift and sent to another persons address. That person now gets a  slew of catalogs at their address with my name on it. (They also get a second copy of the same catalogs with their name on it as well.)   Be prepared to have your name and address sold without permission if you do business with this 3rd party company. Bad business and aggravating
Fell apart quickly. Unfortunately the pet blinker didn't hold up very well.  I think a washer fell out or something but the unit came apart after day 1
Save your money. I bought this coffee maker to try and get above the level of cheap coffeemakers.  I did not succeed.  I paid $50 and could have bought a $20 Mr. Coffee and saved myself a lot of my money.  This is not a top of the line coffee maker with bottomline features.... it is a bottomline coffee maker with bottomline features.  It has no clock, no timer, no automatic turnoff (It will cook the pot dry if you forget to turn it off.  It is hard to fill to the correct level without having water run out the hole in the reservoir at the back.  It is hard to pour a cup of coffee without cascades of dribbles.    You are supposed to be able to take a cup out as it is brewing.  In a word, "Don't".  It just keeps drooling coffee all over the heating element.  And it takes forever to brew a pot of coffee.I am not an engineer, just a harried housewife that is trying to get everything together in the morning and get everyone where they need to go.  THIS coffeemaker should have never made it to the marketplace.If you want a basic coffeemaker, get a Mr. Coffee for $20, this is not what you are looking for.There is nothing "Deluxe" about this coffee maker except the profit they are making off of consumers like me.
Little Disappointing. Honestly, I was a little disappointed in this martini set.  I bought it as a Xmas gift.  I wrapped it as it came, wrapped in a plastic protective bag.  It wasn't until I saw it opened did I really get a good look.  (I know... my bad.)  The glasses are really small.  The idea is nice, but not sure it'll ever really get used.  I really expected something nicer for the price
Disappointed. I had really wanted the Select A Spice carousel. Especially since you are suppose to be able to turn the dial to get different measurements out. What I found out was that when you would turn the dial, it would not come out at all or all of a sudden you would get more of a spice then you wanted. The spices don't stay put on the carousel either, they constantly fall off. I know you are suppose to be able to attach them under the counter, perhaps that would be better. But it would not take care of the spices dumping out at unwanted amounts. I am currently looking to replace this spice carousel
Would of been nice.... Sure could of wrapped up in this, had my order been shipped to me, kept the certificate and the products..
Completely Wrong Material. As a serious amateur woodworker who has also studied the design and building of wooden boats, let me say that beechwood is by far one of the inferior materials one could choose for making wooden spoons.  Olivewood is by far the superior material for this sort of common yet critical kitchen tool. Should you doubt this, please visit the kitchens of France, Italy and Spain to see what's stirring the pot.Additionally, fabricating the spoon by gluing multiple pieces together is a lesson in engineering failure. It violates the most basic principles of woodworking.  Wood, because it is made by nature and not man is not uniform.  Wood not only expands and contracts as it heats and cools, but also as it draws up moisture and dries.  Multiple pieces equals multiple rates of expanding and contracting, working against the glued joint.While Oxo makes and sells some very fine kitchen tools (I have a vegetable peeler by them that's the best I've ever owned and it's about a decade old), this is sure not among them.A product to avoid
Don't get this one. I've had an old coffee maker for a long time that makes good coffee but I thought I was ready for something even better.  I am disappointed with this one.  I thought I couldn't go wrong with a KitchenAid product, but sure enough, I did.  The design is attractive and I like that you don't have to purchase paper filters.  However, I have two problems with it: 1) The coffee isn't hot enough. I like a very hot cup of coffee because I put milk in it which cools it down a little.  My old coffee maker made very hot coffee so it didn't matter how much milk I put in, it was still hot.  Not so with this one.  The coffee was luke warm after I put my usual amount of milk in.  This is my main complaint and I'll probably have to return it for this reason.  2) Next problem is that I set the automatic timer so I could wake up to a fresh brewed cup of coffee.  I set it according to the manual instructions and I think I did it correctly.  When I woke up this morning, no coffee!!  What a disappointment.  I think I'll go back to using my free coffee maker from Gevalia that has reliably made good coffee for me for the past three years!
Don't Buy. Mr Dances to bluethis is a Bad product ....period ...whatever other ( only one agrees) say about it being a good one ....its notThink of getting a diff kettle ....as simple as tha
My Vacuum Fell Apart. My wife and I received this vacuum as a wedding gift. Before we even celebrated our 2 year anniversary, the vacuum had completely fallen apart. It won't stand up on its own, 2 screws have fallen out of the base, the house smells like burnt rubber every time we use it, I have to use the attachments to suck up anything bigger than a cat hair, and the plastic guard on the front is completely detached. Furthermore, everytime we vaccum, the HEPA filter trap opens, and I have to put it back together before I can resume. After reading other reviews, I'm glad I'm not the only one whose had these problems. I didn't pay for the thing, but if you're planning on it, my suggestion is DON'T BUY THIS VACUUM. You'll be shopping for another one within 2 years just like me.
Get the same thing for $10.00. This is a very cool product, but there are a million knock-offs out there these days, and you can get them for as little as $10.00! They are almost totally identical, they look just as cool, they work just as well, and the only thing that the knock-offs don't generally have is the fancy wooden box.  Cost Plus World Market sells one for $20, and Linen N Things sells one for $9.99.  Some companies just don't get the idea of appropriate pricing
Terrible. I drink more wine than I sometimes like to admit, and so I open a lot of bottles. I've used waiter's corkscrews, the fancy two prong kind, the lever 'Rabbit' ones, and the standard winged kind, like this OXO version.I have to say, of every wine opener I have ever used, this is the worst by far. I love every other item I've tried that carries the OXO name, but this one is a miserable failure. My main complaint is that when you line the screw up with the cork, and the wings are down, there's nowhere to grab for stability when turning the knob on the top. You have to kind of poke your fingers between where the wings meet and squeeze. Once you do get it going, half the time it only goes part of the way in and you end up with a half-removed, or worse - broken - cork.Terrible terrible terrible. But the $2 winged corkscrew at the grocery store instead. Even better, get a good quality waiters corkscrew and never worry about how you're going to open a bottle of wine again
Disappointed !. I have ordered several Le Creuset items, and have always been happy with my purchase.  Not so with this teapot.  I cannot use it on my stovetop, according to the warnings posted on the packaging.
Mrs. Anderson's Pie Crust Shield. Within 10 minutes of the pie crust shields being on the pies the crust was burnt.  Pies came out better without a shield
Purchased a Nordic Ware Norwegian Krumkake Iron. I had an old Krumkake Cast Iron that our hinges finally broke off and thought I would try this unit.  Very disappointing!  Ever cooked with aluminum foil in the oven?  Within seconds from removing it from the hot oven you can touch the aluminum; right?  I found this Cast Aluminum Krumkake Iron to be the same way.  I couldn't control the heat.  I constantly had to adjust the heat on my stove.  How frustrating is that?I then purchased an electric unit.  Thinking that was the way to go.  Neat concept or so I thought.  You can cook twice as fast - and two at a time to boot.  However I couldn't control the thickness.  If you don't mind the bits of Teflon (we called them, "Black spec surprises") and a cookie that is twice the thickness of an ice cream cone - the electric unit is definitely for you![...
Disappointment!!. I purchased the Croscill shower curtain liner. While I was hanging the curtain I noticed the rings on the liner were not large enough to fit through my shower curtain clips!!  The company should supply clips that fit this curtain; also there were not leaded weights on the bottom of the liner.  I think I'll stick with the vinyl-never a problem
Complete junk!. Worked fine for about 6 months and then the inner surface failed.  I'm not sure precisely what happened but some part of the surface coating wore off and now it's impossible to make a waffle that doesn't stick completely to the waffle iron.  A complete waste of money
Disposable pump, grows slime. When this fountain is freshly cleaned, the cats love it.  The water does stay cool.  But cat hair -- lots of THAT around here -- clogs the pump, and if the whole thing is not taken apart and completely cleaned with a toothbrush weekly, it grows slime.  Eeeeuuuw.  The first pump lasted about three months, then the replacement lasted about a month. Not really worth it, because the picky fussy cat would really rather drink from the toilet anyway.
Shark is short-lived!. I received this machine as a birthday present.  The first night I tried it, the power and light would turn on and off at random intervals until I could not turn it back on.  I returned it to Target where I was given half of the machine's retail price because I did not have a receipt!  (Did I mention this was a gift?)  I purchased a Singer 8280 and I am very excited about it.  Don't waste your time or money on this machine, the frustration is not worth it
Stopped working after 1 month and the cats are laughing. and pooping in my mulch. The only solution is a rock garden
ok for 6 months, now leaks everywhere. Worked ok for 6 months (if dial is not in exactly the right notch, washer will run forever without stopping) ... then started leaking water everywhere. obviously not able to use the product anymore. Good luck returning something of this size too (check [...] return policy... 30 days only!). Taking item to local repair center tomorrow, warranty covers plastic parts for 30 days, electrical for 1 year... not promising
Good Skillet, NO LID!. DO NOT BUY THIS EXPECTING THE LID IN THE DESCRIPTION!I never recieved the lid described in the description section.They had a similar skillet in colors for less.Skillet is a quality weight anodized aluminum.It has what seems to be a high quality nonstick interior.The comfort handle has a good feel and is oven safe to 450 degrees.CONThe cushion handle means you CANNOT use in a broiler.No top browning your omelet in the broiler
really garish. Should have thought twice about this one -- it's really big and a very garish green. Not worth sending back, so I guess it will go to a yard sale..
Pick a different one. I registered for this and was happy to receive it at my work shower. Until I used it. It is pretty loud, makes the water dirty, the unit itself gets dirty very fast in a forced air heat household (and who's isn't?) and its virtually impossible to clean those little spike thingys on the blower part. The creases on the resevoir get very dirty; the only thing I could stick in there under a paper towel to clean them was my Tupperware orange peeler. My husband noticed that when we first used it, it would blow out the water hardened into some kind of white dust everywhere - I mean clear across our dgtrs room against her bedroom door. I don't wonder if it was some sort of chemical reaction to our hard-er water. Once we started using filtered water, we didn't have that buildup. It is not designed to accept that Vicks vapomist stuff which I found disappointing - winter in the Chicago area w/o it? Plus I have had A LOT A LOT A LOT of trouble finding the replacement filters - grocery stores, Target, other discount chains, nothing. I finally found some at a drug store and was ready to buy them out, but decided to invest in a different model next winter.
Overpriced. Product was very over priced for what I got and shipping was entirely too hig
HELLO!!  A price would sure help me decide whether to purchase!!. I spent about 20 minutes trying to ascertain how much this item cost, but to no avail whatsoever!  I'm so frustrated after such a lengthy, yet futile search that I want to hurt someone!  Instead, I'm shutting down my browser.  You idiots should think about how many more sales you'd make if you just included a price, for God's sake!
Not Too Sturdy. Product was shipped immediately and arrived in excellent condition.  It was not too difficult to put together.As to the product itself, it is not too sturdy and will not hold up to regular rigorous use.  The biggest problem with it (that has been noted by other reviewers) is that the cloth bag slides around on the chrome and will not stay in place.  To get the bag to stay in place, I had to sew Velcro on it and then glue Velcro on the chrome sides.  If I had seen this in a store, I would not have purchased it.
Severe Product and Customer Service Problems. I purchased this product at a B@M retailer (my first mistake?). The unit is attractive. The coffee function works as advertised.Upon setup, I discovered that the espresso function was inoperative. I had to wait until a weekday to contact the Krups customer service. They were not particularly responsive, but ultimately agreed to pay for shipment to their center, and, upon verification that it was inoperative, they would replace it.One month later I received the replacement. Upon setup, the replacement did make espresso. However, the next day the espresso function again failed, this time with different "symptoms" (initiation of the pump, then failure with blinking liht and display. I again contacted customer service, and now they offer a $10 refund of shipping (The return label function is "inoperative at the moment), with shipment of another replacement item upon confirmation of shipment.Krups refused a refund. The retailer, of course, will not refund, since I now have a replacement. So I am now well into my second month of ownership, with no espresso!! (And, my warranty is ticking away....) MY best possible outcome appears to be months of hassles, assuming I ever receive a functioning product...
Utterly useless. DO NOT EVEN THINK about it if you plan to use it for making roti. The roti remains uncooked inside. We also tried just for pressing out the dough and tried making chapati from flattenned dough on stove top. That doesn't work out either.
Liner breaks easily 4 of 5 shattered within 12 month period. after owning a number of thermos' and other insulated bottles, this is the best at maintaining temperature and the easiest to break!parts are available thru zojirushi web site but with shipping and cost of gasket and liner ($3.90 and $8.60, respectively), cheaper to get another carafe.  after buying 5 total during the past year, i'm down to my last one.  thats it, going to another manufacturer.I did prechill the carafe before filling with ice-water and ice.  i put a cup of cold water in the bottle after a prechill of an hour.  Followed carefully with ice.  Upon putting the 1st cube in the bottle, the glass liner loudly shattered.  I have never seen liners break so easily.  I did notice on the last bottle i have left, before using it, the glass liner was rather loose in the carafe.  i took it apart, and hand tightened everything.  so far okay. this is the last carafe i'll buy that is zorirushi made
VERY prone to false alarms!. We have had a lot of trouble with false/"nuisance" smoke alarms with this product.  (It was not anywhere near our kitchen, either, but in an upstairs bedroom).  I would recommend going with a different brand if you do not want to be repeatedly awakened at night by false alarms
Chose another brand. 1. When I open the box. Found there is a loose screw in the heater.Meaning the product quality control has problem.2. There is no handle to hold the heater.3. There is no second heat temperature selection
Thin metal, not flat bottom. In the ad it talks about having flat bottoms and thick metal, but it isn't flat, it concaves up and it isn't thick enough metal to keep it from making a popping noise when you roast in it.  It is worth the $20 it is on "sale" for, but I could have went to a local store for a $20 roaster.
Terrible product, save your money. I'm terribly disappointed. The feed chute is tiny (barely big enough for two fingers), the tray above the chute doesn't hold anything (most things fall out), clean-up is a nightmare, and it takes forever to get a usable glass of juice.Stick with a centrifugal juicer like the Breville Elite 800, unless you enjoy torturing yourself
Price does not equal value - many problems... I bought this on a popular online auction for $25, but I didn't know what I was getting into.  Buy this only if you accept the following:The good:As the other writer reported, the suction on the unit is superior, esp compared to uprights with hose attachments.The cord pullout and retract is again, superior.  Better than my Electrolux...The bad:The hose and extension wands are proprietory, that is, don't expect to use your old crevise and brush attachments with all of that superior suction.  You can't attach the crevice tool at the end of one of the wands.  You need to attach the crevice tool to order to put on the brush.    Gimicky.Furthermore, the wands FLY apart unless you JAM them in HARD.The unit lacks a beater-bar.  DON'T expect this to be of ANY value on carpeting.The on/off switch is small and could be positioned better.  No turning this guy on/off with your foot.The bagless design is old-school.  It uses the same permanent coffee filter design that's been around for years and years, and you can see it clog up in no time.  The superior suction does compensate for that, but you'd think that after Dyson had solved the problem one way, others would be soon to follow.  Not the case here.But the real bug is that the RELEASE of the dirt compartment is part of THE HANDLE.  Be REAL careful picking this guy up or the dirt will go flying all over (and down the stairs!).  Who would think someone would pick the thing up by the handle?HOWEVER, I should say that the suction IS very good and if you don't need carpet cleaning, will never want to use your own cleaning attachments and use it under limited circumstances, it's not a bad deal for the price.  I use it for cleaning out computers.All in all, however, except for those limited circumstances, very soon after buying this you'd realize that you should have paid a little more and gotten something you can use for the long term.
Can it make any more noise?. First off, I paid $25.00 for this at Walmart, so I would suggest going there first if you decide you want this light weight vacuum. At the time of this writing Amazon is selling it for $54.00.   Secondly, it works fine for the amt of money I spent. Thirdly, my biggest problem is the thing is so LOUD that in order to use it, I will have to put ear plugs in.  Seriously,this product makes about as much noise as a fire alarm!! I have an email in to Eureka.com because their 800 number did not have this vacuum as an option on their automated voice mail and I was disconnected for trying to reach a human being to speak to
Disappointed. The towels are as soft as advertised, but that's it. The towels are much smaller than advertised. I ordered grey, but received tan. I can't use them with my grey bathroom
Not first quality!. These towels are obviously seconds. I ordered several bath and hand towels, as well as washcloths. Upon receipt I opened several. Each had clearly visible thin spots as well as many pulled threads. I was very disappointed and shipped them back
Towels?. Towels are supposed to be absorbent, these swoosh the water across your body...Not good towels, pretty, yes- just for "show" though
not easy to fill. not very easy to fill into the original filter; but it saves money though
NOT low lint. Thick towels but shed, even after washing. Don't wash with anything else but other towels. Seem to have good color saturation. Nothing special, but better than most discount store brands. I'd probably pay a little more for better quality next time
design defect defeats travel mug's purpose. You really can't drink coffee from the mugs which come with this coffeemaker, unless the lids are off the mug... a definite design defect which defeats the purpose of a travel mug.  It is a very simple oversight: there is no &quot;vent&quot; hole in the mug's lid, so that coffee barely dribbles out of the sipping hole, even when the mug is full, and even if you tilt the mug as high as if you were drinking the last drops from the bottom of the mug.  It is a very frustrating experience.  Please also consider that the two cups may not fill up evenly as the coffee brews; one may slightly overflow while the other mug is not full.  Then there is the instruction book.  The English is fine, but does it really make sense to instruct the user to heat up the mugs first with hot water, and then to instruct the user to measure cold water into the same mug to fill the reservoir?  Of course, the user can figure his way around that, but the only way to use these mugs would be to drill an extra pinhole in each mug's lid for venting, or just use the mug around the house, without the lid.  The mug is comfortable to hold, but the thermal value is not too good, even when preheated with boiling water. I regret having made this purchase
Not good on grout. I purchased this floor cleaner specifically to use on the white tile floor and (formerly) white grout.  It did a great job cleaning the tile itself.  Unfortunately, it did not make a bit of difference on the grout, which is just as dirty as it was before I cleaned it with the Hoover floor cleaner.  It looks like I'll be on my hands and knees with the bleach and toothbrush afterall - - very disappointing
Worked great.........at first. Was happy with this toaster until I had it for about 4 months.At that time the lever started acting up by not staying down.Sometimes it worked other times we had to prop something heavy on it to keep it down. Not what I expect from a $70 toaster. Well, I have finally given up (2 months later) and am sending it back to Hamilton Beach since too much time has passed to send it to Amazon. They are sending me a new one, which I am not sure I am happy about. Might just exchange it somewhere for a toaster-oven.........
Not  a six quart bowl. Although it says "6 qt" on the bottom of the bowl it actually holds just a hair over 4 quarts. I wouldn't consider this Amazon's fault, but the description is misleading. If I wanted a smaller bowl I would have ordered one
Horrible!. Hey, I wasn't expecting much but seriously, these are a pretty bad.  I bought two of these for my office.  The plastic shade comes all dented and looks so cheap.  The stupid pieces don't fit together right and so if you move it,  you have to pick it up from the base or it falls apart.   AND the switch gets stuck pretty much all the time so that it's really hard to turn it.  I'm the kind of person who enjoys fixing things so I've taken it apart and tried to fix it and its still rotten.  The second lamp is just completely broken now after only 6 weeks.  SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!!  I'm back on amazon looking for new lamps actually :
a waste of money. If you want your wife mad at you buy this vacumn. A total waste of money and time!!! Poor suction, air filter is clogging constantly, filthy when you have to empty it, shuts down when it picked up a small piece of paper, have to unplug for 30 minutes. They lost their marbles when they designed this vacumn!Could not even give this THING one star, it is that bad!!!
Hopeless and Got tilted within 2 days. Useless product.Soaks water and becomes unbalanced and tilted withing 2 days..waste of money.
Disapointed. We loved this pot when we bought it.  The design, the taste and temperature of the coffee;  but like everyone else our joy was short lived.  The cheap plastic top snapped off after 3 months. I have not contacted the company, but I will be doing so shortly. I wish I had read these reviews before I went shopping.
Poor quality. A 1/3 inch split developed in the wood on the spoon's flat edge after about five uses(I hand wash and dry promptly). The same thing happened to the replacement Amazon sent. Amazon-Great!! Mario Batali- not so great
You get what you pay for. I knew when I purchased these sheets for only 13 dollars they weren't going to be great, but really these are ridiculous.  They are incredibly  thin sheets and they pill easily.  They also do not stay on my mattress, I am constantly having to put them back on.  I will not purchase these sheets again
My impression. Dear Customer Service,I am please about the refund; I am please about all thinks that I purchase from you.The web page where I bought: Zelco "itty bitty" Book Light, Volume 2 I believe is not clear.By looking the page I had the impression that I was going to buy a mini lamp where I was able to use the adapter for 110 volt and the lamp is a LED lamp.At list this was my impression.Sincerely,Adrian
Check your municipal water system first. After I read stories about problems chlorine causes in the shower chlorine I got this filter.  It turns out most water systems are using chloramine now, a more stable additive, instead of chlorine and this filter, like most, is ineffective at removing chloramine.  See if your water system uses chloramine and save yourself an expensive filter that probably doesn't work
design flaw. I appreciate the fact that this makes 8 popsicles but the flaw is in the design.  The "dribble" base when tilted to take a bite, pours the melted liquid out onto clothes, rug, etc.Stains.  Too bad
there are better ones out there. I thought I did enough research before buying this machine but apparently not enough. I was disappointed in 1. the design ( looks rather cheap) and 2. the performance. The coffee maker didn't stop dripping either water or coffee when you pulled out the pot and for the espresso part you need to REHEAT the unit 30 MINUTES prior to use!!! So much about being flexible about having an espresso! If you really enjoy good coffee you need to invest more, unfortunately.
Piddle pads. They work great; very absorbent.  And cheaper than the ones I've bought in the past. I have a strictly indoor dog, and these take care of problems nicely
Cheaply made. Although this item is pretty, it is very light weight & feels cheaply mad
eh...try something else. I gave this a super bad rating a few months ago - something to the effect of "avoid avoid avoid...at all cost" - which upon review seemed a tad over-the-top.The things is, as others have reported, this device will take a sharp knife and make it dull. I've never been able to get it to do anything other than leave unsightly scrapes down the length of the blade.You're better off saving your money for a good steel, which is the only way I've ever been able to keep a Global knife sharp.
DO NOT BUY -- TARGET SHOULD BE ASHAMED TO SELL THIS. We made the stupid mistake of buying this item despite many of the bad reviews.  While the item looks nice, it is completely disfunctional.  As everyone else mentions, the drawers get stuck and do not glide and then when you try to pull them out, the cheap knobs fall off.  On top of this we try to call the manufacturer listed on the brochure (techniwood) and the phone rings and rings and then disconnects you.  This product is a joke and it is appalling that Target would sell this after all the bad reviews.  We are too busy to waste hours putting something together that doesn't even work.  We're so mad that I don't think we will ever shop at Target again!!! &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;If Target really cares about good customer service and customer relations -- they would get rid of this product and manufacturer before they further tarnish their brand image.  DON'T make the same mistake we did --- forget about it.
Amazingly short life span. I only had the lasagna pan for a short time and used it maybe four times.  It was in the oven and simply broke into three large pieces.  It didn't go from cold to hot or hot to cold, it was just in the oven and broke.  I don't know what was wrong with it, but I am having a hard time contacting the company.
Hmmmm... This is cute and kitschy, but too small and overpriced. They aren't kidding around putting *mini* in the name of this item. It's way too big to make individual servings of cake with, and yet not nearly large enough to use up anywhere near one full sized cake's batter. You would need at least four or five of these to use up the typical cake's batter. For that price, you can buy a full sized bear cake pan and have money left over
Broke in a few weeks. I wanted this to work, since I have a house full of unglazed, porous, beige ceramic tile floors with white grout (no, it wasn't my idea). It would be a full-time job just trying to stay ahead of the ground-in dirt that rapidly shows up. And the Scooba did work, at least on the superficial dirt, the first time I used it. Unfortunately, it failed on two counts: it couldn't get out the ground-in dirt; and it broke within a few weeks. To be fair, not much else--short of getting down on my hands and knees and attacking the floor with a scrub brush--gets up the dirt either. But the clincher is that after only a few uses, the Scooba's cover stuck closed and couldn't be reopened without a big struggle. Then getting it reclosed again proved almost impossible. Add this fight to the normal hassle of dealing with all the fiddly little parts in the device, and it just became unusable. Oh, and when it did work, it tended to leak spots of dirty water and leave occasional black "skid marks" on the floor
NOT IN STOCK. I have not received the item just yet so I can not comment on the item itself, but just as a warning to all who thinks this is a great deal. I ordered this set in the beginning of November of 2004 and it is now mid-February 2005 and Amazon has been delaying this for the third time now. They say it will be the end of April before I will receive it. I should cancel, but I'm in no hurry. Like I said, just a warning if you are thinking about this as a gift or any other occation where you need it soon, I suggest looking elsewhere.** UPDATE **I received my order and the set is gorgeous, perfect for any occassion! Definately worth the wait
Soggy, dark brown waffles. Unlike many people it seems, I've never had a problem with the hinge on this waffle maker -- it's still sturdy for me after about 8 uses.However, the fact that I've owned this item for nearly 2 years and only used it 8 times speaks for itself. This waffle maker produces extremely mediocre waffles. I've NEVER  been able to make waffles that come even close to waffles I've had in restaurants.After trying over half a dozen different recipes, I realized that it wasn't my ingredients -- it was the waffle maker. This waffle maker is simply incapable of producing waffles the way they should be -- crispy on the outside, chewy and moist on the outside.Instead, no matter what recipe I used, or how long I cooked the waffles for, I would end up with dark brown waffles that were dry throughout and lost all crispiness (if they had any to begin with!) within moments of leaving the waffle maker.The model doesn't burn the waffles, the nonstick coating does indeed prevent sticking, and overall the waffle maker is nice looking. But that's all it has going for it. I've learned my lesson by now that when it comes to small kitchen appliances, you get what you pay for.
Terrible performance. I have this filter only for about 3 months and it is already leaking on the seams. I crazy glued it and it works while I'm waiting for a new system from Aquafana. Although the water tastes great, it takes about 30 minutes to filter the reservoir. I would not recommeded for anyone
not so great. I am totally unimpressed with this set of bowls.  I received them a few days ago and washed them, and one has already managed to crack after falling of the drying rack and into the sink.  A melamine bowl should be far sturdier than this.  The orange measuring cup/bowls towards the center are nice, but the outer bowls are rather flimsy.
Broke down after 2 years. I bought this toaster to replace my cheap $10 Toastmaster, which held up for more than 10 years [it was still working when I tossed it in favor of this name-brand toaster].  The sliding shelf that holds the bread in place is made of a very thin, soft and flimsy steel.  After only 2 years of use, the shelf became bent and no longer remained attached to the sliding mechanism; and it could not be fixed.  The shelf is hooked onto the slider by 2 small prongs that ultimately broke off.  I am surprised that KitchenAid would sell a piece of junk like this
disapointed buyer. I received the sleepwarmer blanket last week and have been very disapointed--it is just not warm enough!!  Even on the highest setting it doesn't get warm enough initially.  It is fine for keeping warm during the night but I want to be able to turn it down to keep warm and have it pretty hot in the beginning and that is not at all what this does.  It is nice and soft but you can absolutely feel the wires as well.  Not worth the money at all
Unwashable. The product description for this is wrong!!  There is a somewhat "hidden" zipper but for some inexplicable reason, the lining is sewn into the cover so you can't separate the two.
terrible product. First time ordering through Amazon, and probably the last.  The item arrived to me chipped and cracked.  Also having a difficult time getting my money back!  Good luck dealing with customer service
Poorly and cheaply manufactured...possibly a fire hazzard. I received this unit the first week of November 2006.  By Valentines day it was toast (no pun intended).At first it worked fine.  I used it to warm the end of our big living room near the front door where it is was almost always cold.  I set the thermostat at about 3/4 maximum and left it to work. It was also completely quiet as advertised.Then, sometime in January, I noticed that the On/Off knob was turning brown near the edges--as if discolored by excessive heat.  I turned it off to investigate.  Then turned it on again.  Nothing. The unit was dead.  After repeatedly turning it off and on I noticed sparking underneath the switch.  After repeatedly spinning the switch between off/on it would finally come back on and would stay on for 2 or 3 days until it failed again.After about 10 days of this I unplugged it out of fear for my family's safety. Now it waits in my garage until I can take a trip to the dump and dispose of it.  WHAT A GIANT HASSLE FOR A 55 DOLLAR HEATER! And don't doubt for a second that Honeywell COUNTS on people not wanting to hassle with returns.Another example of an electronic device made as cheaply as possible with little or no regard for quality or safety.It will be a cold day in you-know-what before I purchase anything else from Honeywell.  I better find me a QUALITY heater soon so that day never comes.-30-
These are not Grand Patrician towels!. I had hoped to match some towels I rec'd for Christmas.  However, the Amazon towels are made by Utica and are not Grand Patrician at all.  There is no indication they are Martex towels either!  I had researched towels with Consumer Reports and Good Houskeeping and do not recall these even being mentioned.  I may return them as they look somewhat flimsy.  Like a previous reviewer, my set is comng in separate shipments so it may take a while before they all arrive
Poorly Made. I have had this cabinet for about six months. The doors when filled with CD's sag and cannot be realigned.  This problem must be common as one other reviewer had the same problem
DeLonghi espresso products lack quality... Delonghi has some serious quilty issues.  I started with a "lesser model,"  and as each one has broken, I have been upgraded (see my blog for more on that: http://intothecity.blogspot.com/2005/09/how-to-get-better-espresso-maker.html).  A few weeks ago, I received the DeLonghi EC701 Espresso Maker in the mail.  After 3 (yes only 3) uses, the lever that controls the steam knob broke off.  Just ripped right off.  I contacted the regular customer service and they were no help (even though this was a replacement for several other broken ones, they want me to take the time to bring it in to a service place and wait (again) to have it fixed.  I got in touch with the VP I had been dealing with (once I found his number), and he is much more responsive -- promised to send me a new "factory tested model" today.But, can all the problems I've had with all the DeLonghi espresso makers be just a coincidence?  I don't think so.  The quality just isn't there.  Buy from another manufacturer if you want one that will last.  As they keep breaking and I get tired of calling in and having them replaced again and again, I plan to eventually invest some money in a good quality unit from someone else.Run, don't walk ... and whatever you do, don't buy!
two came and went. We ordered this for a spare fridge and it would be a great size, but the first on came and it was damaged. It looked like it had been dropped. Then I called Target. They did great taking care of getting us another on. Only the second came today and it was also dropped from a truck. The back was dented and it was already rusting. so I think we will try some where else for this item.
If you want your coffee ground fine then keep looking. I bought this grinder after seeing it recommended on another site. Unfortunately, I quickly discovered that this grinder does not do a good job of fine grinding. Also, the lid is a little finicky going on and can't be used to hold the ground coffee. If you need your coffee ground fine, and don't want to shell out the bucks for a burr grinder, try the Braun KSM2
not what I expected. oversized is a big word for these towels and the quality of the cotton used is very low. I washed them once and they already shrank. What is worse is that they keep loosing pieces of cotton. After I dry with them, I have to spend 5 minutes getting rid of cotton bits stuck on my skin. Definitely a disappointing product even for its low pric
Don't Waste Your Money. This shaker is a piece of garbage.  For starters, the shipper sends it to you in the retail box with no padding.  If that doesn't ensure that the shaker will be bent when it gets to you, you'll wish that it was, because the shaker is worthless.  The 'stainless' steel is rusting after only 2 months, and the shaker top is infuriatingly impossible to remove, because it sits inside the 24 oz. resevoir.  I'm getting the high-rated Ultimo 24-ouncer and sending this one to the Chinese junk heap where it belongs.  Better yet, back to the seller for a refund on the 'lifetime warranty'
did not get. i ordered this item 5 months ago was told by amazon that i would get this item and it was avaliable and then after 5 months they tell me that they cant get it and it is still avaliable on there web site as far as im concerned amazon is not worth shopping if they cant hold there promises and say it is avaliable please take this very seriously when ordering from amazon thank
Same old. There's no real advantage over a vintage toaster oven.  Besides, it's noisy.  As always, it takes too long
Do NOT buy this item... If I had the option of zero stars, I would have put that.  It says to "clean often" and you'll know why.  It may filter the smoke as it goes in, but it leaves a disgusting smell on the lid. I used it one time, for one cigarette and put it back in the box. The lid smelled so bad it was permeating the room. Looks cool, promising theory with the smoke filtration, but an absolute waste of money
My trashcan broke after only a few months!!. We bought this trash can, which seems to have a very sturdy design and appears to be well made about 3 months ago.  We noticed after only a short while that the "step-on lid opener" would not open the can as far as it had before.  After a couple of days the plastic peice on the bottom broke. This can was used mainly by my husband and myself and was not put through any rough handling.  I have yet to find a replacement part and I did not save my receipt or any purchase information...because it is a TRASHCAN that is supposed to be the best that money can buy.  The metal does not stain or pit, it is very solid albeit the opening mechanisim.  If I find replacement parts, I will write another review with that information
&amp;amp;quot;LOOKS&amp;amp;quot; good. I recieved these for a shower gift on a Saturday, by Monday 1 had already broke, and I mean shatered in the sink, I didn't drop it or anything, but they are very nice looking, just don't expect them to last
entertaining but not durable. My Jack Russell loved the ball, in fact when I would take it out, even before I turned it on she would go crazy trying to get it away from me.  It took her very little time to figure out how to "catch" the ball, then once she figured this out she chewed off the tips of all the soft plastic knobs.  She had completely chewed off all of the knobs within a week.  It was great for keeping her entertained but not worth the price
Wilton Armetale does not ship with glass insert. My wife ordered the Rectangular Baker just after Christmas, and it arrived without the glass insert (I wish we would have read the two other reviews).  I re-read the product description and it states it does not ship with the glass insert.  Nonetheless, I called Wilton Armetale to find out their side of the story.  The customer service agent said that Wilton stopped shipping the baker with the glass insert around January of 2004.  The agent suggested I take up my grievance with Amazon.com
Fraud. It's junk.  Bought one .. opened 15 cans and it quit.  I agree with all the other 9 out of 13 reviews, it powered out and no matter which brand of battery you put in it, it won't start up again.  I was stupid enough to buy a second one thinking it might be my fault.  Got the same result.  At $20.00 apiece, the Better Business Bureau should shut this company down
Malfunctioning heater. I purchased this heater for my daughter on Febuary 5th. The heater was connected to a surge protector. A week ago my daughter woke up to the smell of something burning. The heater had burned out and the outlet in the surge protector was melted
Only for Small Books!!. After reading the one review on this site I ordered the bookmateand eagerly awaited it as I was using a Fellowes plastic bookstand for my softcover textbooks.  When it arrived I was sorely disappointed.  The back support for the book measures only about 7"x7" and the depth measurement for the book is 1".Any substantial softcover textbook whose frame is larger than 7"x7" is going to have its pages flop over backward because the stand isn't big enough.  In addition, because the depth is only 1", forget any book with say over 500 pages.  At least the Fellowes stand has a back support of 12" x 9", its deficiency is its page holding arms.  I can't see how anyone using a an average sized cookbook, as perhaps this amazon category is targeted, could use this bookmate usefully
very poor -- it doesn't close well. If this wasn't such an inexpensive item I would return it, but the hassle is too great
Shattered dreams... It is a very lovely two piece set. And Amazon shipped it to me twice, and both times it arrived in more or less a pile of shards. I gave up, but from what I could tell from the remains, this set is a very nice heavy earthen bakewear. I'm not sure, considering the shipping problems, whether the set could survive normal jostling in storage cabinets or a dishwasher
JUNK JUNK JUNK !!!. I didn't expect great things from this machine, considering the price.But I did expect at least the very minimum. I bought 2 because I knew I was hostessing 3 baby showers this year & thought it would be really nice to have 1 machine flowing milk chocolate & a 2nd flowing white, with a nice tiered arrangment filled with fresh strawberrys & assorted fruit. Maybe a tier of nice cookies...WOW I was so dissapointed the 1st time I used them, what a nightmare! They don't flow smoothly at all,one of them malfunctions badly & the 2nd is not much better! I even tried them at the 2nd baby shower thinking maybe I was being unfair or had done something wrong??? Nope exact same horror! Clean-up is not a good or easy thing either! I have packed them up & they are going back! For that 3rd shower I will dip my own strawberries & make a pretty arrangment, stress & clean-up on that will be much much less! I am so frustrated over the machines I hate that I even have to give them 1 star
Horrible product. It doesn't register correct temperature. Actually zero stars. It doesn't give the right temperature. It showed 250 when temperature of fat for fried chicken was 350 according to Taylor Instant Read Digital Thermometer. I just threw it in the garbage. This is a terrible product. Shame on Oxo for distributing it. Their products are usually excellent
Expensive Mistake!. The Venta-Airwasher may be good as a humidifier in countries like Germany where it is extremely cold in winter and the heating stays on 24 hours round the clock, thus there is a continuous need to replace the replenished humidity in the air. But here in San Francisco the weather is mild and we have plenty of humidity in the air due to fog and there is no need to keep heating on 24 hours. If one airs one's apartment on a regular basis, one would have sufficient humidity in doors. What we need here is a good solid air-purifier to clean the allergens, dust, etc from the air.The problem with the Airwasher is that it has no separate button to turn off the humidifier section when the room gets saturated with humidity. Secondly, there is no thermostat built in to check and turn off the machine when the humidity reaches the optimum level in the room. Because both humidifier and air cleaner are one, you can't separate the two. Thus if you keep on running the machine after saturation point, you'll get mold all over the walls and clothes. Even my clothes in my wardrobe were wet. I had to stop using the machine. For the past two weeks I could hardly find clothes to wear that were dry. Thirdly, what they don't tell you on their web site and publicity brochures is that this machine requires an expensive chemical substance added to the water chamber on a regular basis otherwise it won't clean the air. But even then, this machine is more of a humidifier than an air cleaner. After two weeks of use I noticed almost no residue in the water chamber, i.e. it did not clean the air at all. I felt the change that air was getting cleaner once I operated the new Sharper Image Hybrid GP Germicidal Air Purifier. I am glad that I bought two different machines to try. Now I know.By the way, the Venta-Airwasher has not been tested by the Association of Home Appliance Manufacturers (AHAM)or the US Environmental Protection Agency or the http://www.cadr.org/ for Clean Air Delivery Rate (CADR). When I called the company in Illinois and asked why, I was told that their technology is different than the competition that's why. Well, if you believe in that excuse go and buy this machine and see it for yourself. The machine is made of plastic and is very basic.
Fine coffeemaker, but terrible carafe!. I'm about to buy my third carafe in a year. This is a great coffeemaker, works well and looks nice on the counter but the carafes are so fragile it seems like it breaks if I give it a hard look! At least they are cheaper here than most other places
Not working out-of-box. The scale does not come with a battery, even though there is a distinct place for it in the internal packaging.  Scale had a 2002 manufacture date on it.  All of this I can live with, the bigger problem was that the scale would not zero itself.  When turned on, it would drift dramatically after a couple of seconds.  I timed it -40g for one minute (and after hours... just keep on going...).  The box had no signs of damage, so I'm guessing the load cell was bad.  Very disappointing.
Worthless on hardwood floors. The other reviews convinced me this product was what I was looking for - quick and easy cleanups in between major vacuuming. I unpacked it as soon as I got it and tried it out on the cracker crumbs on our hardwood floor left from lunch. What it would pick up was only the smallest of crumbs, and even some of those it just brushed around on the floor. I decided to return it immediately. Problem now is getting the handle unassembled to repack.
One star only because there's no option for zero stars. I bought one of these last year, and put it up in our yard just five feet from the fence dividing our yard from the neighbor's yard.  This device completely failed to stop the neighbor's barking dog.  I could detect no effect whatsoever.  Save your money, and try something else.  I wish I could tell you what works, but we're still looking
Very Disappointed. I was very, very disappointed with the performance of the Tribest blender. I bought it to blend breakfast smoothies....nothing fancy....just some protein powder and soy milk. I even bought the larger cup. The unit is very, very under powered. Did NOT mix the ingredients. Had to transfer everything to my larger, more "industrial" blender. Would not recommend this unit for any serious blending. Save your money or put it towards a better unit. This product is a rip off. Does not even do the most basic blending of a liquid and a powder
my cats do not use the fountain. It is also hard to fill it with water, without spilling.I will try to change location, see if it helps.So far, no luck
Royal Albert Rose Cameo Collectible Teacup, Green. This teacup has a beautiful design, but I was very disappointed when I received it.  The cup and saucer were much thicker than I would have expected for a china teacup!  It also had a problem with the scalloped design for the foot of the cup as this caused the cup to rock as it sat on the saucer.  I sent it back as I could not imagine trying to drink tea from this cup
Used Coffermaker. I purchased this coffeemaker for my boyfriend. When I opened the box you could tell that the item had already been removed. When I took the coffeemaker out, to my surprise, there were still grounds in the filter area. Needless to say I was disappointed that I received a "used" coffeemaker. I promptly returned the coffeemaker and purchased another at a local store
silent?  not quite... i wear earplugs at night and i could still hear this humidifier....  how is that silent
Expensive product with no quality. I've used this "broken" steamer which i'd brought from bed bath and beyond about 1 year ago. the water tank's cover came loose and the water will once in a while flow out of the water tank. how awesome! i'm getting some other brand now
Heater was well below expectations. I originally went to the store to buy another Vornado heater that received good reviews on Amazon, however the store only had the DVH in stock and it was on sale, so I went with the DVH, I was excited about bringing it home to heat the living room when I watched TV and my bedroom at night.  Well I tested the unit last night in my bedroom ( about 150-200sqft) and it was very disapointing.  I live in CA and the temp in my house is around 60 degrees between Dec-Feb, I wanted a heater to heat up my bedroom at night so I could sleep comfortably and I place it in  in the bathroom in the morning so I can get out of the shower and not freeze to death.  This unit's performance was horrible!  I set the DVH on High and set the temp to 72 degrees before I went to sleep, throughout the night  the room still felt cold, in the morning I looked at the DVH and it states that the room temp was around 63 degrees!  The heater hardly changed the temp of the room the whole night!  I then  adjusted the temp to 90 degrees and placed the unit in the bathroom, by the end of my shower the room temp was only registering 65 degrees!! I left it on for another hour to test and when I came back the room temp hardly changed, maybe only by a few degrees!!...the heat coming from the DVH was not that hot and the fan did not seem that strong.  Needless to say I am returning this heater today!  It seems that the quality control at Vornado is not consistent on this heater, some people rave about this heater, yet many others have similar negative experiences like mine.  I would recommend staying away from this heater and spend your hard earned money on something better!  Hope this review helps
The WOREST wok I ever had. I bought this wok 2 weeks ago, read and follow all the insturctions of it.  Within these 2 weeks I use it for about 5 times only and the non-sticking coating started to degrad!!  Even the part which still have the 'non-stick' coating, it stick!!!I can say it was the most WOREST 'non-sticking' wok I have ever seen.  DON'T EVEN THINK OF TRY!!!If you still want to try, simply throw your money to the sea!
NOT dishwasher safe. A drawback of Calphalon's anodized alumninum is that it cannot be cleaned in the dishwasher.  But stainless steel is dishwasher safe, and Amazon's product description claims that Calphalon's stainless steel line is dishwasher safe.  But if you check out www.calphalon.com and look at the description of their stainless line, it explicitly prohibits using dishwasher detergent.  So it is "dishwasher safe" but you can't use dishwasher detergent.
Never got it. I ordered this item and was told it would take several weeks for delivery, then I received an e-mail a few weeks later that it was going to take even longer....so I cancelled the order.   I'm sure it would have been a good machine, but I went with the larger 7-cup model and I'm happy I did.
not all of us are chimps...this is a lousy coffee maker. I have to agree with the review about overflowing and basket popping....while this coffee maker does make excellent coffee, if you put a grain too much of ground coffee in it, it will overflow....very frustrating as we like strong coffee. Because ours has overflowed so many times, the metal plate on the bottom has corroded and now it won't hold water....I'll never buy this frogware again
Stay Away!. I had researched this product for juicing ability and power.  I ended up buying this one and after using it *twice* the motor just shut off.  I returned this product and waited 3 months for the replacement.  I decided to try juicing carrots and celery, and after no more than 5 minutes the motor just shut itself off again.  I might be able to forgive this if it was the only problem with it.  If you are juicing small things, like berries, with larger vegetables/fruit the unit will get off balanced shake the top loose and damage the blade.  I know I read these bad reviews and said, &quot;oh that won't happen to me&quot;... but it did.  I hope you choose a different juicer
Amazon is sending the wrong item. I have tried to get the "All Purpose Spatula" twice and Amazon has sent me a spoon/spatula which is completely different and doesn't match this description.
Very disappointing. After reading the enthusiastic reviews by other customers, I decided to buy this one.  Too bad.Who picked out these colors...they are so dull!  The white is boring, the greenish-gray and black(supposed to be blue)is dreary like a rainy day.  They smell like industrial laundry detergent.  Even the plate is not useable since it looks like it has drips of old candle wax on it
Not a Good experience - No stars. I do not even rate this one star, but the website does not go any lower.We used this product only once before we had to throw it in the garbage can.  It was not very sturdy and bent after normal use.   Would not buy another one
Not very waterproof. I know this is supposed to be a waterproof thermometer, but my wife ran it under the faucet to clean it and the screen fogged up inside. I took out the battery and found water in the compartment.I give it as many as two stars because until the water got in, it did work as advertised. And seeing that other people have had no problem with the waterproofing, I'm wondering if I just had a bad o-ring.Now, I'm off to find a better thermometer
Disappointing. I looked forward to this combo slicer/press, but it is difficult to use, and if you put more than one clove of garlic in, you have to manipulate the "press" part to actually go into the space it is designed for.  Clean up was not easy.
Delivery ruined bookcase. What was to be the perfect bookcase for the space came in a box that was battered and torn.  It looked as if it had been dropped from a plane!  The entire bottom shelf was cracked in half and all the hardware bent out of shape.I would really like to own this bookcase, but I want it delivered in usable condition
Inexpensive Chinois. I returned this item. I was looking for a very fine strainer while this was actually a pierced metal strainer, making it too coarse for my needs. Otherwise the unit was of good quality. The holes are much finer than a typical collander, so it could meet someone else's needs better than mine
Rip-off. Beware of this ironing board.  It is nothing special, kind of rickety, and the shipping charges are almost as much as the board, which I missed becuase I was ordering a lot of things at once, and I was shocked when I got the bill, but I guess it's too bulky to return easily, so I just lose, but you are warned..
Don't use dark fountains. Petmate makes a great fountain, but their black model should be discontinued.  It is impossible to tell if the water is clean by looking at it.  When I went to wash this fountain, like I usually do every couple of weeks, there was a purplish color slim growing by the pump and the charcoal filter was covered with it.  I think the pump motor might have been leaking (I'm not really sure). If I had their white fountain I would have noticed there was a problem with the water right away
Not a good one. I bought this board along with another brand.  This one falls off the sink and is constantly dumping my cuttings in the sink.  It also warped within one month of my purchasing it.  The wood has also splintered.  Not my idea of a good cutting board.  I would not recommend it to my friends, nor would I purchase it as a gift
don't do it!!!!!. it's a little confusing to use and it's very easy to stop the wrong timer running because it doesn't automatically switch to the time going off.  But the worst is it's whisper quiet.  I bought this item for a professional bakery and the noise level is high.  If your running your home mixer and the timer goes off unless your right by it you won't here a thing.
Waste of Time. We bought one of these for Christmas and it went back within 2 days.  After trying twice, it took me over an hour to "clean" my kitchen floors.  Some spots I had to go over 7 or 8 times - and even then it didn't clean all of it up.  Plus you have to go sooooo sloooowwwww.  And it is loud.  This machine loses suction at the slightest quick movement and you have to turn it off and back on again.  Also, the water it does pick up is dirty so you have to handle it with your hands to dump it out.  I have a 2 year old and infant - I don't have time for this ridiculous contraption.  Try a steam mop instead, like the Reliable Steamboy.  They're cheaper, faster (I can have my kitchen done in less than 5 minutes) and leave your floors "white-sock" clean and sanitized - without cleaners or chemicals
Not entirely stainless steel interior. I was seeking an electric kettle specifically without any plastic in contact with the heated water (due to dioxins released from heated plastics) and all the kettles at my local store were entirely plastic (drinking heated plastic steeped water everyday is insane!  I can't believe these kinds of products are even sold.)  So I came to amazon, found this (supposedly) stainless steel one which seemed generally liked and not too cheap, and lo and behold inside is a plastic bolt, leading to the outside water level gauge!  What a brilliant piece of engineering!  Ruin the entire design by tacking on a useless feature (I already know a good way of finding out the water level: LOOK INSIDE.  Do I need to keep track of the water level as its boiling?  Thank you thats very informative that the water level did not change the entire time the water was boiling.  Here I'm pouring some out now, I am very curious to know whether the water level changed!  (nameless epitath)).  Now I am spending tomorrow at work lunch break TAKING THIS USELESS THING BACK and mailing it away, rather than drinking delicious invigorating tea.  Thanks Chef's Choice International
Decent job, but lacks in quality. I'm a student in college, and when my first hamper ripped, I decided that it was time to buy a sturdier hamper. My roommate rarely does his laundry, so he has huge loads, but his hamper manages to carry it all. I saw the Whitney Design hamper online, which looked nearly identical to my roommate's hamper, so I bought it.When the hamper arrived, I put my clothes in it, and prepared to do laundry. The shoulder strap ripped right off. I didn't even fill up the hamper all the way, as is shown in the picture. Amazon sent me a replacement, but now I am afraid of using the shoulder strap again, and I have to awkwardly grasp the sides around the metal wires. This hamper may be able to function, but not well. And for a college student, this is definitely not sturdy enough
Never again  will we buy Hoover. We purchased a Hoover bagless canister last year. The electrical connection between the hose and wand broke due to a very poor design. Never again will we buy Hoover.
On a scale of 1-5, I give it a -20. This is the worst popcorn popper I have ever owned!  It is slow and doesn't pop well.  I thought it may have been the popcorn seeds so I bought some new ones and tried again.  Same thing!  What a disappointment! 20 minutes of popping to get less than 15 half popped and/or burnt pieces.  In the same timeframe I was able to take out my old $10.00 popper (Walmart special)and pop 3 large bowls, melt the butter and disperse to the 15 teengers waiting in movieroom.  What a waste of money
No sirve. Se rompio la primera vez que lo use. No gasten su dinero en esto
Doesn't fit. I bought this lid to use with my 8-inch saute pan (part of the 9-piece Calphalon commercial hard-anodized cookware set), but its slightly too big.  I would like to point out that if you go to the Calphalon web site, this is the lid listed as fitting the 8-inch saute pan.The lid is usable, but doesn't seat well to get any sort of seal on the pan.  It's unfortunate, as its an attractive, well made lid, but for my purposes its useless so I am sending it back.I also have the 10-inch stainless steel lid, which fits the 10-inch saute pan perfectly.  I'm not sure why Calphalon didn't take more care designing this one
My dog hears the noise. My dog hears the nosie, very disappointing in this item
Unhappy. When I recieved the shelf it did not have the poles in the box to attach the top shelf. I emailed the company and did not recieve any response back from them. I had to use just the bottom shelf. I WILL NOT order anything else from these people,because they will not stand behind their products
You will never get this one. I ordered this product 3 months back - as they say "Got into the line". This item was part of an larger order so i could have gotten free shipping. Now I get an email from Amazon stating this item has been cancelled as it was further delayed and as I did not respond to thier email for extending the wait time. I never got an email and now as the remaining items have been delivered - if I need one then I will end up paying shipping too. Amazon is normally good about these things - how can they still have it listed on the site when they are cancelling orders in the pipeline
pointless. For the 1500W of power that it draws this provides about the amount of warmth that a vaccum cleaner provides by friction on a carpet. Quite pointless
nice look on the picture but not the product. The glass bottles are full of voids, scratches, non smooth glass surfaces. I have returned mine for an exchange, but the replacement is the same
Misrepresented. The ad for this bed stated that it came with a hand held control to make it easier to inflate and deflate the bed.  Instead, it came with a motor that screwed into the bed which had to be plugged in, and unplugged, back and forth, to inflate, and you had to unscrew something on the motor to get it to deflate.If Amazon does not discipline this seller, they are only hurting themselves
Nordic Ware Double Swedish Rosette Timbale Set. I was not pleased to have received a DIFFERENT PRODUCT than was featured/selected/ordered !The company did NOT respond to my request for a return with refund based upon an item that differed from the described/pictured/ordered item!  The item received was a SINGLE handled item!Do NOT order unless you are aware of the fact that the seller may deliver a replacement item
Too small. This is a Lemon/Lime Press. The Oranges in China must be real small, so if your planning on pressing Oranges make sure they are small and forget about Grapefruit
3rd Pur Pitcher....3rd Leaking Pitcher. Great Water!  That is why it got a 2...otherwise it would have receive a 0.I DO love the look of that pitcher...but every one I have seen leaks after just a month or two...it leaks from the bottom seal and that is what makes it worthless.  I thought that I could just replace it and get a new one and it would be ok...it did the same thing....3 times in a row...good thing I only paid for it once.  I have a friend that replaced hers after the same issue and her second one did the same thing.  I gave up on this and looking for another picture.ATTN PUR Company!!!! Fix the leaking issue and I will come running back to buy a new one
There are better humidifiers for the price. I bought this because many claimed how quite it was, especially on low setting. Well the fan is quite on the low setting because it barely moves. On the higher settings the entire thing vibrates making a sound you can hear on the floor below, even when it is placed on a carpeted floor. I am very disappointed with this humidifier, so much so that I might just throw it away and get a different one. I plan on never buying Vornado again.
NOT A GOOD DEAL...TOO EXPENSIVE!!. First of all, it's expensive ($60).  Kitchen Kaboodle sells the SAME EXACT one for $29.99.  I tried to return it to the company and found out they're located in Canada so it was going to cost me another $25.00 for shipping.  Due to shipping, I was forced to keep it.  HUGE RIP OFF!!  It is good quality but go to Kitchen Kaboodle for half the cost!
Recieved wrong set. I was sent another set, not this set which I ordered so I had to return it and cannot give a review
Great buy if you like throwing your money away. I have purchased 2 of these from Amazon, neither worked. I tried buying them from Bed Bath & Beyond, neither worked. This is a horrible company. There fryers are delivered non-working, there sweepers are bad and get recalled if they didnt catch fire. Very poor product development. Better off buying T-Fal
Beautiful Blanket with Unfortunate Controller Problem. We purchased the blanket because we felt it was superior in quality. Since it costs at least double what common blankets cost, it seemed likely that the company had done it right. Unfortunately, the first blanket controller started giving an E3 error within two weeks. We followed the instructions to try to reset it and that didn't work. We exchanged the blanket hoping the replacement would function properly.After three weeks a new controller began displaying the E3 error.When we plugged the other side's controller in, it worked. We tried tocontact the manufacturer to request a new controller and to see it theyhad addressed the issue with a new design but it was impossible to reach them. Bottom line is we returned the second blanket and gave up.Seems like the blanket is high quality and the electronics in the controller are not
Doesn't Work. I just got this... took it out of the box... plugged it in ... and... it does not work
Don't bother. It seemed like a good idea, a ball to fetch/chew and ropes to chew and tug. After less then 10 minutes with this toy our 14 lb, 4 month old puppy had already tore off a piece of the rope that we had to fish out of his mouth to avoid him from swallowing it.The ends of the 'ropes' are sealed as if in a glue that comes off as the puppy chews.  The rope then came apart in chunks. Not for a teething puppy
Too big. These glases are too big for practical use. Instead we recommend the Chardonnay/Voigner model.
Dissapointing. I purchased this little sweeper to sweep up bird seed and crumbs on the floor from the kids.  For the bird seed it's ok as long as you make a couple passes.  For food and feathers it seems to pick up about half.  Also, I've only had this sweeper 6 months and the battery slowly died and I always fully discharged and then charged the battery. I would suggest getting anopther sweeper that has suction and not just a revolving brush
A little too stiff for my liking. I like the concept of this easy-to-keep-clean kitchen gadget, but I found it to be too stiff for my liking. Perhaps if the tip was a bit longer it would be more flexible, but for now I'm sticking with my traditional spatulas
Disappointing. We have been searching for a solution to our very uncomfortable seats in our Ford Windstar van. This cushion did not help
Misleading Description. Description implies that the entire toy is filled when in reality only the cat's head contains catnip.  The tail is an extremely thin strip.  I was very disappointed seeing as how I ordered three toys.  I had to ship them back and lose $6 for the shipping they charged to send it to me.
Buy from someone else. I checked the ProFlowers site and it said I still had 3 days to order the flowers to ensure they got there before Christmas.  It's now the day after Christmas and they still haven't gotten them
2 months old - heating element has failed. I've owned any number of VillaWare products in the past and have always been happy with their quality and longevity.  This product has not lived up to that reputation - the heating element has failed on this unit after only about 6 uses in 2 months.
It's a cheap piece of foreign garbage. Here's a list of what's wrong with this item:&#60;br /&#62;1. You'll stain your wrist trying to screw in the hex and other screws.&#60;br /&#62;2. The wood is cheap and can split when screwing in screws.&#60;br /&#62;3. The wood panel for the drawer was warped and didn't fit.&#60;br /&#62;4. It's from J.P. Products - who doesn't provide customer service during listed business hours, nor do they have a web site.&#60;br /&#62;Overall: avoid this product. It's a shame Target is willing to offer such an inferior item.&#60;br /&#62;
Pesto - burned up !. Made pesto last evening with parsley, walnuts, two cloves of garlic, and extra virgin olive oil.  Added ingredients, a small amount at a time.The machine started to smell like it was burning up and eventually quit running.
Defective Vacuum Cleaner. This vacuum cleaner had to be sent back to the manufacturer. The setting that determines which type of floor is to be vacuumed simply did not function. As I vacuumed, the vibration of the machine caused the knob to drift to other settings. It was impossible to properly vacuum a bare floor since the knob drifted to the carpet settings. Hopefully this is a problem with this particular item and not a design flaw. The manufacturer plans to test the machine and determine if I am entitled to another vacuum cleaner.
Not up to "Le Creuset" standard... I am a major fan of "Le Creuset" pots and have a number of them but I must say that their kettle is not up to par.Like the other lady said, it does spit out water (substantially at that) when it boils on the stove.  I am finally throwing mine out to the garbage since I have had it for a while and the coating at the inside bottom of the kettle is coming apart and I have been boiling "contaminated" water since a while...I just noticed one day that there was this stuff floating on top of the water....I wonder what kind of chemicals I have been putting in my body???
Old product. Package looked 10 years old. Product appeared undamaged. Used for a couple days and the filter status indicator reads bad filters. As it did from the start. No reply from Holms on any compensation for new filters. A few weeks later the humidity display went bad.
Don't waste your money. This item seemed like the answer to my prayers.  Holds 18 pr of shoes in one foot of floor space?  Well, I only had it for a few months when one of the tiers snapped off, then another, and now, they are all broken in one area or another & the 3 tiers are hanging at crazy angles.  And trust me, I did not misuse this shoe tree in any way.  It was used for only about 6 pair of regular shoes and sandals at any one time.  There's no way it could have held 18 & even lasted as long as it did.  So, looks can be deceiving.  This product may appear good online, but it does not do what it is supposed to do & is just not worth it.
Doesn't do its job, and makes a big mess. I had high hopes for this little gadget, being a fan of grilled sandwiches. Unfortunately, one experience was all it took to convince me that this grill isn't the way to go.I tried to make two grilled ham and cheese sandwiches. Within about 30 seconds of the grilling, it was pouring cheese out all sides of the grill (and no, before you wonder I didn't use a lot of cheese). I didn't even let it finish the cooking cycle because the cheese was getting underneath the grill and I didn't want it near the cord.When I opened the unit I got two sandwiches that needed to be separated from one another (and cut into halves) using a steak knife, and even that was a pain. The sandwiches themselves, which started as standard store-bought bread, were now mashed into what looked more like pita bread (hollow, thin, and a little tough). The edges were burned black; just generally not a good sandwich.As opposed to cleaning the liquid cheese off, this device just went in the trash. I can't recommend this even over just a standard non-stick griddle
Good for making a mushy mess. I have a mini-cuisinart and a full sized one, but since I received this herb processor as a gift, I thought I'd give it a shot. Well, after a day of trying to chop herbs and mince garlic with it, I'd rather spend the extra time setting up and cleaning the mini-cuisinart. I found that most of the time, this herb processor just mashes everything up, or crushes it, no matter what blade I use. Juices from the herbs or garlic just leak out, weakening their overall flavor and limiting their usefulness. If I need to quickly chop some herbs, I'd rather just do it by hand or by cuisinart
do not buy. do not buy this.  the steamer stops working in a month and it cannot be fixed.  cleaning doesn't help at all, even after carefully following the instructions.  very cheap, no good
cheese squasher. Nothing like a wire cutter. You're better off with a knife than this thing.
Foiled Again. This was my last attempt at buying a battery operated frother. My hope was that it would recharge after every use and being environmentally consciencious would put my mind at ease. Well, the recharging base is not "smart" so you have to drain out the # of uses before putting it back on the base. The battery has memory so if by accident you put it back on the base, the life span of the battery is shortened.  The most important message is this: Even a fully charged battery was not powerful enough to make an enjoyable drink--The kind of drink you can't wait to get home to make. I'm reverting back to the manual style of frothing
SAVE YOUR MONEY. SAVE YOUR MONEY. HAVE TRIED DUAL CEREAL DISPENSER FROM JC PENNY'S. AGAIN SAVE YOUR MONEY. CRUSH,JAM,FLEMSY,MESSY, ETC. . NOT KID FRIENDLY !!NOT WORTH THE MONEY. USE TUPPERWARE UNTIL SOMEONE MAKES THIS PRODUCT PROPERLY..
Disappointed. After reading all the reviews, I was eager to own one of these.It didn't work at all with synthetic corks. And even failed with some real corks! 8 bottels of wine. It has failed on 6 synthetic and 1 real cork.I guess you just can't beat the "Waiter's " cork screw
This is not an oyster knife. It is preposterous that they would even call this thing an oyster knife.  This piece of garbage was literally destroyed after opening one raw oyster.  I could see that was going to happen before I even tried it.  It's just a flimsy thin piece of sheet metal.  Anyone who has shucked raw oysters knows how much torque it takes and how rigid the blade needs to be.  Apparently these guys don't know anything about that.  Shame on &quot;OXO/Good Grips&quot; for calling this thing an oyster knife
Not Worth the Money. I bought this thinking that it would work better than scooping kitty litter into a small trash bag and tying it off and then placing it in the trash.  I was WRONG.  This does not hold much waste and takes up un-necessary space.  If you want to buy something for your soiled kitty litter get a diaper genie and throw your trash bags of waste in that.  I have three cats and have to empty this Litter keeper at least every other day.  I wish I never bought it
Sad...I returned it immediately. This grinder is really nice looking and the price was right, so I was looking forward to incorporating it into my life.  But it kept turning itself off until my husband figured out that you could stand over it, pushing the cover down to keep it going.  It wasn't because we had not put the top on properly--it needed the extra pressure.  I don't know if it was a defect in our unit or in the design but I suspect the design.And the grind settings were way off.  We had to use the finest setting all the time and even then, the grind was a mix of crumbs and flakes.  Sad! You might as well have a $19 blade grinder.After dropping it off at the post office we went to Starbucks and bought their burr grinder for $88.  Much as I dislike supporting any chain store, we are relieved to have a grinder that simply works
Deception. We were very disappointed, upon opening the package, to see how small the glasses are.  I was concerned about this when I purchased them, but could find no info on size (and the seller is very careful to not show them near anything else that might give you a hint as to how small they are (2 inches in diameter at the largest point and only 4 1/4 inches tall; I can hide the entire glass in my closed fist)
Break too easily. Hi,Really like drinking wine from these glasses.  Ended up with 8 each in two sizes.  Broke my 4th glass the other day while cleaning it.  NEVER broke any other end-high stemware doing that.  Believe me, I've been very careful too.Also had one break in a very modern dishwasher operating on a crystal cycle.Just too thin and fragile despite the resonable price and good functionalit
Does what it claims, but takes forever. This product does what it claims.  I recieved it a few days ago and it has performed well.  The downside of the product is the size.  It does a good job if you have an hour or more (depending on the size of your pet) to spend using it.  They tout it's price in comparison to other models costing around forty dollars or more.  I wish I had invested in the bigger, more expensive FURminator.  I rate this product with two stars, only because it's a hassle and time consuming to use on a larger animal.  It would probably be worth it if you own a small dog or cat
Poor customer service. I purchased this machine in November 2005. When working it is a wonderful but it started to leak within 6 weeks. I sent it back for repair or replacement, 3 weeks later I received a badly damaged box, not the shipping box but the Bodum box. The replacement had a manufactures date of 03/04, 2 years old. It had obviously been used, coffee and water stains were present several scratches, and parts were missing. I called customer service and the supervisor promised they would ship a new one immediately and I would receive it no later than 2/23/2006. Three days after I was promised I would receive the new machine it has yet to arrive.  I called customer service today and was informed they have no record of shipping a new unit and could I call back next week. The very used replacement machine was shipped back last week.I regret making this purchase
Bad controls. The blanket worked, for 3 weeks. Now the controller just keeps blinking E. It wont reset, it wont warm. I cannot return it to amazon, It's been longer than 30 days, as I purchased it ahead of time as a christmas gift. I wont do that again
Pasta maker. The first time using the product it got jammed and I have not been able to open the machine up due to its malfunction.I need to exchange it for a new pasta maker, however, I do not have any of information to do it.  It was thrown out by mistake.Could you please send me information on how to exchange the machine for a new one and then I could be better at rating the product
the toaster that doesn't toast. looks nice but DOES NOT TOAST! for baking function, takes a while to heat up adequately- thus totally defeating the point (in my eyes) of a toaster oven.
Not enough heat. I received this as a gift from my wish list.  The oven does not get hot enough to brown food, same for the broiler.  I'm sorry I own it, it takes up way too much room on my counter.
Doesn't work for me. If you own a large dog who likes to roam (like a great pyranees or similar), this will not work and will be a waste of money. I spend hours trying to train with this system. My dog just yelps all the way through the shock and off she goes.  Waste of money and made for a frightened dog who only associates home now with being shocked so she stays up against the house or insists on coming inside when the collar is on, then the boredom gets to her late and night and I hear her yelping as she runs off into the night...so much for a good watchdog which is at least what we had before this system. She doesn't get it and if she does, she has more determination for getting out than the consequences the system delivers.
BEWARE -- NO RETURN ON THIS ITEM !!. I ordered this item as a gift and later learned that they had already received a like product. When I tried to return this unused item I was unable to get any response despite the fact that I followed all of the instructions for returns. This item is drop-shipped by wholesalersclub.com. After four phone calls and three emails, I have gotten no repsonse. No only am I upset with wholesalers.com, but with Amazon for subscribing to this kind of lousy service
No support. The supports for the seat cushion are flimsy wood with rubber joints.  I have had to reinforce every one of them with bloody duct tape before I dared let company sit on.  Two adults will break right through it!
Not worth the money. I am sure there is a lesson in my experience.  I fist purchased the salt and pepper grinding mill balls and found the  salt/pepper did not go where I wanted it.  I also found that in order to get a reasonable amount out of the grinder I had to select the maximum coarse setting and over a period of six months the efficiency became so bad I finally threw them away.  Based on a salesmans advise I purchased the dual grinder thinking my problems might be isolated to the shape of the feed tube.  I am sad to say that I again found it's performance to be a big disappointment
Been doing this for a long time... with an old coffee can.  True it doesn't have the "odor free" aspect, but if you are scooping a litter box there is going to be odor.  I just keep the can by the box and dump it in the trash when full.  Same deal.
Overrated. I bought the vacuum because of the good reviews on several sites.  I, however, found the vacuum to be very lacking in performance.  It didn't pick up well at all.  It is EXTREMELY heavy and therefore hard to push around.  I was completely unsatisfied and am shipping it back.  Amazon, on the other hand, was amazing.  They had the UPS come to my house to pick it up and didn't charge me shipping for the return
world's best cat litter. Is not the worlds best cat litter. Does not last the length of time they claim it too.  It does control urine odor but stinks like wet corn meal.  They claim it could be eaten, although they don't recommend it, my cat was eating it and vomiting it up.  I wonder if they use corn that was contaimanted with a fungus that they could not use for human or animal food. The plus side was its light weight, "good for a person with a bad back", easy to scoop " no digging to get that clumping litter removed", and does seem to be dust free.  May be agreeable for some one with only one or two cats.  I would not recommended for the multi cat house hold
Don't make the same mistake I made!!. This unit is heavy and awkward.Three months after I purchased it, the on-off switch stopped working.  Sanyo's nearest service location is more than one hour from where I live.  I called their customer service center and they refused to show any flexibility regarding service (ie, they would not pay for me to ship it to a repair center, nor would they authorize repairs at a nearby appliance repair center).  The customer service representative was unsympathetic and refused to offer to allow me to speak with her supervisor.Avoid purchase of Sanyo vacuum cleaners to avoid similar problems
DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY!!!!. TOTAL PIECE OF JUNK.  EXPENSIVE JUNK AT THAT.  ATTACHMENTS HARD TO USE.  CAP SEIZED WOULDN'T OPEN FOR REFILL. NO REPLY FROM ONLINETECH.IT LOOKS STURDY AND WELL MADE BUT IT'S USELESS. I WISH I HAD READ THE REVIEWS IN THIS FORUM BEFORE I WASTED MY MONEY.
Two-Time Loser. This thing looks and performs wonderfully out of the box.  The filters capture that disgusting vacuum smell, and its fun to watch all that dust and pet hair swirl around in the translucent box.Then it quit working.  I figured that was the retailer's problem, not mine, so I returned it.Second model did the same thing and broke after about two hours of use.  I had to bang on it and manually spin the rotating filter to get gobs of dirt dislodged (a "gob" is approximatley one pint.  I removed "gobs").So this model has failed twice.  Not what I want from an appliance that costs close to $300 and should last 10 years.Also, the attachments don't stay put and the little plastic keeper for the hose is in just the right spot to snap off on your thigh.  And the handle broke on my first one.Come to think of it, this damn thing is pretty junky
This sateen is a finish that washes out. I purchased three sets of Wamasutta 300-Thread-Count Egyptian Sateen Sheets and thought I had made an investment that would last for years. The sheets looked lovely, the colors bright with a soft sheen, the texture smooth with satin like feel. I consider myself a "laundry care queen" always carefully following the manufacturers care instructions: within two washes the "Sateen" look and feel of the sheets was completely gone (washed out).The sheets are very dull and very much wrinkled. They're still soft and serviceable but now I also doubt the thread count.  My supposedly lesser quality sheets are more comfortable and attractive.
alp. The top doesn't seal so shaking and storing the dressing can only be done with tinkering. Also, the bottle being so narrow it's hard to clean.
chirp chirp chirp. This is not and I repeat is not a good alarm. There is one alarm light and you can hardly tell which one is sounding. It looks as if the specs are lying to me and I hate lies. Also the battery died after 6-8 months. The low battery alert is loud and chirps so anoyingly. I also noticed that the alarm sounds a loud shrieking alarm when it sounds. I will return this alarm. Never again will I trust in First Alert
Don't buy Shark!. I bought a different model of Shark vacuum cleaner about three months ago at a Target  store near my home.  It's a different model than the ones sold on Amazon, but after reading the reviews here from customers who have purchased different models the results are the same:  Shark vacuum cleaners die out after a  few months, and even when they work for a few short months they are so high maintenance it's not worth it.  Stick with Eureka, Hoover or another trusted brand.  The only thing going for Shark vacs is that they look good.....
Don't bother. I thought this breadbox was beautiful in the picture and unique because of the two compartments.  The construction, however, is horrible.  The wood was split at the screw locations on the lid.  I returned the box and received another one.  The wood was split at the screw sites on the bottow of the second box.  It is very poorly put together and the material is cheap.  This certainly is not worth the price
False advertising. The product description says the fridge can cool 40 degrees below ambient room temperature. The packaging on the product, which I received today, says 20 degrees below room temperature. I am very frustrated, and of course there is no information in the package that lets me know how to return the product, etc.
TINY Bookstand. After reading several reviews, I only read one that was negative. I concurred that perhaps one person just had different needs.  Well, as soon as I opened the package I realized just how right the negative review was.  This book stand would hold up a children's soft cover back.  Any of my school books are not stably supported.    I would actually have to hold up the sides of the book to read the pages.  Unless you have thinner hard back textbooks (the hard back will support the pages), this is not worth buying (especially not for $20.00).  Make sure you realize just how small this bookstand is. If that is with you need, then this is the one for you.
Waste of $. This heater blew a fuse twice in my office, causing my coworkers' computers to shut down and lose unsaved information.  The darn thing comes on for 2 seconds every 5 minutes so I'm constantly cold.  I would recommend one where you can change the fan setting to go at all times on low without the thermostat stepping in and ruining a good warmth.  Also, doesn't turn off unless you unplug it so I have to crawl under my desk everytime I leave the office.  No fun.  Want to return but it's too much of a hassle
The Margarator On the Rocks Processing Machine. The Margarator will process your ingredients to small pebbles of ice and a liquid and then all liquid.  All you will need is ice for a margarita on the rocks.  I am taking the machine back and hoping for better results from a quality blender
disappointed. Item received not the same as pictured - cost more to send it back and reorder - disappointed.
stay away from this humidifier. This product seemed to have been designed by someone who had never used a humidifier before. The water tank is nearly impossible to fill; there's nothing to hold on to once the tank is upside down, and the opposite end is sloped so you can't rest it against the bottom of your bathtub while it fills. Once it's full, a juggling act is required in order to screw on the tank lid, since you can't set the tank down anywhere. After trying twice and only succeeding in spilling water all over myself and the bathroom, I left this task for my husband to take care of, as he has very large hands and was able to fill the tank more easily, although he too complained that the tank was so poorly designed.The tank capacity is too small; to keep my bedroom at a good humidity level, we have to refill the tank twice a day. Still, the thing did what it was meant to do--humidified the room--until after three weeks the full tank leaked all over the wood floor and area rug. We thought the top must not have been screwed on correctly, but it happened again, warping the wood floor. Leaving the full tank in the bathtub, it didn't leak at all, which made us think that something had gone wrong with the base.I didn't waste my time trying to get this thing fixed. I returned it
No effect for us... Alas, this had no discernable effect on my cats.  However, the product arrived in good time and in good shape
Really bad. This is the first review I've written for anything.  I am inspired to write about the Krupps Burr grinder because it is the most frustrating piece of equipment I have ever owned.  You have to whack it on the counter three or four times per grind to get it to complete the job.  We got it as a wedding gift and have since gone back to our blade grinder that saves time and aggravation
Doesn't keep a charge, and maintain a fast enough speed. It's not god awful, but the cheaper plug in one I have is easier to use, not as heavy and bulky, and gets the job done with out running out of steam
Dissatisfied. After waiting for a month for this to come, I opened the box and found it to be broken.  Most pot racks are riveted together to make them stronger, but the cross pieces on this one are just welded in with a very small weld, which was broken in shipping.  Fortunately, it was broken when I received it, rather than hanging it and having all of my pots and pans come crashing down and break my tile counter.  This is obviously a cheap pot rack and I wouldn't recommend it to anyone
I'm sure they are nice... Unfortunately, I ordered these twice and received rectangular bakers instead.  This was *not* Amazon's fault, but Emile Henry's for mislabling the box as oval bakers when they were not.  In fairness to Amazon, they tried to make it right but had a difficult time doing so since the contents of the box were mislabled.Althought I would have preferred the oval bakers, I kept the rectangular ones and do like them
GOOD BAD IDEAS. I agree. A GOOD idea poorly thought out. YOu would have to mount it on a pole or hang it from the celing to get the desired effect. Rex is laser CRAZY and he is not into this toy.I hope they are working on a new design, maybe the mirror should rotate ?PS. We played with it some more and found if I set it on top of the very high chest it works ok and Rex will be interested SO am bumping it up a star
Bread toasts well but, bagels and muffins are bad. Based on all the glowing reviews here of this toaster, I went and purchased one.  It does toast bread just fine. But it is absolutely lousy on bagels and english muffins. One half of the same side too dark and the other half of the same side not toasted at all. Figured that I had a bad one. Exchanged it for another and it does the same thing. I am very puzzled HOW it can do so poorly on round items, but it does. Tried inside in, inside out. Always the half closest to back of toaster burns before the half closest to the front gets any gold at all
Grill top very bad quality. Being Swiss, I know how what normal wear and tear is on a racelette oven. The oven itself is great, and the little pans are made of good non stick material. The top grill however is of very very poor quality. The coating was starting to chip, in addition to bubbles forming on the surface just after a couple of uses. I do NOT recommend this grill if you want to be grilling on top.
Not a real tagine: it only looks like one. A real tagine in Morocco has a hole at the top for the steam to escape.  This has NO Hole and therefore cooks like a dutch oven.  The chicken will literally boil to death and drown.  The product is made in Thailand, says so on the box, and is so hot after a half an hour that you can not touch any part of it, unlike it's claim.  This product to me, having been served a chicken tagine for over a month in Morocco, is culinary fraud.  And the price is highway robbery. I do not recommend buying this product at all
Slow Leak. I liked the product until it showed a small split in the bottom and developed a slow leak after only a few uses.  Perhaps the plastic doesn't tolerate boiling water as well as it should
did not get. i ordered this item 5 months ago was told by amazon that i would get this item and it was avaliable and then after 5 months they tell me that they cant get it and it is still avaliable on there web site as far as im concerned amazon is not worth shopping if they cant hold there promises and say it is avaliable please take this very seriously when ordering from amazon thank
Nice looking, doesn't hold up. A very attractive kettle but the plastic holder on the lid broke off in a matter of a few months.  This is not a particularly sturdy kettle.  Not recommended
Broke after about six months. I purchased this grinder and was very pleased with its performance.  I really like its compact size, the ability to choose grind and to just press the button so I could fill my coffee maker with water while it ground.  I also like that the cord winds into itself and it stores easily.  However, after about six months of daily use, the plastic which holds the metal cup and blades to the body broke, rendering the grinder useless.  I was very disappointed.  I don't know if it's a design flaw or just a fluke with mine, but I probably won't purchase it again
BROKE IN 3 MONTHS. I should have followed the advice of most of the reviewers here before I purchased this humidifer.  There was a large mineral buildup but that was the least of it.  Worked fairly good for three months but then it stopped working.  One of the controls literally "froze" in place and the machine was unusable.  No way to fix it - had to throw it away.  What a shame.  Next time I will pay closer attention to what people write.  My advice - by something other than a Honeywell.  I have three packages of filters that I purchased separately - another waste of money
Barely Acceptable. This toaster oven is nicely styled on its exterior, but its pleasures end there.The box loudly trumpets "Stainless Steel" in its ad copy, and it's true that some is used on the appliance.  It's on the top of the outer shell- just where it will catch the most kitchen grease and dirt and be hardest to keep clean, with painted metal and plastic everywhere else. Inside, stainless is not used at ALL- the rack is cheap chrome-plate, and the crumb tray and baking pan are that weird silicone-finish "non-stick" over steel.  This material cannot be scrubbed, because to do so will breach the silicone coating, allowing the steel underneath to rust.  I did this accidentally with a plastic-mesh Teflon scrubber- the coating is obviously very fragile.The feel of the controls is shaky and vague; the knobs wobble a bit, and their detents are not very positive, so you don't get a satisfying "click" feel that tells you that you've reached a given setting. The timer must be used for all functions; though it has a "stay on" setting, there is no way to avoid its use as there is on other toaster ovens.  My guess is that this timer is going to wear out faster than the ones on other units I've had.Toasting performance is not great; each slice is unevenly browned, and there is a lot of variation between slices in front and rear. Baking performance is okay, but unlike my former Munsey toaster oven, this bulky toaster oven will not take a 9" round Pyrex pie plate- it touches the glass door. I'm concerned that the hot pie plate might create a hot spot that could crack the glass door, so I don't use this unit for some of the minor baking jobs my former unit excelled at.This unit might be okay for someone who has never had a large toaster oven before, but of all that I've owned or used, this one has been the biggest disappointment.  I'm especially taken aback at the squandering of stainless steel as a decorative element outside, when it- or something else that is both rustproof and easy to clean- is so sorely needed inside to contribute to the longevity of the appliance
A no good canopener. The on & off switch positivly did not work.After about a week,I got so disgusted with it Ithrew it in the garbage can.Thats what i thinkabout this product.
Not loud enough. I'm not sure the timer I receib=ved works properly. The timing mechanism dseems accurate, however, the sound it makes when the time is up is more like a "ticking". If you are nor right near it, you'll never hear it
DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY. Brought this home from Target today and it's going back tomorrow. The quality is unbelievably poor. You actually can't assemble it. When you screw in the dowels, the screws strip the holes in the dowels so that it's impossible to get them stable.
What are the colors made of?. As this is a consumable food product, I'd like to know what each color is made of.  ???????????
broke in 6 months. this fridge was great for my son and then it stopped working in 6 months what a dissapoitment!
Teflon Bonding Failure. Within a few weeks of purchase the teflon in the Zojirushi pan started to blister and flake off. This is NOT the result of customer abuse but a manufacturing defect.This is my third (and final) bread machine. The first two were Breadman Ultimates. I should note that I make bread in the machine about 6 times a week on average, pretty much every morning.The first Breadman worked for over a year until the teflon in the pan started to fail. This was probably my fault for allowing the pan to soak for extended periods of time (water can get behind the teflon and ruin the bond).I bought an new Breadman Ultimate because the entire machine was only slightly more than the pan alone and the old machine was starting to have mechanical problems. This time I took extremely good care of the pan (letting it cool down, no soaking) because it's clearly the weak link in the system. Within 8 months the stirring shaft that drives the paddle in the pan simply fell out. Whatever the detente mechanism was that holds the shaft to the pan failed, making the machine useless. Currently it doesn't seem very easy (or even possible) to buy a replacement pan for the Breadman.At this point I was done with the Breadman. Much as I didn't want to spring for the extra money for the Zojirushi, and realizing that my default augmented sourdough recipe probably wouldn't work the same in the new machine, I didn't see an alternative and got one.Within 3 weeks the teflon in the Zoji pan formed two blisters. One is bit smaller than a dime and all the teflon at this spot has flaked off; the other spot is blistering but the teflon is still intact. I have been extremely careful with the pan: I wait for it to cool and then remove the baked-on bread under the paddles with warm water using mostly my fingers. I don't let it soak at all. This is clearly a manufacturing defect.I have further complaints with respect to this machine as compared to the Breadman Ultimate:1) The top of the bread rarely gets brown. I've added more sugar to the recipe which helps slightly but not much.2) I don't understand what the crust control option does. It doesn't seem to increase baking time which it does on the Breadman so it doesn't make much sense.3) The programmability is very weak. On the Breadman you can take any of the existing standard options and modify them as well as make up entirely new programs.4) The programmability options are very limited:- You can't control the knockdown time between risings.- You can't add risings to the default three. They do give you a lot of time control on the risings.- You can't separate the mixing cycle from the kneading cycle: it's all one cycle.- When you turn off the preheat cycle, this only affects the built-in programs and not the custom ones.- And worst of all: you can't bake for more than 70 minutes. This is utterly ridiculous. I'm sure this is a "safety feature" but it means you can't correct for the pathetic lack of crust formation or have larger recipes and so forth. This is almost a killer limitation in my opinion.For those other reviewers that are having issues with rising, I've determined that the machine is very sensitive to the amount, type, and quality of yeast. If you *exactly* follow the manufacturers instuctions with respect to yeast and use fresh yeast, it should work okay. This means you must use rapid rise yeast with the Quick programs and active dry yeast with the longer standard programs. Even using Fleischmann's instead of Red Star made a difference. The Breadman was pretty much indifferent to yeast variations.At this point I'm done with bread machines. They are a failed technology. In fact, teflon is a dangerous and substandard technology.All you have to do is search for teflon (Polytetrafluoroethylene) and toxic to come up with some pretty alarming data on this noxious substance. The manufacturing process results in significant environmental contamination.A direct consumer health risk due to toxic outgassing occurs when teflon is exposed to temperatures above 500 degrees (eg: frying pans). Perhaps bread machines are not that risky given the lower temps involved in baking and the fact that wet dough will keep the average pan temperature pretty low, but if you know anything about toxicity you will realize that it is always a sliding scale: there will be some outgassing at lower temperatures. Imagine low levels of toxic gas released into your homemade bread. I've thought about this, but there's no way to make a bread machine without teflon -- going from mixing dough to baking requires teflon, there is just no other viable solution.I love making bread every day and I'm going to miss this activity but at this point the manufacturing defects and use of teflon mean I have to give up on this technology. It's back to the occasional hand-made loaf -- it's the only rational and healthy solution
It did not work!!!. I received my timer yesterday and decided to test it... IT DIDN'T WORK!!!  I shipped it back right away.  It looked somewhat cute with the chicken and chicks but the quality is not really good, not just because it didn't work, but just how the plastic looks.  I would get another kind in a heart beat...
Very disappointed. I have spent this weekend trying to establish the boundaries of this system. The first attempt took a little while however we placed the flags as instructed. Fitted the collar to the dog & went outside for the 1st training session. I found it very hard to hear the beeping once the collar was on my dog however I soon realised that even before we were within 2 feet of the flags she was being shocked. I felt terrible. we took the collar off and realised that the boundaries had changed. The instructions say that it can fluctuate however we were never able to get it to beep in the same place twice. Sometimes we would get one beep & it would just stop. We tried to place the transmitter in three different locations today and each gave poor results. There were areas between flags placed 6 feet apart that we never heard a beep and could just keep on walking. I am more than willing to spend the time training my dog but I could not even set the boundaries. We changed the height of the transmitter, moved our car out of the way, moved anything we felt that may be affecting it without success. I am sorry but it did not work well for me. I will be returning the system
door stop. did not grind well and then after about 4 months died. I won't make the mistake of buying a DeLonghi product aging
Disappointed. I have used a lightweight Hoover for years and was very pleased with it.  When I first received this new cleaner I was really excited with the power it had.  The third time I used it the belt broke.  With each use, my back would start hurting. The forward motion was very easy, but pulling it back was hard.  I returned this product because I felt there was something wrong with it
If you don't believe me, see my photo. I should have read these reviews instead of trusting the KitchenAid name when  I bought this toaster.  From day one, it has never toasted evenly any breadlike substance - fresh / frozen / refrigerated, bread / bagel / english muffin - you name it.  See the photo I uploaded - toast is burnt and raw at the same time!!  Pass on this one
You get what you pay for. Many times, I've come across great deals on Amazon where I've paid just little for a lot.  This is NOT one of those moments.  This pan feels like it's made from three layers of tin foil.  It's shockingly flimsy
800 grit sandpaper. Must write a review so I may save someone else from a sleepless night. Sheets were washed and still felt like sandpaper. I literally had to sleep in the guest room. I guess the old saying "you get what you pay for" applied. If you are used to nice sheets, you will hate these.The  egyptian label is very misleading. It only take 1% egyptian cotton thread to qualify sheets as such. Watch to be sure that you are buying 100% egyptian.Given this from a sheet supplier, but good food for thought.[...
Cool idea, bad execution. I love the idea of these but they're a pain. The plastic plunger sticks so tightly inside the plastic sleeve that getting accurate measurements is difficult. I finally oiled down the plunger and that helped, but it's a definite work-around. I've gotten the kitchen art stainless steel set in the hopes that it will work better
The old ones were better. I also bought one of these to replace an old B&D spacemaker that was around 8 years old.  My old one was nasty looking, yellowed but still worked good.  I should have kept it because this new one is a piece of crud!  It is very hard to put the can on and open it, takes me 3-4 tries, and the bottle opener is side to side now instead of front to back, making it very hard to open a bottle.  I am VERY disappointed in it and we have been using a manual can opener instead of this one thats hanging under the counter---it will be coming down very soon.
plastic carafe will not hold up. I purchased this blender several months ago and the power of the motor is great.  But if you make smoothies and crush a lot of ice, the plastic carafe will absolutely not hold up to that use.  Mine now leaks all over the base unit even though I've always washed it by hand and followed the manual's instructions.  The Waring website says this product is sold with a glass carafe, but they don't sell the glass carafe as a replacement part - only the plastic.If you think you're going to crush ice or use the power of the motor, you're going to have big problems with the plastic carafe.  (And the replacement plastic carafe is $50!!)At this point, I think I'm going to have to throw out the blender
Terrible Trash. This vacuum cleaner has been junk from day one. Poor quality accessories that broke easily and were expensive to replace, retractable cord that rarely retracts. All this, and it barely cleans anything. Don't buy it. The folks at Hoover should be ashamed of themselves
Zero stars...true JUNK!. Would not work right out of the blister pack. Plugged it in, set the time, set the alarm. Could never get the timer to turn *On*
Only lasted a few times... I was very disappointed with this cheese slicer--the wire broke after about the fourth use.  I have always had good experiences with Oxo and was very surprised.
Works, but safety concerns. As others have noted, the outer case gets very hot. I decided to take it apart to understand why. The removable stoneware sits in an inner aluminum pot surrounded by the outer metal case. The pot and case are held together by a screw, spacer, washers, and nuts through the bottom of the pot. A lip around the top of the pot wraps around the top edge of the case, and 3 legs under the pot contact the bottom of the case. The heating element wraps around the bottom of the sides of the pot. The handles and temp control are attached to the outer housing. There are several metal-to-metal contact points between the pot and outer housing. The screw, legs of the pot, and upper lip conduct heat from the pot to the outer housing. Since the base is metal and does not have insulated feet, I recommend placing the unit on a heat-resistant surface away from combustables, flammables, and exposed skin when in use.The handles and control knob feel sturdy, but time will tell whether they will crack from the heat. The switch body is also plastic and is mounted very close to the heating element. The inner wiring is wrapped in insulated fabric sleeves, but they are in contact with the housing.The 3ft power cord is permanently attached and is unusually stiff. I have to form it into shape before plugging it in, and I don't coil it up between uses.The package I received from Amazon did not include the 200 page recipe book. There were some recipes in the owner's guide and a couple of recipes on the box. A 4-page slow cooker accessory catalog was included showing cookbooks, travel bags, bread/cake bake pan, meat rack, dust cover, liner bags for sale.UPDATE: The outer case was recalled by the manufacturer because of several cases of cracked handles. I had to cut the plug off the end of cord and return it. They sent me a new case and reimbursed me for the shipping
Rusted out. Although a pretty kettle, and with a wide enough base to support a full flame on commercial range such as Viking or Wolf, the inside became pitted and rusted within months. When I inquired from LeCreuset, they explained that it was not an isolated incident, but rather that they had been having problems with the vendor that produced this particular item. Unless you are looking for a disposable teapot you will have to replace within 6 months, stay away from this on
Junk - find another option. I just threw this thing in the garbage after 12 months, and wish I would have done so 11 months ago.  "Non-stick" coating was peeling off which I am sure is not a healthy addition to your pancakes.  Heating was very uneven, hot right under the perimeter and cool in the center.Made in China
Out of Gas. I've used gas wine preservers for many years with good results. In my opinion, it's the best way to preserve an opened bottle of wine.Private Reserve is a good product except that the last can I bought had only 22 two second bursts in it. They advertise 120 uses and 600 seperate sprays. I don't know if someone tampered with only this bottle or whether it's the norm but beware that you may run out of the gas sooner than later
Cartridges. The cartridges are exactly as I expected, but the shipping charges were hidden.  No where during my order was I informed of the very high shipping.  I would not order from there again
I bought an upscale product?. Within 2 weeks, the pause & brew didn't exist. The coffee poured all over when I tried to pull the carafe for a cup. My attempts at fixing it were for naught. What a waste of money! I'm not one who returns items. I just won't buy Braun again!
Teflon Bonding Failure. Within a few weeks of purchase the teflon in the Zojirushi pan started to blister and flake off. This is NOT the result of customer abuse but a manufacturing defect.This is my third (and final) bread machine. The first two were Breadman Ultimates. I should note that I make bread in the machine about 6 times a week on average, pretty much every morning.The first Breadman worked for over a year until the teflon in the pan started to fail. This was probably my fault for allowing the pan to soak for extended periods of time (water can get behind the teflon and ruin the bond).I bought an new Breadman Ultimate because the entire machine was only slightly more than the pan alone and the old machine was starting to have mechanical problems. This time I took extremely good care of the pan (letting it cool down, no soaking) because it's clearly the weak link in the system. Within 8 months the stirring shaft that drives the paddle in the pan simply fell out. Whatever the detente mechanism was that holds the shaft to the pan failed, making the machine useless. Currently it doesn't seem very easy (or even possible) to buy a replacement pan for the Breadman.At this point I was done with the Breadman. Much as I didn't want to spring for the extra money for the Zojirushi, and realizing that my default augmented sourdough recipe probably wouldn't work the same in the new machine, I didn't see an alternative and got one.Within 3 weeks the teflon in the Zoji pan formed two blisters. One is bit smaller than a dime and all the teflon at this spot has flaked off; the other spot is blistering but the teflon is still intact. I have been extremely careful with the pan: I wait for it to cool and then remove the baked-on bread under the paddles with warm water using mostly my fingers. I don't let it soak at all. This is clearly a manufacturing defect.I have further complaints with respect to this machine as compared to the Breadman Ultimate:1) The top of the bread rarely gets brown. I've added more sugar to the recipe which helps slightly but not much.2) I don't understand what the crust control option does. It doesn't seem to increase baking time which it does on the Breadman so it doesn't make much sense.3) The programmability is very weak. On the Breadman you can take any of the existing standard options and modify them as well as make up entirely new programs.4) The programmability options are very limited:- You can't control the knockdown time between risings.- You can't add risings to the default three. They do give you a lot of time control on the risings.- You can't separate the mixing cycle from the kneading cycle: it's all one cycle.- When you turn off the preheat cycle, this only affects the built-in programs and not the custom ones.- And worst of all: you can't bake for more than 70 minutes. This is utterly ridiculous. I'm sure this is a "safety feature" but it means you can't correct for the pathetic lack of crust formation or have larger recipes and so forth. This is almost a killer limitation in my opinion.For those other reviewers that are having issues with rising, I've determined that the machine is very sensitive to the amount, type, and quality of yeast. If you *exactly* follow the manufacturers instuctions with respect to yeast and use fresh yeast, it should work okay. This means you must use rapid rise yeast with the Quick programs and active dry yeast with the longer standard programs. Even using Fleischmann's instead of Red Star made a difference. The Breadman was pretty much indifferent to yeast variations.At this point I'm done with bread machines. They are a failed technology. In fact, teflon is a dangerous and substandard technology.All you have to do is search for teflon (Polytetrafluoroethylene) and toxic to come up with some pretty alarming data on this noxious substance. The manufacturing process results in significant environmental contamination.A direct consumer health risk due to toxic outgassing occurs when teflon is exposed to temperatures above 500 degrees (eg: frying pans). Perhaps bread machines are not that risky given the lower temps involved in baking and the fact that wet dough will keep the average pan temperature pretty low, but if you know anything about toxicity you will realize that it is always a sliding scale: there will be some outgassing at lower temperatures. Imagine low levels of toxic gas released into your homemade bread. I've thought about this, but there's no way to make a bread machine without teflon -- going from mixing dough to baking requires teflon, there is just no other viable solution.I love making bread every day and I'm going to miss this activity but at this point the manufacturing defects and use of teflon mean I have to give up on this technology. It's back to the occasional hand-made loaf -- it's the only rational and healthy solution
not the quality I was looking for... returned product. I opened this mixer and it was broken.  I shipped it back.  I did however order another and it was in great condition
Better off using it on a futton. We were better off using the sofa sized one on a futton than on our sofa. the THROW wouldnt stay in place for 5 minutes. the loveseat size wouldnt even properly cover my over stuffed chair. They are worthless unless you are planning on using the fabric for a diffrent purpose.Dont waste your money
Terrible. Slept on this bed one night, couldn't wait to get out of it. Definitely not recommended. Only gave it 1 star because zero stars is not an option
Not recommended. Feels like sleeping on a rock, hard like a rock. I wake up everyday with a headache. I slept much better with my old, 10 year old pillow
crappy. This worked great for about two weeks of minimal use. I live in New York and I don't believe I got more than 5 gallons of water before the filter stopped working completely. Definately not worth the money
wish I had known it had an aluminum core before I bought it. No where in the description did it say the core was aluminum.  I was under the impression it was all stainless steel.  Wouldn't have bought it if I had been aware of that
Bad-Bad. I received the first topper and it was not satisfactory so I called and was sent another one which was worse than the first discolored etc. I have since returned both pads in the same box
Disappointed. I bought a non digital Vornado in the past and it still works fine.  This digital Vornado was fine in the beginning, but after a short while, the digital temperature readout was scrambled and the fan and heat didn't work.  I'll get a replacement Vornado but it won't be this model
Pet safe?  I don't think so!. Do NOT buy this product.  I bought it for my 10 month-old lab who barks excessively at night. My husband and I tested the device before placing it on our dog (if it beeps when the sensors are run over a rough surface, it's supposed to be working)  and waited to see what the dog's reaction would be.  For about an hour he didn't bark at all, but every now and then the collar would beep, then he'd shake his head and scratch at the collar, as if it were irritating.  We thought he was just getting used to the feel of the collar.  About 90 minutes after we placed the collar on the dog, he was munching on a rawhide toy not barking, growling or anything, when he leapt into the air about 3 feet, yelped and started crying and frantically running around. We chased him to try to hold him and take the collar off. But before we could catch him he was shocked again because he jumped into the air a second time and yelped.  We finally caught him and took the collar off. The instructions say the dog's first reaction to the shock will be the strongest, and we expected he would have some discomfort and be surprised but the dog WAS NOT BARKING when he was shocked.
TERRIBLE. We bought it, came home and tried it: did not work!Went back to the store, exchanged it, took the new one home, tried it, worked, BUT 2 months later it just stopped working!I would NOT recommend this fryer.
supersized. I bought these because I was looking for nice red glass.  I'm almost embarrassed at the size of them.  They are not practical but i paid so little it wasn't worth sending them back.  I recently saw them in Bloomingdale's so maybe this is the new trend but they won't do anything for your wine.
Turbo-Driven brush -- what a joke!. I used this model twice and promptly returned it.  The "turbo-driven" brush works only by the suction of the vacuum; it has no additional motor.  This means that if the suction is ever less than perfect, the brush stops turning and is useless.  Actually it's worse than useless because the non-turning brush then blocks the airflow and hampers suction.  So I would not recommend this model
lousy item. the stopper will not seal once it hits the oil in the dressing.  useless, but would cost me as much to send it back as the cost of the item itself, so it will sit on my shelf until i can find another use for it.  very disappointed.
NO GOOD get Dirt Devil 083414 Extreme Power Stick Vacuum. No suction and only ran about 2 minutes after an all night charge. I returned it as defective, which it was. A waste of money. I recommend the excellent Dirt Devil 083414 Extreme Power Stick Vacuum, also sold by Amazon
Braun MX2050 does as good a job for under $45. The Vita-Mix 5000 is billed as "10 kitchen appliances in one." This tall, heavy, and pricey machine did well in our blending tests, BUT NO BETTER THAN CHEAPER BLENDERS. What the high price gets you is versatility. We tested two of its many claims. The Vita-Mix mixed bread dough well, but cleaning out the dough was a chore. It also made decent ice cream, but it was quite a project. If having a do-it-all device is a priority, consider the Vita-Mix. Otherwise, we'd get separate appliances. ~ Consumer Report
Not what shown in the picture. The space between the strands is much greater than shown in the picture.  The cutrain will not hide what is behind it
2 Toaster Shipments 2 Returns!. On the first toaster 2 of the 4 slices would not toast as the element would not work. Returned and replaced. The second toaster had to be set  to number 9 out of (1-9) to get the toast to even slightly brown.  Called Kichenaid, useless they had no idea. Returned it. Amazon is good about the returns, but the Kitchenaid product has problems!
Terrible Pillows. I bought 4 of the Chenille pillows and they have all came apart at the seams.  The lasted maybe a couple of months.  These pillows are for looks only not ever to be used
Don't be fooled. This is a very powerful handheld vacuum cleaner.  If you just need to clean up loose this like salt or cracker crumbs it will perform great.  Should you actually try to use the beater brush attachment you will be very dissappointed.  I bought this cleaner for the purpose of cleaning my curtians and stairs.  I own two cats and virtually all of my in-laws are allergic to them.  Everytime they come, I have to clean the house top to bottom.  My upright vacuum (Dirt Devil Vision Lite model 008650) weighs a ton and was not designed to use on stairs.  I thought this little cleaner might be just the trick.  The brush worked great the first several times I used it.  But after about 20 uses it began to slow down.  I cleaned it very thoroughly but never saw the initial performance again.  Eventually, it stopped working at all.  I urge you to buy something else, if the beater brush is a selling point for you
Bad warranty policy. My collar stopped working after 3 months. Innotek doesn't honor their warranty unless you buy from an authorized dealer (which doesn't include Amazon)
sun tea maker. WE MADE TWO BATCHES OF ICED TEA IN OUR MAKER.  WE COULDN'T FIGURE OUT WHY IT WAS LEAKING BUT FIGURED MOST OF THEM DO HAVE SPOUT PROBLEMS.  MY HUSBAND FOUND A CRACK FROM THE SPOUT UPWARD SO OUT IT WENT. ALTHOUGH THE INSTRUCTIONS SAY TO ADJUST THE SPOUT WE NEVER TOUCHED IT
I would love it if... The foam mattress really is wonderful to sleep on, however, the plastic odor is extremely strong. So strong, that I still smell it after 2 months. I would return it, but it really has no guarantee to speak of.If you are sensitive to "new car" smell, purchase something else.A mattress covering would be nice too. It doesn't come with one, so expect little pill balls when you change sheets
Carafe exploded. We've had this coffeemaker for about 10 months now and so far it has worked reasonably well. I have to admit that the coffee is not as hot as I would like it though, when brewed. However what is more upsetting is that the carafe exploded on me today after it had been washed. We are very careful with the carafe and always handwash and take good care of it. Is there a replacement carafe? Can Krups replace this?Regards,Kavith
unit fried in 5 months. I've had very bad experience with this vacuum. It is bulky, heavy, and inconvenient. Also, the cord is too short if used in a big house. Carrying it up and down stairs -- forget about it!After all these trouble the engine got fried. Then, the interesting part started. I contacted Sanyo for warranty work. They referred me to some service center, which was out of business. After going back and forth they accepted their mistake and pointed me to some other place which is very far from me and I am in Chicago area! So, there is 1 Service center to serve 12 million people.Don't buy it! Horrible product, plus no service
Cheap yet costly. I purchased this item to store cereal items for my four young children. This item is flimsy and cheaply made yet very costly. I would not recommend this item to customers who have younger children. It is not child-friendly. The only thing I do like about this item is that it color coordinate with the other appliances in my kitchen.
design flaw. The first waffle came out OK, but on our second try the lid mechanism locked with the waffle inside. We tried everything to get the waffler open but had to send it back, trapped waffle and all
NOT the best microwave popcorn popper. This is NOT the best microwave popcorn popper. We tried this at a friend's house after Christmas, I was raving about my own new popcorn popper (the NordicWare Microwave Microwave Popcorn Popper that WAS available on Amazon) and my buddy wanted to show me his popcorn popper, the Presto popper. (Such is the exciting life of younger married men with small children). He has to use a disposable base each time he uses the Presto Popper and the popcorn is not as good. Get the NordicWare instead, much better popcorn and it is just a well-designed piece of plastic with a lid, no gimmicky "Concentrator" baloney
Overpriced!. This product is OK - it's just a larger version of the upholstery tool that you probably already have with the vacuum.  The head is eight inches wide with two little strips of lint-catching fabric.  The extra width lets you vacuum areas twice as fast, but for what it is, this attachment is ridiculously overpriced
They don't work well. These shakers really don't dispense salt and pepper very well.  They're cute and small, but my guests have to shake for an extended period of time to get anything out of them (and I was using regular table salt and pepper -- nothing fancy). They're really not functional -- what more can I say?Skip these, there are better sets out there
Do NOT buy, if you have hard water... I live in Utah and purchased two of these for my home. Within a day everything was covered with white dust, on calling their customer service, they asked for my zip code...they then informed me they are not recommended for my area, due to the hard water, and to return them to the store. Unfortunately not before the dust had got into my computer hard drive and DVD players, rendering them virtually useless.Why distribute them in a hard water area in the first place ? This is a law suit waiting to happen.I purchased one Evaparotive type of Humidifier from Sears for half the price and there is no dust whatsoever and it is maintaining a comfortable 50% humidity throughout my house
What could be more stupid than buying one of these?. Buying two of these.  Yes, indeed.  I'm the biggest loser of all.  I was so impressed with how this looked and the write-up, I bought two of them.  They are equally horrible.  One lost it's non-stick properties after the second use and the other became "all-stick" after the third use.  Do not waste your money on these things.  There are cheaper and better skillets available.  If you really want one despite all these reviews, please e-mail me and I will sell them to you really cheaply
Somewhat disappointed in quality. I bought this set because of the colors and the value. It looked beautiful and smelled wonderful but that's where the &amp;quot;nice things&amp;quot; ended. I lit all the candles and within 1 1/2 hours it was ruined. They all dripped down onto the next and either snuffed out the flame or the melted wax dripped all over the rocks in the tray. The wax is of poor quality. If you never light these, they're fine but once you light them be cautious of dripping wax.
Can you rate less than 1?. Checked online comparing many models and purchased one two years ago, worked great all winter. Decided to purchase a second last year year, both worked great all winter last year. Unfortunatly this year neither works, despite cleaning and following all instructions. Guess the quality is put into them just enough to last though the warranty period. Junk, dont buy.
Never recieved the full product. Please HELP!. I ordered the product on Dec. 15/2006. The product was shipped, but never arrived (Tracking Number:  1Z YX5 952 03 8168 867 7) I called customer service: Kathy Wynn, Customer Service Manager, Taylor Gifts at 610-725-1100, she said she would send another product out. It finally arrived on the Jan. 10 UPS #(1Z YX5 952 03 8210 311 7 ). The product was missing the peg inserts that screw into the coat rack. I called Kathy Wynn again on the Jan. 12 and she told me, she could not send my another one and that my credit card would be credited. She was a rude + short with me and not very helpful. My card has not been credited yet by amazon. I would still like to have the product. Please help!!!! I can be reached at 678-296-9041.thanks, Don Young
hard to clean. In my opinion the reset problem and occasional burbling are not problems. My main beef is it's too hard to clean. A few weeks after replacing the filter the deposits start adding up. It has to be cleaned basically every time you refill the tank. Soaking in vinegar doesn't do much and requires a lot of vinegar as the entire bottom reservoir must be filled. The (phosporic-acid based) cleaner sold on the website is slightly better but in the final analysis you have to resort to hand scrubbing. And there's the hitch! You can't reach parts of the element, not even with a toothbrush. Why they couldn't center it just a little further away from the edge of the "wall" is beyond my comprehension. I spent more time last winter with the thing taken apart & trying various methods of cleaning than with it running. I wouldn't buy it again
Very "quiet" timer..... A nice heavy timer, but even when I put it in the same room that I'm in, I usually do not hear the timer if there is any other sound going on - voices, TV, radio, etc.  I've had two other timers - that eventually wore out from use - I rate this below average
too much trouble. When I got my Fagor pressure cooker I thought it was going to be a long relationship. But I have learned over the past few months that it's much more trouble than it's worth.It may cut cooking time in half, but it certainly doubles clean-up time.It's hard to regulate the cooking of the food that's locked inside the cooker.In a regular cooking pot I can look inside and see how things are going, add things at the right time, make any adjustments that I need.I like the ease of just bringing a regular pot to a boil, reducing to simmer, and coming back when the timer goes off. I hate trying to get the pressure right, worrying that it's too much pressure, and then waiting for it to depressurize or depressurizing it manually to speed things up.Food textures are often all wrong. And when is it done? You can't just open it up, look inside and say "ten more minutes".For the same price you can get some very nice copper-bottom pans that will last your whole lifetime and have no gaskets or valves that will need replacing
WORTHLESS - DO NOT BUY THIS ITEM. I wish i could get my money back from this. I hate this vacuum for the following reasons:1. it is terrible at cleaning hard floors - no suction2. 'bagless' feature is losuy. it is filthy to change the cannister and you have to change it every other time you use it.3. it clogs too easily.4. it breaksdown frequently.5. there is no auto rewind for the cord.If there were fewer than 1 star, i would rate it a zero. I have a 20 year old panasonic (thank heavens i didnt throw it away) that does a better job, is easier to use and has a good old fashioned bag!!Run, dont walk away from this or anything else Hooover makes
It didn't last long. While the water tasted better, this model didn't last for more than about two months before leaking and eventually spraying water all over the place
Anolon 16-Quart Stainless Steel Covered Stockpot. I used my new pot to make fig pickle and it did a super job! It is deep enough so I didn't have to be concerned with boil-over and as the figs and vinegar have to remain in the pot for a number of hours after cooking I decided a stainless steel pot would fill the bill. I would recommend this stainless steel stockpot without reservation!
Bad Bobo. My miniature Poodle loves her Bobo dog, however they don't last very long, and do a good job of absorbing saliva, so they become very stinky after just a couple of days of play. Better suited for use as a bath accessory than a chew toy I think
Expected better. For the price, I expected a quality canister.  The plastic insert in the lid arrived unglued, and hardly creates an airtight seal.  Had I seen this item in a store I would have passed on it immediately.
This is a JOKE- Didn't even make one cup!. All this stupid contraption did was blink and lock up. I never even got one cup before it locked up and never opened again. I wanted that vanilla latte so badly. I called the help line and wasted 2 hours of my life only for the cheap plastic to finally break. I will be returning this within 24 hours of purchase. I should have listened to other bad reviews.DON'T BUY THIS PIECE OF JUNK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
review mni magnetic s& p set. Neither the salt mill or pepper grinder work well.  It takes forever  to get salt and pepper from the squeezing of the handles together and still not an adequate amount.  Perhaps the blades that crunch the S&P are not sharp enough?  Very disappointed in product
This griddle sucks!. I make pancakes almost every day (its one of the only things my toddler will eat) and it usually cooks one side, but for some reason turns off when I flip them half the time.  It nevers cooks evenly and every day I have to adjust the heat settings to make the same old pancakes.  I'm replacing this as soon as I can afford
Its wood!. Well...its wood...its hard to clean...but I knew that going into it!!  wont do it again
DO NOT BUY:  This item needs to be recalled. I initially bought this item at my local hardware store.  That unit stopped working after 2 days.  I returned it thinking it was a fluke, and bought it again from Amazon for less $$.  The second unit stopped working after 2 HOURS.  I called DeLonghi's 800 # and the service person was evasive when I asked if this is a defective product.  I'm very frustrated with the amount of my time this product has wasted.  In the mean time, I work in a home office w/o heat and I've even caught a cold b/c I haven't been able to keep warm thanks to this piece of junk.  I would rate it ZERO stars if that was an option
Disappointed in the Bunn. I'm a BIG coffee drinker and I thought the Bunn would be a coffee lover's delight. It turned out to be my biggest nightmare. It takes a lot to set it up and get it started. If you make a mistake and close the cover before you have the pot in place, boy what a mess. It leaked out the bottom and was VERY large and heavy. Took up way to much room on my counter. I dumped it after one week and bought a Farberware coffee maker and it is just as good, if not better. It's small, easy to run, and the coffee tastes great.Deb in New Hampshir
Very very thin material.... Sheets and comforter are cute, my son loves them, but they are paper thin. You can see right through the sheets, and they are a little rough. So far my son hasn't complained, but I do not expect the sheets to last too long.
Not very chip resistant. I purchased these to keep on my counter and house my coffee.  I used them daily and they soon looked terrible!  The paint on the lids has worn off almost all the way around the edge, and there are chips off the enamel portion as well.  I do not recommend these for anyone who is actually going to use them
horrible. The cutter worked fine on the first 2 bottles I opened. After that it won't even cut through the foil of another bottle. I had a foil cutter from the rabbit opener that lasted for 2 yrs until the plastic broke in half. This one isn't worth it
Waste of time and money. Ours has stopped working in a matter of months.Instead spend your money on a pepper mill with the Danish ceramic mechanism with a lifetime guarantee
Not for a guy. Looked nice and plain in the picture and it was on sale. Got it and was all doily and fru fru at the top. Gave it to a girl I know
Strange odor. This grill pan heats relatively evenly, and is large enough to accomodate four slices of bread, allowing for the preparation of two sandwiches simultaneously.  It leaves nice "grill marks" on the food, and works well overall. The press that comes with it is very nice to have, as it helps cook food faster. However, it has one major drawback: it makes a very odd smell when it is used, regardless of the temperature at which it is being heated. I thought maybe this smell would dissappear after several uses, but even after many uses the smell is still as strong as the day I took it out of the box. It is enough of an odor to make me wonder about the safety of the product.  I have a number of higher end Calphalon non-stick pans and none of them make this smell, making me think this is a consequence of a cheaper pan. Bottom line: If I had to do it over again, I would spend a bit more money and get a higher end Calphalon grill pan and press instead
Melted the first time I used it. I see now that it's rated to 250 degrees, though that's not written on the package. The first time I used it, the handle got a little too close to the flame of my stove and the end melted.  It was still serviceable, so I was more careful the next time, but apparently the cooking temperature of an omelette in a pan is higher than 250 degrees and the entire leading edge melted to my omelette and my non-stick pan, half-ruining my very expensive All-Clad pan, entirely ruining my omelette and of course the OXO Good Grip Turner. It may have a good grip, but it's not good for much else
Misfit topper. The decanter's pretty, the wine topper is okay. However, the picture is misleading.  These two items are clearly not meant to be paired.  The topper does not fit.... must have been very carefully balanced for the photo, but it sure won't stay that way.  The topper is made for a bottled wine, not a decanter.
Don't waste your money. Bought for my wife and it is usless. Short battery life and poor suction. A total waste of money
BE WARNED. I purchased this to replace the filter on my 04163 unit and although the description (and box) say it is compatible with this unit, it was the wrong size! I still don't know how to order the correct one
BAD FIT. I purchased this item thinking it would be great for my 5 yr old's room.  He has a 19 inch TV/VCR/DVD combo that will not fit into the space that was designed to hold a "20 inch" TV.  If you have a modern TV with speakers on the side it will not fit!!!!!  I purchased the item directly from STEP2 and they do not want to refund my shipping fees or pay for me to return the item!!!!
weak coffee; brews too fast. I agree that this coffee maker brews coffee too fast.  For 6 cups of coffee I need to use 6 heaping tbsp of coffee, where in my previous coffee maker I could get by with 3 or so.  My wife also noticed that the coffee was very weak the first time she used this coffee maker.  So maybe we'll use it just when we have company, but for now I guess I'll keep using the free 4-cupper that I got with Gevalia coffee several yrs ago.
Bark Control. I set it up for my dogs because they bark whenever they hear a noise or if someone rings bell, I have 3 dogs, I put it on and they went beserk, they started going after each other, I didn't hear anything myself, but I am quite sure the dogs did, like I said they acted very badly towards each other, the tone must have made them lash out like that. I cannot use it anymore.
The glasses were ok ... but our package only had 5 glasses, not 6. The glasses were ok, but not great, for Bordeaux and other red wines. Additionally, only 5 glasses arrived in our box (which was intended to be a set of 6).  Merchant refused to respond to requests to send the 6th glass--or provide a pro-rata refund for the missing glass--so we sent all 5 of them back.  Oh well
Good Idea... Bad Execution. I was really excited when I received this for Christmas and was looking forward to using this.  However I was very unhappy when I took out of the box and found the feed tube to be very small, and only two slicing disk that suck!  First task shredding cheese - well most of the cheese was going around the top of the shredding disk, and that was not using the fine shred disk either!  Next thing I tried green peppers, after CHOPPING the peppers to fit them in the feed tube I got very disappointing results, - green pepper mush!  MMM...  The only thing I like about this thing is the cleanup that is it!  I use my giant food processor more than this.  This is not worth $40, it should be $9.99 and I still don't know if it would be worth it
Sick!~. Feeling sick already just by looking at this! Not a very funny joke! Don't believer in fung-shuei, but this is just not a good luck symbol for any place
High price, low quality. Why do most of us buy sharper image? Most of the times their products work well, and they look great.This heater looked great in the picture. It ends there.I bought three, thinking I would keep one for myself, and two for friends. There's no way I would give this to a friend. Maybe a stranger whom I didn't care about giving the wrong impression.Pros: It's small.Con: It looks cheap. It feels cheap. It doesn't work at all. If it didn't have the sharper image logo on it, I would guess that it was a 5 dollar clearance item at walgreens.
Usless. If you read between the lines on the other reviews here, I think you'll see that everyone thinks this thing is junk. And their right!!! No matter how small the job, it won't do it. It's just one more "MADE IN CHINA" piece of junk that I've wasted money on. It won't suck anything off hard wood or carpet floors. I don't get how any company, let alone a well known vacuum company, could sell such a usless tool. My only question is how could anyone give this thing two or more stars??
DO NOT BUY. I previously reviewed this product and had nothing but great things to say about it.  My opinion has now changed, after owning it for a few months I have had nothing but problems.  The first thing to break was the self propel.  Then the on and off switch quit working, it just stays on, to turn it off you have to unplug it.  Now, it keeps throwing the circuit breaker to my house when you plug it in(brand new house).  It is still under warranty, but Hoover says that I have to take it in, and they will only pay the bill if it is their fault.  I don't want  to take the chance in what they preceive is their fault.  This vacuum cleaner should be recalled, I can not imagine it is very safe if it will not even turn off.  I just threw away alot of money, and now have to go buy a new vacuum cleaner
Time ran out on this clock. Compact design but cheap materials. A vital piece of plastic came off when I set it down on the bedstand. Another exhibit in the "you get what you pay for" sweepstakes. I threw it away
Lasts only two months on average. I've gone through so many of these that I have lost count. For someone like myself who reads every night for at least an hour, the light lasts no more than two months. I don't mean the batteries -- I only use the light plugged into an outlet. But it just stops working suddenly after about two months on average. Very flimsy design, I guess. Yet I have continued to buy it because there's nothing else that lets you avoid batteries and is bright enough for a comfortable read. No wonder they don't offer any warranties! But now it looks like there are some other options and I have vowed never to buy this light again
And a 1 is being generous. Everything everyone said about this is true. I wish there had been reviews before I bought this thing. I think giving it one star is being rather generous. It will not cut anything but soft cheese. Do not buy
My continuing crusade against gizmos:. There are a lot of theoretically good ideas that  fail when executed. This is one of them. 1/QUALITY:It's made cheaply, and even before it breaks, it's flimsiness does not inspire confidence. 2/RESISTANCE:The levels of resistance have nothing to do with real progression , as anyone who 'seriously' uses this will be too strong for the machine in a few weeks,(many will be unchallenged right from the beginning). The standard: If the set is longer than a minute and you still have strength to continue, you need more resistance. 3/COMPARED TO CRUNCHES: There's a reason why crunches are done lying down: The weight of the torso supplies a fairly heavy resistance, whereas when you crunch in an uptight position the weight of the torso actually  helps the effort, as you are dropping your weight down instead of lifting it up. Much of what makes the Ab Crunch Machine 'work' is your weight dropping on it, not your muscles working. This little piece of plastic doesn't have springs strong enough to resist your bodyweight and strengthen your muscles besides. (You may achieve an isometric contraction that has some effect, but you can get -exactly- this effect, or -better-, without any equipment at all! Just tense up in seated crunch position for minute or so.)... Of course, by the time a product is appealing to the public by  claiming how supposedly -huge- a hassle  lying down (??) to do crunches is, we've reached the real problem: This thing is designed to AVOID EFFORT. It seems as though no one goes broke helping people avoid effort. Unfortunately, exercise IS effort, and the more you avoid effort, the less exercise you get
Disappointed. I had read the other reviews and thought I had found the perfect solution for my microwave.  I followed the directions, but to no avail, it sits there lifeless and doe snot spin.  My food is still unevely heated and I am completely disappointed. You would be better off, heating your food for half the expected time, taking it out , mixing it and turning it yourself, then finishing heating, rather than purchasing this product.
doesn't live up to the hype. My dog (80 lbs.) liked this toy when it contained a treat but within a week it was beginning to come apart so I threw it away.  Maybe she needed the black kong
BOO Thumbs Down. I am usually very happy with Hilfiger Home products.  Well, these towels are run of the mill discount linen store quality.  There is nothing luxurious about them whatsoever.  I would expect to pay around 10 bucks for each.  They ARE NOT worth it...I don't know what the heck kind of towels some of the other reviewers were using before they bought these!!
Tend Skin President Is An Angry Man!. Do me a favor jerkwad...DON'T use my trademark to sell your product.  Let me worry about the rest of the thieves like you on E-bay and Amazon.  Besides, you are not the first I have reported and as you have already surmised, you will not be the last.There are laws against what you did with my mark.If you like, get your lawyer and sue me.  I would LOVE to entertain a lawsuit against you.  You would owe me damages for every bottle of your product you sold using MY trademark.Instead of being a leech taking short cuts and using the hard work of other legitimate businesses,  why don't you spend your hard earned money and time and build your own trademark?You won't find Tend Skin Company using yours or any other trademark to sell our products.I spend nine years trying to sell the first bottle of my product.  I spend millions on patent and trademark lawsuits against scum like you who cannot make it on your own but need to steal the good names of others.  I'll be damned if I am going to let you fraudulently use my intellectual property.Again, if you want to entertain litigation, please feel free. My address is on my web site and I am ready for you.Dr. Steven RosenPres.Tend Skin Compan
Not quite what I wanted and scratched too!. The pan came with a small scratch in the center.  I have used it once and it worked pretty well and cleaned up nicely.  I was looking for something other than aluminum (causes Alzheimer's) and non-stick (causes cancer when heated).  I wish I could have seen it first.  I think it will be okay.  Has a dip all around the edge and when I made oven fries, the oil gravitated to that low area.  The potatoes cooked good anyway.  Too much trouble to return it.
Product  not the same as the picture. The Calphalon roux whisk is a flat whisk, not a full whisk as pictured.  I was very disappointed when it arrived.  It is not suitable for the things I hoped to use it for.
Not thrilled. The plates were warped and the color was off from the original set
OSTER 4 SLICE TOASTER OVEN. PACKAGE ARRIVED QUICKLY.OVEN LOOKS REALLY NICE.OVEN BURNS TOAST EVEN ON LOWEST SETTINGS!
THANK GOD I AM NOT ALONE!!!!. OK, so I thought I was crazy, not being able to make a decent meal with my crockpot. People were making fun of me, "HOW CAN YOU BURN ANYTHING IN A CROCKPOT"??Now, I look at the reviews on this thing and see that I AM NOT ALONE.I always wondered why people liked food out of a crockpot! Now I know that they are not SUPPOSED TO be like this!!!DO NOT EVER BUY THIS THING UNLESS YOU LIKE SCORCHING BURN GUNK!!!!!On the 10 hour setting it starts boiling within only a few hours!!!!I am trashing mine today!!
Not so great for oatmeal. I've been using this for oatmeal, and it doesn't work that great.  I like to use 1/2 cup oatmeal with 1 cup of water.  The dispensor doesn't have a regular amount of oatmeal that comes out - sometimes it might be 3 clicks, other times 4 or 5.  Part of the problem is the flexible rubber blades that dispense the product
What a lousy idea. for a cookware? I bought the wok and a sauce pan because they looked so beautiful on display. Nothing wrong with the interior, it works like All-clad should. But whoever thought of putting an anodized exterior ought to be made to wash these dishes for eternity. Hot oil mars the lovely black surface. You can't put it in a dishwasher (I tried and it gives the anodized surface a chalky appearance) as it is aluminum. My pans look like they have been used in mess kitchens in war zones. A complete waste of money..
Rust and Discoloration. You're definitely getting what you pay for when you buy this. Even though I made sure to wash them right away and thoroughly dry them, these pans rusted like crazy. They also discolor easily. The only thing good about them is they're really cheap
Avoid, horrendous piece of junk. First item came with the LCD display scratched UNDER the protective film from the factory.  Yes from the factory.  Put a battery and it ran for exactly 15 seconds and died.  Tried a new battery, different brand etc.  Yup, dead.  Don't buy this thing, I've never seen worse quality in my life
One Star just because it is attractive. I got this baby home and plugged it in.  The indicator light for the smaller burner did not light up. It was apparently broken out of the box.  The temperature control knobs are almost as if they are on a child's cooktop.  There is no definitive "click" for off, so I would be worried that it gets bumped "on".But still I loved the look of it, so I tried to cook with it.  It took 24 minutes to bring about 2.5 quarts of water to a boil, and this was in a highly conductive copper pot.  Guess what? It's going back.And an interesting side point,  the Rival website doesn't list this as one of their products. My guess is that it was discontinued because it was engineered so poorly
Very Poor Performer. Heats quickly but puts out only small amount of steam.  Need to move VERY SLOWLY IF AT ALL to get out wrinkles.  Then had to wait every few seconds for it to heat up again to get more steam.  TERRIBLE!  Returned it immediately.
Waste of time!!!. I purchased this machine from an on-line vendor in November 2005 and immediately the bobbin casing cracked.  After 4 months of run around I finally found a singer store that was able to drop ship a new bobbin casing to me.  It is now March 2006, and now that I have the new bobbin casing I find that the whole machine design is defective. Now it wont allow the needle thread to pick up the thread from the bobbin so that I can sew!  I have had this GOD AWFUL machine for 5 months and the only thing I have been able to do with it is stare at the damn thing while it collects dust!  I am furious!
It's just okay, overpriced. I have not had a good pillow in a long time.  I wouldn't pay upwards of fifty dollars for a pillow.  But I gave in after reading the reviews and got this one.  It's way overpriced in my opinion but they are onto a very good idea.First, I have had it for a couple of weeks and it's pretty flat now.  The coils are only in the very center of the pillow, and at times you do notice them there, but not in a bad way, just noticable.  The problem is the fluff they add to the pillow must be the cheapest possible nothing.  I imagine I will have a really strange looking square blob surrounded by a moat of flat fabric pretty soon.At first, it was really comfy. I think that if they either put high quality fluff around it, or better yet put coils through the entire thing, with higher ones in the center, this would be outstanding, beyond all other pillows!  But as it is, it's not worth the price yet.If you have tons of money to burn, go ahead and try it.  I wouldn't recommend anyone get two to sleep on at once, they would be awkward and they would be falling off the sides of eachother.  You could use a regular pillow below this one, but then you are back into the same pillow finding - switching game we all want to avoid.I would have given three stars if it were a lot cheaper, but after going flat after only a few weeks, and the price, I had to give it two
Very poor quality. After using this product and finding it totally unsatisfactory, I checked this site to see how others rated it, just in case our bad experience was unusual -- but of course all the other buyers were just as disgusted as we are. The griddle never stays hot enough to be of use, and the plug-in section smoked and gave off a smell of burning plastic. There should have been a recall. Black and Decker should be ashamed. I'll never buy any of their products again
It Leaks. I read the reviews and was sure that I'd found the perfect honey dispenser. But, after a while, it leaks. They all leak. I am stuck (no pun intended) with a honey ring on my counter.The flaw is at the back of the spout. The cut off cover does not reach the back... and so the honey drips out
Fatal Problems, Indeed!. After using an opener of the same design, and buying a similar one for a gift, I decided to try the Insta-Pull brand.  I wish I hadn't.  The 90 day warranty is not long enough.  I used it with some regularity for almost 120 days.  The main lever broke off the gear while pulling out a cork.  Also, the included foil cutter doesn't cut foil.  The one I bought as a gift is from Bed, Bath & Beyond, costs $9.99, comes with extras (including a handy stand), and has lasted a couple of years so far.  So I bought myself one of those.  There's more metal and the foil cutter actually works
3 Defective/Broken Machines in a Row!! Stay Away. After using an inexpensive Krups machine for 2 years, my wife gave in and we agreed to buy this Delonghi EC701.  The 1st machine we got had a cracked plastic water tank and a broken tray.  DeLonghi customer support is outsourced and worthless andreplacement parts were out of stock and backordered.  We exchanged it for another and the power button did not work-to keep the unit on, you had to physically hold down the power button. Finally, the third machine we got was totally DOA! It wouldn't even turn on.Finally we were told that they were getting alot of these machines back, and customer service told us to steer clear.  Buyer Beware. We went back to our $50 Krups so far
Honestly... A bottle of Tarn-X worked so much better and faster.Just use scratch-free sponges for general cleaning, and when the copper gets dingy a damp cloth of Tarn-X worked in about 10 seconds.This cleaner kept my elbows greasy for at least 20 minutes a pot.  It DOES work... but be prepared to scrub - at about twice as much as regular copper cleaner works
Disapointed to say the least. I also have this fountian in black. I get a orange slime on my filter and the white residue on the slide part. I agree it is hard to tell if the fountain is dirty. The filters do not seem to last very long either. I have not even owned this for a year and the motor has broke. Now I am attempting to find a motor to replace this one. I do not reccommend this color at all! The fountian has been fine until now, but it shouldn't of broke down already
Save your money- buy a better quality. The quality of this isnt great- the sound of the "waterproof" material is loud.  I dont like the side material and think it will fall apart easily.  I would save your money and buy the more expensive one that has better quality.
messy EC-505. I find that this unit spatters and sputters terribly when I make quantities of rice measuring 3 cups dry or more. It is a 10 cup cooked unit and I can't imagine making any larger quantities than I have. I use the right amount of rice and water. Water spills over onto my countertop and through the air hole. As it nears being done the liquid spatters out the air hole all over my countertop. What a mess! I threw away the packing materials or I would probably return it. I do like the non-stick pot and the keep warm feature. If anyone has any advice on how to keep this mess from happening, I would appreciate it
Neat looking...and that's all. Seriously, for as good as their mixers are, their knives are really, really disappointing.  Flimsy, dull, easily bent and broken.  Within the first week of use, our paring knife bent a full 90 degrees at the tip and needed regular re-straightening before it eventually broke off altogether a couple months later.  The steak knives are now following suit, and the handle of the chef's knife has completely seperated from the blade.  Gah!  Don't waste your money
This can't even grind pre-ground hamburger!. This product is terrible. It's the only thing that I've ever returned to Amazon because it simply dosen't work.I bought it because I bought a small pate terrine, and I was looking for something to grind small amounts of chicken livers, pork and so on. I was dubious -- it seemed to kind of cheesy. But I thought that as long as it basically worked, it was fine.I put in some chicken breasts for a pate recipe, and those were fine. But the, I put in some pork. It squished up in the machine and couldn't come out. It got stuck and I had to remove the mincing plate. I tried the larger plate. The same thing happened. Essentially, any meat with even a small amount of fat can't be ground in this machine. It has only a small, not very sharp grinder blade element. Given that the meat you'd tend to grind would be for the likes of sausages, pates and for hamburger, it makes this machine useless. I actually had some hamburger in my fridge. Just for fun, I tried putting that through the machine. It also didn't work on that -- and it was ALREADY ground!!I thought, OK, I'll try it for some pasta. Maybe that will redeem it enough to keep it. No way. The engineering on a playdoh machine is better. The dough comes out and immediately tangles with whatever comes out of it. It also just gets stuck and refuses to move through the machine. There's no way to make any kind of "strands" of pasta. I tried three separate pasta recipes. I am a culinary school graduate, and a professional cook -- i know how to make pasta. This machine just doesn't work. Then, I went to clean it up. It took 40 minutes, using a skewer and Q-tips to get the pasta out of the little holes.The suction cup device that is supposed to hold it onto a counter works only temporarily. It seems sturdy, but then you start to crank and it comes right off. The sausage funnel is way too small to actually use for sausage.It sort of works for nuts, but then, I can use a coffee grinder for that.Take my advice -- get the right machine for the job. Get a cast iron meat grinder; they sell them on Amazon. Get a separate pasta machine, the stainless steel kind that breaks the pasta down into sheets of thickness. If you want to make baby food, get a good quality food mill.I think this is the most disappointed I've been in a product in a long time -- and I didn't expect much! Stay away from this product
False hopes. I bought this as a gift for my sister and her husband.  When we opened it, it looked or seemed like a table cloth.  It was perfect rectangle.  Slip covers are supose to fit to the couch, chair, loveseat, etc...from what I knew.  It was also WAY too small!  I understand that every love seeat is different as is every piece of furnniture depending on the maker, but this was extreme.  My fault I guess for assuming AND shopping online.  I don't even know if I can return it...it's just sad that I was so excited to give this as a gift and then it was a joke
Unless you want to be a Kricket Wrangler ... I bought this item to house my crickets for my hungry beardies and panther chameleon.  Unfortunately though crickets CAN and DO escape from this item.  My son was wondering what was crawling on him in the middle of the night and we discovered crickets all over his room.  I tried placing the cricket keeper in the bathtub and sure enough when I returned later there were crickets in the tub that had escaped (and yes the lid was snapped tight and the two tubes had their covers on them).  Now I have to keep the keeper tied up in plastic bags when crickets are inside until I can find another cricket keeper.  So unless you want to be a Kricket Wrangler ....
sits in drawer doing nothing. Yes, it sits in my drawer and that's all, it's only useful if you have a real dread of trace garlic aroma on your fingers.Instead I cut off the base of the garlic with a widish knife, then put the flat side of the knife on the garlic and whack it with my fist. It's so much quicker and easier, the skin comes off no problem, plus crushing garlic releases more flavour than merely slicing it.
extreme lint. I was very upset with these sheets and how much lint is STILL coming off. It totally clogged my dryer. I have washed them 3 times and I still come up with a trap full. Should have sent them back.
One look and back it goes -. Nice concept, bad execution.  This doesn't look like it would make a clean cut through any type of cheese.  I'd rather stick with a cheese knife than this ill-conceived guillotine.  Back it goes before I use it even once
Luke Warm. Like everything in the world, this coffee maker is lawyer approved. In other words it does not get hot enough to cause any harm. Unfortunately one minute after poring it is not hot enough to be considered a good cup of coffee.Every day I have to warm my coffee up in the microwave.
no holes. The outside ring works well but the inside ring leaves an incomplete cut. It appears that the two rings are not at the same level leaving no way that the inside ring can make contact with the cutting surface. I am cutting the inside ring with a separate modified piece of metal
Cheaply made, AllergyBeGone is a bad seller. Although a filter is a simple item, it just felt like this thing is even cheaper than it needs to be (quality-wise).  AllergyBeGone was pompous and rude.  I emailed when my filters didn't arrive after about 3 or 4 days.  I live in NYC, where coincidentally ABG's offices are (Brooklyn).  It took well over 7 business days to get it.  Maybe Amazon should kick ABG off their site..
Not worth the money!!!!!. These sheets are aweful.  They are so wrinkly and stiff.  I should have listened to all of the other reviewers when  they said the same thing.  TRUST   me.  They're not worth the money not matter how good the deal sounds
Manufacturer's Warranty. Anyone with any rust issues should contact Henckels from their website and get a replacement. The blades are guaranteed to be rust free. Don't mention the rusty spring issue or they'll only send a replacement spring
Waste Of Money. When I received this item I immediatley knew that something would be wrong.The box it was packaged in and delivered in was open and torn up.Not open like someone opened it I mean it was sent in a box with no bottom and no side, just taped together with styrofoam.I opened it and thought well it maybe ok, this is a big item to send. The right front wheel is off balance from the rest so the whole machine wobbles, the back panel had puncture marks in it and was off level from the rest of the machine. I thought jeez what have I bought. So I thought well I will hook it up and use it,see how it does. It ran beautifully and cleaned my dishes cleaner than I have ever seen them. At that point I thought well the damage is in the back and the wheel doesn not cause it to wobble while it is running so I will just be grateful I finally have a dishwasher. As I was unhooking it from the sink the ball bearings that hold the connector piece in place fell out and down my sink. So I spent 2 days trying to call the company and get a replacement piece or something. NOTHING NO ANSWER AT ALL....Even during the times they SAy they are in the office there is still no answer. So I searched online and in stores for this piece. NOWHERE!!! Danby is not even registered at Sears or Maytag ar any big dishwasher supplier for that matter. HELL all of the actual plumbing repair stores did not have the piece I needed. I was told over and over again, no one really uses that hook up anymore ma'am, or "Wow what an ancient piece". So I went online and had to order a $90.00 hose and hook up from GE. Once it came in I realized it was not compatble with this Danby dishwasher. So I spent another week trying to call Danby and still NO ANSWER. Finally my husband cut the tubes from the dishwasher and used hose clamps and metal nipples to piece the dishwasher hoses and the new GE hookup together. I did have to go out and buy a new adapter for my sink as the Danby one does not work with the GE. But now the dishwasher works and it still cleans beautifully. The GE hookup is made with little plastic nudules that cannot fall out instead of ball bearings which if you are not careful will fall down your sink. So I would have liked to give this product a 1 or even a 0 based on customer service (NONE) and the way that the item was packaged and the way it arrived so damaged, BUT the dishwasher does slean so very well. You dont even have to rinse the plates before you put them in and they still come out sparkly. So all in all I WOULD NEVER EVER BUY FROM THEM AGAIN. If you add up the cost of the dishwasher and shipping, plus all the money it took to repair it, I could have gotten a much higher quality dishwasher with no problems at all for less than what this dishwasher cost me in the  end.
Waste of money. Like almost everyone has said in the reviews, their animals might play with the beam for a minute or two then never play with it again. I have five laser-crazy animals. The cats were more interested in the device (it makes a small whirring noise) and none chased the laser. One of the two dogs appeared interested, but quickly became confused and just stood in the middle of the circle looking at me quizzically. Maybe a really simple-minded pet will like this, but mine aren't interested. I tried putting the device on the floor, a shelf, the coffee table, and other locations looking for a way to get the critters to take interest. For the most part, the movement is too fast and too repetitive.Recommendations for improvement match others here - rotate the mirror (randomly), make the mirror fully adjustable instead of just two settings, and slow down the movement so pets can track it more easily.
Hilfer Cotton Sheets. If I could have given this a ZERO rating, I would have.  I bought these sheets because they were "deep pocket" sheets.  They have shrunk and no longer fit my bed
It's NOT stainless-stell. I think the machine was great at first. It's fast and eficient, but if you have more than 5 lb.of meat to grind and you don't want smoke coming out from the motor,  You might want to give it a break in between. Plus, the cutting plates and the feed screw turn rusting and black even you put cooking oil  after wash as directed by the instruction book, and they have this iron/metal smell on the cutting plate that contaminate the meat. I am very disappointed.
Disappointing sheets. The Rainbow 600 count Egyptian sheets were so irregular that the seams on the pillowcases were not square. I returned them
looks nice.. NOT PRACTICAL... just a gadget. Attachment to the kitchen faucet is very suspect.  Plastic parts do not make for a sure fit.  IF YOU EVER RUN HOT WATER THROUGH THE FILTER... forget it.  This has happened twice at my house.  If hot water goes through the filter, even for five seconds, the filter is ruined.  Two brand new filters at $24/each met this fate.  When this happens the whole contraption pops off the faucet.  Spend another $50-$70 bucks and install an industrial grade in line filter underneath the sink.  In line filter replacements are cheaper than small Brita filters and can be found at Ace Hardware.  I am EXTREMELY disapointed in the Brita AquaView product.
neither a good toaster or a good microwave. The concept is brilliant and I really wish I could say that this unit is a good combination toaster/microwave because I have limited kitchen space.  Unfortunately, it only has 600 watts of microwave which means it is very slow at defrosting or microwaving a potato.  As for a toaster, it is a failure.  If you repeat the process two times, you will get bread with a very slight brown to it but it is not toast.  I returned the unit and do not think this should be sold as it does not perform as stated
Too Rough. The sheets are disappointing, because they are too rough and scratchy.  No matter how many times you wash and use softener, they don't soften up.  They are very vibrant, but what's the point if your child won't sleep on them
HORRIBLE, HORRIBLE, HORRIBLE. It worked great the first time, but the second time it was absolutely no good. The cap seized after the second use and the whole unit turned when I tried to get the cap off. It's garbage now. I wrote to them and the answer I got was a totally different answer for the question I asked.
disappointment. This toaster disappointed. Overprized and does not live up to the KitchenAid name. Toasting is uneven and edges burn easy. I still regret ever buying it
Extremely Disappointed. I was very hesitant to spend close to $160 on a single fry pan, but I had heard so many good things about All-Clad and thought it would be a wise investment.  For the first 6 months, the pan was great.  I loved the large size and used it often.  I was just about ready to invest in an entire set of All-Clad cookware when my pan warped.  I was using it on an electric stove as usual, and the pan just simply warped.  I was thoroughly disappointed that a $160 pan would warp during normal use.  I won't be spending this kind of money again.****Follow-up.  I contacted All-Clad regarding the warped pan-they had me send it in for evaluation, and yesterday a brand new one showed up at my door.  I'm impressed at their customer service and the fact that they stand behind their product.
Cuisinart Crapfest. The Grind-n-Brew is for you if you literally have nothing else to do but make coffee, and you enjoy getting dirty.  If you are a negative person, and you need something to get you off on the right foot, so you can feel miserable all day, the Grind-n-Brew is for you.  If it were not for the fact that it is cheaply made and over-priced, it would be a fine coffee maker for people who do not mind taking 20 minutes out of their morning to clean (that's right you have to dismantle it and clean it EVERY time you use it) their coffee maker BEFORE getting a cup of coffee.  However, on top of being poorly engineered, it is poorly built.  Maybe that's an up-side.  I can't wait for mine to break.  It comes dangerously close everytime I need to interact with it.  Oh, and as an aside, it makes crappy coffee.  The place you put the beans is so small, you'd better plan on using espresso roast if you want to taste coffee.
Way Too Large. Buyer beware. I'm a Kitchenaid fan but these tools, while sturdy and elegant, are much too large for normal kitchen pots and pans. The slotted turner dwarfs a 6 or 8 inch frying pan. Likewise the slotted spoon is unusable in less than a four quart saucepan
So disappointed in Henckels. I have owned and enjoyed and recommended Henckels knives for years; naturally, when I needed high quality steak knives, I went to them first. I have owned this set for less than 6 months. Tonight while merely cutting a pork chop, the blade that I was using snapped right through the steel, near the handle. There was no unusual force being applied; just an ordinary cut through tender meat.I have had this happen with lesser knives, but never expected it with this set. I had read a review speaking of this problem at the time I ordered my steak knives but decided to disregard it and go with my experience. I hope you will listen and not waste your hard earned money
Worst grinder I've ever used. --and I've used a LOT of grinders. VERY badly designed, and the "custom" thing is a gimmick and a sham: it's a standard rotary grinder. They just added flashing lights and extra buttons, and made it look bulkier. Every day was a misery dealing with this thing: it's designed so that you have no choice but to spill grinds all over the place when you use it
Dead Flowers. Sent flowers to my father's girlfriend in Florida for her birthday.  Flowers were left on the porch to die in the hot Florida sun.  My father tried to contact them and nobody responded.  I sent an e-mail that I am still waiting to see if they are going to do the right thing by either sending new flowers or giving my credit card a refund.I learned a lesson... stick to a name brand florist
TINY Bookstand. After reading several reviews, I only read one that was negative. I concurred that perhaps one person just had different needs.  Well, as soon as I opened the package I realized just how right the negative review was.  This book stand would hold up a children's soft cover back.  Any of my school books are not stably supported.    I would actually have to hold up the sides of the book to read the pages.  Unless you have thinner hard back textbooks (the hard back will support the pages), this is not worth buying (especially not for $20.00).  Make sure you realize just how small this bookstand is. If that is with you need, then this is the one for you.
Overpriced. This item is really overprice for a piece of wood with slots.Cheaply made in China. You can buy the 19 slot version for $39.95 on Amazon
Poor Design. Evidently the people at Krups didn't try this coffeemaker before they put it on the market. The caraffe is hard to take out and put back in. It scrapes the lid every time. They say it keeps the coffee warm if you preheat the thermos but why then have a timer? You need a microwave handy if you want a hot cup of coffee. You never know how much coffee is left in the caraffe. Also you need to turn the caraffe upside down for the last few cups. I'm sure this is the last Krup's product I will buy.
Not Durable. I'm currently looking for another crate pan for my dogs wire Midwest crate.  The plastic pan is not durable at all.  The first crack appeared when my dog (Boxer) was only 5 months old.  Now she is 18 months and the pan has several cracks in it.  Luckily she doesn't have any accidents while being crated!!  I'm just now replacing it because the local pet stores in my area, including Petsmart, doesn't carry them in their store.  I'm told everywhere I go to check online.  In my opinion the crate pans are way too expensive to have to keep replacing them
Rigal GR250 Griddle. I would not recommend buying this griddle...the non-stick surface burned through the first time I used it making pancakes at 375 degrees...I tried treating the surface again with additional oil before cooking pancakes again at 350 degrees...the surface deteriorated even further and the third time I made pancakes they stuck badly to the surface and I gave up...I am going back to my cast iron griddle
Product 5 STARS, Packing -3 STARS, Hassle -1 STAR. Great looking set if they could arrive here without being broken. Amazon, how can you continue to ship these out to customers when it is so obvious that the manufacturer doesn't pack them well enough for shipping?Amazon then simply throws that poorly packed box in an Amazon box with not enough cushion and away they go. Any rough handling at all resorts in the canisters banging each other and you end up with a broken box of ceramic. I've received two of those lovely surprises, the first set I ordered and the replacement set. Oh boy, I give up!The canisters are packed one inside the other with a thin piece of cardboard separating them. Just imagine the UPS guy throwing the box or even setting it down hard. THEY BREAK!Amazon is however good about issuing a credit or in attemting replacement (in this case) so it's like playing the lottery to see if you can get lucky and receive them without breakage. Are you feeling lucky??? If so then roll the dice
Disapointed with KitchenAid. The toaster does not seem to cool well between repeated toasting cycles (only 2-3).  With the heat control kept the same, the second toasting is much darker than the first and the third will be almost burned
CHEAP PRICED, CHEAP QUALITY. I DON'T KNOW IF IT'S BROKEN, BUT THE MACHINE DOES NOT STEAM THE MILK AT ALL. IT ONLY GIVES ME A FEW SECINDS OF STEAM BEFORE STOOPING. I FOLLOWED THE INSTRUCTIONS, BUT STILL NOTHING. THE THE REST IS OK I GUESS, JUST THE STEAM. I EXPECTED MORE
Waste of money..... This single burner lasted almost 8 weeks until it completely stopped working. It took a long, long time to heat up and I wished I had returned it after using it only a week. Don't bother
Categorically wrong. I am very disappointed in this blanket--though some could be considered my fault.  I searched soley for "Electric blankets" and when this came up over and over, I thought I would try it for the price.  It is NOT electric, but that is the category I found it in--and still find it in.  "Queen size, electric blankets only."  Other than that, it is way too expensive for a nonelectric blanket--and probably way too inexpensive had it been electric!  I just don't want anyone else to be mistaken.  It may work out, but I did not need another regular blanket and it is not very soft.  Good luck shopping
Not loud enough to get your attention. I have sold a number of this style timer made by KitchenAid in Pink , Black and White. Almost every buyer complained. All complaints were that the ring is not loud enough to hear if you are in another room, have a fan on or are listening to the TV or radio. Replacing the battery does not remedy the problem either. If you want a kitchenaid timer invest in one of the Red, Black, Blue, White or Tangerine ones that are entitled Digital timer with rotating dial - no one has any complaints over this style of KitchenAid timers.
Not Good. My hot coffee turned lukewarm 10 minutes after I poured it.Retained odors.  I am currently looking for a replacement
unhappy. I canceled my order after 3 shipments of the wrong color. The shipping documents stated red but you consistantly shipped white. It is hard to be happy with a product you never receive
useless. The 2nd time I used this item the springs popped out and it was thrown away.  Since then I have purchased 2 different ones and the same has happened.
Two purchased, two defective and returned. Purchased the item, arrived defective, replacement was also defective
Beware Chicagoans. I purchased this product in November 2003 and still have not had it installed. The customer service is horrible. I had questions and had a very difficult time finding a service company who knew anything about this Haier machine. I called customer service over five times and had to have corporate refer me to a company in Indiana. Nobody I knew has had a combo, and it has been frustrating dealing with the company. I also did not know I could not return this product. I honestly regret getting this machine; it is pricey and not worth it. I was looking forward to the space saving option, but I rather have no machine than face the hassles and headaches. I read a few negative reviews and do not look forward to the troubles ahead.
Does not live up to its image. I recently bought the Dyson Complete specifically because it has this attachment.  With 3 indoor cats and a cat allergy, I needed something that would get the fur off the furniture easily.  This does NOT do it.Like everyone else, I was sure something was wrong with mine because the brushes stopped every time I put the attachment on my sofa.  I finally went and bought a Eureka Power Paw ($20) that actually works the way the Mini Turbine tool is supposed to and fits on my Dyson!  Don't spend the money on this - go by the Power Paw
not heavy weight at all. I was disappointed in this towel set advertised as heavyweight.  It looked to be WalMart type quality.  I would have been better off buyingfrom Linens and Things
they don't function. i hated these shakers. i got them as a gift and 1. they are too big and take up too much space and 2. the rubber stoppers were not a tight fit so the salt and pepper was always leaking out the bottom and 3. the holes in the top are too big and too much comes out at once. finally one broke and i was thrilled to toss them out. the other, smaller fiesta ware ones -- the round ones -- are much much better
Very deceptive listing. I wish I had read the other review before I bought this item. The listing is very deceptive on all of these strainer products as they indicate the length of the item (who cares!?!) rather than the diameter of the strainer. Needless to say I am not a happy puppy! I wanted an 11" strainer and got a 5" strainer! How disappointing
Fantastic. Don't buy this fan, unless you can put up with noise it will make on high speed.  Also, if it has green lights(like my blizzard fan did), it will light up a dark room at night. Also, you will see the fan shadow on your ceiling.  Low speed is quiet enough for sleeping, but high will disturb you. The angle tilt adjustments are not precise, and are difficult to do.  There are better choices
UGLY. This is an ugly looking "Made in China" Japanese item. The finish is not up to the mark. Go for other models which are "made in Japan" for looks and reliability
Not a good as I'd hoped. The light output of this device is inadequate for reading at night.  It would have been better with three for four LEDs
Delivery ruined bookcase. What was to be the perfect bookcase for the space came in a box that was battered and torn.  It looked as if it had been dropped from a plane!  The entire bottom shelf was cracked in half and all the hardware bent out of shape.I would really like to own this bookcase, but I want it delivered in usable condition
Cute but not too durable. I liked this cute little tag when I got it, though I can't speak to its reflectiveness as I never let my puppy out in the street at night. However, in little over a month my puppy managed to chew it beyond recognition. The letters are no longer readable and I'm going to have to order a new tag. This time I'll go for a metal one
hmmm...wonder why the return policy is limited to 60 days?. because just around the 60 day mark, the chime turned into a terrible noise like something dying.  I just turned that feature off and continued enjoying the dispenser, but a month later (3 months after original purchase), the thing is spewing soap non-stop.  Wasted lots of soap this way.  Changing the batteries didn't help.  Soap just flows out until there's none left.  To maintain some customer satisfaction, Sharper Image should consider backing their products with a better return policy or providing some better quality control
leaky, unstable steamer. It looks fancy in the picture.  The panel is actually hard to read.  The steam penetrates through the panel and thus make it blurry and leaks/steams out.  It has an unstable base.  Bought three.  Opened one.  Returned three
Cheap product. I had these canisters for a few months in my kitchen, then they started wearing - pitting, staining, - the finish simply wore off. They do not seal tightly, but keep mice and bugs out. Don't waste your money. The photo may look good, but the product is garbage, which is where mine ended up this week
You get what you pay for!. I was looking for a set of steak knives and came across the infomercial one night. It sounded great and much cheaper then the Henckels of the world. And look at all the different types of knives. NOT WORTH IT. These knives don't cut well at all (as compared to my Henckel knife). I wish I didn't buy it and just purchased a couple of good quality knives.Also, the block holder is HUGE!  It takes up too much space.
No Good. NOT a good light.  The light is already fading and I don't use it very often.  Very disappointed
Dog interested in noise, not detered from barking. My beagle (13 mo.) cocks her head showing that she hears something with a slight pause in the barking process but does not deter her from barking at a later time.  Does nothing for howling and will only go off for loud barks, not smaller barking or any form of whining (even if extremely loud)
hate it. i got this fryer only yesterday i fryed some chicken wings and french fries the fries came out with so much oil and cooked for 10 min for a small batch i have been frying for about 10 years and know how to cook very well and i have to say this is just as bad as frying on the stove. i put the oil to the max fill line and with cooking the two things the oil went down to the min line do not buy.
poor range. Did not work right out of the box. The heating elements did not get hot. So I had to return it otherwise I would be throwing money away.  Do not buy
get a rolled pad, not a folded one. I bought two of these pads: one 8x10 and one 10x14 (or so).  They were billed as "premium" rug pads by a local dealer.  The trouble is that they are folded so tightly in their "bag" they actually stretch (apparently permanently).  They will not lay flat on a hardwood floor -- even after a week or two.  One is under a relatively lightweight handmade rug, but the other is under a very dense and heavy (~ 150 lb) handmade rug; both have "mountains" that don't go away and are a tripping hazard.I have a cheaper pad from a department store rug shop that has been perfect for 10 years (under another rug) -- we brought it home "rolled" and it has been smooth and wrinkle-free from day one. Like this pad, it has a rubber side and a "grippy" side and I wish I had bought more
PLEASE READ Before you buy this item. Your Steam Fast will rest EXACTLY 2 ft 3 inches from the ground. This stand cannot change height so it is meant to be used while sitting.  I don't iron that many shirts/clothes at one time so sitting is not necessary, and standing at 5 foot 8 inches and trying to use the steam fast at 2 ft 3 inches can be challenging.  After I steam, i have to get up multiple times to hang the shirts. I don't know why they don't design a stand the raises the steamer to standing height.  Crazy!  Just know what you're getting and you won't be disappointed.
buy a different brand - 1 star is too many for this one. Dogs and cats react only because the sound is novel to them.  The device I received and the replacement after that were so low powered that some animals walk over out of curiosity, some don't react at all and the ones that it scares is only because the new sound startles them.  I had a chance to try a different brand years ago and I know from that experience that this brand is a toy in comparison.  If you think this will protect then give it to your kids and watch how fast they get themselve eaten.  There you go, suicide by dog, that's a good use for it.  May be it is just quality control, you might get lucky,  if not then you might have to deal with a seller that won't return calls or e-mail, like i did.  So you bypass by finding his supplier and get a replacement that is just as bad.  Go to the website and they are obviously throwing away the bad reviews they get and posting only favorable ones.  I hate being cheated.  Score another point for the bad guys
Bed Sheets. I didn't like these sheets, because you have to put them inside of the matress I do like their softness though, but they are very hard to put on the bed
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
Too Good to be True. So far, I have tried two of these units.  The first one did not cool at all, and the second one stablizes at a temperature about 10-degrees off from the selected temperature.  That is not acceptable for the wine temperature control that I had hoped to have with this device
waste of money. I have used my Movietime Popcorn Popper and well, I wish I could send it back. First the instruction manul claims that it pops more kernels that other popcorn makers if this is true I'm going back to microwave popcorn. I found nearly half the kernels went unpopped.Q:would i Reccomend this produt to someone?A: NO!
A disappointment of so called "Egyptian Cotton" from Elegance. Purchased a set of the 400-Thread-Count Egyptian Cotton Sateen Queen Sheet Set, Ivory color before the end of 2005 at the price of $39.99 here at Amazon. The package arrived on schedule. However, the quality of the materials "Egyptian Cotton" is far less satisfactory. Compared this set to a few sets of my other Egyptian Cotton sheets, Elegance's sheet set is rougher and stiffer even after two full-cycle washes. I'd say stay away from this item if you are looking for quality Egyptian Cotton sheet sets.
Do not buy this. This canister will crack and stop sealing with in weeks of purchase.   I tried to get the mfg. to honor their warranty.   I am speach impaired and have to use digital methods to communicate.  They would only talk about it over the phone.   They refused to use other methods.  I will never buy another one of their products.   You shouldn't either
Spiegalau Wine Glasses. Of the three boxes I ordered, over 35% arrived broken.  When Amazon replaced the broken glasses, the new box arrived with 2 of 6 glasses broken
Worked great.........at first. Was happy with this toaster until I had it for about 4 months.At that time the lever started acting up by not staying down.Sometimes it worked other times we had to prop something heavy on it to keep it down. Not what I expect from a $70 toaster. Well, I have finally given up (2 months later) and am sending it back to Hamilton Beach since too much time has passed to send it to Amazon. They are sending me a new one, which I am not sure I am happy about. Might just exchange it somewhere for a toaster-oven.........
Nice Unit But.... The Rival Slicer (Model 1060C) is a generally well designed unit.   I say generally because there appears, in my unqualified opinion, to be one major design and/or manufacturing flaw associated with the product.The first unit I received had a broken speed control knob that prevented any speed adjustment.  This unit was exchanged (thank you Amazon for making that process painlessly easy) for another.  This second unit also had a broken speed control knob, the failure point being identical to the first.  The stem on the speed control knob is either woefully under designed or it is being forced into the wrong position (it has a detent) during assembly.  This is really too bad since the unit looks like it would do the job for which it is intended quite well.What's good about this product:- heavy-duty construction (parts I expected to be plastic are made from cast aluminum)- heavy-duty, thick stainless steel blade - removable for cleaning- angled slicing surface- tray to catch the slices of what ever- cuts up to 5/8" slices- integrated cutting boardWhat's not so good about this product:- There are rubber suction cups on the four bottom corners to protect the surface the unit is sitting on and hold it in place while it's being used.  This would be a great feature except that the suction cups stick to the surface and pull out of the unit when it is lifted up.- the speed control knob as stated above (and sole reason for number 1 rating)
Doesn't fit. The 3 quart steamer does not fit in the 3 quart pan
Plastic Junk. This item sucks, got it, broke second time I tried using it. Simply do not buy this overpriced piece of plastic
VERY Poorly Made. Reasons:1. Faulty battery cover design.  The battery cover comes off time I remove the timer from a metal surface.2. The protective glass is cloudy - making the timer numbers hard to see.3. The alarms are not very audible.4. The magnet "unglued" itself within the first three days of use
Don't Do It! Turn back now!. The brugo mug is a hyped piece of junk. The 'tip and cool' feature on mine doesn't even work (when you select the 'tip & cool' setting on the dial, no coffee comes out at all - brilliant!). It works fine as a regular thermos-type thing, and it looks cool, but don't be fooled. Save yourself the shipping costs and high price of this faulty paperweight and get something from a local store or cafe.
Don't Waste Your Money. This cart fell apart after 2 outings. You can purchase a similar cart for $10 (w/o the organizer). See if you can purchase the organizer alone and purchase yourself a better quality cart
Save your money- buy a better quality. The quality of this isnt great- the sound of the "waterproof" material is loud.  I dont like the side material and think it will fall apart easily.  I would save your money and buy the more expensive one that has better quality.
Nice at first but rusts away very easy. Bought this knife set 3 months ago. It was beautiful with unique patterns on the blade and very sharp. But within few days we noticed it rusts very quickly. We left a knife in the sink in the morning after breakfast, by the time we came home for dinner the knife had several rust spots. We had to use Barkeeper's friend to clean all the rust out. We've tried to clean and dry the knives immediatly after every use - real pain in the #*@ - but once in a while one will be forgotten for couple hours and then rust immediatly forms. Once, when someone else was helping clean up, one went into the dishwasher. It didn't only have rust all over but the blade edge rusted away! Now the knife has jagged edge!!! I guess if I grind down the knife about 1mm I'll have a full edge again but I didn't expect this from top-of-the-line knives. Will not buy this brand of knives anymore
There is a product recall. I received this message direct from the ManufacturerThe DVH  is subject to our Heater Recall  that was announced last year Aug 3, 2004. and should be sent in and repaired before you use it again.If you still hold in your possession a Vornado DVH, EVH,  IntelliTemp or VH heater, we are most interested in having it sent to our factory to be serviced and the potentially defective part replaced. We are providing free shipping via FedEx both to us and back to the owner.To Register your product for free shipping and repair, you must call 1-888-221-5431.  You will need to know BOTH The Model  & Serial Number of the Heater ( which is only on the Bottom of the Heater itself) and also we will need the following information. Your Name, Street Address, City, State, Zip, Phone Number (with Area Code first).
Re-consider. I returned the HCH4051 I got to go under my desk. It was a handy size, and I could probably have dealt with the rather high noise level, but I couldn't handle the smell! Even after running it full-bore for HOURS outside, it still gave off a nasty chemical odor. It smelled like pesticide, like 2,4-D or something. That was unacceptable
Piece of junk. This is a piece of junk!!!! The beater inside broke while making the first batch of ice cream and the ice cream hadn't even frozen totally
DO NOT BUY THIS. I bought this item because other comforters from this seller had good reviews, but it was a complete mistake!  It really was dingy like described by other reviewer.  I returned it, but lost over twenty five dollars in back and forth shipping costs for this item.  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND AGAINST THIS PRODUCT OR SELLER
Dogs will pay attention to this..but.. it requires effort from owners.  Bought this to help control our Sheltie's barking behavior.  When we first tried it, he would stop and look around to see where the sound was coming from.  We noticed that this alone wouldn't stop his bark and required us to work with him by using voice commands like 'No' or 'Quiet'. This  meant alot of time and patience working with him and my kids didn't help very much.  They have a tendency to push the button and not do the commands.  So now the dog thinks that the sound comes from the birds that he likes to bark at...lots of re-training to do here.Well the dog hasn't stopped barking and obeying yet, but we haven't been as good at working with him either.  My next purchase will probably be a Citronella Collar..I'm opposed to the shock treatment from shock collars as this seems cruel and can teach some dogs to be mean.  Better still maybe a good book on dog training is in order.My oldest daughter used this when walking the dog around the neighborhood and found that it did stop some of the neighbor's dogs from barking or at least got their attention.My question now is could this possibly stop or delay a dog attack??...at least long enough to get away or somehow protect yourself.   Not sure I would want to risk trying this though but it might be worth taking on walks..just in case.
Poor Quality. I ordered this teapot because at the time it came with a free tea infuser. When it arrived, the teapot was broken, with a large section missing from the side. I returned it and had to pay the shipping to the company to reorder the same item after I received a refund only for the items price. After receiving my second teapot, it was cracked in the exact same spot. I returned the product and complained with no response. I was refunded the price for the teapot, but I am out $10 in the cost of shipping. It seems highly unlikely that two teapots would break in the exact same spot, so I would try a different product.
Not happy with this sweeper. Pros:  Lite-weight, easy to use, long battery life.Cons:  Cat hair gets wrapped up into the coils and is difficult to clean out.  Does not pick up all of the dirt and hair.  Spits some of the dirt back out when you pull it backwards.  When you press the off button, dirt comes out of it.  I will not buy this sweeper again.
Poor Ergonomics. The unit works well.  Nevertheless, it is poorly designed. I don't mean that it doesn't look good-it's really beautiful.  The problem arises when filling/refilling the tank.  The tank must be removed from the base, turned upside down, (before turning it over the mist outlet cap must be removed and put aside) the water tank cap (with the demineralization cartridge attached) removed and put aside before it can be filled.  While it's in the upside-down position for refilling it must be held firmly since the top (now on the bottom) is not flat. After replacing the tank cap the now full tank must be turned right side up and reinstalled onto the base.It's not a user friendly task.  There a very good chance that when refilling the tank you will drip water on the path from wherever it's kept to where it's filled and, again on the return to the base unit.Incidentally, the unit should not be placed on the floor.  It's supposed to be placed in an elevated position on a table or bench - to avoid the mist staining the floor.It's too bad that the guys who designed this probably never used one in their own home.  If they did it would probably have the filer cap on the top.  That simple change would make the unit much more user friendly.Incidentally, the product is described as  "3.5 Gal.". I don't know what that refers to.  The actual tank capacity is much less than that (about 2 1/2 gallons). It's probably an estimate of how much water it will put out as mist in 24 hours.  That lets you know that the tank must be refilled every day
Burned out quickly. Lasted less than a year.
MIRACLEWARE POPCORN POPPER IS A DUD. This item arrived in perfect condition, and after following the directions on priming the Miracleware Popcorn Popper, I made my first batch of which half the kernels popped.  On my second try, the popcorn popper had holes burned on the bottom which made it unusable and I had to throw it away.Sorry, this was a dud for me, and I have been making popcorn all my life
Didn't last long. It was kinda hard to use and after about 6 months it just stopped even though I always kept it charged. Since this is the type of product youmight take camping I don't recommend it because it's not reliable.I used it once or sometimes twice a day....no more so I really thinkit should have lasted longer
Henckels Twin Pro S-8-Inch Chef's Knife w/Hollow Edge. The knife is constructed well - as pictured - does not cut very well.  It just was not very sharp.  I tried mincing some vegetables - it just didn't work as well as my $9.99 serrated TV info knife.  I was disappointed
very disappointing product. We have used a Cuisinart for about 25 years! It is getting worn out and parts are not available to make it like new. The Kitchenaid looks great and has plenty of power but, and that is a big BUT, it does not work to do what we want. First the amount of fluid that it can hold is pathetic compared to the old Cuisinart. The Kitchenaid leaked like a sieve via the gap between the lid and the bowl. The complicated "safety" system that allows something to be placed in the feeder tube but not fingers also prevents us slicing a cucumber or even a reasonable sized potato!I wonder who designs these products.. obviously no-one who cooks! When our Cuisinart finally gives up my wife says she will go back to a knife.We tried this product and returned it for a full refund thanks to Amazon
Blender died on 3rd use. I gave this blender to my adult son for Christmas after I had spent several hours researching different blenders on the internet.  He used the blender twice and all was well.  On the third time, he noticed a burning smell, and the blender died.  Obviously, I am quite disaappointed with this product
Does not work. I'll start with - I know how to sharpen knives.  I purchased the Knive Care Kit to take care of my Wsthof  collection and I now have to take my knives to the hardware store for re-sharpening.  The Wsthof  kit made my knives dull and even  chipped a section out of my wonderful Chef's knife.  I expected much more and ended up disappointed with somethin I can't use..
PIECE of JUNK !. Junk, junk, junk.Thank heavens Amazon has such wonderful customer service.Myself as well as one of my friends purchased this so called food processor. We felt we researched it well BUT.......on the second use (shredding cheese) it fused together, forever.This seems to be a constant problem, which Kitchen Aid will not admit. They refused to take it back! Look at customer reviews on the KitchenAid website.We purchased Cuisinart, works great
product bites. Got the scale and it looked pretty nice but it wouldn't zero so I sent it back for a refund.It was refunded quickly bit was charged 3 bucks for the return
Royal Albert Rose Cameo Collectible Teacup, Green. This teacup has a beautiful design, but I was very disappointed when I received it.  The cup and saucer were much thicker than I would have expected for a china teacup!  It also had a problem with the scalloped design for the foot of the cup as this caused the cup to rock as it sat on the saucer.  I sent it back as I could not imagine trying to drink tea from this cup
Too hard to pull. I received this as a gift. I does not compare to the Lever Pull in any way shape or form. It takes tremendous amounts of strength to pull the lever back getting the cork off.I through it out last night after fighting with this for 12 months.
Fun for a dumb cat. I have a kitten I can't keep up with and thought this would be a great idea. Wrong, he figured it out and lost interest in the first day. He will play with it for a few minutes but then looks to see where the beam is coming from, figures it out and walks away. A whole 2 minutes of fun
Not a winner. First off, this machine LOOKS great.  But unfortunately, that's where the attraction ends. You see, I too used a little Krups $45 espresso machine for years. But it was a heck of a lot easier to use, and made consistently better espresso/cappucinno than this dog.  Here's a brief synopsis.The reservoir holds enough water for just a couple of days.  I'm constantly refilling it.  After making an espresso, the thing leaks out coffee drippings for minutes on end, making a mess of the whole machine.  The steamer seems to spurt out as much water as it does steam.  The lever that dispenses the steam does not move in a fluid fashion. And positioning the coffee holder pod thingy is downright cumbersome.Did I mention the thing leaks? Now you might forgive the little bugger if it made amazing capuccino............... it doesn't
Strange deposits and other malfunctions. We bought this stand mixer in September 2006, and from the first time we used it we noticed a silvery-gray deposit on the batter when it was scraped from the bowl (both bowls).  Thinking it was some coating on the new bowls, we washed and scrubbed them thoroughly--still same thing.  We thought it may be some oil coming from the motor and escaping from where the beaters are mounted, but that doesnt seem to be the case.  About the 4th time we used it the center beater jammed and cannot be removed--it is abiut 1/3" from being locked in place and wont budge.  While struggling to remove it, some grayish powder came falling out--maybe that's where the deposits are from.  Anyway, I wish we hadnt bought this product and would advise you to find another option
Form did not follow function. Great humidifier, noise not a problem, keep it clean and it will perform well. BUT, the water tank is removable for filling and thats where any functional design consideration ended.  Tank will not sit by itself with fill opening up to be filled and tank is slippery when wet.  Whom ever designed this chose pretty, not functional.  So close yet so far away
Not  As Shown On Picture. My cat plays with the toy, but it is not what's advertised on the picture. What I received is a cheaper, smaller version, which is not expected to last long. It's much smaller than advertised and the pom on the spring is ready to fall off.  Be cautious... At this point it's not worth my time or shipping cost to send back
Very expensive and unreliable. This is a very expensive item for what it is - a pump and a bucket! It also has a few serious disadvantages:1) It circulates dirty water over the sprouts - not a good idea.2) It is flimsy and unreliable. The pump on my unit gave out.3) The spray spins around very unreliably - it's virtually impossible to adjust so that it spins consistently. Either it doesn't spin at all or it almost blows the spray attachment off the top.4) The pump gets clogged up with gunge. And yes - I followed all instructions very carefully, changed the water frequently and washed out the device.5) The sprouts are hard to harvest as their leaves and roots get stuck in the trays.Definitely get into sprouting - it's great! But this is not the device to do it with
I disagree with Jackie on this one!  Stay Away from Cerama Bryte!. I bought Cerama Bryte and their Stainless Steel Cleaner with all the gadgets and bought in bulk 6 bottles of each.  I paid for the whole shipment over $97 with shipping.The Cerama Bryte does not work at all on taking the spots or the overflow of the water when your boiling potatoes and it boils on to the cooktop.  This was a real waste of good money.  The stainless steel cleaner is just ok.  I was willing to spend the money for a real good cleaner to keep my very expensive new Italian made stainless steel range with the sealed ceramic cooktop that cost me over $2250 US.After I found that the Cerama Bryte did not give me good results I started searching the internet for other ways to clean the ceramic stovetop without scratching or damaging it.  Here is my recommendation:By a can of Bar Keepers Friend (non-abrasive cleaning powder for about $1.19 a can) and the Mr. Clean Magic erasers.  Wet your ceramic cooktop with a little water and put a couple of teaspoons of the Bar Keepers Friend powder.  Put a little bit of water on your Mr. Clean magic eraser and then lightly rub all the powder and water with the eraser.  After a couple of minutes wipe off the paste with a sponge and get it so it is nearly clean.  Finish off with Windex Streak-Free and a paper towel and you have a beautiful clean ceramic cooktop just like it was new.So I have my cleaning cabinet full of this cerama bryte cleaner, treated wipes, stainless steel cleaner and treated wipes as well and I am going to give it to anyone who wants to pick it up.  If not gone in the next month it is all going out with the trash for pickup.Worst cleaning product I have ever used is Cerama Bryte
Disappointed dishwasher. I bought this exact same dish rack from another company ... . I liked this dish rack for the stainless quality and for looks. I was very disappointed that it has no sides, therefore cups and  bowls, etc fall out continually.  Nor does it hold many dishes at one time.   The drained water stands in the bottom tray and has to be emptied with  each use.  The stainless steel will indeed last forever, but not in my  house
No sir, I don't like it. The lowest setting is too dark for my taste when making toast. Enough said.
What size is the damned thing?. There is no way of knowing from the description what size pot this will fit on
Not impressed. I read all of the great reviews that this product had, but I encountered nothing but problems.  First, the pieces it came with did not fit my tank.  The short attachment was too short and the long attachment was way too long so I had to cut it.  The pump is not strong enough to pull the water up through the attachment no matter how much I cut it and even with it off, the pump had major problems.  The product just did not perform as the manufacturer or other customers had testified to.  It was way loud and kept up my kids atnight who slept in the next room.  I was not impressed and changed back to the free filter that came with the tank - the Tetra Whisper brand
A Big Disappointment. We ordered one of these from Amazon, but when they were out of stock for several weeks, we decided to get it elsewhere. We kept it for only 2 days before we realized it was a big mistake, and sent it back. We have had a series of less expensive espresso machines for about 10 years now. Our first few were the cheapo steam models, and then we moved up to a low-end Briel pump-type. It worked okay but started to leak after a few years, so we decided to try another brand.Our main complaint about the Gaggia Espresso is that we could not get decent crema out of it at all, and it was way too hard to use. It comes with a little rubber disc called a "Perfect Crema", which you are supposed to insert in the portafilter under the filter basket to make crema. Well, with that disc in place, it was next to impossible to make the portafilter go into the machine because the filter basket would not push down far enough into the portafilter holder. We finally jammed it in once after a huge amount of effort, and got decent crema, but the next time, after we had removed it to clean it (quite a procedure in itself to pry it out), we couldn't get it back in again. Without that disc it makes okay-tasting coffee, but no crema at all. It certainly did not seem worth the effort to us to attempt this hassle every time we make espresso (which we do at least twice a day), since you are supposed to remove and clean the crema disc after each use.I also agree with the person who said the construction is kind of cheap. The first one we got arrived with the plastic water tank shattered, which makes me wonder how long it would last in daily use and regular cleaning.We ultimately got a Krups XP 4000 (I believe this is a new model), which is the same price as the Gaggia Espresso. So far (after about a week) we are quite happy with the Krups. It's much simpler to use, and makes excellent espresso.Incidentally, I don't want to mention the exact name of the company where we got the machine we returned, since it might not be permitted by Amazon, but you will see this place advertised all over the web for selling espresso makers. They have a pretty good web site, but I wouldn't recommend dealing with them, as they have been very slow in crediting our account for the returned machine.
Junk?. I bought one of these and it didn't work when it arrived so I returned it for another one, which in turn did not work when it arrived.  I didn't even bother returning it again since it was too much trouble for the price. I just threw it away. Sorry but I can't recommend this product
Bad buy. the product came with a broken cord. Sending it back would cost the price of shipping so I just took the fall. Do not bu
Didn't Last Past Three Months. I was sooo excited to get a toaster oven combination but was ultimately soooo disappointed that this product did not last past 3 months!  I tried it twice - but twice the toaster feature did not withstand the test of (short) time.   I am still looking to replace this item with one of better quality that can perform both functions well.
Not impressed. I was extremely disappointed by the size of this item.  It is for an individual serving.  I would not purchase this item again, never.  Also felt the color was off, not a true red, more like a coral
got 2--neither one works!. We ordered 2 of these wafflemakers.One for a present for my daughter in college. It never worked from day one. The second one worked for 2 months then quit heating up. Calls to villaware company resulted in them telling us to "ship them back". Shipping costs would have been above $30.00..Then what if new ones don't work...do I pay to ship those back too? Don't waste your money on these.Yes, when they work they make great waffles,but only WHEN they work...
Looks better than it works. Looks super cool, right?With bag cleaners, all you have to do is remove the bag and put in a new one. With this, you have to realize the suction isn't working (the barrel will not be close to full). Removing the barrel is easy, but you have to spill everything all over when you open it to dump it. Then, you have to remove & clean the sub filter...very dirty jobs.The brush head is too tight and doesn't drop down to the floor level properly, so the brush isn't even in contact with the floor most of the time.Avoid this until they get the kinks worked out.UPDATEMy wife called their customer service. They said that it wasn't supposed to be stiff and immediately shipped out a (refurb) replacement. It's working fine, though is does have a small bit of stiffness.I'd change to 3 Stars if I could..
Dead on Arrival!!  Does Breville have quality control?. I was so pleased with the workmanship of this product when I opened it up.  It had everything I was looking for, and I was astonished it didn't sell for twice as much - definitely a professional quality build on the outside.HOWEVER, Breville must have poor quality control.  After 20 minutes on the grill, chicken filets were still white, not a bit of browning anywhere.  I had it on sear (420 degrees).  So, I took my candy thermometer and placed it between the two grill plates, closed the lid, and let is sit for 20 minutes.  The temperature was 220 degrees rather than the 420 degrees it says it cooks at.  Needless to say, unless you want to grill or boil water, nothing is going to cook.This was my first Breville product and will be my last.  Obviously quality control is not a concern otherwise they would have caught that this machine has thermostat problems.  It's a shame such a finely built, heavy machine (cosmetically) can't heat any hotter than an aquarium heater.  I was very disappointed.  I am returning it this weekend
cannot boil water; useless. This does not get hot enough to boil water (no matter how long I leave it on). Makes it useless. Why bother with a burner if only possible heat setting is "low" and "lower"?Some customers found that it worked initially, before developing its problem. As to my experience: I don't have memory of mine ever working properly. I bought this a few years ago, and had it in storage, not having need for it at that time. Then I pulled it out last month, for basically its first use. No boil water. No go. It is straight to the landfill for it.Annoying disappointment.
you get what you pay for. It's fairly cheap looking, but it does the job. The razor holders cannot hold my Gillette Mach III Turbo razor, it slips out
Wrong size. Ordered King size but received Queen size.  The hassle of returning isn't worth it since I am disabled and live in a rural area
Krups replacement carafe. Just the right one for my coffee maker.  I like the shape of the carafe
Looks can be deceiving. I ordered this kettle specifically to avoid heating up water in plastic. However, this  kettle emitted a foul chemical odor that also transferred to the water. I boiled it a few times plus tried the water/vinegar suggestion in the brochure but nothing seemed to help. I decided that I didn't want to take the risk of drinking these unknown chemicals so I'm returning it - it's not worth the risk. I can't figure out if it's coming from the "stainless steel" bulb  (that feels like plastic to me if you tap on it) that covers the heating element or the plastic seal between the glass & the bulb. Plus the lid has a stong odor too & that is plastic covered in "stainless steel"
Smelly plastic. I thought this was a neat idea but silicone in the oven is not. Our house smelled like plastic 15 minutes into baking a cake in one of these at 350 degrees in the oven. The cake was ruined & the silicone cake pan smelled of the cake even after a thourough washing. I like my silicone pot holders & threw out all my cloth ones that were a fire hazard, but I have to say that I don't recommend cooking anything in silicone pans. Use air bake double insulated non-stick pans instead, which are tried & true
Close to Garbage!. I got them free with purchase of Wamsutta sheets. These blankets are of really cheap quality. Thin, mesh-like texture. Threads get loose at the ends. Leaving traces of fabric everywhere. I got rid of it cause I am afraid the loose ends and fabric may be swallowed by babies
Great idea but...... My wife loves for me to make her an "Egg McMuffin" kind of sandwich, except with egg whites only, and on a bagel, and with Virginia ham intead of Canadian bacon. I make one for her almost every morning befoe I go to work. I had been using these egg rings, which you lay down on a hot frying pan. They work sorta ok. But egg always leaks out because either no frying pan in completly flat, or the rings are not. I have not ever figured it out. Then along comes this pan. Seems to be the perfect size for the pefect round egg. And really, it is! The egg cooks up fine, especially if you keep the flame on low, which on most gas burners give you a flame ring the size of the bottom of the pan. This also seems to be just the right amount of btu's for proper cooking. Turning the egg over is a problem, but not a huge one. Best option is to let the egg do 90% of it's cooking on the first side, then use your smallest spatula to turn it over for the last 10 or 15 seconds of cooking. There is one fatal flaw to this pan. It is the handle! For starters, it is of an almost useless shape, too wide and too flat to hold comfortably, were the second problem not evident-the handle gets just about as hot as the pan! Now the makers have seen fit to afix a goofy egg character on the end of the handle, I suppose to insulate your hand from it's cooking temperature surface , but alas, it gets just about as hot as well. Having said all that, I still use the pan every day because it is the only one of it's size I have been able to find. And it does make perfect round eggs for that morning sandwich my wife must have
does not hold 20oz. Much smaller than it appears. Does not hold 20oz. I gave it away for christmas, instead wishing for one of those old 32oz Aladdin coffee mugs they used to sell or give away at 7-11. I have one old one. It keeps my water cold, and I do not have to fill it often
Worst Product I Ever Bought. I have owned a Roomba for several years, and have been very pleased with its performance, so I was very excited to purchase the Scooba.  However, it has been the worst purchase that I ever made.  The first one that I received would quit working every time it bumped into furniture or the wall.  iRobt did send a replacement, but it only works about half of the time.  The other half of the time, it does not vacuum up the dirty water, so it leaves the floor dirtier than before I "cleaned" it.  I have contacted iRobot for help, but none of their suggestions have worked.  Honestly, I would throw it in the trash if it did not cost so much
disappointed. I wanted to love this toaster, I really did, I read all the reviews and was convinced that this would be a great working, long lasting toaster.  I bit the bullet, spent way more money than I wanted to, and ordered this toaster. I like the way it looks and I like that it doesn't 'pop-up', you can check the toast anytime that you want and return it to toasting with the cool lever.  However, I wish I returned it. It is slow, it is a pain to plug in before each use (must be unplugged when not being used), and worse of all :  it does NOT toast evenly!  Top is burnt, bottom is not even toasted at all, or one slice is done perfect and the other slice is like it was never put into the toaster. This toaster would be a waste of money at $9.99, it should be illegal to charge $200. for it.  That said, Amazon's price of 200. was a better deal than William Sanoma's at 299., but I am still sooooo disappointed in this purchase.  Upon re-reading the other reviews I find that the people that purchased 'refurbished' models seem more pleased with their purchase.  Leads me to wonder if upon 'refurbishing' they are making them better somehow
PRODUCT DID NOT MEET EXPECTATIONS. My fiance and I purchased this item thinking it would make a great addition to our room. The pictures looked great. As it turns out, the product is not as nice. The chairs are too shallow (not deep enough) to be comfortable and leave a large unsightly gap between the seat and bottom swivel portion. Also, the color does not appear to be Espresso, but rather black/brown.  I WOULD DEFINITELY NOT PURCHASE THIS PRODUCT AGAIN
Don't bother. This is a $30 "ice crusher" whose instructions advise inserting just one cube at a time. Even at that ludicrous rate, the machine occasionally jammed. I threw it out, went to Target and bought a $20 Waring blender that has an ice chopping mode. It works beautifully, even with a dozen cubes at once
Pretty but questionable accuracy. This is an all-metal exterior scale that operates through a spring loaded bowl that pushes on a metal lever that is geared to the indicator. The overall exterior construction is pleasant, with a nice appearance and a few sheet metal screws located to easily allow access to the mechanism. Unfortunately, the mechanism itself is set up such that it indicates gross amounts reasonably well, but fine amounts poorly. For example, if you want to quickly see if you have about 2 pounds of potatoes, the scale is great for that. On the other hand, if you have 8 ounces of grain on the scale and you'd like to add another ounce, you won't know until you've added too much and the indicator finally overcomes the built-in friction necessary to move, at which point it will show that you've added a few ounces. There's also a kink in the mechanism at 2.5 lbs which the unit has to overcome, again blocking fine gradients from being measured in that area to an even greater extent than around other points on the scale. Overall, not a unit I'd recommend.
Impressa S7. Although I have used this model before and have all good results, the one I bought for Christmas did not work.  Jura Capresso states that they test their machines before they leave the factory.  They might have tested mine and it may have worked, but all it did for me was spit out hot water underneath the tray.  I tried different grind settings but to no avail, water flowing out the bottom of the machine.  Too bad as this was a gift for all of my family.  Imagine the look on their faces when all they got was water dripping onto the floor
Leaky Cow. I have the same problem as Sillygal00 - "The spout doesn't pour cleanly and water ends up all over the stove!". I'm returning it
Furminator instead. The way the brush is situated on the handle makes this brush difficult to use.  I would get the Furminator instead, it has the same deshedding edge but a much easier to use overall design and it comes in larger sizes!  This technology is great and you will be so shocked when you see all the hair you are able to remove
Black & Decker GR 100. I also hate this griddle!  It has a very poor non-stick surface.  I keep hoping it'll season, but after 3 months I'm giving up.  I also tried Rival and they are even worse!  I will try Presto based on someone else review
Don't Expect to Love this. What a great idea: a spice rack that you can hang next to your kitchen work area that won't be in the way.  Wrong.  The magnets on the bottom of the spices, fall off.  That's right:  in the middle of mixing something, a magnet falls off causing a spice to fall onto whatever is close.  Of course, the magnets fall off when you're not even close to the rack.  You get to walk into the mess in the kitchen after the magnet has come off, the container has dropped, and the lid has come off.Great idea in theory, but a horribly high price to pay for something that you will want to throw out within a few weeks of messes.
Good, but horrendously expensive. I will give one thing to the Litter Locker: it works, and works well.  Odor is controlled better than any other system that I have tried.  BUT, it is also horrendously expensive, and I suspect that is no accident.  Overall, it is probably not worth it unless you have lots of excess cash to get rid of.The cheapest price I found online for litter locker refill cartridges was $8 (but many places were as much as $14!).  This will last you two weeks with a single cat of average size.  So let us do the math:  $8 every other week is 26 cartridges per year, plus the $30 cost of the locker itself gives us a MINIMUM of $238 for your first year, and $208 for every year thereafter.  Unfortunately, I have 2 cats, and the litter locker is going to cost me $446 in one year!  Or, I should more accurately say it will NOT cost me that much, because I refuse to pay that much.Obviously these guys have a racket going.  The locker could easily be designed with twice the capacity, and the refill cartridges could certainly be sold for much less.  But this is the same old gimmick that razor companies have been playing for years: get a consumer to buy their particular razor, then charge a premium for the replacement blades.  The profit is made on the blades, not the razor itself.  Likewise with the litter locker: the companys profit lies with the exorbitantly priced refill cartridges
Not bad for the price. I bought this to avoid buing and expensive mandoline to make my sweet potato fries.  What I leared is... the sweet potatoes are too hard for this cutter to work well.  Neither my husband or I could get the sweet potato to cut.  We had to take it out and chop them by hand.  It works very good on regular and smaller potatoes though
Should work right out of the box ... but don't hold your breath. I ordered the Scooba thinking that this would be a great Christmas gimmick for the family.  What's better than a toy that mops floors?  Trouble is, the unit did not function ... would not spray the cleaning solution after about 3 feet of travel.  I called iRobot Customer Service and they had me squirting water into valves and passageways trying to flush out the system.  No luck.  I visited a Scooba internet discussion forum board and read all the posts, and discovered that I was not alone.  It would seem that a pretty high percentage of machines do not function right out of the box.Being unable to get the machine to work, I paid to send the unit back to iRobot, and they sent a new one.  THE NEW UNIT DID NOT PERFORM EITHER.  Again, called iRobot Customer Service and they had me squirting water into valves and passages, cleaning this, adjusting that ... all to no avail.  This time iRobot emailed me a UPS shipping label to send the unit back.  I made sure that the customer service agent understood that I expected to receive a functional unit this time.  It must work right out of the box.  No excuses.The THIRD machine arrived at it too did not function properly.  It would dry up after about 3-6 feet of travel.  I visited the web discussion forum again and did A LOT of reading.  I have performed many checks and flushes with this unit, finally discovering that the clean water tank does not vent properly (forms a vacuum after a little water is pumped out) and no cleaning solution will flow.  Today I left the clean tank filler cap off when I started the machine and it seems to be working just fine.When it works, it works great.My issue is why should I have to engineer workaround solutions for this machine's shortcomings?  IS IT TOO MUCH TO ASK THAT A $300 MACHINE FUNCTION PROPERLY STRIAGHT OUT OF THE BOX?  I don't have to do carbureator adjustments on my new car.  I didn't have to engineer repairs on my new central vacuum system when it was installed.  New should mean "perfectly functional", shouldn't it?By the way, DON'T ORDER THIS FROM AMAZON.  If you get frustrated with the Scooba and want to return the machine, you won't be able to after 30 days.  Read the Amazon return policy!  My suggestion: order from Hammacher Schlemmer.  You'll pay a little more, but they have a lifetime return policy, no questions asked.  (So what is "lifetime" for a Scooba? Hammacher gives the Scooba 4-years). Hammacher has been in the mail-order business for many, many years.  They have an excellent reputation
SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!!. Finally, when it actually WAS over a year since I had received the coffeemaker, when I called to check on the status of my warranty claim, they said, "Your warranty has expired. You've had this coffeemaker over one year. There is nothing we can do." I highly recommend you find a coffeemaker from a manufacturer that stands behind their product! I have a Cuisinart now, and it is WONDERFUL!
Poorly Designed Product. I bought 3 of these to monitor my invalid mom and they don't work well. The manual is not thorough, but it does tell you AFTER you bought the product that there is a one-second delay unless you buy an AC adapter.  I just bought 12 batteries for 3 units and wasn't about to buy an AC adapter to see IF that fixed it. It cut off my mom's voice and I rarely heard her message. The units also have annoying beeps that can't be turned off. No real volume control either. A very overpriced and poorly designed unit. Also, the switches to adjust for conference and vox mode are small and need a small object smaller than a pen to change them. The sound is clear if it doesn't cut you off, but the units are far from user-friendly.
One bad apple!. If you want something that looks like an apple, I suggest you buy a real apple.If you want a kitchen timer, (something that reminds you when the time is up) then this product is definitely NOT for you. We were extremely disappointed that it doesn't make any sound whatsoever when the time is up.However, it did make a pleasing smash noise when we threw it out of the window! ;-
Too flimsy!   Light also not that bright. Being somewhat of an insomniac I read well into the hours of the night and a book light is essential to me.  I therefore purchased the itty bitty booklight.  If you do use this light it is essential to purchase the power supply for two reasons.  Firstly, there is no auto shut-off so if you fall asleep reading your batteries wear down very quickly.  Secondly, when using batteries, they start dimming rather quickly making it hard on the eyes and difficult to read resulting in the constant need for new batteries.  This light is also extremely fragile.  Over a couple of years I went through 7 of these!  I would not recommend this light - for the amount you spend on the never-ending purchasing of batteries or the expensive power supply, and the constant new purchases after it breaks, you might as well splurge and buy a decent book light. I now have the Tri Lite by Capstone Enterprises (available at Barnes & Nobel - come on and get it in stock Amazon!)  It is terrific!  It has a clock with an alarm and a timer.  You can set it to stay on for any period of time and once it reaches that time the light flashes.  At that time you can extend the minutes.  If you don't do so, for example you're sleeping, it will automatically shut off.  It also produces much more light and is much brighter than the Itty Bitty Book Light
Still Waiting. After my brother-in-law and I found out how great mojitos taste, I ordered this muddler in the begining of September 2006.It is now December 19th and all the fresh mint I had growing in my yard is dead. I just got a notice that I might get it by Feb 9th, 2007.So, I'm hoping that this performs as well as it looks.
broken liner. I've been using a model 199 coffee maker for about 2 years. First carafe lasted about a year. Second lasted a little less. I'm just starting on my third carafe. Carafe thermal liner explodes during coffee making leaving a 10-cup mess to clean up. Coffee is good, but carafe only keeps coffee hot a couple hours. By the end of the second hour coffee is closer to luke-warm
If manufacturing was better I would have rated 5 stars!. This is a nice looking table for the price but my husband had a heck of a time putting on the bottom piece of the table.  The screws were way to short and just would not fit in correctly.  He had to go back out to the hardware store to buy longer screws!!  Plus, thehole that the pegs fit into the bottom piece was not drilled in enough so he also had to drill a wider hole.  Not to happy with the poor job they did on manufacturing these tables.  Maybe we just got a bad one I dont know, but it sure was difficult to match up pieces with the holes!  And putting the baskets together, thats another story!!  Very frustrating!  Table looks great in my home just a pain in the bum to assemble!!  For all you single woman out there, FORGET IT!!!!
Amortize it quickly, it failed after 2 uses. I was given the fryer as Christmas gift.  We used it twice - worked perfectly, great features - pretty idotic proof in being able to set time and temp.Third try, the LED on the control unit started flashing random numers, letters and symbols.  The reset never functioned @ all, heating element failed - essentially a total meltdown.  Called DeLonghi, they requested I send the unit to a service center in New Mexico which I did.  A month later, no unit, no response from service center
leaky faucet. I've had several of these; the spout in time will leak.  If you don't mind a leaky spout this is a great product
This thing sucks. Yeah, this thing is a peice of junk.  Its made out of extremely cheap card board.  Ignore the lies in the product description that say it's sturdy, water resistant, and leather like.  You also have to asemble it yourself and guess what?  It doesn't fit togehter right because the dimesnions of the cheap card board don't line up to where its supposed to snap together.I'd rather suggest lighting a 10 dollar bill on fire.  At least you will be more entertained by watching the bill burn then you will be by trying to put this thing together and then throwing it in the trash can afterwards.Hopefully, one day companies will give us decent DVD storage.  However, don't give your money to this company trying to rape the consumer with their extremely over-priced junk
Coffee Mug not so great. I ordered two based on the description that the mug keeps the coffee hot and that it is spill proof.  The coffee barely comes out of the lid to sip and when I tip it up to even get a drop more of it seeps out of the area where it screws on so it drips down the front of me.  It is a very frustrating mug to drink from.  The only thing that is good about it is that it is very well insulated and does keep the coffee hot.
Not good for candy!. I bought two of these; one for me and one for a gift.  I used it immediately to make English toffee.  The temperature never registered above 220 F and it burned!  I checked the temperature with my old candy thermometer (with the mercury) and it said it was over 390 F.  So, I took out the other one and tried to make another batch of toffee.  This time I used both this thermometer and my old candy one.  Again, this digital thermometer was always low.  So, I am returning the both of these digital thermometers.  Maybe they work well for meat but I don't want to risk it!  I am very disappointed
Pinzon 16-Piece Rooster Dinnerware Set, Service for 4. I loved the pattern but when I received them there were several broken coffee cups. I was told I needed to receive a whole new set just to replace 3 mugs and then deal with returning the  set, this did not make me happy!  The dishes are not good for everyday use because they are very fragile and chip easily.  I do not recommed these dishes, but the pattern is very nice
HOT HOT HOT. I like many others have had major issues with this crock pot burning everything I make. I lent it to my sister in law for Christmas, ahe has another brand pot at home and hers did not burn at all, or boil. Mine had the same food in it and was boiling and burned the dish. Even on low it boils and burns. I will be contacting Rival now that Iknow that I am not the only one....I would not recommend this brand or unit..
Wireless Intercom. The unit did not recieve or transmit half the distance that was reported across a flat surface.  100ft. would be pushing it
Too small and awkward. While cute, this little pan is difficult to use. There's no room to use a spatula, so you'd better like the eggs cooked through - you can't flip for over easy, and the egg white is too deep to do sunny-side up. Also the handle gets hot and the little plastic egg bit is not enough to grip, so you have to use a potholder. Plus, it's so small that it won't fit any normal-sized burner - another burn risk to your fingers
didn't wear very well. They looked great for the first few months.  But any hint of moisture on the bottoms made them lose their finish.  The typical grease splatters and other messy situations you'll find in a kitchen make them look bad pretty quickly.  Plus, as other reviewers have mentioned, the plastic liner/seal is worthless.  Don't plan to use these as functional canisters -- they're decoration only.  After a year, I threw them away.  What a shame, especially because they seemed so good at the beginning
In the running for worst teapot ever... Yes, it is pretty. No, it is not a good teapot. I have made tea for over 40 years, in all sorts of pots, and this is right up there with the worst. It drips A LOT! Perhaps those who think it does not drip were just looking at the spout. And no, it does not drip from the spout. Rather, lots of tea runs down the underside of the spout and ends in a big puddle under the pot.  This happens with both fast and slow pouring, with full and near empty pots.  This teapot will most likely have to become a pretty red flowerpot. Just too much mopping up
great for the first month. I love to cook and a good knife will facilitate your cooking experience.  The first time I used the miracle blade knives I was amazed by how sharp they were, but within a month or two the sharpness was not there anymore.  The life-time guarantee is excellent but there is a shipping charge of about 6 dollars for a new set of 3 knives, and there are about 11 knives to replace.  Like I said the knives are great when they are new, but the info-mercial is full of it.  I dont cut hammers with them and they are still dull
Very disappointing. Much thinner and cheaper metal than I thought Revereware would ever produce.  I'm very surprised and disappointed in how cheap and poorly it is made.  Very thin bottom and thin coating of copper that doesn't even completely cover the stainless steel.  The lid didn't fit because the pot was out of round, but I could squeeze the pot back into shape - now that's thin metal!  Also handles didn't appear to be centered correctly, wish I hadn't bought it, but too expensive to return just because I didn't like it.
Don't buy Hamilton Beach products. We purchased a Hamilton Beach cool mist humidifier for our daughter.  We go through one filter/month.  The filters are not sold in any locals stores and we can only buy them on Amazon.  We usually have to purchase (6) at a time because the filters smell moldy after 3-4 weeks.  Now the price has jumped from $6.99/filter to $15/filter.  We are disappointed with the product and it's permformance
Seriously disappointed. I gave these one star because I had to.  These sheets are garbage.  The colors will wash out after the first washing.  My blue sheets now have big permanent peach marks in them.  And the corners of the fitted sheet have split.  I have only had them for a month.  Love the way that they feel, however the quality is terrible.
Pretty, but not tough enough... We've had this set for about 3 years and after about a year they began to chip and/or crack.  They are beautiful and affordable, but they just do not last.  I had two plates crack in half in the microwave.  A mug handle break off as I slowly turned it in the dishwasher rack.  It's too bad because I really liked this set
Worked for 5 minutes!. Heavy machine, looked durable, almost commercial. Put her together and began. Within 5 MINUTES of use the belt for the rotating brush burned up and the brush no longer rotated! Returned it the following day and bought a Bissel that has worked great, was cheaper and weighs less!
I don't recommend this Kitchen Range. I really do not understand all the fuss about this range,I can only assume that because these rather silly pots and pans have a french name that people somehow equate that with cuisine quality. I received a casserole as a gift, which was lovely, they look good and have a snob value and cache.But they are truly awful! they dry out food too quickly, they are pure evil to try and clean and they are ridiculously heavy! you could give yourself a hernia hauling one out of the oven.My advice is forget the hype and stay practical in the kitchen!Incidently, mine is used as heavy and special occassion only, tureen; a lot of money to shell out for a not very practical serving dish
Hot, bitter, dirty, brown water Maker. Just picked up this thing from a shelf on a WAL at a local super MART for $19.88. I brewed a couple cups of coffee using fresh pods I purchased with it (not the 8 sample pods that have a best use date of 03/05). It is terrible. First I tried a 14oz cup with 2 pods. Too weak. Then I tried the 9oz setting with again two pods (as is suggested for a "strong" cup of coffee). Swill. I am not blaming the folgers pods (I dont think) because I have had good cups of folgers from my old auto drip, but something is awry. I will be returning this immediately and stopping off at starbucks to cleanse that horrible taste from my mouth. I guess I got what I piad for
No Thanks. I bought this timer for my fish tank light.  For the first couple of months, i had no problems with it, but recently, i've noticed QUITE frequently that the light would not come on, or turn off.  Upon closer inspection of the timer, i noticed that the time was not moving.  i would go to bed at night, with it set to 1130, and in the morning, it was still 1130 pm - hadn't moved AT ALL.  i would fix the time and the light would come on, and when i would get home from work, i would check it again, and guess what?  it was still 8 am, sometimes it would have made it to noon, or some other afternoon hour, but it's never the right time.  i realize it only costs $7, but my recommendation is to go with a different brand...preferably one that works!
Sad bed. This bed was small-not for the size dog they recomended-and very flimsy.  I could feel the tile floor through the bottom of the bed easily. The sides of the bed were barely higher than the bottom.  The only thing good about this bed is the cute material, but that was not enough to keep me from returning it.  Overall, poor quality and construction.
Great - when the unit still works. I've been through FOUR of these expensive units. They work great on my Great Pyrenees dog. At least they work for awhile. Then I end up trying to figure out if the batteries are dead, then if the NEW batteries I put in were dead to begin with, and then I send it back for repair. Once I got back a unit that worked again - for awhile. Then I got back a unit that never worked again.I stopped sending in my broken units after that.So - in desperation, and impending poverty, I switched to a shock collar; it was either that or what my breeder calls a "blue juice special". It also worked - and yes, I tried it on myself and decided that it wasn't cruel at all. But the punchline is this: the shock collars broke at about the same rate as the citronella collar. At least they were cheaper, so I didn't lose as much money
First Alert Support Horrible. This is a fine product, but when it malfunctions, First Alert is very hard to get a hold of and requires a lot of documentation to certify that it is within warranty.  After 8 months, my unit went out (it sounds 3 quick chirps every 30 seconds).  For 2 weeks, I have been trying to contact First Alert and either get unavailability or voicemail.  There website does not have a form nor address to send warranty return items (don't use the corporate address---the unit will be returned to you even if you have a letter explaining the problem.)Features of the unit:  5 starsUnit itself:  3 starsCustomer Service for the unit itself:  1/2 a sta
Waste of money. Had these pillows for 6 months, finally drained them and threw them out.  You don't realize that once you fill them with water how heavy they are!  Once they are in place on the bed you can't move them!  Try lifting them when you change the sheets!!!  But, you probably bought them due to a bad back, neck or shoulders and now you have to lift these weights to make the bed!  What was I thinking?  I was lucky I didn't wind up in traction from lifting these things.  My husband refused to use it after a few weeks, said he couldn't get comfortable and was unable to move it easily (they weigh a ton!)  I hung in there longer but wound up using a regular pillow on top of it just to be able to adjust it without having to get a crane to lift it.  We honestly didn't feel any better sleeping on it and having to deal with the weight of them was not worth any benefits we might have derived.  No one mentions this issue in their reviews, I have to wonder if they all have maid service
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
Look for better. Even though I am a fan of the Calphalon cutlery line (I really think they beat the pants off of the German competition), this block leaves a lot to be desired. The block that came with my 15 piece set was pretty nice, and I ordered this block to house the additional knives that I bought. It appears to be the same design, but the quality control is awfull. Several glue joints were split open when I recieved the block, and the finish was not quite up to par. Given the low cost, I chose to glue and clamp the block into submission, rather than to send it back, but you  might be better off buying a more expensive block to start with
Do not buy. The thermometer of this heater is completely messed up. It does not measure the room temperature, but the temperature of the air that has just been heated up. In other words, if your room temperature is 60 degrees and you program it to heat up the room to 70 degrees it will do so (according to the thermometer reading) in less 2 minutes and stop. If you do not use this functionality, but instead let the heater run for some time (5-10 minutes) the thermometer will want to make you believe that the room temperature has gone up to 90 degrees. The thermometer is probably in the wrong location. Did Honeywell do any kind of testing before putting this model on the market ?
Doesn't work. Hard to impossible to clean. Creates a stream of oil rather than a spray. I found it impossible to completely clean the internal parts, causing the oil to eventually go rancid and ruin the sprayer
Poor and Inconsistent Grinding. Unless you love the look of this pepper grinder, I'd suggest you look elsewhere. When compared to a generic grinder, this product produces inferior and very inconsistent grinds. I've gone so far as to grind peppercorns onto a white sheet of paper to look at them. With this grinder you'll always get a huge variation in the grind. Some of the pieces of the peppercorns will be large enough that it would give anyone pause to wonder whether foreign matter had somehow entered the dish. The oval top is quite slippery and when you tighten down the top nut to reduce the grind to something that will prove acceptable, you'll have trouble turning it. Not recommended
Nice Look, Not so Nice Features. 1. Knobs fell off within a few weeks.  Nice appearance but very cheaply made.2.  Replacement knobs are on backorder for 4 weeks, apparently, it happens alot.  I don't expect the new knobs to last very long either if it's the same design.3.  The on/off switch is connected to the timer.  When cooking is done, the timer should "ding".  But when I switch it from on to off, it shouldn't ding also!4.  The on/off light indicator is impossible to see unless you're in pitch darkness.   Seems like a hazard to me.5.  Other than that, it works..so far.  It does have a nice Stainless Steel look however
Have a big dog? Not worth the Money!. I have two Great Danes who love chew-treat toys. Especially KONG. I brought the Everlasting Treat Balls Home and they both were able to pop out the treat within 2 minutes! They enjoyed the treats- but the expensive plastic ball is useless. I will be returning this product tomorrow
Picks up lint. I thought this would be a good deal but the material for this set picks up dust and lint way too easily.  Other wise it looks ok and didn't fade in the wash
Not sure if mine was defective, or if item is simply subpar. I purchased this reconditioned item primarily to toast English Muffins, which I eat regularly. Strangely, I had to set it all the way up to its darkest setting (9) just to get the muffin to be somewhat browned. I would routinely have to toast more than once to get the desired level of toasting.I suspect there was something wrong with mine, but who knows? I returned my KitchenAid and ordered a Krups toaster...I am hoping for better results
Uses Twice as Much Coffee as a French Press. See other reviews for a description of overall performance and cleaning. Cool design, but overpriced and requires the use of nearly twice as much coffee to arrive at a similar strength to that typical of a french press. I only used this coffee maker 3 times, and reverted to the press.
If less than a star were an option I'd have used it. I've never felt so ripped off by what I thought was a reputable company in my life.  The blade is so flimsy it tweaks with the first use and you wind up with a topsy turvy cake whether you wanted one or not.  A blind man with a baseball bat would have better success leveling a cake than this piece of junk
Huge rip-off (only one collar for this item). Advertising is VERY misleading for this item.  Picture and description make it look like you are getting five collars, but when the item shows up, guess what, one collar for $3.95 plus large shipping fees.  Avoid this seller!  Much better deals at the local pet store
tiny fingers, big noses. Yes, these are lovely glasses...BUT. The big bowl certainly develops the wine's nose, but my own nose presses against the rim (only 2.25 inches in diamter) when I sip, so much of the pleasure is lost. And the stem provides only about an inch of clearance between bowl and foot which makes for very awkward handling. Seemed like a bargain, but mine are about to be returned to Amazon
Leaks and had to get another one. Had major problems with it leaking and ended up having to get another (different brand). I was shocked and a upset because of the mess it left in my kitchen.
Probably not suitable for household use... As other reviewers had pointed out, you have to clean this vacuum pretty often. The vacuum is not good at handling lint and small particles, and I happen to have a lot of those in my apartment. What happens is that lint would clog the preliminary filter made of a metallic net, and fine dust ends up clogging HEPA filter. These dirt have no where to go but to stay on the filter, which have very small surface area, so overall the performance is worse than a bagged vacuum cleaner, which at least have a large surface area to trap the dirt.The HEPA filter is also difficult to clean. They claim you can "tap" it, but in reality I find myself having to bang it against a hard surface. It is the only way to make dirt come off. Banging it also causes dust to fly all over the place. Inhaling the fine dust trapped by HEPA could be fatal.In my case, trying to vacuum a 200 sq ft. carpeted room usually takes me 1 hour because I have to clean it every 20 seconds of use; otherwise the motor would overheat. The dust bin would still be nearly empty. It has been that way since the very first time I used it
The Mystery Is Solved. My family drinks a lot of coffee.We usually brew 3-4 pots a day,so any coffee maker gets a workout.We have gone through a lot of pots, usually replacing them about every year or two.We bought the Krups 199-47 from Costco about a year ago, it worked very well and held up to the daily beating.Last week my mother in law informed me that the pot was found on the floor and coffee and glass was all over.No one would confess to dropping the pot, and the pot couldn't jump off the counter, or could it?After preparing to order another carafe, I saw the reviews were one star???I read the reviews and realized the pot exploded.Thank you Amazon.I ordered a Braun KF600 today and have a Krups 199-47 with no carafe that is real cheap!!!!Thanks again.
Poor Design. The design is such that when you pour out liquid, some of it seeps into the space between the outer plastic and the vacuum glass container. Then, when one sets the carafe on a counter, the liquid leaks out.This could be a problem with a particular unit or a marginal design
agree with others it doesn't work. tried making some hard candy and it started to caramelize at the 230F point - not good!  i'm going to buy another thermometer from another company
New meaning to the term "thin"!. Description of the comforter does point out that it is lightweight that would be an understatement. More like a poor quality sheet with a bit of down in between the layers.  Made in China of only 74% down.  To state that this comforter has a retail price of $160 is laughable!  Really more of a throw than a comforter.  At $50 it is grossly overpriced!  Look elsewhere
good looking but not so good. I bought these a couple months ago. they are a very good looking set of bottle stoppers but it has only been a couple months with minimal use and I have already noticed major problems.  The first issue is that they do not fit italian bottles of wine, the bottle stoppers will not even go in with force so if you drink mostly or all italian wine you will have no use for these.  The second issue is that of bottles that they do fight it is not a tight fit.  If you put it in the bottle and not move the bottle at all it will not drip but if you rock it back and forth once even lightly a little wine will drip out.  The third issue is with the plating, they seem to be chrome plated but the chrome plating starts to come off after one use.  I used it for a week, when I took it out of the bottle I relized it was either rusted or small amounts of the plating came off, I hand washed it and realized it was permanent.  I have bought many items from amazon.com but this item is unfortunatly the only one I have been compelled to write a nagative review about.  This item is also overpriced
MISLEADING DESCRIPTION!. Please be advised that the description provided herein is misleading - they claim to measure within 0.1 oz increments, when in reality there is no decimal reading on this scale. It measures in 1 oz increments only
Hate it. Easily overheatsShreds badlyDoesn't really chop iceSUPER LOUDI returned min
poor substitute for original PATTON high velocity. Back in the mid 1980's I bought a Patton 14 inch high velocity fan; although this fan i am reviewing uses the same name, it is not at all nearly as good as the original. The original actuallyhad three different speeds ;while this one uses three speeds, they are hardly distinquishable from each other; the original was of heavier gauge and would not topple as easily as this new version.   The original fan model had a fan which cut more deeply because the fins stood out more and hence the original blew the air much more powerfully than this new version. Oh, yes the original's lowest speed was actually quiet whereas none of the speeds on this new version is quiet.  Bad substitute and mediocre fan
Not a good purchase!. After ordering I was very disappointed! I will be sending these back ASAP! I can picture one of my small kids hurting themselves on the sharp corners! Do not buy this flatware..
Sating pillowcases. they are a lovely color, but I don't like the fact they aren't zippered.  They slip off constantly
Doesn't keep my yappy Cairn from barking... He just looks away from where the spray emits--and barks again!It also doesn't work 100% of the time...and we're not sure why.  When we fill it, it seems to work fairly well right after but it either does not have as many sprays as it is supposed to, or it isn't working very long.It does work well for my other small dog who is not such a persistent barker.  Terriers are just too stubborn to care if they're getting sprayed, I guess.
Great idea - poorly executed. The price seemed great and I really liked the modern look. When I took it out of the box got disappointed by how cheap everything looked. Assembly was very easy - it took my boyfriend about 15 minutes (the most). The design is really great - it's very compact, perfect for small spaces and would look awesome if materials were a little bit better. Great idea - poorly executed. Would gladly pay a lil more for this futon if it was a better quality product. My main concern is that the construction seems like it wouldn't last too long. I feel like I should attach "sit carefully" tag to it before anybody comes over
breaks easily. The frother works well as others have said.  Unfortunately, it broke very easily when I dropped it into the sink while cleaning.  I've only had it 3 or 4 months but did not save any warranty info.  This device needs to be made stronger to withstand normal kitchen events
In a word....TERRIBLE!. My parents have a set of Chicago cutlery that they got for their wedding decades ago, and it's still a great set for them.  I bought this set as a starter set until I could upgrade to a better Chicago cutlery set, but I'll never buy another Chicago cutlery set.  The chef's knife rusted after a week.  Now three months later, their all rusted.  The serrated edge is dull and doesn't cut, it tears.  If your thinking of buying this set, regardless of price you would better served spending your money elsewhere
MISLEADING. THE 8 AND 10 INCH FRYING PANS ARE NOT 8 AND 10 INCHES, THEY ARE IN FACT 7 1/4 AND 9 1/4 . WILL NOT BE MISLEAD AGAIN BY THIS COMPANY!!!!
Good in principle. First of all the item is too small.  it is about 1/3 the lenght of a pair pants and 1/3 as wide.  So as you can see it is pretty small.  So it is a lot of moving around and adjusting which causes previously ironed parts to become wrinkled again.It does not make life easier.   good in principle but does not work.
Piece of junk. I have three cats and I own the Litter Mate fully automatic litter box already.  I bought this as a second litter box because it was all I could find and It's a piece of junk.  The rake gets stuck with even very little waste in the box and you have to help it along with either your hand or your foot.  The rake doesn't reach the bottom of the box and I usually have 3/4 of an inch of dried clumped litter stuck to the bottom that I have to scrape out.  I cleaned the box completely out this morning, emptied, cleaned inside and out, dried thoroughly and put all fresh litter in and the rake got stuck with nothing to move. (No, the box isn't overfull of litter either).  After doing research, as soon as this dies (and I suspect it will be very very soon) I'm going to spend the $$ on the Litter Robot.  My fully automatic Litter Mate isn't bad but the rake does require regular cleaning and after a year, it's starting to show it's age and not run as well.  We'll see what I get to replace that when it dies
Pleased at first, only to be sorely dissappointed. I have owned this vacuum for 2 years. It was great at first. Now, with a 3 level house, it is heavy and awkward to lug around and the hose that serves as the main suction shaft gets clogged at the drop of a hat. I have made mess after mess cleaning out clogs in the hose and now it drops dirt everywhere I move it. The main filter wears out really fast and is expensive to replace. If I had to do it all over again, I'd buy something else. Invest more in a better vacuum- not this one
Beware-great idea just not user friendly!. My first one failed in 5 weeks. The clock would reset to three dashes after brewing a pot of coffee. It was replaced with new,even shipped before returned for a $10 charge to my credit card. The carafe doesn't hold the 10 cup max. You end up with coffe on your counter if you brew 10 cups. The internal grinder works well. Its loud so using it early in the am for that first pot is not feasible unless you want to use it a an alarm clock.  The grinder always ends up damp so you  constantly need to dry it off. It would have been a better system if they made the grinder insert optional for brewing coffee. If you try to leave the grinder out of the system it beeps at you and won't do anything. I assume it is safety feature but it is annoying to clean a damp grinder when you don't use it. The best feature is the carafe. You put the top on and that's it. You pour a cup without having to adjust the top and end up spilling hot coffee on you or the counter. It is a little cumbersome getting the last cup out of carafe but  a minor complaint. If it dies again I will get it replaced under warranty if the warranty is done I will not get the exact replacement. I will only get a coffee pot and live with a seperate coffe grinder on the counter next to the coffe pot
DOESN'T HOLD CHARGE. MY 5 YEAR OLD DAUGHTER LOVES THIS VACUUM THE ONLY PROBLE IT DOESN'T HOLD A CHARGE I CHARGE IT OVER NIGHT AND MAYBE LASTS 15 MIN CAN ANYONE HELP....
Defective Product. I had just purchased the humidifier and followed all instructions to set up the system.  After running for 15 seconds, the machine's reset button started to blink, which by the way should only be blinking if it runs out of water.  Staring dumfoundadly at a full water resevoir, I followed their reset procedure only to have the same thing happen again...and again...and again.   When I called customer service, they explained that the only time the reset light will come on is if there's no water left in the resevoir or if there is a mineral build up on the heating element.  I explained that I had just bought the system less than an hour ago so there's no chance that there is a build up of any kind and that the tank is full.  Their response was to return it and bring home another system and try that one.  I am definately returning it, but will not be purchasing another bionaire system, or anything that has the bionaire name printed on it
party only. this item is good for a party setting, not for small gatherings.  The quantities you must mix are large (1 gallon at a time) because otherwise the machine does not work properly.  If you wait to serve the second batch it is watered down because of the amount of ice that you have to put in to make the machine work.  The Margarator works much slower than the directions state.  After 3 unsuccessful attempts to make the perfect batch of margaritas I returned the machine
Look elsewhere. This thing couldn't even penetrate a large can and skipped about on a small can.  This is going back to Amazon even though I have to eat the shipping charges.  An e-mail to Hamilton Beach remains unanswered
Broken, not packaged well. The fiestaware is nice of course, but the item was not packed as well as the other 7 sets I recieved and as a result, was broken.  Amazon was quick to replace it, but it was still an unfortunate situation
Rival No Customer Service. I recieved one of these for Christmas, I would love to tell you how it works.....but it is missing a plastic piece. Now to be fair, I lost it, in the confusion of Christmas it must have gotten tossed. I called Rival to purchase a replacement piece. What a joke. I emailed....no response. I called, they don't know what I am talking about (even though it is clearly listed in the instruction manual), or if I get a rep who does know what the piece is, they say they don't have one to sell, but if I want to pay to ship the unit back and forth,they will replace it. I have left voice mail messages for non-existent supervisors. So, instead of being happy to pay for my own mistake of losing the piece, I will return this to the store as defective and get the money back. They lose a sale, the store loses a sale, they get in return an unhappy former customer and a defective unit. DO NOT BUY RIVAL PRODUCTS, we need to start showing these big companies who hide in voice mail hells that we are tired of poor, illogical treatment
DIDN"T LAST LONG. I'm giving up on coffee grinders.  I had to buy this thing, which didn't last long enough to grind the 39oz. bag of Eight O'Clock beans I bought, because the expensive, super-duper, Cuisinart Grind N' Brew's motor failed.  Save your money on both and grind the beans in the supermarkets machine.  You'll be richer and happier for it
Broke after one use. Beautiful looking but the quality is sub-par to say the least. I had bought this piece along with two bowls which had plastic lids.  This one broke after one use, the lids didn't fit my bowls.  Poor to no quality control in this product
a big mistake. i tried this thermal coffee press - delighted to see it was 1/2 the price of other thermal coffee presses - but in this instant you get what you pay for 1) the coffee doesn't stay as hot as a regular thermos 2) when you press the grains down to the bottom they leak back up into the thermos and your last cup of coffee looks and taste like mud 3) its these times that you wish you bought the item in the store because now i have to pack it back in its box and send it back
Don't bother with this model. Read the description carefully. It states the speaker range is 50' not the microphone. My dog stood 10' away from it and even with the sensitivity on high and her barking right at the thing it wouldn't trigger. Matter of fact I never could get it to trigger with barking. The only time it did go off was when I put the batteries in for the first time and my husband was mowing the lawn on his big riding mower and he knocked into a chicken wire fence which made me run out to get it with the unit in my hand. Even then it didn't go off till I was about 4 feet from the mower.I also couldn't get it to just make the ultrasonic sound. Even when switched from audible to ultrasonic you still hear a noise. Not just me but my husband too so it's not a case of super human hearing on my part :-)Yes the timer option is very nice. This was actually why I purchased this one over the others as we only wanted to stop the night barking. But what good is the timer function if the microphone can't pick up the barking?So read these descriptions carefully when looking at these control units. Unless your dog always barks in the same spot and you can place this unit under 4 feet from them then pick something else.
Biggest Scam ever. These products are the biggest scam ever. They make it seem so easy in 'Meet the Fockers.' However, even if you happen to reach the final stage, cats will not use the bathroom unless there is litter, dirt, or anything else that they can use to cover up their mess. On top of that, whenever you have to go back a stage, you have to buy a new system, due to the fact that you have to cut out the bottom as they progress in stages. Now, I'm stuck with about $50 worth of wasted systems, and I have to buy a new toilet seat, as the current one is covered with feces stains. And I still have to buy a proper litter box..
drawer has no bottom?. too bad the description did not state this was a bottomless drawer, if it had i wouldn't have gone to (4) stores looking for it--finally found and bought(2). beautiful look but is NOT at all functional for me. now, i will return the (1) i built and the other which is still in the box :(  also, the screw for the knob was not the right one, had to find one of my own!! too bad!
T-Fal is T-Bad. I decided to "upgrade" and spend more on a toaster, too. First one did not work properly - one of the wires that holds the toast in didn't move with the lever and the toast tilted to one side and burned. My second one - the wires work but it does not toast evenly at all! Half the time portions are burned, even at a lower setting of 3-4. I don't see it being a whole lot faster, either. I've gone through a half/loaf of bread testing it and I am not happy. I appreciate the reviews on Amazon and checked here to see the comments on this product. It looks like the two good reviews were from a year ago, so perhaps the manufacturing has gotten sloppy. But my old, cheap, unattractive toaster does a better job than this! Do I exchange it again or forget it?
Nice Concept / Poor Performance. I have had nothing but problems with the way this mug seals.  The threads are insufficient when it comes to securing the lid in place.  Many times I have been carrying the mug and had the lid come loose spilling hot coffee all over myself and the carpet
Everlasting Treats - Wrong size. I ordered the product and thought I was getting the large size.  I called the shipper, no returned calls and I can't really use the item shipped as I needed the large item.How do I return, the shipper doesn't return the calls.  Not a happy customer of this product
Not Sateen!. Even though it says that these are Sateen, they are not.  I sent them back because they weren't and could find no indication that they were.  For the money though, the sheets seemed to be nice and Amazon did a pretty good job of refunding my money promptly
18 months to failure. We have owned one of these for 18 months.  It has never done a great job of blending our fruit smoothies, but my wife wanted it to match the other KA appliances.  Yesterday it failed, while trying to chop up some frozen strawberriies & OJ.  I removed the jar & saw that the teeth on the drive coupling had broken off. Take a good look at the drive coupling.  Its made of a hard rubber.  This is going to be a failure point if you buy this blender.I would recommend loooking at another brand
Great look, if that's all you want. I gave this toaster a 2 star rating because it does look great, which bumped it from one star.  However, from day one all it does is burn anything that goes into it, even at it's lowest setting.  Nice bagel setting but it too burns the one side to a crisp.  Not worth the money and I'm embarrassed I spent so much on a toaster thinking the DeLonghi name was worth it.  It wasn't.  Going back to a $20 toaster....
Shame on Henckels. Beware, these scissors are low quality, not what you would expect from Henckels.  They are manufactured in Korea and China with cheap, uncomfortable plastic handles.  I own a genuine pair of Henckels kitchen shears which I purchased at Macy's about 20 years ago.  They are still in great condition and work perfectly.  This is the type of quality that I was hoping for when I purchased this 5-piece set. Unfortunately, what I got was a set of cheap imitations. I returned my order.  Don't make the same mistake that I made
Not what I expected. I thought this would help soften our very firm mattress, it worked for maybe 5 minutes then I was sleeping in a hole... Your body just sinks down into this and all the padding goes out to the side.  Just a waste of money.
Neanderthals Designed This BBQ. Robust construction throughout, but really lacks some subtle niceties that are found in less expensive BBQs. There's only two grill height settings and you cant easily change heights when the grill is hot and cooking (the grill surface itself flips over to cause the height change). There is a door provided to stoke the coals that appears to be a needless feature. The hibachi's feet are not insulated and can get pretty hot, so beware of placement on high-value surfaces. The draft door is heavy and easily separates from the body. The heavy door already tagged me once on the foot as I was emptying the BBQ of ash. Really?, I'd give it a 5 out of 10 for usefullness as compared to other hibachis that I've used in the past. Conclusion: the making of a cheap, convenient, and efficient cast iron Hibachi BBQ may very well be a lost art
Flimsy. Does not sharpen particularly well. Furthermore, the cheap, flimsy plastic cover constantly comes off when you drag the knife through.Definitely not recommended
The shortest life!. Everything negative that is in all the other writen ratings are very true. I had this coffeemaker for 3 months and impressive to look at but horrible to use and died on me in 3 months of home use. I am a homemaker and a die hard coffee drinker, 12 to 20 cups a day. This pot couldn't stand up to making 3 pots of coffee a day. It did not brew or keep the coffee hot enough and took much to long to warm up and brew a pot. DO NOT PURCHASE THIS COFFEE MAKER! You will be sorry. I don't know how to return it as I threw out the box two months ago and purchased it online while stationed overseas. Yesterday I purchased two of the new model Cuisanart 12 cup programmable makers. I can now brew two pots at the same time and much faster. The cuisanart pots let me regulate the coffee carafe temperatures and brew a great cup of coffee, are self cleaning, auto shut off 0-4 hours(you choose), an alarm/beep to let you know when the pot is finished brewing and are half the price. I purchased two for the price of one Waring Coffee Maker. I will never purchase another Waring product...
Ripoff. These glasses sold for $23.99 on Amazon only days ago.  Now they've jacked the price up by $10.  What a ripoff!  I'll never shop Amazon again!!
HOOVER FLAIR CLEANER WITH POWER NOZZLE. This is by far the worst hoover cleaner I have ever owned and I have had many over a long time span. After ten minutes or so the broom motor heats up and you have to wait at least twenty minutes for it to cool down so you can start using it again. I have never had this happen with any other Hoover electric broom, so I called Hoover and they said that this model is only meant to be used 20 MINUTES PER WEEK and only for quick pickups. No where does their literature say this on the box or in the manual inside the box. This product is a completely useless item if you want to use it on a daily basis. I purchased it for bare floors, not carpet, yet it has a rolling brush for carpet use. The box says is provides "effective carpet and bare flooring cleaning, " but they don't tell you it can only be used for 20 minutes a week as I was told by their customer service rep. Poor product from a company I always trusted
Not impressed. This foil cutter requires more effort (a stronger squeeze) than it really ought to, and too much turning.  The built-in foil cutter on my "Boomerang" brand waiter's corkscrew works more reliably, and requires less effort, and the whole corkscrew hardly costs more than this foil cutter.I had expected that a purpose-built, standalone foil cutter would excel at the task, but this device came up short
The Handle is Quality, but the Whisk...?. It's weird. The handle is so nicely designed with rubbery grips and that handsome "Emeril" logo, then you have the whisk part which is kind of cheaply made rough plastic which loses it's shape easily. You'd hope the manufacturers would put the same effort into the actual whisk as they did in the handle, but not here.It's not a bad whisk for the price, but if you want a nice whisk and are willing to spend a couple more dollars, buy something else.
Table top missing, base only arrive and it was broken. The base arrived broken. The box was marked 2 of 2. I did not recieve 1 of 2. I have a table base but no table top. Also, the base was poorly packed and arrive broken. I will attempt to reorder. This aprears to be reoccuring theme.
I could have done a better job with a straw. This vac is an absolute hunk o'Junk!1)It over heats and turns itself off (after only 10 minutes of vacuuming) and it will not restart for at least 45 minutes.2)The dust cup or containment compartment is MESSY and difficult to empty, when removed it creates a huge dust cloud over the waste basket.3)I am convinced the replacement filters for this machine do not exsist, I have found not one retailer who sells this product that carries the filters.4) And as for trying to contact Euro-Pro, the maker of this marvelous machine, you can let the unit cool while you are on hold with customer service
NOT "Ultra Quiet". I see other reviews to the contrary, but the one we got was FAR from silent.  The other attributes of this pet drinking fountain appear to be accurate.  The sound level, however, is more like a coffee grinder than a 'silent' fountain. We checked all the applicable trouble-shooting tips, such as making sure the pump was properly secured to the bottom on its suction cups, and also making sure there was sufficient water in the system for the pump to function properly. Still, quite loud. The cat reacted to it like it was a killer robot from space. Returned it and got the Drinkwell, which also has some pump noise, but it is well masked by the sound of the splashing water, which seems to appeal to the kitty, rather than repelling her.
Gaggia Espresso Machine-. The machine works as advertised but I was very dissapointed in the quality of construction.  While I fully understood that the machine was constructed of plastic and not metal i did expect that the plastic pieces comprising the body of the machine to properly fit together.  The machine was a gift and so I could not return it otherwise I WOULD HAVE
Zax mixing bowl set. I received my bowls today and was very disappointed.  How bowls this size can be referred to as "mixing" bowls I cannot fathom.  Neither do I know what could be mixed in bowls so small.  The second from the largest bowl is about the size of a normal cereal bowl. The bowls nest so the largest bowl holds the "cereal" bowl and the next to the smallest bowl nests in the cereal bowl.  The smallest bowl is a joke.  I doubt it would hold an extra large egg without running over.  The material is nice...melamine... and colorful but those are the only positive statements I can make
NOT "Scientific" -- NOT a Positive Training Tool. Before you buy into the hype and purchase an item you'll eventually discard (if you love your dog, that is) you should know that dogs hate this device. It feels totally unnatural to them. Its so-called "scientific" design is based on the way a supposed alpha wolf enforces his authority by aggressively gripping a subordinate around the muzzle with his teeth. (Nice, huh?) Since we now know that the alpha theory is false, the rationale behind this torture device for dogs is equally bogus. (Wild wolf packs do not form dominance hierarchies or spend time trying to show each other who's boss by grabbing each other around the snout; such behaviors are only produced when wolves are forced to form unnatural packs while living in captivity.) A device that mimics a totally unnatural act of aggression cannot be considered positive.As a dog trainer, and just as a human being who loves dogs and hates to see them being mistreated, I cannot stress strongly enough that this device should not be used on any dog, ever.So what do you do to keep your dog from pulling? Dogs don't really pull on the leash so much as they get pulled on by things in the environment that stimulate and attract their instincts. So the trick to training a dog NOT to pull is to play games that will make YOU more interesting and more appealing to his instincts than the things in the environment are.
my own fault... for not shopping around. it is easier to take things back to a local retailer  if you think something is wrong with a product.  i believe the sharpener wheels are misaligned  so the knives are being unevenly sharpened.  it does take off metal.  i'm going to do more practicing  and not on my top of the line knives.
Bad Choice. Unfortunately, I didn't read the other review prior to purchase, but I agree 100% - sheets are NOT soft, instead they are rough!!  NO WAY can these be 600 thread count Egyptian Cotton Sateen
It would have been so easy for them to do much better!. This cooker makes wonderful rice.  I don't find it especially slow--slightly slower than cooking on the stove, but not much.  The rice has great texture and flavour.  The product is not particularly difficult to clean.  An excellent nonstick pot means you get the rice skin in your food rather than having it stick to the pot, but in some circles the skin is a delicacy.  Basically, not bad.But the electronics are pathetic.  Given how easily Sanyo could have done better, I'm harsh in my criticism:First: there is no audible notice when your rice is done.  It cooks for a while and then it stops.  It only counts down the last ten minutes (it does not know initially how long the rice will take because, presumably, more rice takes longer and it has to sense how much rice there is (which it does quite well)).  But this means that you can't even reliably set a kitchen timer!  Not that you should have to--there's quite a sophisticated computer in there, and it would add no complexity and little hardware to make it beep!  But no, you just have to watch the unit.Second: there is a nice "steam" feature, but it is not possible to use that with a timer.  The manual helpfully advises that you time steaming by hand, which is difficult because while the machine knows when the water starts to boil, it doesn't tell you!  You have to watch or listen for steam.  At least the "slow cook" feature lets you time things (in increments of a half hour; think all-day stew).Third, I'm partial to 24-hour clocks, but I'm used to 12-hour clocks.  This unit has neither: it mostly follows 12-hour conventions, but noon is 0:00, not 12:00.  This is more logical (a numbering system that goes from 0 to 12- rather than from 1 to 13- as is the convention) but I've done double-takes a few times because 0:00 is midnight in the 24-hour world.  Why Sanyo thought it a good idea to use _neither_ of the standard clock formats, but rather invent their own, is a mystery.Fourth (only for the somewhat absent-minded): the unit does not shut off when you open the lid.  When your rice is cooked the unit enters "keep warm" mode, which is great, but even when the lid is opened and the bowl removed the unit stays in that mode until I start to wonder why my kitchen feels warm.  The "keep warm" light is probably more obvious if you're not as tall as I am, and I suppose some people will serve some rice, close the unit, eat, go back for more rice...  at least an audible warning that the unit is still on upon lid open/close would be nice.Fifth: The control panel resets to its default ("white rice") after each use.  There's a battery backup for the clock and I leave mine plugged in anyway, so the machine could easily remember the last thing you did (I almost always cook brown rice), but it doesn't.Sixth: of course a holster for the provided spatula wouldn't be a bad idea, but that's minor.In summary: it makes very good rice, but Sanyo cut many stupidly trivial corners
Not reliable. My second Aeroccino is now not working.  The first one just completely died and this one will only stay on for a couple of seconds before turning off.  I believe that Nespresso needs to overhaul the whole machine before subjecting the public to it!!  Especially, at the price they are charging
This heater is terrible compared to 2 Vornados I bought 5 yrs ago. The written description of this heater led me to believe that it would perform like the 2 5-yr-old Vornado models that are the best electric heaters I've ever had.  The VH2 has major flaws.  It's single fan speed is way too fast, causing heated air to be cool/cold within 10 ft of the heater.  The fan cannot be slowed down.  The thermostat causes the fan to stop and start in ridiculously short intervals; thereby wasting energy I believe.  Finally, the thermostat is set so that when at the highest (hottest) setting it doesn't allow the heater to bring even the immediate area around it to more than 70 degrees F.I've had the heater &lt;1 mo and will attempt to return it for a full refund in another wk or 2 as soon as I have an alternative brand in my home
QUALITY NOT WHAT EXPECTED. THE LARGE FRY PAN NOT NON STICK, NOT MATTER WHAT YOU COOK IN IT, STICKS
Too much type, substandard product, too high a price. Does not keep beverage warm for a long enough time. Construction is cheap and does not deserve the price.
Poor Customer Service. I received my Granos as a birthday present two years ago.  As had already been reported here, the machine is great--when it works.  I thought I was the only one who had leak problems but most everyone who wrote a review here reported the same problem. Leak from the bottom and leak from the water container.I called customer service to report the problem and they sounded like they've never heard of the problem.  They asked me to return the machine but I didn't bother.  A good customer service should have already heard the problem before customers call.A $600 espresso machine should last more than two years.  I can't believe a company like Bodum is not concerned about its product.  I'm buying another espresso machine and it's not going to be Bodum again
not worth it. I bought this item along with the bookcase and nightstand for my 8 year old.  It has made me rethink ever buying furniture that needs to be assembled again.  I spent my whole Sunday putting the thing together.  The knobs come apart very easily I have lost 4 so far.  I will just replace them they look cheap anyway.  You can see the metal casing through the glass.  You definately get what you pay for it is a cute dresser but its not worth the aggrevation.  The nightstand was a breeze and the bookshelf was better.  Plan about 4 hours for this project and expect to be disappointed.
Need a drip pan to set under entire oven. I bought this oven recently. It is cheaply made but most of the functions do a fair job. All except the rotisserie; when used, grease runs from the unit onto the countertop even though the unit is level and the drip tray is not full. I was very dissapointed. I contacted them via email today, they say they will get with me in 24 hrs. We'll see
Janet. Well I guess you get what you pay for, this thing is very hard to put togather, as usual when something is made cheap the screw's never seem to fit, trying to get the wheels to stay on is another disaster.If you don't have the equipment to get this thing together FORGET it!Think I'll just get a shopping cart already assembled
Works but probably won't last long. After 36 years my all metal corkscrew came apart in my hands.  This one is flimsy in comparison and there is no way that I think it will last even 20 years
Bad Service. I never received this mixer. I ordered it in good faith and was told it was in stock-what happened? Did you sell it to someone else
Under counter lights. They take batteries but don't last 15 minutes.  They have an ac spot for and adapter but where do you plug a undercounter light in under the counter.  Hate them
no 3/4 cup or 2/3 cup cups!. We should have thought about it when we ordered, I guess, but this set doesn't include 2 of the most commonly used cups, which is too bad.  We gave ours to good will and ordered a different set, alas... Other than that, though, the quality is very good
Great, but NOT so great!. I used this thermometer for 3 weeks, and fell completely in LOVE with it!  It worked great on Chicken, pork loin, steak, everything....  But, like many other users it eventually starting reading HIGH for the temperature and completely farted out on me!  I'm reluctant to buy a new one, since I hear this is a common problem with users of the TruTemp product.  What to do?
Cleans OK, but VERY LOUD and tricky filter. This vacuum cleans reasonably well, but I have a few significant gripes which will prevent me from buying a similar model when making my next vacuum purchase, which seems to about every 2 years. I've finally decided that we may go with an "heirloom" vacuum next time, such as an Oreck, since the lifetime of any sub $100 vacuum is just ridiculous.My complaints:1. This thing screams like a banshee! It is indeed light, and reasonably powerful, but it literally hurts my ears to use it in small rooms. It does not roar, it emits a relatively high pitched scream. I have had big, small, and medium size vacuums, and this thing easily is louder than all of them. I haev a 2 1/2 horsepower Shop Vac which is much quieter than this vacuum.2. Wheels barely extend below the bottom of the vacuum, so it requires a bit of effort to roll over anything but very short carpet. Wheeling from room to room, say over hardwood while tipping the vacuum back, also cannot really be done.3. The filter is hard to clean, as it has a flange that extends down over maybe 1/3 of one side. I often have to stick my finger in the space between the filter and the flange to get a significant amount of gunk out. Gross. Tell me how this is better than a bag
Stay Away From This!!!!!!. Didn't BLACK & DECKER mean the finest, ruggedest, equipment, one could find??Mine stopped making toast after about a dozen uses, and shortly after, the top heating coil stopped working.This is an appliance with a shelf-life of 6 months,,,,,,,,,absolutely amazing,,,,,,
1 star for A-. mazon. I ordered 4 for xmas dinner, was sent three and they cancelled the 4th one saying the will never get it in.  Thanks Amazon
Correlle Simple Lines Dinnerware from Amazon. I have never received this product.  It has been sent to me in 4 separate shipments over the past 3 months and has never arrived.  Tracking the items indicates that the USPS receives it damaged and returns it to Amazon.  It's been very disappointing, inasmuch as I asked my friends to give me Amazon gift certificates for my birthday, so that I could buy it from Amazon.  It's now carried by Target, and I could buy it there, but Amazon won't turn my gift certificates into cash, so that I could use the cash to buy the items instead of waiting for it to arrive at my local post office damaged again.  I have re-ordered using my gift using my certificates again.  Let's keep our fingers crossed
Guarenteed leakproof lid and drinkproof. Beautiful mug and the coffee stays hot. When they say leakproof lid, however, they really mean it. Even in the open position NOTHING comes out!!! Can't figure out if it is possible to adjust the lid. We have to drink our beverages with the lid off which defies to whole purpose of "travel mugs". I took advantage of the 5 year warrenty and the replacements had the same problem. Apperently as the gasket on the lid heats up it expands. Then the seal is just as tight as if it were in the closed position. We are very unhappy with this product and I wish to give it -5 Stars
Already broken!. Bought this toaster less than two months ago and it's already broken. The control buttons (one of the reasons why we bought it) are not functioning, neither is the darkness control knob. Once it's put into the toast position, it does not shut off, you have to push up the lever manually. My son put in some Toaster Swirls only to set off the smoke alarm. This is the second time a product (a rice cooker)from this brand has broken within months of purchase. I'm just going to avoid Oster at all costs in the future
It's Plastic!. I'm sending it back immediately. No where in the description of the product did it say it was plastic, and I don't feel I should be charged for return postage
The worse vacuum !!!. I just want to say "Please don't buy this vacuum" Here is why:1. When I vacuum on hardwood floors, the dirt would shoot out from the back of the vacuum itself.  Make my job twice as hard.  It does not do that on carpet, though.2. It is heavy.3. The cable is short, and so I have to keep on moving it to different plug in the other room.4. It blows air everywhere and so when I tried to vacuum my golden retriever's hair I decided it's better to use a broom instead.5. It is not wide enough.You really get what you buy for a 'cheap' vacuum, don't expect much from it!!
Terrible Product. I think this product is terrible.  The first time I put my 40# golden retriever in it she tore through the mesh liner in 1 hour (the time I was gone) and got out.  It is not durable at all!!!I am very disappointed.
Dont waste your time unless you like thin cheap looking flatware. Very thin and it does not look as nice as it does on the internet. I dont think it would hold up for very long since it is so thin.
doesn't work. I had high hopes from reading reviews on this product, but it has not worked for me. Waste of money
Broke. We bought three of these machines for a classroom quilt project. They were so poorly made that I am returning all three to buy ONE machine that costs a little more. You are much better off going with a more expensive machine- this one is very cheap in every sense of the word
My husband has a FIT with these. These shakers are adorable. Very small and cute... BUT, unless you look closely at them, it's very easy to mix them up. My husband has fits over them and swears he'll find a way to mark them "S" and "P" if I don't switch them out. Often we'll use the larger range shakers by Fiesta instead of these. Buy the range shakers instead of these if you can find them. I bought mine from Amazon
One word for this and it starts with S. Come back here and write a review as soon as you get over feeling foolish for not having listened to these reviews
What a messy thing!. I was disappointed in this product.  The butter slid out of the bell and into the water.  I think it would be better if the inside of the bell wasn't glazed
INCOMPLETE TABLE. The table arrived with only a base and no table top.  I am waiting for a response to see why this keeps happening.  i am very unsatisfied with the product
"Red Stuff"  WARNING!. Believe it or not there was red stuff inside!!!!!Today I unscrew my "Brita Ultra Faucet Filter System". Well, I was shocked to discover that  inside the faucet mount and on both water mouths there was red stuff growing.I called Brita and was told that it is not the product, SINCE IT IS NOT EVEN DESIGNED TO FILTER OUT BACTERIA, it must be the water. Long story short: Brita still pushes it product on people who doesn't know better.This product is poorly designed and drains bad, therefore bacteria or other nasty things could multiply in it. Since it doesnt filter out bacteria the scenario is not a pleasant one.IF you buy this system it means that you dont know a lot about water filters and what you want to filter out. Neither did I, you have to be a chemist to understand the lingo.Stay away since this product may be harmfull to your health by its poor quality.
Piece of Junk. I purchased this when it first came out on the market thought it would be great for just one cup of coffee in the morning. Purchased the cappicino pods from the home cafe website and wanted to try those, they didnt fit. The top of the machine after you put in the pod wouldnt shut. Called customer service and was told yes they knew there was a problem and there engineers were working on it, took my name and number and said they would get back to me when they had it fixed.  That's been over a year ago.  My question, why sell the pods online or even the coffeemaker if they knew there was a problem???  Now all my coffeemaker does is leak all over the place.  This is going into the trash today, dont waste your money on this coffeemaker, spend a little more and get something you know will work
Horrible. The lids do not seal properly, and everything leaks when you are trying to pour the jello into the molds
liar. this product did not come with all that was advertised
Didn't work for me, but your mileage may vary. I bought this device in the hope of eliminating or significantly reducing the noise emanating from my neighbor's mutt.  The offending dog is often left on the neighbor's porch, where it harasses just about every living thing that passes by.Before ordering, I had read varying accounts of its range in terms of how close the unit must be to the dog in order to attain the desired effect.  In my case, the neighbor's porch is about 35 to 60 feet aware from mine.  Unfortunately, this was not "too close for comfort" as far as the dog was concerned.Having read a number of very mixed reviews of this and similar devices, I was not overly optimistic about the prospect of it actually working.  Alas, it did not.  Some dogs just don't hear them.  In my case, it was probably due at least in part to the distance.My suggestion is to go ahead and pick up one of these devices if and only if you are within 20' of the target.  If it doesn't work, go ahead and return it to the manufacturer for a refund (which is exactly what I did).  By the way, you don't need an RA (AKA RMA) number to return the device.  Just send it to the company along with your receipt, and a note saying that you would like a refund (not an exchange).(...)  I sympathize with anyone having this problem, and wish you all the best of luck.  No one deserves to have their peace and quiet disturbed without good reason, and the argument that "dogs bark" simply does not hold any water
very tiny bowls. These are not at all what I was expecting.  To me, these are tiny bowls -- they measure 5 1/4 inches across top.  [...
bsrk control collar for small dogs. We bought the PetSafe collar for small dogs who bark entirely too much.  It is made of a rigid plastic in a round shape that will not conform to the neck of any of our 3 Maltese.  This particular collar is meant to stay on the voice box area or it won't work.  Unfortunately, because it's rigid, it slides up a dog's neck very easily.  I have worked with fabric and then with foam rubber trying to pad the sides so it can't slide.  Even when I can barely get a bit of fingertip between the prong and neck so that it feels too snug and is also snug on the sides, it only takes minutes for it to start sliding out of position.  A shrug, a shake, or simply walking a few steps is all it takes.  This is a one piece molded plastic unit and for our dogs, is not going to work.  It should also be noted that if you have a nuisance barker who barks at any sound or sight, it may be effective but if you have a dog that barks at a family member, this is NOT a good solution as a shock collar may well result in more problems.  The dog now has another negative association to the person.  Consult a trainer or behaviorist before buying.F. Quall
Not functional, poor quality... Not functional, bought it as a gift and could not give it after looking at it and trying to put a roll of paper towels on it.  Impossible to use -the rod and rod top and base are not aligned properly nor made properly. Also, it came in a box that was damaged and taped together (not the shipping box, the Polder box that the product comes in)...looks like someone returned it previously (probably for the same reasons) and it was then sent to me.  I still have it because I was not able to return it within the 30 days alloted. Time to throw it out - waste of money
ignored the negative reviews. wanted it so bad!. I saw this item in Consumer Reports. Checked it out on Hoovers web-site and had to get it. self cleaning filter! bagless!lifetime belt! super cool handle that detatches and becomes wand!by far the best features of all vacuums.i read the reviews at Amazon about the messiness and more importantly the self cleaning filter breaking almost immediatly and i was concerned so I called a Hoover sales/service center. They assured me that that glitch was on earlier production models and had been corrected. i bought it and wow!! that baby could clean a carpet!! i loved all of the features! i even celebrated when the cleaning lady didn't show up so i could use the vacuum!! less than 1 week later the rotating filter started jamming---rendering the machine useless. couldn't get anyone at Hoover to pick up the phone. Returned to Amazon and am getting the Hoover electronic bagless canister that, at last count, had over 180 reviews--most of them positive. Shame on Hoover!!!!!!
Not The Same Stemware As Before. These 'Vino Grande Chardonnay' glasses are less in volume and shorter in height than the Spiegeleau stemware previously sold under the same name.
unreliable, inaccurate. We have one of these... actually two... and they consistently give inconsistent ratings--we couldn't figure out what temp our aquarium was really at, since when the heater kicked on was unrelated to what the thermometer said, and as we moved one around the aquarium it would vary by as much as 10 degrees and so when we got one for our second tank and found IT had inconsistent results too, we put the two thermometers next to each other--just 1/2 inch apart, and they're typically about 8 degrees different. I have no idea which--if either--is accurate, or whether they both fade into and out of accuracy
spend your money on a higher quality kitchen cart. If your looking for kitchen cart then keep looking.The kitchen cart was missing pieces, which the manufaturer took 9 days to ship to me. Then when they arrived one was defective, as in I had to bust out a hand saw to fix it.Another problem was that the packaging material stuck to the kitchen cart and was pain to remove. Also, the stickers denoting the pieces stuck to the cart to well, there are stickers that use modern adhesive technology and do NOT require 20 minutes of elbow grease to remove.Lastly the gap between the drawers of the lower cabinet is twice the size of what the picture shows and the top drawer does not close in a flush manner (i.e. no gap at the top of the drawer and a 3mm gap at the bottom).All in all I feel like I should have billed someone for my time.This cart turned into a huge pain
Not worth it's money. very bad metal quality. Easy oxidize with white patina after every wash. First few grounded peaces always have black color.Not worth buying
Don't Believe the Hype. Even the Ginsu is sharp and easy to use out of the box--at a fraction of the price. And it, too, has a lifetime guaratee :)Seriously, if you want to "cook like Rachael Ray" and invest in your first good knife set, go to the store and handle several different brands and types before deciding to spend the money on these.  There are better quality knives available at this price.  Learn about what the knives are made of (Steel vs. Stainless steel ALLOY) and how they're made.I sincerely hope that fans aren't purchasing these over-priced knives because they are endorsed by Rachael Ray, instead of investing in quality German or Japanese-made knives available for close to the same price -- that are used by true Chefs.If Rachael Ray respects her audience, she'd educate her viewers about knives instead of making money off of them, hawking mediocre knives at a premium price.
Okay for occasion home use, hard to clean, unsanitary. My wife and I do a lot of volunteering catering for the local elementary school.  We also direct our school PTA's hospitality services.  That requires large amounts of food prep on a monthly basis for all the events requiring food.This Rival slicer was relatively cheap and did a good first job, making quick work on items that need to be sliced thin.  It's good for the less skilled cooks out there who aren't skilled with a knife, as well as for even good chefs that need to do large volume tasks with common items like luncheon meat, ham, or other cold cuts.But it's certainly no commercial Hobart slicer, and it won't produce the same quality of results.  The blade is quickly dulled if attempting to slice a semi-frozen roast to produce thin raw beef for say, Philly Cheese Steak or for Vietnamese Noodles.  Also, the design catches meat underneath which festers unless you disassemble the entire under carriage and remove the gunk underneath and disenfect.I debated whether to give this product 2 or 3 stars, and while it does come in handy for occasional home use, I'm experienced with a knife and have decent knives and professional sharpening equipment.  In the time it takes to break this out and slice and do the clean up, I can out-produce this by hand about 2:1.  But that still would warrant 3 stars in my book, but I had to lower the rating to 1-star because of the residue and trapped meat and sinews that the undercarriage causes.  I don't know who designed it, but being a very highly trained in mechanical engineering, this seems like classic idiotic American slap-together design and get it out in the low-end marketplace to stupid comsumers who don't know any better.  Rival is basically asking for a lawsuit, not because people will cut themselves in this case, but because the undercarriage traps stuff and to remove it, you really have to remove components that aren't user serviceable and even then, it's still hard to clean.  Ever since the first use, I've diligently disassembled the under carriage, exposing some electrical wiring, and cleaned out the residue left by the slicing process.And yes, the gears are plastic as another reviewer noticed.  If you use your slicer often, the blade dulls quickly, and the motor will work harder and this will damage the gears sooner.What happens if you're less mechanically inclined and don't clean the slicer like I do?  Well, we had only one ant problem last summer in the house and it was because they found the mostly cleaned slicer boxed and placed on a rack, then found the residue and proceeded to invite a million sister ants to come in and feast on it.  Try as we might to disassemble and clean it, more residue kept coming out and the ants would not relent and kept attacking the slicer.  I ended up doing a nearly full disassembly and submersive cleaning of the slicer components (except for motor) and to repackage the slicer in knew plastic with Windex spray on the exterior of the box to neutralize the formic acid of the ants.As a scientist, engineer and volunteer cook, I'd recommend that people stay away from this product, unless they like to disassemble the whole thing and then spend an hour wiping and disenfecting the thing after each use.
Oxo Good Grips Tea Kettle. the tea kettle has a nice shape and the whistle works fine, but the inside of the spout began to rust within the first month.
Impossible to review. I cannot comment on the product itself because apparently it is not available for sale although it is listed as such.  Availability of the item is so intrinsically tied to its value to a customer that it is inappropriate to exclude comments related to such.  Although I ordered the item on December 10th as a Christmas present, it has yet to ship, no reason is given, and now the estimated delivery date is Feb 14-21-  great product, right
Not worth anything. These cheap plastic pieces of junk are not worth anything.  Avoid them at all cost.
not what i expected. i expected better durability out of this fan. It died after just 3 months, and had flow problems from day one.  I tried contacting Lasko but got no responses.
sucks-don't waste your $. streaks and scratched the front of my dishwasher. Does a very poor job.
not Quiet t all. In reality, this humidifier is quite noisy. Even on the lowest speed I have to put it in the farest corner of the house so we can sleep.I don't understand why is it so difficult to balance a fan...This Humidifier is made in China by Kaz and Honeywell puts it's reputation in jeopardy by outsourcing to Kaz.In addition, occasionally humidifier fails to start (probably fan gets stuck and I have to turn it by hand).$8-$12 Filter gets mold in 2-3 months and needs to be replaced
color matters. If this is in a jade or perhaps brick...other earth colors, let me know. why waste everyone's time with such a lame description
Good for an Area of 1'x1'. I bought this from Home Depot for $12.59.  I was mainly curious what kind of heat I could get out of a machine that was less that $13.  With the fan set on high, and the temp. at max, this unit heats up about 1' directly in front of the fan, and about 1-2' directly above it.  So, unless you just want to set it on the floor and warm up your feet, I would say use that $13 and put it towards another heater........I will be returning it tomorrow.  Hopefully this will save some people some trouble and now you know what to expect
Might have been good if... The packaging hadn't been so pathetic. The tiny pieces of styrofoam, that failed to cushion the fridge during shipping,  led to a fridge that arrived leaking coolant. The cooling part of the unit had come dislodged from the frame, and one of the pipes was broken and leaking. PLUS there was no crisper drawer included. I won't be buying a replacement from Sanyo!!
Buy with caution. I orinally posted a very sarcastic review of this product, but when I contacted the seller, I was given a full refund.  Therefore, I will say they have good customer service, but I still don't think the product is useful for storing magazines.  They are made of a plastic that is simply not rigid enough to support a stack of magazines.
retractable leads. The case on one of the leads came apart within about two to three weeks.  The other one is still in tack but now I don't trust it
TWO broken carafes. Great coffee, and a convenient size, but the carafes keep breaking on me! I used the original carafe just a few times before it broke. I ordered a replacement, and was extra careful when handling it (especially when washing it). I used the carafe maybe five times before it broke. These things just seem to spontaneously combust. The carafes are $12 a piece, so it's not worth replacing again. ARGH
DO NOT BUY!!!. DO NOT BUY - you will have problems with Innova cookware like everybody else does and Innova will not do anything about it!!!INNOVA SELLS FAULTY COOKWARE DOESN'T HONOR WARRANTY!!!I would give Innova line of cookware 0 stars if I could because there is absolutely nothing positive about it. When I first got this pot it seemed ok. But after enamel started chipping off (very common problem with Innova cookware, as I later discovered), I contacted customer service and all they told me was:"That would not be covered by the warranty because it does not affect the function of the cookware."One line, no "sorry", "thank you" or whatever. Not to mention this ridiculous and dirty way to dishonor warranty.DO NOT BUY or you will be giving your money to thiefs
Bark stop ... NOT. It appears that the Viatek product (Bark Stop Pro) is related to the Lentek design (PC16 ; ASIN: B0002Q89O6) - they are based on a common design by a Lentek engineer. I have used (tried) the Viatek Bark Stop Pro and it definitely DOES NOT work. My experience was the same as another reviewer of the Lentek PC16 who noted that the unit only works on the "Audible" setting - dogs will at least perk up their ears at the high pitch tone ; they completely ignore whatever is emitted on the "Ultrasonic" setting. Furthermore, it is often activated by extraneous noises like birds, banging doors, wind noise, etc.This really poor functionality is due to either poor design or poor construction / quality. I've tried two different units and they both do NOT work.The negative reenforcement concept could work if only these devices were tuned to the noise environment and could filter out all except the actual barks.
Making toast like an old "I Love Lucy" episode. Nice looking toaster, makes good toast, but one MAJOR problem that I've had.  When making toast, especially when only making one slice, the slice pops right out of the toaster. If I'm not there to catch it, (like that old "I Love Lucy" episode where Lucy always catches the toast from the toaster, when making Ricky breakfast), I end up picking my toast up from the counter, or sometimes the floor.  Unfortunately there's no way to correct this without having to go through the hassle of having it repaired, so I guess I'm stuck with this "projectile toaster".  By the way President Bush, I think I might have found one of those "weapons of mass destruction"
Nice idea but........... I thought this pillow would be the answer! Its a great idea but one insert is to flat, two inserts is ok, all three memory foam inserts are way to much. And pillow ear? Oh my aching ears, I have had pillow ear pain before but never like this. I am not sure my ears will ever be the same, and sadly, I probably have to stop using this pillow! It needs help :
Corroding ring. Not only does the cap not seal, but once the rubber sealing ring that surrounds the cap rips and corrodes off, as it did on mine after 2 months, then the only thing the shaker is good for is measuring recipes. I had to find a new bottle to store the dressing in, and the MIU Dressing Shaker is now collecting dust in my cupboard
CFF-900 Stainless-Steel Chocolate Fondue Fountain. Aweful.  Noisy, did not warm not to mention get hot.  Seller should scrap this product
10 inch Fagor gasket. I was shipped the 12 inch size gasket which does not fit the 10 inch lidand needs to be returned. Please advise as to how I can exchange this forthe proper size item
A dissapointed buyer. I bought this safe less than six months ago, and here I am, searching for another safe box again.At first, the key was stuck, and after many, many tries, I manage to loosen up the key and use it.  Now, I am using just security codes.  And whenever I enter the codes, it does not open or close on first, second attempts.  It opens after I keep trying.  Pretty much, it's not reliable.  It can not handle daily use, and over time wear and tear.  I have changed the batery twice.  And I only had it for less than six months
Does not work nearly as well as the original. After reading the other reviews, I am wondering if I have a defective model.  Here is our experience with this machine:We've had a floormate since 2001. We loved our original floormate, so when it conked out, we bought this model. It DOES NOT clean the floors, at all! The "new and improved" brushes don't even touch the floor most of the time. It doesn't suck up the excess water as well as the older one, so you're basically just pushing dirty water around the floor. We are so dissapointed, we've went back to cleaning on our hands and knees
Won't Stand Behind Product. At first, we loved this ultra quiet vacuum cleaner. After one year, however, it started sounding like a jet engine. The turbo-nozzle had broken. I live in a major city and no one within the city limits services these things, and when I ordered a new turbo nozzle, they sent a mini. It turns out that the actual replacement nozzle, listed at $29.99 a year ago, now costs $125.00! The explanation I got was "Prices are subject to change without notice." Now I'm stuck with a 5-inch mini turbo nozzle and my wife is going to kill me. Plus the cord, which used to snap back into the cannister at the touch of a button, creeps in while we're vacuuming--and when we press the button too. I love it at first, but I'll never buy another Electrolux. It's not well made, and they don't stand behind their product.
Not what I expected!. The heater does  not function well.  The foot button is very diffifult to use and requires using my hands repeatable to get it to turn on or off.  The timer is a sometimes thing...not very reliable.  I am very tech savvy and didn't get much help from the manufacturer. I had selected this product based on a prior purchase from the manufacturer which was a good product.
Buyer Beware. Having read the other reviews of this product on this site, I decided to go ahead and give these collars a shot despite some of the problems other reviewers had encountered.  I ordered three of these products from this site, and when they arrived, not a single one of them worked - at all.  They were completely useless and despite trying everything other reviewers and the manufacturer suggested, these products are completely useless.  Although I have contacted the manufacturer of this product about the defects, I would still like the buyer to be aware that if purchasing this product from this website, that if the product does not work, it can not be returned for a refund or even exchanged.  Thus, your credit card will still be billed, your dogs will still be barking, and you may get stuck with products that are worthless.
broken. this item arrived with a broken tank, and 1 week later quit making mist at al
Paint particles -- part of a balanced diet?. This machine is built like a Russian tank - what it lacks in finesse it tries to make up for in sheer bulk. But the massive, retro-industrial design is not enough to earn a place on your countertop. My juicer arrived with several dings in the paint. The stainless steel dome that the fruit is crushed on had a black greasy substance on the underside. It took a lot of scouring to get rid of this material of unknown toxicity. The shape of the squeezing surfaces is conical rather than hemispherical. The effect of this is that the discarded rind always includes some unsqueezed pulp. But the worst feature of the unit I received is that two of the painted surfaces of the mechanism rub against each other during use causing a fine powder of paint flecks to fall into the juice. The toxicity of these paint flecks is unknown to me but I sure don't want to ingest them. It's going back
Don't wash these often!. I bought 2 of these blankets, one for each of my kids.  They provide extra warmth to their bed, and that's about it.  I am SO glad I didn't pay more than $10 for these a piece. Not worth it. Every time I have to wash these (and with kids currently potty training, they need to be washed!), the decorative trim on the top of the blanket.. the hem?..  gets more and more ratty, pulling apart from the main piece of fabric. Every time I  wash them, I have to get the scissors out, and it is driving me insane
A bit annoying to use. I like the style since it's different from the typical shoe rack, but shoes are always falling off this thing. It doesn't fit boots or many types of dress shoes, and it's hard to squeeze men's size shoes onto the different tiers without knocking shoes off a different tier
Burned out. I ordered this item fully understanding that it was a beginner's sewing machine. I know it's not the heavy duty kind with bells and whistles that costs a pretty penny. So when I tested the machine on the test material that comes with it I wasn't expecting it to be the only stitches I would get out the machine. When I lifted the foot and took the sample material out and placed my material in (cotton, not a heavy material) it didn't work. I checked the plug, nothing. It simply stopped working. I sent it back in about a month ago and just got it back today. It works now, but not a highly recommended product
Filters Look New Unit Says Replace Them. I purchased a Brita after being a devout pitcher system user for years. I'd had a faucet system from Pur a few years back and it leaked. I was hesitant to go the faucet route again. I figured I'd pay extra for this most expensive Brita model, assuming mechanical integrity.Here's my overview:The installation (to the sink) was easy. The unit has not leaked at all. This is great.The filter installation is easy. The battery installation was also easy.I have owned the system for 4 months and replaced 2 filters. The Aquaview display in BJs shows a clearly worn filter needing replacement. This worn filter is shown through the Aquaview window. My own filters look as clean as the day I installed them at the point when the unit indicates yellow and red LED lights. This , by Brita's own definition, is when you replace your filter.The cost of these filters is $25 a whack. I would not mind this price if I felt the filter's proverbial time was up. I'm feeling that I'm replacing good filters. I taste test the water each day. The tap water defintely tastes worse than the Brita water. Noticeable. This gives me confidence the unit is working. The Aquaview feature is supposed to be away to say--Hey look my filter is really dirty, it's capturing the contaminants I'd drink. My town's water is dirty. If you leave sheets wet in the washer, you will get a brown tinge.Why are my filters clean in the Brita unit after two months. The LED says change the filter (RED Light). The aquaview shows me a clean filter to the naked eye. The price of use for these filters is $150 per year, with this red light going off every two months like a clock alarm. Brita is there a chance that the filter is still good, even with your LED light on? Can you let consumers in on this? I realize many contaminants may not make your filter elements dirty, but then why make something called an Aquaview filter, if the view shows  a clean filter and I'm throwing away a clean filter.So fellow consumers, beware! The proof is not in the pudding. Taste alone does not insure that harmful contaminants are not reaching me---this means the system may not be working even on week one. The LED light system, at least in my household, does not correlate even slightly with the naked eye  Aquaview condition. My filters look like they could go another month or two without dirtying. This may be testimony to a really good filter. The taste test does not correlate with the Red Light. The water, even with a replace indicator, and a clean view indicator, still tastes better than tap and equivalent to the filter being a day or two old. I would say my filter is still good and Brita has me over replacing good filters but we're dealing with the world of microbial contaminants---who are they to go liberal on filter conservation. On the other hand it's a big hit to consumers and environment to be throwing these units away good.So.......beware on this machine. You will probably, even with a dirty view, find yourself replacing filters sooner than the manufacturer describes. You may find yourself like me and  another reviewer on this site, with LED lights going off and filters not looking dirty. I am curious about the New Jersey person who claims they have not changed it yet, seemed like about 6 months. This is disconcerting because the LED light is a timer or volume control and would go off regardless of your Aquaview filters visual condition. 6 months on a filter seems too long though and I'd conjecture you're getting some bad stuff in your tap.Brita please provide much greater detail on your website (which doesn't work tonight for registration or support email.Regards
Piece O' poo. I bought this and used it once. Right from the begining I could tell this was a shotty product. I don't know who designed the wringing fuction but it doesn't work in the least. And the removeable cleaning head would not stay attached half the time and I assure you it was inserted correctly. Waste of money!!
Eheim sludge extractor is not worth the money. Assuming that you put the four double A batteries in the right way, the unit will start to make a humming sound, but as far as being beneficial in keeping an aquarium clean, I see no value whatsoever.  It is a total waste of money.  The unit simply doesn't have enough suction power to be helpful
Priming Nightmare. This filter was a nightmare to set up, and it is probably my fault.See, I got ths filter for the 2 aquatic turtles that I have.Anyone who has turtles knows that one does not want to have the entire tank filled as though they were keeing fish. Turtles need to be able to get out.I started looking at canister filters ecause of a blog entry on the fluval canister filter. I researched and researched looking for more informatio on alternate filters, after all the xP2 was less expensive an for most posts, it was a toss on who had the better product. so I got it.4 hours later dealing with priming I finally have a system that isnt working quite right but at least its doing something. Modifications were done using the excess hosing on the intake to conince the pump motor that there is more pressure.So I guess there is a moral to this story, this is not the filter you are looking for if you have any need to have the tank less than all the way full. and if you make it work like I did (heck spending 130 on the set up-- it does not come with addional media like ceramics like the fluval does-- you better believe i made it work!) it is not silent. you hear all sorts of air popping noises, but this is the quietet i've gotten it so i'm quitting whle im ahead.happy tank keeping
Dangerous at any price. This machine is an accident waiting to happen. In order to pull out the (very hot) toasting rack, you have to attach a separate handle. Not only is this awkward and inconvenient, we found after many attempts to attach the handle safely, we were unable to do so, since it attaches at an angle that requires on's hand to come very near to or actually touch the EXTREMELY HOT frame of the oven. Avoid this item at all costs
Do yourself a favor and skip this product. Don't just skip this vac but avoid ALL Shark products. I can echo what a previous reviewer said....The unit will die on your after minimal use. I made the mistake of buying two sharks, this one and a small hand held one for my car. As soon as I use the hand held for more than a minute it gives off a a burnt rubber smell. This one began to do the same after being used only two or three times and died completely on the fourth clean up. The container was never really full so it was not a case of overload on either unit...at least not user overload. My best guess as to what is wrong with this product is that they put some great filters on a cheap motor. The motor isn't strong enough to pull the dirt through the filter and quickly burns out. They had to know that when they made these. What a rip!!
Shipping fiasco. Love the Riedel glasses and had ordered them in the past from Amazon. Unfortunately, the Amazon shipping department seems to have difficulty packing delicate items: The first shipment included a couple of heavy books which shifted during mailing and broke the glasses. The replacement box had the glasses jammed against one corner with air packing around three sides. Those arrived broken, also. Guess we'll purchase the glasses at a wine shop! Love Amazon and this is the first time we've had a shipping problem with you!
You are stuck with it.... You need to really want this product from Kitchen Capers because it you don't you get stuck with shipping & return costs.  So again, you need to know what you are ordering or you will get hit with big shipping costs.  Would go with another company
Totally Worthless. I bought this vac to replace an older Dirt Devil stick vac that I had for about ten years.  I really liked the old one and thought I was getting a more powerful version of the it. The new one is more powerful alright, but all the power is situated in one tiny section of the floor brush.  If you don't aim that section right onto what you are trying to pick up - forget it!I agree with some of the other reviewers on the noise level.  It's so noisy I feel I should be wearing ear plugs.  Also, I can't figure out what's with all the air that blows around while you're trying to focus on your one little area.  I think that's where all the power goes.  Dust, debris and hair blow all over the room.I'm going this weekend to buy a new stick vacuum that works.  Maybe I can sell this one in a garage sale.My advice to others is DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!!  I only rated it with one star because I had no other option
Extremely stupid control logic. This heater works reasonably well, it's not too noisy on the LOW setting, but it's electronic control is designed extremely bad. First of all it has three operational modes: LOW, HIGH and AUTO. Low uses half of its heating power and runs the fan on a slower and quieter speed. High - uses full power and is the noisiest. Thermostat setting/operation is not available nether under low nor under high mode.On Auto mode you can set the desired temperature and the heater will do a reasonably good job of maintaining the set temperature, but - when it's on Auto mode the heater runs on it's full power and becomes noisy.There is no way to make use of the thermostat with the low heating power.I think that most people would actually want to use Auto mode with the low power, especially if they use the heater in a bedroom, but some genius at DeLonghi decided to save a few cents by not providing this option.The heater also 'forgets' your last Auto temperature setting after you switch it off and defaults to 75, so every time you switch it on again you have to adjust temperature - pretty annoying IMO. In spite of the fact that I got it pretty cheap (under 40), it's going back.
Terrible Chocolate!. This is the WORST Fondue chocolate that I ever bought! The instructions on the pack says to melt it in the microwave for 2 min intervals, but the chocolate refused to melt!! Instead it got even HARDER!!! I even added oil and this did Not help! I wasted hours trying to work out this chocolate.This MILK chocolate is a Total rip off..I wont be using the rest of the 20 pounds that I bought! ps. The sephra dark chocolate is perfect, its this MILK chocolate that is a rip off
Non receipt. Ordered almost a month ago. Never been shipped and it will take another month for them to potentially ship this.Geez, I could have just bought this in the store for the exact same price. Rip off
Poor quality. The fabric used in this set is so rough it can not be slept on.  Not worth the trouble
I thought it was a sheet set. Hopefully, I will never make this kind of mistake
Don't wasteyour time. I bought this cleaner because my house is all hardwood and I have two dogs.  I was hoping that this would help to give my floor a nice deep clean.  It actually didn't clean anything at all.  I couldn't get up the dog drool spots which I have to scrub out, but worse it didn't get rid of water spots which I can wipe up with a paper towel.  This may work for tile, but wouldn't bother if you have hardwood
Great pottery, ruined expectations by Macy's. We love Fiesta Ware pottery.  This is a quality product made of tough clay with well matched durable glaze. Because of this and its famous assortment of sumptious colors, I will buy it every time.  However, when buying this product from Macy's I found the following to be true:1.) Items or colors listed as in stock and shipping (the pizza plate for example)get listed as backordered after you purchase and languish for months before the order is inexplicably canceled.2.) Items that are seconds quality being sold as first quality. On average, 10% of our orders included slay slubs, glaze missing in spots and other imperfections.3.) Range of products severely limited4.) Color choice from available range severly limited.So, in short, buy Fiesta Ware. A quality product, made in the United States, of charming beauty--but reconsider Macy's as your Amazon supplier
Thermostat doesn't work. Ditto the other's observations... The thermostat seems to register the temperature of the unit itself rather than the room... I had the thing in a 63 degree room, had it set to 85 degrees. It would register 90 after 30 seconds of running, turn off, slowly ramp back down to 84 degrees over a 2 minute time period, and then repeat. The temperature of the room never got above 64 degrees....
Disappointed - stopped working after 3 weeks. I was very disappointed with this product.  Some of the reviews said it was poorly made but I wasn't looking for a high quality product just something functional that would last a year or so. It lasted 3 weeks and then just stopped working.  Initially when we wound it it would keep going even if no pressure on it so you had to rewind every time you used it. Then it just stopped. Of course by then the 30 days to return had passed.  Please save your money
uncomfortable. The pillows are very soft, don't give any support to the neck. Not recommand it
I wish these fit!. Purchased this sheet set as the description stated that it would fit deep mattress. As with every other sheet set I have purchased for the deep mattress, the fitted sheet does fit OK. However, if one wants to tuck in the flat sheet on one side of the mattress, there is hardly any sheet left to cover the bed! I guess that deep mattress sheet sets will always be "short-sided" on the flat sheet until manufacturers begin making an oversize flat sheet, too. I am, none the less, disappointed
Got small feet?. The pockets are too small for men's size 10.5 athletic shoes and women's size 9.5 athletic shoes but sandals and moccasins will fit.
This is the best thing ever!!!. Man this item is fantastic. I love wasting $80 on pointless furniture. Getting a great cheap plastic looking set that holds all my games and systems.... Man I must be in heaven. Not only that but it breaks easily, does this thing have no limit? So I bought this great video center around a year ago.... And what happens it breaks. I had it for a couple of weeks and does it look like dog crap. It looks like you're in a baby kids room. Similar to those play centers in day cares or McDonalds. Man that is lame.... I just love having children decor in my house, and it has to be $80. If I were you.... I would just let my systems, TV, and CDs sit in some tubberware. Believe me it would be 50X safer!
The Ford Pinto of coffee makers... When you first get the BrewStation it works great.  It's really convenient.  I bought one for my Mom last Christmas (2005) and she loved it.  One day I walked into the kitchen and noticed coffee all over the counter around the BrewStation.  I whiped it up and didn't give it another thought.  But the next day I went back and there was coffee all over the counter again.  It was then I noticed that the spout had developed a leak.  My Mom said she hadn't a clue what was wrong with it, so we cleaned it and sit it on the dining room table for about 2 months unused.  Yesterday, I went back to it and figured it was probably the gasket around the spout.  I found the replacement gasket that came with it and replaced it.  I then cleaned it off and placed it back on the counter and filled it with water.  I ran it with just plain water to see if it would leak and at first it didn't.  Then after it got up to about 6 cups it began dripping again.  Bummer...So I left it sitting there and put a paper towl under it and when I went back about 20 minutes later the paper towel was soaked.The bottom line is the BrewStation my be convenient and have great features, but you would be better buying a $10 traditional coffee maker at your local Dollar Store.
lasted less than a year. this might hold up if you don't put anything but windbreakers on i
description does not state size!. I am disappointed in the size of these bowls. They are very small...the largest being approx 1.5 qt.  The description does not state the size and I needed much larger. They do seem to be made very well, though.
It never arrived. I ordered this item in June.  After repeated emails and phone calls Macys did not ever deliver it.  It was going to be a wedding gift.  At one point a double boiler was delivered instead.  After 3 months of frustration I cancelled the order from Macys and had the same item delivered in 5 days from another source.  It was incredibly poor service.  Nothing wrong with the wok itself -- the bride reports being quite happy with it
dont buy this. the product that is being sent out is NOT the product that is pictured.  they are sending out an oblong platter with no handles made from STONEWARE (it's not even corelle).  extremely unhappy!!!
Heed these reviews!. I had read the reviews and still ordered this cup.  The first one we received, the pop top was broken.  The second one lasted a week before the screw top wouldn't stay on anymore.Really disappointed, especially considering the price
Another White One. I too just received my Petite Casserole in white too.  I thought after reading that many others got white by mistake that the problem would be corrected.  I am returning my "white" casserole and hope that I will be able to get the "red" one that I ordered.
juicer. This juicer is not weight balanced.  When you pull down the handel, the juicer wants to turn over.  Causes a messy scean trying to make sure it does not flip over.  Also did not get any instructions for using the juicer with it's many parts.  Had to learn by trial and error, still not completly sure I am using it correctly
The item has serious design and assembling problems. I had 2 pieces of this item, - both had similar problems. First and major one is water and steam leakage between the filter holder and the machine. This, I believe, is due to poor Chinese assemblage. Secondly, "perfect froth" nipple has terrible persistent ordor of the material its made of, which perfectly transmits to your drink. Krups should've thought of changing this design and set better quality control over assemblage. The item was returned.
Mediocre Espresso. This is a great maker for American coffee drinkers who have the occasional espresso.  This will not pass for a full-time espresso drinker.  The machine functions fine but the coffee is not robust enough to be called true espresso
Didn't work for long. I received the Shake-N-Take as a gift for Christmas 2006.  Mine just broke down this morning.  The motor gave out.  I didn't really get 2 weeks of service out of it
If I could give it less than one star, I would.... My beautiful Grand Prix Wusthofs are the best knives that I've ever owned, and I've persuaded friends to buy them as well, just by letting them borrow one.  Even the cheaper stamped Wusthofs that I had for a while are worlds better than any other knife that I had before.  So why did Wusthof put their name on this damaging piece of hardware?  I used it on one knife, and knew after that that it would never get near one of my knives again.  It dulled it so much that I had to take it in to get professionally sharpened.  Don't purchase this set!  You will regret it
Tribute Glassware. This glassware cracks and breaks very easily, particularly the tall glasses.  After owning the set for a little over a year, I now have only one tall glass left.  The most recent glass broke when I dropped an ice cube in it
Ultimately delivered as promised. The package arrived 12 days after placing the order and the tamper was tossed loose in the box without any packaging.  There is no way to track the package.In fairness to the company, the tamper is of high quality and was not damaged in transit.Overall, while I am very pleased with my purchase, I tend to expect more from an on line merchant than what was delivered
shipped wrong product. I ordered this product relying on the picture. I got the wrong one. Shipped it back but never got any credit back yet. Am still waitin
Water smells like plastic. I bought this electric kettle and while it did heat water very quickly, once I opened the lid the whole pot of water reeked of plastic.  Needless to say, the water was not drinkable.I don't know if I was stuck with a bad unit but I would not recommend this electric kettle.  Buyer beware
Terrible Odor. Im sorry to say that this carbon filter smells terrible, and the odor does not dissipate. The odor is so bad that it makes me feel sick when I use it.Cutting this filter is also one big mess, since the black carbon particles fly everywhere when the strip is cut which is one big messy experience.Honeywell needs to design a carbon filter that does not smell so terrible, and that is already the size you need.  Taking out this long filter and cutting it and making such a mess is a real inconvenience
Non-functional. First, and most importantly, the server doesn't keep the coffee hot. It does not have a glass thermal lining (I should have known to look for that feature before I purchased this product.)After a half hour in the server, the coffee is lukewarm and I have to reheat it in the microwave.Secondly, the screw-on top has some features that seem to serve no purpose - a button on top that I assume is intended to release the vacuum so the coffee can be poured out.  It doesn't work, you have to loosen the lid itself. Also, the lid comes apart into several pieces for cleaning I guess.  But it collects coffee inside the hollow lid and then that coffee dribbles all over the place.
Disappointingly small. This piece is very small and the spiral to hang the towel on looks cheezy. Very flimsy when compared to other towel holders I have seen and used. My advice is to look for a better one that will fit in with the other Italian Chef decor available
Not Corelle Thin!. Actually...more like ZERO stars!!!Verrrrry unlike any Corelle dishes I have purchased in the past.  These pieces are clunky and extremely HEAVY.  I doubt if they fit properly in anyone's kitchen cabinets and definately provide a free workout...forget about joining a gym...these bricks would do the same job....useless as dishes and definately not Asian flair...more like a Dodge in Toyota clothing
The chicken was a dud. My timer didn't work either.  It arrived broken in two pieces, and even though I was able to put it back together, it just didn't work.  Back it went.  It's cute, but pretty much useless
Avoid this thing like the plague. I had an old Black & Decker SpaceMaker which broke after about 10 years of daily use.  I bought this product as a replacement.  It looks sleek, takes up very little space, but has one tiny flaw.....it doesn't open cans.  In order to open a can you have to tilt the can just right under the "locater post" and even then the one I have opens a can maybe only 1 out of 20 tries.  Maybe I got a lemon, but in any event, its not even worth returning it after considering shipping, etc.  I'll just buy another brand and eat this one.  Do yourself a favor - pass on this product
Too Scratchy. The sheets are horribly scratchy and rough.  No matter how many times you wash them and use fabric softener, they stay hard
Pretty - but small. Love the matching sugar bowl that comes with this butter dish, and the butter dish is very pretty, however it is too small!! or short rather.. you put a standard cube of butter in the dish and it squeezes the top of the butter and gets stuck. The lid does not touch the bottom of the dish  until you have used most of the butter. Also it has to reach room temperature, so it becomes molded to the shape of the lid better, which in turn makes a mess. Really, very unusual and it drives me nuts. I do not recomend the butter dish, sadly
Beautiful But Dangerous: Buy For Display Use Only. The Fiestaware Scarlet mugs are beautiful but dangerous.  The handle is much too small for this size mug.  If you can get your finger through the small hole, your finger will soon be as scarlet as the Fiestaware.  The first and only time my family used these mugs, two of us burned ourselves.Fiestaware really screwed up on this one, a shame given the beauty of the Scarlet Fiestaware
Electrical hazard!!!. I had this fan 2 days. I was changing the fan setting when there was a snap and a flash of light from the display. Similar to a bug zapper. I was lucky not to get shocked, however it scared the .... out of me. The fan kept working, but could not be shut off or adjusted. I had to unplug it. Do not buy this fan
Wish I had bought something else. I have a two-bedroom apartment with hardwood in the living room and bedrooms, linoleum in the kitchen and tile in the bath. I have four area carpets, two 8x10s and two 3x5s. The apartment collects its fair share of dust, but since it's just me, there is minimal traffic. My Swiffer electric broom that I got at the grocery store does a marvelous job of keeping everything clean and tidy. I've even used the Swiffer on the carpets, but because it doesn't slide easily over the carpets (I have to remove the dust cloth and essentially get down on the carpet on my hands and knees to manually run it over the carpet surface), I decided to buy a separate stick vacuum that could do a better job. Well, I wish I had heeded the negative reviews on this product. It is very loud indeed, louder than my old Bissell traditional carpet vacuum which long ago became so clogged that it is no longer functional. The noise really is painful to the ears. It blows dust and dirt away rather than sucking it up. You do have to vacuum over and over on the same spot to get it to pick anything up. Same thing on my hardwoods, linoleum and tile - it just blows everything around. Apart from the noise, this seems like an easily fixed design flaw. Guess I will be sticking with the Swiffer for now
I expected more from these sheets. I picked up these sheets during a Friday Sale ($69.99).  I am pretty disappointed by the overall feel of these sheets.  Out of the packaging they were stiff and rough.  I ran them through a wash w/fabric softener, and they weren't any better.  They seem to be constructed well (the seems are high quality) They feel like 180-200tc hospital sheets.  I've bought 800tc sheets for &lt;$100 and they were night and day better.  Don't waste your time on these sheets, they aren't worth the money
Two purchased, two defective and returned. Purchased the item, arrived defective, replacement was also defective
Beautiful But Dangerous: Buy For Display Use Only. The Fiestaware Scarlet mugs are beautiful but dangerous.  The handle is much too small for this size mug.  If you can get your finger through the small hole, your finger will soon be as scarlet as the Fiestaware.  The first and only time my family used these mugs, two of us burned ourselves.Fiestaware really screwed up on this one, a shame given the beauty of the Scarlet Fiestaware
Junk. I never liked this light, and now it's broken. The clamp that holds the light to the book is extremely tight, so it puts permanent dents in the back cover of a paperback.  The light short-circuited after a couple of weeks
It's Not Green. The first time I used the vase the green color started coming off.  The vase is very, very heavy thick glass
Can't review. I have not received this item yet, so I can't really review itthank
Don't buy a roomba. My $200 roomba which I loved to use daily for picking up dog hair stopped charging after 8 months.  I was appalled to find that a new battery was $50+ and delayed buying one for a long time.  I finally caved, got the new battery, charged it and used it once for 20 minutes, and it hasn't charged since.  What a disappointment and waste of money
Too expensive if you smoke. I bought the air filter for my smoking, to clean the air.I figured it would at least last 2 months. But it only lasts for about a month and at $12.00 a piece, it gets expensive to keep replacing the filters.These are smaller, maybe 4X4 filters and I think they are over priced especially since they don't last longer.They should be priced lower but I suppose they were made for non smokers
Never in Stock. I, too, have the same complaints as the others, I ordered this item in June, it is now October, and I have yet to receive it. In June, I was in no great hurry, but now with the holidays approaching, I would very much like to use my dishes!!! This is totally unacceptable and I'm thinking about cancelling.
would not ship to military overseas. My order was cancel because company will not ship to a FPO FPaddress, really unclear as to the reason, but I am sure it isa fine product, my Turtles will continue to bask on their rock
Poor Quality - Stay away. I bought this unit and the timer stopped keeping proper time within a month of using it.I also bought a Timex Digital timer and it was immediately defective, I sent it back to the manufacturer and the warranty replacement they sent me was DEFECTIVE TOO!Whoever makes these TIMEX timers must have zero quality control.  Stay away and find something else
This is not a high-end product; Let not the reviews & list price fool you!!. When I look at some of the positive reviews of this product, I wonder what these people were comparing these towels against.  Martex makes a VERY large cross-section of towels found in most all stores under a multitude of brand names.  This particular line seems to be a low-end one and one that uses Supima cotton fibers that are not as fine as good Egyptian cotton ones. The cotton loops on this towel are small, not nearly as fine as good Egyptian cotton and the towel itself doesn't have a good heft/fluffiness to it (seems thin and for lack of a better word, "Wal-Marty".  If you want a great quality product for the same price, search for the "Famous Maker Washcloth 2-Pack" made by GRAND PATRICIAN, right here on Amazon.  I ordered both brands at the same time and the difference between the two is like night and day. Make sure that the Grand Patrician ones mention "100% Egyptian fine extra-long staple cotton" in the description. That is your assurance that you are getting the finer line product, not yet another low-end line product such as this Martex Altier.  This is important since the actual brand/contents of the "Famous Maker" towel products can change with time.  Also, the list price on the Grand Patrician is noted as being lower than that for this Martex product but don't let that fool you. I still gave the Martex 2-stars since it is not a bad value in and by itself.  But it is an atrocious choice if you also have the option of the Egyptian cotton Grand Patrician ones from Amazon at the same price
OrangeX  CitrusJuicer. I was very disappointed with the quality of the juicer I purchased. The handle would not stay up and it was easy to crush your fingers, bad if young children were using it. The top would not stay in. The rubber feet left black marks on the formica (poor quality rubber). I sent mine back for refund. E-mailed the company but they would not respond, sign of a poor company
It Looks Good. However it doesn't work as well as my previous one from Pavoni. The cover on the Capresso fits around the outside of the grinder so when you transfer the ground coffee to another container there is always some cleanup required. It also takes longer to get the beans finely ground.
sucks. don't buy this wok.  It tastes like you are eating metal when you cook cabbage with tomatoes.  i ended up returning the second wo
Terrible, would not recommend. My girlfriend just bought this couch from amazon. This is by visiondecor furniture. First it shows up on the curbside in pieces. Did you ever hear of a couch in pieces and that you actually have to put it together? This is not including the cushions. The material is loose and very cheap looking and the frame is flimsy. I don't know if it will last a year. IKEA furniture is actually better quality. Paid around $550 with shipping, if she would have spent another $200 she would have a great quality couch from one of the local furniture stores in Los Angeles. She is very disappointed and wants to cry. Sad, very sad...
Nice coat rack, took forever to arrive. The coat rack was nice.  Everything was included and it was simple to put together.  One other reviewer mentioned that it will tip over with really heavy coats.  My coats (even the winter ones) are apparently not that heavy.  The real disappointment was that it took over a month to arrive.  It took about two weeks after the last date predicted that I would receive it by.  If you really want this coat rack, make sure you give it adequate time to arrive
Great for about 2 weeks, then WAY LOUD. This fan would be terrific if it were quite.  Once it starts to get a rattle it's so obnoxious that it's worthless.
This gadget destroyed my microwave after one use. I have a Panasonic microwave that's worked perfectly for years. The first trial of this popper produced good popcorn but a funny smell came out of my microwave. Now the microwave can't even heat water.Pretty upsetting... to be out over $100 now. No warning on the box about Panasonic microwave ovens
not  necessary to change filter as often as they say. You're better off just washing and re-using the mineral pad until it is really spent, or using distilled water in the tank (if you are willing to buy the water)
Love ceramic cookers but his one is a poor value. All the things people say about ceramic cookers are true; they are the best way the cook foor whether you want to do traditional BBQ low and slow for at 225 degrees or to grill steaks at 700 degrees. They keep the heat and moisture in due to the thick ceramic walls and keeping the temperature adjusted is easy. Whether grilling or barbecue, the flavor is unmatched by steel cookers.All that said, for the same price as this "large" BGE you can get a #7 Kamado that is much larger, has thicker walls, and can be had covered with beautiful mosaic tile of your choice. Not only is it a thing of beauty, but it the way it cooks is incredible. Using a 6lb. load of Kamado natural coconut extruded charcoal it is possible to maintain a constant 225 degrees for more than 24hrs without adding more charcoal. This means you can do traditionl BBQ with primal cuts such as full 12lb. briskets and 7lb. pork shoulders and sleep through the night while they are cooking.
EH1-0019 RECALLED. It amazes me that this model is being sold here, since the product was recalled by the manufacturer.  A newer, safer model is offered for just $10 more by Vornado.Do your homework before you buy...
Won't help in an accident... If you're looking for a car harness that will keep your dog safe in an accident, keep looking...This harness might work to prevent your dog from bouncing around the car and possibly distracting the driver (although I'm not even confident it would hold up for that use with a big, strong dog) but I seriously doubt it would hold up even in a mild collision.The dog is held in place using a few plastic buckles/snaps which are not even very strong-looking-- I have seen stronger snaps on regular dog collars. Plastic snaps like these would not hold up to the forces created in a collision.If you want a safety harness that will protect your dog in an accident, look for one that has actually been tested/rated similar to human car safety devices
overrated crunchy slushy ice shredder, falsely hyped. Read all reviews and believed them. What a mistake. I have eaten shave ice from Hawaii and Los Angeles, and this machine does not make japanese or hawaiian shave ice or shaved ice. Anyone know what powdery snow feels like and that is what this machine and many reviewers promised--but the machine is a big disappointment.  More like crunchy ice which is supercold since the ice mound becomes more dense and watery almost immediately.  Brain freeze.  Even the title of the item is misleading since the box for the crunchy slush maker clearly states it is a snow shredder!!! Kinda sad that this machine doesn't make ice better than the manual one I already have.  I used store bought smaller ice cubes but that made no difference--still crunchy and melted fast.  DO NOT BUY THIS if you want real shave ice or real shaved ice
Not for glass tops. This pan was a bargain that turned out to be overpriced. I have a number of Farberware pans that have served me well, but this one came out of the box warped. The first time I put it on the range top it was rocking like crazy, with only one strip through the center that made contact. I could return it, but for $10 it is not worth the argument with Amazon about restocking fees. So after one use it is now washed and packed up in the GoodWill box. I would never use it again.
600TC sheet set. This product arrived in what appeared to be good shape, but upon washing became blotchy and discolored in places making them unusable.  Very disappointed
INCOMPLETE ORDER!. "I ordered this unit for my mother. She received only the bottome portion of it in one box and in the 2nd box was only a pen and not the rest of the filter. The seller then accused my mother of lying. It's a $30 filter that I bought for her to have clean water. We order all the time from Amazon and we have never had any problems. I want the money credited back to my account immediately! Any now after asking for the refund, which has yet to be credited, they have the nerve to ask for the original boxes back, still accussing her of lying.  I'm having my mother email me her scanned copy of the receipt from the store she had to go to just to get a complete working water filter.  I am extremely disappointed in Tarsal for not taking care of their customers.  I'm the Supervisor of Customer Service at a very large National retail store and we most certainly do not take care of our customers this way.
Hilfer Cotton Sheets. If I could have given this a ZERO rating, I would have.  I bought these sheets because they were "deep pocket" sheets.  They have shrunk and no longer fit my bed
This is not silent... I wanted a humidifier that was silent, but when I plugged this in, not only could I hear it from the other room, but it's a high-pitched whine. I don't know what to do about it. I think I'll probably just return it for something different
Batteries and DC Adapter don't mix!  Clip destroys books. The design for using the DC adapter with this little light is extremely poor.  It is possible that I missed the warning that tells you to remove the batteries before using the DC adapter.  But, it must not have been very big.  I combined the two and ended up with batteries that leaked all over inside the battery case.  These were brand new batteries.  There does not seem to be anything protecting the batteries from the DC adapter and so the power goes right into them.  This is bad.  Modern devices are expected to work with either battery or adapter without having to remove the batteries.Then, after I cleaned it all up, it worked for about a week w/o the batteries installed.  Then the LEDs started flickering.  The next day, it was dead.  To see if it had to do with the battery leak, I took the little guy apart and found that the power was still getting all of the way up into the head.  But something on the little circuit board must have blown.The other part of the design that is bad is that the metal clip has a sharp edge that digs into and tears up the pages of the book.  I found this a problem with soft cover books, at least.  Putting a little electrical tape of the end made it better.I had hoped that the design of this edition would last longer than previous editions.  I've gone through many Zelco lights and stretched out their lifespan by repairing the poor connections as they wear out.  This one is beyond my ability and I'm done giving Zelco my money.  They are a nice idea, but have no durability.  If they were cheaper, it might not be such a big deal, but for their price I would like to see them be far more durable
Small like a toy. It is definitely not for 3 cups. It is a mini French Press for 1 cup of coffee. I was shocked to see the size. Other than that it works
Too noisy. I purchased the Deni 6000 without reading the reviews. What a dummy! It is too noisy. You have to hold it down or it will vibrate off the counter. It gives you shaved ice not chunks or lumps. I guess I purchased it because it was the right price. I now own the Waring professional ice crusher
Broken top  - try and get replacement - good luck. The item is not packed well for shipping. The drawer and top were cracked. When I called the number on the replacement part, I was told did not have the replacement. They gave me a number to call for Target, THEY in turn told me they couldn't send it and told me to call the number I had just called.UNREAL trying to get this fixed. I am going to have to pack the WHOLE thing up and return myself. NO HELP IN GETTING THIS TAKEN CARE OF.
Not worth it... I've had my futon a little over two months and was very happy with it initially until one day two of the wooden slats which are all held in place with plastic fell apart (and I only weigh 100lbs).  I tried everything to fix the problem to no avail.  So considering it only lasted a few months, it really is not worth the money at all.  The price is cheap but so is the quality.  For what it will cost me to replace this one, I could've bought a much better quality futon without the disappointment and aggravation
pray fan works at all. I am returning my fan through Amazon, after an infuriating three weeks of trying to get help from Soleus through their customer service.  My fan arrived with a smashed remote and they would not even tell me if I could get another one--just kept forwarding my requests to somebody else--while my Amazon 30 day return guarantee was ticking away.  They are a lousy company
You Get What You Pay For. This set of sheets was a bargain... NOT! They immediately started to "pill" and are definitely not the size that it says on the package. I'm guessing, these sheets are probably from the back of the "reject" pile! I would send them back... but it wouldn't be worth the cost of shipping... believe it when they tell you, "you get what you pay for~
You get what you pay for!!. This is a cute Vacuum, and that's about it. The filter clogs, and they are next to impossible to find. The Canister is a pain to empty. The biggest problem I found was there was no height adjustment. If you have thick carpet, you just need to forget about this vacuum. What A nightmare to push and pull this stupid thing. Mine has gone to Goodwill.
put in spare bedroom. The product was not comfortable; it is now in the spare bedroom for unwanted guests. Also perspired even with 2 cotton pillowcases
Rate this a negative 3. I bought this thing from amazon over a year ago, it never worked right. But a least it only caught bread on fire a couple of times. We have gone round and round with Kitchen Aid over getting a replacement. They won't honour the warranty. At the very least Amazon should drop it. RUN
Consider before purchase:. This is supposed to be a travel mug. The closure for the drinking lip attaches to the mug lid with a tension, two bar slip in slot.  In three weeks of daily use the closure came off at least three times per day and finally is lost. A minor bump dislodges the closure.  I wasted my money.
Not worth the money. I often have to mix by hand, things always end up dry and grainy.  Might be partially my fault - maybe I should try adding the ingredients as it's mixing.It makes a REALLY huge mess.  My mother and I both bought one, but I told her to return hers, it wasn't worth it
Not totally sure it works. It seemed to work when I first got it, but I'm not really sure anymore. When I first got it, I changed the litter and put the Smellkiller right near it. Usually after I change the litter, I can still smell the litter, it just smells clean; this time, I couldn't smell anything. I keep the sponge moist and it still sits in the small area where the litter box is; for the most part, I don't notice any smells, but I'm not sure if that is due to the Smellkiller or because I use A&H Baking Soda Kitty Litter, a 2nd litter with crystals, AND the A&H litter box deodorizer powder.I suppose it works ok, but I wouldn't buy another one, and I don't think it works the miracles claimed in other reviews. Also, mine didn't stay on the wall either...came crashing down only 1 day after I put it up. Now it just sits on top of the litter box
Barely gets by. After borrowing my brothers, I decided to buy my own jerky gun. I bought the exact model he had but my first one would not advance the meat. Amazon replaced it with another one that still did not work, the cap kept popping off when I pressed meat into the tube. I returned that one too and gave up after that. If you can afford to pay $40, then go get yourself a real jerky gun.Pros: Cheap, cleans easily. Comes with a variety of spice packets in the box.Cons: Cheap, flaky mechanism, capacity is only 1/2 pound, must refill often (two fills per dehydrator tray)Advise, if you use the cure that comes in the package, use only 3/4 of the quantity, the prepackaged amounts tend to make the meat too salt
Mission computer desk. Very hard to put together, drawers came broken both times- cute though- not at all sturd
Not first quality!. These towels are obviously seconds. I ordered several bath and hand towels, as well as washcloths. Upon receipt I opened several. Each had clearly visible thin spots as well as many pulled threads. I was very disappointed and shipped them back
Flawed & Dangerous!. Received this oven as a wedding gift and enjoyed it for approximately nine months. It cooked fairly evenly, offered convection speed, and looked attractive in chrome.Unfortunately--like many reviewers on Rival's sister unit (the TO600)--we started experiencing problems with the control knobs getting stuck. In our case it was the all important timer knob which would freeze while COOKING AND COUNTING DOWN. The unit is fairly quiet and if you aren't paying close attention (and who is during the morning rush?) then suddenly your 4-minute bagel has been broiling for 15-minutes and is nearly on fire! Given the other reviews on Rival countertop ovens this is obviously not a problem isolated to just our unit.Rival did make a digital touchpad version of this oven but it has been discontinued. And even if it were available--a call to Rival revealed that they were only willing to replace our unit with the exact same model. No thanks! Taking the recommendation of a major consumer magazine, we've purchased a Cuisinart TOB-175 with DIGITAL timer and would highly recommend it
Stopped making coffee after 2 pots. The first two pots of coffee were delicious and then it just stopped working.  We did everything as before and then - nothing.  Didn't even bother trying the espresso portion
Anything But Soft. This set is anything but soft.The set is also very heavy. Washed several times and never got softer. The only good thing is they are plenty big for a pillow top matress. Not worth the price
Disappoited. The humidifier worked great for 2 weeks but now leaks all over the floor during operation.  I would not recommend buying this product
I hate this unit!. I purchased two units--one for our home and one for our vacation home.  Within a few days, the unit at home was no longer making good crema.  The water pump at the one at our vacation home died within about 10 uses.I'm sending both units back and buying another brand.If they had worked properly, I'm not sure I would have like them even then.  The design of this unit is "odd".  I've had home espresso machines for 12 years and this one is just weird.  If you remove the espresso coffee holder too soon after you brew, the grounds and steam explode all over.  I also suspect that the thermostat is broken.  It allows the water to boil--which does not make tasty coffee.Overall, I hate this unit.  I'm going back to shopping
Discount Club Bargain. I paid what I would call a fairly high price for a blanket I could have gotten from a Discount club for half the price.  The photo is very misleading in that only the top and bottom edges are hemmed, the left/right sides are simply cut.  I expect this to disolve within 4 washes.  Will not buy from this manufacturer again
strains my eyes. My eyes hurt after reading only a few pages.  I have good eyes (perfect vision) but this light really hurts my eyes.  Also, the size of this booklight is important and has to match the size of your book.  Many of the paperback books are made in a slightly larger size than the LightWedge Paperback Booklight which leaves parts of your page unlit
No GOOD!!!. This product does not perform the functions for which it was designed. Do NOT buy this product, I wish I had returned it with in the first week of having it. A real piece of JUNK!!! cd
I HATE this vacuum!. Pros:  Bagless, works well at firstCons:  Breaks down frequently, the tubes often become blocked despite emptying of the canister in a timely manner, burning rubber smell, and had to replace the belt-twice.Right now my vacuum is sitting in the middle of the living room.  I want to vacuum, but I can't.  It is broken-again!  It isn't as if I use it all that often, so to have it break down so much is quite frustrating.  Don't waste your money on this cleaner.
Nonstick? Right. I have had my analon "professional" since 1996, I loved it at first, in fact, I don't even own metal utensils, so I was confident it would never scratch the non-stick finish. Now, 10 years later, I can tell you that all the pans I barely used, are still fine, look good. The pans I used daily (the fry pans) are absolute messes. I cook with egg whites a lot, so I think that having something so hard to get off really had taken a toll on the pans.At $60 (the current price) I would consider how much you use cookware. I must replace my frypan now and have a "non-coordinated" set. Do your research on non-stick finishes before making the investment.In all fairness, my favorite pot is the stockpot and I use it many times per week for stews, spaghetti, manwhiches, and it still looks great
Flawed design. I have watched Emeril and perhaps others using this food processor and ending up with liquid all over the counter.  I just dismissed it as part of Emeril's shtick until I bought this machine for myself.  The first time I tried to use it with any liquid ingredients (making mayonnaise), it blew much of the liquid through the joint between the top and the bowl.  The top is just flawed in its design, as it would seem pretty obvious that the part of the top overlapping the side of the bowl should be on the inside rather than the outside of the bowl.  I suppose it had not occurred to me that anyone would design the top in the way that KA did, much less that such a design flaw would be overlooked in so many reviews (e. g. Consumer Reports and Cook's Illustrated).In any case, this machine is pretty much useless for wet ingredients and borderline for dry (they blow through the badly designed joint as well) unless you feel that wiping up a large part of your ingredients from the counter, the outside of the bowl, the bottom of the machine, and any items nearby is a reasonable thing to expect to do.  I will probably get rid of the machine in some way and go back to the Cuisinart I have had for some time as it is a much better design in this regard.
Quiet... NOT! Stopped working after 1 night. This was fortunately a present and a gift receipt was enclosed. QuietCare? My 2 month old wakes up when it starts running. Cool Moisture - well it's cool alright to the point where it's freezing in my room. In fairness, air quality in the room improved and I know the water in the tank has been dispensed in the air. I was willing to work with this then it stopped working!I'm sure lucky this was a gift and a receipt was available
very poor quality. i am bitterly disappointed with these towels. i was expecting high quality cotton fluffy ones and instead got very average quality. they are virtually indistinguishable from the ones i buy from k-mart for 1/3 of the price
Good while it worked. Similar to another review, mine is totally dead.  At about the 4 month mark, it no longer powered on.  Hopefully shipping costs to send it back to them aren't too bad.  Was nice while it worked
A big disappointment. After years of using a box fan for white noise to help me sleep, I decided it was time to break that habit and learn to sleep with something a little more portable.  After much research I invested in the Tranquil Moments Sound Therapy System.  Although I loved it and the quality of the sound, I would not recommend it.  The light is very bright, so I always had to keep it covered with a washcloth.  About once a week or so, it turned itself off in the middle of the night (and no, I hadn't selected the sleep timer).  Recently, it died for good.  I'd only had it for 10 months.  Too late for me, I then found a couple of reviews on other sites that mentioned the same problem of the unit turning itself off
Ugh... I was very disappointed with these sheets. If I had not thrown away the bag, I would have returned... (Instead my pug inherited them for his bed)They are poor quality workmanship and the fabric is cheap. I purchased them to match my Croscill Versailles set. They did provide a visual pop, but were a nightmare to sleep in. If you like the sensation of sleeping in wet plastic wrap and flush money down the toilet for entertainment, these are the sheets for you. If you want comfort and durability, stick with a 100% cotton 400+ thread count sateen sheet
Quality Doesn't last. Sadly these lovely sheets are already showing threads after just 2 washes (in delicate cycle) A good purchase at the time but sadly not a quality keeper
Good for about 10 uses. This piece of junk gave out after about 10 uses.  Steam shoots out from behind the trigger making it impossible to hold
Terrific gift for a cook/chef!. My friend was ecstatic when she opened up this present from me at the holidays. She claims it's the best spice rack - very durable, stylish, and doesn't take up too much space on the kitchen counter. To prove her point, she went and bought fresh spices and made her own personalized spice rack. Definitely was a hit
Don't waste your time. Thinking this would be an excellent gift for Mr. Electronics Geek/Light Sleeper, it became a pretty big joke (and embarassment for me) because some of the sounds that come out of this thing sound like a circus or a dying Speak N' Spell. Don't bother - buy the sound screens used in medical offices, etc. for half the price. They're so much better
Not Worth It. The Chocolate would not melt.. I ended up placing the chocolate bowl in a water bath in my regular fondue pot and made do.............
3 Step Designer Step Stool. Nice Looking, but not easy to move.  The bar at the top isn't smooth and it hurts if you try to move the stool with one hand.  Also, it arrived with the top plastic piece broken on one side.  Disappointed.  Not worth the trouble of returning
Reply to Stella. I had the same problem when I purchased a similar product. Great idea, but hard to come by the fuel. If you go to [...], they make the 2.6 oz chafing fuel and you can click on a list of places that sell there products. You should also call ahead to make sure that they have that size in stock. I hope this works for you, it did for me
OK for miscellaneous knives, not for the GOOD stuff!. I also have to echo the comments of other reviewers when saying if you have inexpensive, common cutlery this sharpener will work OK.  If you have Chef's Quality cutlery don't bring it near this machine.  It leaves a rough edge no matter which stone you use and simply isn't meant for good quality knives.  If you paid a couple of hundred dollars or more for your set of kitchen knives, get them professionally sharpened.  If you have run-of-the-mill cutlery this machine will do OK
Okay, but not great. I tested this out as soon as I got it and was not thrilled with the results.  The steamer barely took the wrinkles out of a satin shirt after I used almost the entire container of water.  The product might work better on cotton or a sturdier fabric.  In a pinch, if you have the time to go over the garment numerous times this item is for you.  From what I have read this is one of the best of the travel garment steamers.  Maybe my expectation were a little to high.Pros-Easy to use-price (same product at Sharper Image for lots more)Cons-Helped but didn't get all the wrinkles out
Disappointing Purchase. I share some bad experiences too.I bought the E8 on Amazon and used it for 3 weeks.  It was working fine initially until I started using my Capresso beans, which were delivered to me just last week (made use of the Amazon rebate offer).  The machine seems stuck and there is no longer a clear stream of brewed coffee.  Instead, the coffee came out in droplets literally and the amount also dwindled.  The machine kept requesting that its tap be turned on.  I've stopped using it altogether and have emailed the Capresso customer service for assistance yesterday.  There's no point calling the toll-free number since I'm never home during office hours to go through the process.  This should not happen since the beans ought to be compatible in the first instance.Other than that, I must say the machine is simple to use and very convenient.  Although I do agree with Roell that it does look cheap
Does not work. ITem is unable to create a vaccuum or seal plastic bags... customer service was surprised that I had bought it since I live at 7,500 feet, indicating that I needed special instructions which they sent by email. After buying a special screw driver with particular size star tip, and making the adjustments they said I needed to do, it still does not work. They said they would take it for repairs, but $25 for shipping across country is unacceptable. Avoid this unit
Shark sweeper. This is a great sweeper, but its tragic downfall is the short lifespan of the battery. We bought one a couple of years ago from Sears with a Sears replacement warranty. Since then we have replaced it FIVE times (we really got our money's worth from the warranty, at least!)It's getting to be a joke--one day (usually 2-3 months after we bring home the new one) the rotor just stops turning and that's all she wrote. Next time we will purchase a different sweeper, warranty or not
TERRIBLE!!. This is NOT a high-end luxury towel by Grand Patrician and is not ultra in ANY way. Even if they were firsts, they are second rate. Mine started to self-destruct after the first wash, and never had the absorbency of a wet dish rag.Am disappointed Amazon would carry this product, which would be a bad deal at half the price. Next time I will look for more reviews
Great idea, marginal quality. I bought this item for my daughter and was thrilled how much she used it to make terrific, healthy smoothies.  But after 5 months, the motor died.  I decided to buy a replacement because my daughter enjoyed it so much, and the new one doesn't even turn the blades.  Great idea, but they need to work on the quality and durability
"Red Stuff"  WARNING!. Believe it or not there was red stuff inside!!!!!Today I unscrew my "Brita Ultra Faucet Filter System". Well, I was shocked to discover that  inside the faucet mount and on both water mouths there was red stuff growing.I called Brita and was told that it is not the product, SINCE IT IS NOT EVEN DESIGNED TO FILTER OUT BACTERIA, it must be the water. Long story short: Brita still pushes it product on people who doesn't know better.This product is poorly designed and drains bad, therefore bacteria or other nasty things could multiply in it. Since it doesnt filter out bacteria the scenario is not a pleasant one.IF you buy this system it means that you dont know a lot about water filters and what you want to filter out. Neither did I, you have to be a chemist to understand the lingo.Stay away since this product may be harmfull to your health by its poor quality.
Tines on Fork Too Sharp. I got this on sale and thought it was a good deal.  It wasn't.  The pieces are heavy and huge.  The tines on the forks are sharp.  I wanted to return the set but the cost of the return shipping was almost as much as the price I paid so I kept it.  I do not recommend it.
Crying over my onions!. I just spent the past half hour crying while chopping my onions by hand.  Why is that you may ask?  Because I ordered this darn product A MONTH AGO and it STILL HASN'T SHOWN UP!!! If you choose to buy this product definately don't get it from the "offical site".  I called the number provided twice and was given 2 different dates that this wonderful product supposedly shipped.  I read some other reviews that had the same complaint.  I'm already not happy due to this fiasco.  I've ordered products from other countries that shipped faster than this stinker
Only sprays intermittently with my cocker spaniel (15 lb.). Sometimes it sprays when she barks, most of the time it doesn't. So I would say its effectiveness has been rather low. It's not the battery or the fill level - maybe it just depends on the dog. I can bark into it myself and it sprays just fine. (My children found this amusing.
not for me. I hated this item. It did not protect my hands from the heat and got too dirt
Too Much Imperfection is Too Much Imperfection. To us, typical Fiestaware pieces have great design, color, durability and functioning wrapped up all-in-one. We ordered a set of Turquoise Candlesticks and were disappointed because the candlestick openings are very disparate in size and shape and it was obvious if one chose to use candles it would be a task to insert them properly with &quot;straight candle&quot; results.  Even more disappointing was the quality of the color application to the product.  Specifically, the lack of even color application to the scrollwork and edges of the bases plus around the edges of the openings for the candles.  We were sent a replacement set which had even more color variation but the openings for the candles were shaped somewhat better.  We are returning both sets because they are not pleasing to view due to the shaping and color variations.  Fiestaware can have a color variation that is subtle and uniform, a kind of &quot;softer&quot; look in the color application around the rims on plates, for example, and the piece will still look beautiful.  We don't want to pay for a product that is not as pleasing to the eye as the rest of our Fiestaware products far exceed the quality of these pieces
Cruel. You may as well put your betta in a glass of water. The argument is that bettas are naturally found in rice paddies in Thailand...go ahead and google images of a rice paddy. Bettas can live in small areas due to a special lung that lets them breathe air directly...humans can live in cars, but should they? And the tiny stick of bamboo is a joke, adding insult to injury. They have nothing to retreat or hide behind at all in this kit. Bettas were not put on this earth to make your office pretty. If you want a betta, get them a proper tank
If you want excellent, rich cappucino, do NOT get this. I'm an espresso/cappucino only drinker, and have owned a variety of machines over the past 20 years. I've had this one for less than a week and it's going back to the store for refund. After having read all of the reviews, here is exactly what is correct and what to expect (p.s. if you're not a cappucino conniseur, please don't bother writing a review):Pros:1 - built like an absolute tank. Beautiful style and construction (this does not mean excellent engineering... just means not 'flimsy'). The thing weighs like 40 pounds). 100% durable.2 - short wait time for water to get hot. Like this really matters compared to a boiler-type machine (this is thermoblock). A boiler takes what, 7 minutes and this one takes 4? Are you that much in a rush for a cup? Takes 20 minutes at Starbucks.Cons:1 - I have a $1,100 Pavoni, the best boiler/manual pump machines in the world. You can't come close with the Breville. At best with fine ground espresso I can get slightly rich coffee while the machine pumps for 5 minutes.2 - The filters stink. The double-wall on them is only there because the machine does not produce enough pressure/temperature. The filters leave a soupy mess and not a dry puck (a puck is indicative of a boiler system). Makes you want to drill holes in the bottom of the filters (as is, there's only a single pinhole that gets clogged).3 - What steam? When you first switch to steam mode, it spits out a nice 2-3 second stream of water. And whatever you call the air pithing out you can put your hand up to for a bit without scalding. You're better off making foam using your lungs and a straw, then nuking it in a microwave. It hardly produces any foam.4 - The hot plate on top is not a hot plate. It's a luke-warm plate. My heating pad for my back is warmer.Overall, if you're an inexperieced cappucino maker who thinks Dunkin' Donuts hung the moon, get this machine. Otherwise it will end up being returned or being a workshop anvil
My Honeywell Fan Died after 3 months!. My Honeywell 16-inch remote control fan just died. It has been about three months since I purchased it; it was used with reasonable frequency. It has a 5-year warrenty from Kaz, Inc, but you have to send a $10 check for handling, return packaging, and shipping charges ON TOP OF what you will have to pay to mail it back to Kaz, Inc. I paid $43.99 on Amazon. So it would cost me another $20-$25 to get it fixed/replaced after only having it for three months.
Don't use with batteries!. The design for using the DC adapter with LED Booklight is extremely poor. It is possible that I missed the warning that tells you to remove the batteries before using the DC adapter. But, it must not have been very big. I combined the two and ended up with batteries that leaked all over inside the battery case. These were brand new batteries. There does not seem to be anything protecting the batteries from the DC adapter and so the power goes right into them. This is bad. Modern devices are expected to work with either battery or adapter without having to remove the batteries.I had assumed that I could leave the batteries in so that when I was at home I could use the adapter, but traveling I would use the batteries.  Don't make this mistake
Not for your car. I purchased this steamer for use on my car (inside and rims), but this steam cleaner is virtually worthless for this use.  Dirt and grime only sprays away when the nozzle is directly on the dirt.  Therefore, for hard to reach places, it does not work well.  Furthermore, the steam is not that hot.  A few inches from the nozzle, I can hold my hand in the steam.  Directly under the nozzle, I cannot, but I was under the assumption that the steam was significantly more powerful that this.Now that I am resigned to the fact that I have to keep this unit, I tried it on my shower, and it is not all that impressive there either.  Scrubbing Bubbles work better
Coffee Pot Filter. This filter is not, in my estimation, any good. It leaves a sediment , and the end product, the coffee, tastes terrible. Use paper filters insted for a great cup of coffee
Lid way too tight for the container. Total ripoff. The lid is too tight for bottle. At this moment, I can not use this item and i consider this item trash.
It breaks!. Sure, it looks nice enough without anything on it.  But if you plan to actually hang coats and umbrellas on it, pick something else.  It's tippy and it doesn't hold very many coats without the pegs cracking and breaking off.  It's cheap, but you're getting less than what you pay for.  It couldn't last a winter when being used by only two people
Doesn't Fit. I'd give it zero stars if I could.  I read the review from 2005 and hoped that was just one bad batch--but it isn't.  The lid is slightly too large and if used on a non-stick pan will damage the non-stick surface since it sits on that instead of the lip of the pan.  So, I have returned it.  Note that this is just a problem with the 8 inch lid; I also bought the 10 inch lid and that one fits perfectly
Filter Coffe is Good Espresso is not so. I have previously owned a separate Krups Espresso machine and it made great espresso. This one doesn't. The problem is the amount of coffee you have to put in to make an espresso they say 2-4 cups but if you make two you cant compact the coffee unless your making for four so no crema ever :(. Filter coffee is fine and has a nice cut off feature when you take away the pot whilst coffee is being made. The build is not great and don't get the feeling its going to last that long..
Don't judge a book by its cover... Likewise with this toaster. It looks great [especially from several feet away] and although it's expensive it just isn't all that great. Specifically, this toaster is Made in China. So don't think because it has the DeLonghi name it is actually made in Italy or the EU. It's *designed* in Italy is all. Chinese manufacturing is often a good deal for the manufacturer and a bad deal for the customer. I would say that this is one of those cases.The toaster is suprisingly light as others have mentioned. The fit of the parts where the sides meet the center part of the assembly is not tight - one of the first things I noticed was  a gap of varying width on both sides. It's a small gap don't get me wrong, but with the name and the price I was very disappointed. The manufacturing further showed its sub-standard quality when after a few months it stopped working after I cleaned out the crumb tray. I was careful not to get it wet or in any way abuse the unit, but it simply wouldn't toast any more. I ended up going out to get a less expensive product with a similar appearance - so far so good.It will be a long time before I buy anything from DeLonghi again..
Deceptive Picture. Like other customers, I too thought I was getting a crate, and not a divider.  The image for this product is extremely deceptive, as it shows a crate with no divider.  I feel that the picture should be removed, so the product can be represented accurately
Nice but not durable. This fan has nice features and operates very quietly. Seems to be a durability issue with most reviews I've read because mine only made it nine months before konking out
Beware of flim flammers. Beware of the five reviews for the mysticmop. Although microfiber mops are relatively new, major department stores have approximately a dozen different mops with different mechanical designs. In order to standout from all the competition, five reviews were concocted for mysticmops in order to deceive buyers about the quality of their mops. Google mysticmop and you will find that all the sites with reviews have the same five identical reviews. Fortunately the "reviews" were fabricated about a month ago so, hopefully, not too many customers have been deceived. My experience has been that most reviewers give, helpful honest reviews.
disappointed. sheets are full of wrinkles after being washed,not as soft as when new,and not the qualiy i anticipated
Missing Part and Poor Customer Service. The Rubbermaid Chrome Dish Drainer arrived in a timely fashion.  However, the utensil holder was not included.  I promptly contacted the seller by email.  Their representative apologized profusely in her response and assured me that the utensil holder would arrive promptly.  Two weeks later, I did not have a utensil holder and I had received no further communication from the company.  I plan to return the item and dispute the charge on my credit card.  I also have found the same item under a different brand name for a cheaper price at Bed, Bath and Beyond
Disappointing purchase. This mattress pad was delivered to us with yellow stains on the surface.  When opened and unfolded, it wouldn't fit a queen bed much less a king
rough material. I washed this pillowcase 4 times and dried it with a fabric softener sheet in the dryer and it's still too rough for my son to sleep on.  Nice print and size, but useless if you can't sleep on it.  Don't bother
Perfect sweeper? LOL !!! Ummm that would be a firm NO!!!!!. Garbage with a capital G! where to begin???Ok the handle, it's my own fault for getting mad about that because i did read where the handle falls off, but , in my defense i figured  surely the people over at Bissell have heard about this issue, so by the time i buy it will be fixed right? WRONG! Got this because of cat litter issue on a carpet, don't want to lug around the vacuum, thought this was the answer.Picks up a little, but it is so amazingly noisy, which if i'm gonna be that loud, might as well get a real vacuum cleaner.I am guessing that Bissell has sold out along with alot of the old standard companies in America and moved to Mexico, and this would explain why the products are sub par, i mean you can't take a customer service issue if you don't know the language, so Bissell , i am here to help you out today! Your product is MIEDA, been awhile since i lived in a latin country(Miami ), so please do forgive me if i spelled it wrong:
Sounds better than it is, for some cats. It works fine, but my cat won't use it.I was thrilled with the reviews I read about this fountain and happily set it up as soon as it arrived.  Unfortunately, I like it better than my cat does.  He largely ignores it and still prefers to drink out of the bathtub or a glass.  Oh well.Before you buy, make sure it's not the sound of the water that attracts your cat. This fountain has no water sound (pretty quite, actually).  I think that's why my cat ignores it
Better Supplements on the market. I actually found Dinovite Canine Supplement to work better than this supplement.  Missing Link does not have the additional ingredients to address some of the other issues, especially the allergies and shedding
Weeks later and still hasn't arrived. I would love to review this product, but Amazon first provided me with an incorrect delivery date, then said it was lost but they took the liberty of placing a replacement order for me "at no charge" meaning "no additional charge.  Service and shipping have really gone downhill
Very small for a pair of kitchen scissors!. The description claims that these scissors are good for use in the kitchen but I think that needs some clarification.  The cutting edge of the blades is only about an inch and a half long!  The "Torque engineering" that is referred to can surely only mean that the handles are longer than the blades and so providing a gain due to leverage - other than that there is nothing really different compared to 'regular' scissors.  When the description refers to chicken bones does it really mean just chicken ribs and cartlidge? The pivot is a simple rivet - pretty basic (and cheap) for a relatively expensive pair of scissors.  Such a simple rivet also means that you can't take the blades apart.  The scissors do work OK as regular scissors i.e. for cutting paper, plastic packaging etc. but no more so than any other reasonably well made, and possibly less expensive, design
DOA. Sigh. Was so excited to receive this item and it arrived today via UPS in pieces. I should have heeded the previous reviewer's warning. Doh! Oh well. Live and learn. Live and learn. Refund, please
first kitchenaid appliance that is not good. Very low quality and I am very surprised that Kitchenaid puts its name on this product.  I highly DO NOT reccommend this product.  I agree with all the other reviews about this product and was in denial until I bought one myself
Great idea but Poorly made product. - 2 of the 3 wheels broke off after first trip to laundromat- metal coil already ripping through the red polyster hamper- tote strap very uncomfortable to carry a bag this large when full of clothe
Thick Paper towels cause a problem too. Looks nice but the roll does fall off and thick paper towels can rub the top edge of the unit closest to the cabinet. Item is being returned
Rip Off. What a complete rip off. The 5" by almost 6" cookbook that comes with it is maybe worth 2 dollars( I think they used card stock for the cover anyway ). Your better off getting plain planks(more planks and alot cheaper). Save your money for better products this isn't one of them
Great concept, but. . . This waterer is a great concept, but does have some drawbacks.  For starters, one of my dogs is scared to death of it and wont come near it because when the water level in the bowl gets low it gurgles just like a water cooler at work.  The first time it happened she was drinking out of it and it freaked her out and now wont go near it.  The other dog is just fine with it, but then again he's deaf, so the gurgle doesn't bother him. lol. The other issue i had with this is just like all water bowls, it gets dirty.  so you still have to clean it as often as you would any other water bowl, but it's a bit more cumbersome having to take the big jug off, clean the bowl and but the jug back on.  So, if your dog isn't afraid of the noise it makes and you don't mind the extra hassle cleaning it, it's great.  Otherwise, just get a large bowl; that's what i ended up having to do
scrubber. This item is not powerful enough. I really thought it would do a better job of cleaning. The squirter got clogged after one use and did not deliver enough liquid
Scratched on first use. The box and inside materials say that metal utensils can be used, but after a single use my metal spatula created deep grooves all over the surface.  The pan was ruined.  Very disappointed
poor quality for price ratio. As several others have noted, the wire goes slack and then breaks easily after a short period of time. Once the wire breaks you have nothing but an expensive handle to throw away. This product should be recalled, it is of fraudulently poor quality
Thoroughly dissatisfied!!!!!. I never received this product!!! I returned the black cloth bag I received instead of the glasses and I received an e-mail confirmation of my return of what I had received.  I have never received a refund!!
Not Stainless or Straight-Through. I bought this grinder for my wife who likes extra fine grind and she was tired of holding the button on our current burr grinder and wanted an automatic shutoff. The straight-through sounded good as our current Salton grinder would accumulate grinds on the side shoot and had to be cleaned regularly. Stainless sounded even better.When I received the grinder I looked at the parts and it looked like any other grinder. The stainless part is the BACK COVER and has nothing to do with performance. Then I pulled out the grind container and found that not only is it not straight through but has an extra bent tube that routes the grinds out the side of the grinder and down into the the container. If the direct side outlet clogs, this will clog even more.I never even tried it, but sent it back. Total misrepresentation by Capresso
furminator the more efficient tool. i got this for my cat (ocicat breed).  he's a short-haired cat that doesn't generally need much grooming except when the season changes.  shedender worked just like the commericals.  one brush and fur goes flying everywhere.  it does remove hair however the teeth of the comb are not deep so the removed hair goes either flying or stays on top of the fur towards the back.  as u can see in the picture the tool is small.  if you have the patience and extra time (and if your pet has the patience too!) u can think about saving some money with this tool.  if you want something more efficient, invest some extra money and go for the furminator instead.  i bought both and compared them but i'm keeping my furminator despite the much higher price
Never Again Dirt Devil. I've had my vacuum for a few years now only b/c I'm too lazy to buy another one. However, I am at the end of my rope. From Day 1 of having this vacuum the belt broke frequently -- and most of the time I was vacuuming on hardwood. If I accidentally ran over a cat toy or piece of string or anything bigger than a crumb, the belt broke. I took to buying lots of extra belts whenever I went to the store. The other day - surprise - the belt broke for no apparent reason. I promptly replaced it and it broke again the minute I turned the vacuum on. I say: NO MORE. I am now determined to buy the best vacuum EVER. I don't care how much it costs!! The only nice thing about this vacuum is the ability to use to the hose/attachments without having to flip a switch; and it is pretty powerful. But that's it. Changing the cannister can be messy and like a few other reviewers, I frequently run over the cord. Something just wasn't designed right there... You've been warned
Breadmakers Beware - this is not the one for you!. After 20+ years of owning a Cuisinart, I switched to this food processor because of concerns over Cuisinart quality.  What a mistake this food processor is, especially if you want to use it for making bread.-  Dough does not ball up in this unless you run it forever, and even then the kneading is not as smooth as with a Cuisinart.-  The mini-bowl is a pain to remove.-  The unit is massively heavy, even moving it forward a couple of inches on the counter is a chore.- The rubber feet stick to the counter and get dislodged when moving the unit.- Huge chunks are left over between the blade and the lid when gratign or slicing.Do I like anything about it?  No. This is a dog, buyers beware
Look for a different coffeemarker. Right from the start I have had problems with this coffee marker.The timer/clock loses about 5 minutes a day so I'm always resetting the time to the correct time so that the automatic start feature will work.The lid on the thermos leaks during brewing. Which means coffee spills everywhere including on the maker which also shuts the coffee marker off. So I end up with coffee everywhere and have to wait hours before I can even think of using the marker again.I have owned the coffee maker for less than 30 days and I think I will be looking for a replacement tomorrow
Wire broke on the first slice. I purchased the cheese slicer to replace one from the 70's that finally gave out.  I pulled out a block of cheddar cheese and tried the new slicer.  The comfortable handle made holding the slicer a dream, but the dream ended quickly.  The wire broke halfway through the first slice!  Unlike my old slicer, this one does not have a screw on the side to re-attach the existing wire, adjust the tension or replace a broken wire.   Oxo's web site says they guarantee satisfaction, so I am going to see if I can actually get it replaced without paying more in shipping than I saved by buying this slicer rather than the fancier one
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
Nothing but trouble. We bought this machine over a year ago. It has been nothing but trouble. Water leaks over top of shot. We've tried everything - new parts, different beans, different grinds. Very disapponted
Ugly. Quite possibly the most overpriced crappy wine glasses anyone could find.  They're exactly like the wine glasses you'd find at a hotel bar -- short, with a rolled lip, and designed to be washed in a dishwasher over and over.  Heavy and indestructible.  Not what I think of when I think of crystal
Smells bad, thermostat is useless. The thermostat on this heater is a waste of time. It has a knob that you can control the thermostat shutoff level with. The trouble is that when you try to adjust to say, 70-85 degrees the sensitivity of the thermostat becomes extreme and you can never get it right. It'll either stay on all the time or never come on until you get to around 65F.  It also smells rather nasty
Disappointing performance. This product got a lot of great reviews and was the reason why I purchased it.However it had very poor suction power, in fact it would blow dirt away from the edges. It was also very heavy to maneuver around. The solution reservoir was too small and had to be refilled often. Cleaning the tanks takes a very long time. The attachments are useless since hose is not long enough the machine needs to be repositioned frequently to be near the area you want to clean. There was also leaking water on the floor every time after turning the vacuum off. Finally, it saved me no time at all. It took longer to do the floor with this vacuum than it would have if I used a broom and mop
I couldn't make it work. While one of the other reviewers states that it only works on some types of champagne bottles, I couldn't get it to work at all.  I tried it on two different shapes of bottles, but to no avail.  The problem is that the ring that is supposed to slide down the neck to secure the stopper doesn't slide when it's on the bottle.  When off the bottle, the mechanism works fine.  It appears to me that the stopper must be made for a specific bottle and not for most champagne bottles in general.  At least that was my experience.  I found a good $3.00 stopper at Sur la Table that works just fine and is not dependent on the shape of the champagne bottle.  It doesn't have the fancy pour spout, but at least it keeps the bubbles in the champagne
Really cheapy. I ordered this thinking it would be great for grinding up "big people food" for my grandson.  It could not even grind up a soft hot dog!  We kept trying softer and softer foods to see if it would be able to grind them but since the blade is a cheap plastic material (painted gray to look like metal!) it just couldn't do the job.  Sheesh, I mashed up a banana faster and better than this grinder.  Total waste of money.  Also, my husband tried to put the handle on the carrying case and it snapped right in two.  Junk
Not worth it. Saw these canisters and fell in love with them. Couldn't wait to get them and when I did they were broken into a million pieces.  They replaced them very timely but one lid is almost too small and the seal doesn't fit properly.  Another lid fits so tight it takes two hands to get the lid off.  I was disppointed in the quality.  I wouldn't buy these again even if I had to buy something more expensive
under cabinet lights. these lights are junk, but the vendor i purchased them from is excellen
Filter is great, but not worth spraying your sink over... My wife and I bought this Pur Filter and installed it yesterday.  One thing we immediately noticed was that when we attached it to our faucet, the water stream was no longer a smooth stream into the sink like it used to be... now it was a full-on spray.  It's a real inconvenience to try to run water over a spoon or into a glass for washing when you need pressure and your stream is spraying all over your hands and sink.  I haven't read any other reviews where anyone else has had this problem, so we're going to take this model back and exchange it for an upgraded model.  Maybe we can chalk this one up to bad luck, but I would definitely not buy this one again
Returned 2 - Burnt Out Motors. Burnt out the motor on the first one within 3 months, exchanged for a new one, burnt out the motor on the 2nd one within 6 months.  I only used the lower power setting and was only juicing carrots
Nesco roaster oven. Well, after having this for almost a year, I honestly am sorry I bought it because I am finding it just isn't a necessary appliance for my kitchen.  My mom has one and just loves it.  She cooks all her chickens in it, small turkey breasts and larger sized roasts.  I have cooked my chicken in it and it did turn out well. However, I continually needed to check it to make sure it wasn't burning on the bottom.  It is much easier for me to put the whole chicken in a cooking bag in the oven.  In terms of the slow cooker portion of the roaster, the things that I have tried to slow cook I haven't used enough of (we're a small family) and the food hasn't cooked all day like I would want it to without being burned and dried out.  As a result, I ended up purchasing a 4 quart slow cooker which I just love and the portions I use in it are the right size for our family.This appliance is big and you need to have enough room to store it.  I think if you have a large family and are cooking large portions, this should work well for you.
Seems a bit flaky. I love the concept and simple (implied) ease of use of this item, but when I actually used it, it didn't work so well. Some days it worked fine but then other times it would  turn on too early or too late (not at dusk as designed) or not at all
Not up to snuff. This toaster was not up to snuff for a variety of reasons. It did not toast bread evenly; the toast was dark on top but virtually untoasted on the bottom. Secondly, it had a bagel feature which left the bagels very light when bagels should be very dark. Despite these deficiencies, the product did have one redeeming feature. The handle that allowed one to lift the toast out of the toaster to varying heights was very handy and unique compared to many other toasters.
OFFICE CHAIR!. Well I purchased 2 chairs thru Amazon. When the chairs arrived that were exactly what was displayed. Very nice. But after two and a half months the chairs gas lift broke on one of them. I sent an email to the vendor on 1-8-07 and still have not heard anything from them. I run a buisness and use this chair for our frontdesk.  I was hoping this matter could have been taken care of with a little more customer service! I hope that in the next couple of days they will get back to me regarding this purchase and rectify the situation
Doesn't work for very long. I bought this coffee maker and after only using it 6-10 times over the course of 13 months, it stopped working.  I called the number for service that was listed in the booklet and was told it can't be repaired & I should just throw it away!  I had already purchased nearly 100 pods and now those and the coffee maker are useless!  Buy one at you own risk
It doesn't work!. I bought this product with high hopes of making my Christmas candy, but after 3 hrs. of having my chocolat chips and wax in the Chocolate Heaven Fondue pot, my chocolate wasn't quite melted yet.  At that point, I switched to my double boiler, which worked fine.My advice is don't buy this product.  Invest in a double boiler.I'm rating the product a one because it doesn't work.  Also, it's too small.  With such a small quantity of chocolate in the pot (it will hold 12 oz of chips), I would have needed to melt 2 rounds of chips.  With 3 hours and counting to get the first batch melted, I didn't have time to melt another pack in the Fondue
It sucks!. This kitchen timer is really cute and I HAD to have it to match every other pink kitchenaid appliance that I own and love. BUT you simply cannot hear it. When the other review said that you couldn't hear it from the other room they were being generous. You literally can't hear it from like 3 feet away unless you REALLY concentrate. So buy it if you just think it's cute - it is. But still you will have to buy a TIMER for your kitchen or you're gonna burn the cookies.
Not so good. I got this toaster cause it was a good brand and on sale. I thought it looked really nice and it does go well with the other appliances in my kitchen, but it doesn't work worth a damn. SInce day one my toast has been unevenly toasted. And even at the highest setting, my bread is more slightly warm and over-dry than actually toasted. I like the bagel setting, but don't use it because I always forget which direction to put the bagel in... Pretty much, I really wish I had not bought this toaster. I am amazed that the company still sells it actually.
What a waste!. I just bought it yesterday. It isn't a cheap product, but I thought it would be nice if I could save dryer time and not use fabric softener sheets.However, with my home dryer, drying time was the same, and it didn't soften laundry at all. At least, I didn't notice any difference. If people still need to use fabric softener sheets, what is the point? If I had known this result, I wouldn't have bought this. I am very disappointed
2 bowls later and waiting. I received a bowl and it was cracked. I returned it and another bowl was sent. This one was also cracked. Waiting on further directions. Frustrated they did not check the condition before mailing.Bowl Less..
What a rip-off!. This was a horrible egg slicer.  I thought something from KitchenAid that was advertised to slice strawberries or mushrooms would be worthwhile, but was I wrong.  Worked fine for eggs, but broke on the first strawberry.  My previous one broke on the first mushroom!Don't bother.  Use a knife.  Save the slicer for the eggs
Don't waste your money!!. I have a lot of low-voltage lights on our house.  Many colors and different wattages, which I dearly love.  Unfortunately, the spiders also love to build webs on the siding because flying insects are attracted to the lights.  One night I used my Panasonic vacuum (which I love) and got over 30!  The motor chews them up and spits the pieces into the disposable bag--I've never had one survive! Nice jolly subject, right? Often, I have to hold the vacuum in one hand (20 lbs.) while using the hose with attachment in the other.  This gives me over 3 ft. of reach and the suction is so great that the insect is "gone" within 1" of the brush.  OK, the Lentek is rechargeable, doesn't have a power cord and is lite (albeit unwieldly).  After charging for a day the unit would pick up a 1/8" spider but nothing larger.  After a minute of operation the suction is down by about half and you won't get anything then.  Yes, I'm back to the Panasonic and the Lentek?---the "round file"!
Don't waste your money.... I've owned one of these for about a month.  It's a total waste of money.  It rarely sprays, just a steady stream of oil.  I'm diabetic and thought this would be a good way to restrict my use of oil on salads, etc.  I am so very disappointed......   I'll try to find another brand that is more reliable and that does what it's advertised
Disappointed. This is my first time to use an electric krumkake baker as I previously had the old type you use over the stove.I feel the baker doesn't bake evenly on both sides........the top of the krumkake cookie is nice but the bottom remains on the soggy side which leads me to believe the heat is uneven.Also there is no indicator light to let you know when the cookie is done.  Therefore you have to really pay attention to your time. Usually it took only 55 seconds to a minute. Also hard to get two cookies commpletely round..... batter ran into each other. Perhaps my batter was too runny but have used this recipe before on the old iron without trouble.I'm at the point that perhaps the single baker would be better than the double. HOpe to find a person that could demonstrate the two cookie krumkake maker......perhaps that would help. Trying to be open-minded!
Rusty knives and worse customer service. I got these knives as a gift. Ironically, the first thing to rust was the part of each knife stamped "Stainless Steel".Let's be realistic. These knives are cheap. They're thin and they're not well weighted. However, they say stainless steel, and you figure that that's what you're getting. I hand-washed these knives and dried them immediately, but they still corroded.Now comes the bad part. I wrote to their customer service department twice and didn't hear back. I finally got their address (from the post office) and sent them back the knives. It took three months of me emailing and calling them (with 15+ minute wait times for Each Call) to get them to send me a replacement set.The replacement set rusted in about two weeks. That was in September. I just got off the phone with Miracle Blade, a call during which I was interrupted so many times that I actually had to say "I'm going to finish my sentence" so their rep would stop talking. They won't refund my money. In fact, they won't refund Anyone's money after 30 days. The lifetime warranty is for replacement only. They'll send me another set of soon-to-be-rusty knives, of course--if I pay the shipping and handling...Again. I asked the rep for his full name, for his ID#, and for a manager, and he refused all requests.In summary, if you buy these knives, they will rust. You will want to get rid of them. Your only option will be the garbage can
Broken dreams. Thought this would be a perfect drinking glass.  My husband cracked it the first time he used it - all he did was brush it against another object.  Very expensive item for it to be so fragile
Not what it used to be. I had what was supposed to be the same model for many years and it worked very well, although the push-down handle broke off two years ago.  The toaster finally became stuck in reheat mode, so I decided to replace it with the same model.  Not possible.  The newer incarnation of the Classic is much less sturdy and the push-down mechanism would not engage - that is, you could not push the handle down and have it stay down to toast.  I returned it and set out to find a better toaster - no easy task.
Don't expect too much.... I bought this vacuum as a cheap "in between" vacuum while I saved up to get a better one.  It did a pretty good job cleaning my small apartment for about a month.  It has a nice LED which tells you when you need to clean the cup and filter. This is also, unfortunently, when the vacuums suction has dwindled to nill.  This happens often.  After a few minutes of medium to heavy cleaning, the whole thing needs to be cleaned, otherwise your just pushing the thing back and forth for show.  After about a month, this condition became permanent.  The light stayed on, and the vacuum was basically useless.  I hesitate to give this product one star, because it would probably be good for small jobs and light cleaning.  Just don't buy it and expect it to be your primary vacuum
Totally Disappointed. I brought this item looking at its high ratings. It didn't take long to find out what was wrong with this cooker.The first time, it didn't blow any whistle. I thought maybe I had put less water in it so that it couldn't build enough pressure. Second time it was worse, I filled the water, careful not to exceed the safety mark and closed the lid. Soon, water droplets started coming out of the edges. Thinking that it'd stop soon, I let it go. This time, the steam started coming out from the edges and more heavily from between the handles. It burnt the food and didn't pressure cook it.I'm returning this product within a week of buying it
Awful coffee! Messy machine. This coffeemaker makes the WORST coffee of any I have owned in 26 years.  It "brews" very quickly, losing a "cup" or more of the water added in steam that just pours out of the top.  The coffee is weak and bitter (no matter what brand we have tried).  About the 4th time we used the pot it overflowed, creating a mess of grounds and coffee all over the countertop.  We thought maybe we had put the carafe on the base incorrectly, and were careful to always be sure it was pushed in completely from then on. The same thing has happened twice more. This coffeemaker is a piece of junk
Scary! Melted the bottom. I used to agree with great comments of fellow consumers. Today I experienced very scary part of it. When my wife kept the cooker for little longer than used to be( less than 45min), we started smelling metal. When we went to kitchen we couldn't believe our eyes, the bottom of the cooker melted and dripped down as molten metal, ...it was so scary. I do have pictures of it all and will be going for consumer protection on this item. Just thought of let you all future buyers and current owners know about it.
Bad design, too many parts to clean, long juicing time, small capacity. I read all the positive reviews, and after using this unit I can only say that those giving the Omega 8005 a positive rating must have either very low standards or nothing better with which to compare.I have a Breville 800JEXL Juice Fountain Elite, arguably the pinnacle of consumer-level juicers. This thing is fast, easy to clean, and exceptionally well designed from a usability standpoint. The industrial design is tremendous, and everything is sized perfectly and makes sense.The Omega 8005, unfortunately, doesn't compare. It's feed tube is so incredibly small that you can only feed a single stem of kale at a time, or risk jamming the tube. The Omega 8005 is absolutely useless to juice anything other than grass or simple greens because of its inability to handle a decent quantity at one time. Even the tray that sits atop the feed chute is shallow, narrow, and utterly useless because whatever you put into it quickly falls out.It takes me a good 10-15 min. to juice two bunches of parsley and one bunch of kale, excluding clean-up, simply because you have to cautiously feed each item or risk a jam. The amount of juice produced is under 4 oz., enough green juice for one person. If I had to spend 10-15 min. juicing for each person (not including cleanup) in my household, that's a good 45 min. of juicing time plus cleanup.Although the Breville isn't particularly adept at juicing leafy greens, it can produce 8 oz. of juice in under 10 seconds from items such as carrots, apples, oranges, pineapples, tomatoes, grapefruits, etc. Such items make absolutely no sense to juice in the Omega 8005 because it would take an inordinate amount of time to chop everything up into the small 1 inch squares that are required to fit through the feed chute.When the feed chute jamps (quite often), the supplied plunger is inadequate to exert enough leverage to force the produce down the chute. When you do exert force, the entire juicer tips unless you use both hands -- one to force the produce down, the other to physically hold the juicer down.Cleanup is a big chore. The Breville has large, easy parts to rinse, but the Omega 8005 has easily double the number of parts that require cleaning. The parts are smaller, with a lot more nooks and crannies requiring attention.Photos of the Omega 8005 show a single container underneath the juicer to catch both juice and pulp, which is ridiculous. The container provided is not large enough to properly catch pulp, unless you enjoy having pulp all over your counter. Contrary to the representations made on the packaging and in the instructions, you need to use two containers: one for the juice and the other for the pulp. This machine contains a multitude of design flaws that are further exacerbated by undersized parts which inhibit usability and functionality.It seems to produce slightly more juice from greens than the Breville, although not by a quantity significant enough to mitigate the amount of time and frustration spent in using this underpowered, undersized, and badly designed machine. Juice is very thick and pulpy, with small pepper-sized pieces of the original vegetable present in the juice. Very annoying, especially since none of this is an issue with the Breville.You will read people claiming that juice from the Omega 8005 is healthier because it has less froth and is not subject to the "warming" of a centrifugal design, thereby retaining more of its nutrients. This could not be farther from the truth. The Omega 8005's single impellar produced plenty of heat from friction, and juice comes out substantially warmed from its cold refrigerator state. I have noticed no such warming in the Breville 800JEXL, and can't help but believe that users of the Omega 8005 once again are deluding themselves into believing marketing hype that simply isn't true (i.e., it's a big lie). As far as froth is concerned, yes, the Omega 8005 produces far less froth -- but at the expense of a pulpier juice with pepper-sized gritty fragments of vegetable in it. Given the choice, I'll take the cleaner juice with the froth and just skim off the froth.I did not purchase from Amazon, but from another store that had a better price. I wish I had bought from Amazon, as I could probably return the thing now that I've discovered its many flaws. I can't imagine anybody using this to juice anything of any substance -- it would take just too darn long.In short: don't buy this machine. Unless you specifically need to juice greens for the maximum amount of extraction and are willing to put up with a badly designed unit, pass this one up and go for the gold: the Breville 800JEXL. You won't regret it
Dry but Sore Feet. I purchased Paw Tectors for our Australian Shepherds. The dogs are walked on country roads in Northern Wisconsin that are sanded and salted during the winter months. These booties did stay on the dogs' feet, but I stopped using them because they were too stiff and rubbed on their paws until they were bleeding.
Be Cautious!. I purchased the cat it fountain, and for about 1-2 months, it was the greatest thing I could have imagained for my cats. They were drinking fresh water and it was great for them, they loved it. Very shortly however, it began to break down. The valve broke during routine washing. The water never formed a continuous stream over the dome, even after "running my hand over the dome to release the static electricity." I was lucky if there was a single stream, but I took it because the water was at least getting cycled. Now, 90% of the time, my $40 investment won't even throw me the smallest of streams, effectively turning my investment into an electricity wasting door stop. Sometimes, when I am lucky and seat it just right, it will give me a stream.It's touch and go... just be warned
Don't buy it from Dynadirect. The Corningware dish is great, my 1 star is not for the item, it is for Dynadirect.  They are HORRIBLE!  Item was backordered, but they never told me and charged my credit card.  When I called they finally told me it was backordered and I ask that they cancel the order and refund my money.  Bad, Bad Servic
Durability issues. I've owned this vacuum for 3 years. Most features are OK for $150 vacuum cleaner. My issues are the unit, due to its wheel design, gets tougher to pull around on carpet. I tip the unit over often due to this. Also, like another reviewer said, if you've got wood floors, or tile, the absence of an attachment for that type of flooring is missed. The powerhead in the "off" position is not the same. Lastly, the powerhead stopped working after just 3 years of light duty (we have a 2 story house and have a vacuum on each floor, so it only has to vacuum 1/2 a house). Like another reviewer, the nearest Sanyo repair center is 1 1/2 hours away. The unit only carries a 1 year warranty, so I'm outta luck. They sent me to a website to buy a replacement powerhead...it's $130...as much as buying the whole vacuum. As in most areas, the hourly charge on fixing electronics continues to go up, so if it takes a couple of hours at $50/hr (or higher in some areas, I'm sure), I may as well buy a new vacuum.Good points are the way you empty the unit, the filter system, and it seems to do OK on carpets.
gets loose all by itself - not recommended. I love the look of this collar and the idea is great that it pulls loose when/if it gets caught on something so the cat can get away BUT I find that it comes loose on its own!! I bought two and they both have the same problem. I have to re-tighten it twice a day which obviously makes it useless. I'm tossing them in the garbage and going back to the other kind I had
Piece of junk. I've owned 2 of the previous model of Scum Buster and I was looking forward to purchasing this new design.  What a disappointment!   I put in a water type cleaner and on the second use the nozzle was clogged. To clean it, yu have empty the reservoir, wasting all of the cleaning product that was in it.  When taking it apart to clean it, a black piece fell out which didn't show on the diagram of parts so I had no way to know what is was or where it went.  DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS!I don't know what has happened to Black and Decker, at one time they made quality products but not any more.  I bought an electric floor cleaner made by them a couple of months ago which was also a piece of junk.  I will never buy another Black and Decker product and would advise anyone looking to buy another brand
I expected more from Henckels. I gave these 2 stars because they worked nice for the first couple of months, even cut through chicken bones.  But just like the other reviews, the spring rusted terribly and the spring tends to pop off too easily at the most inconvenient moment.  I used these for making chicken soup alot, but noticed that it also doesn't always come clean between the blades and when using on chicken I like to be extra careful. So the next set I get I'll look for a set where the blades unhinge to make sure they come clean and not from Henckels this time
save your money!!!!!!!!!!!!!. this piece of plastic is garbage! one use and it fell apart. just use the end of a cork screw to rip the foil off
Great for a while but then it falters. I loved this item for a long time.  It is quiet and not unattractive.  But, I have had it for a year or so, and now it is not working.  The pump seems to be broken, because when I add water to the resevoir it stops flowing and sometimes days later it will suddenly turn back on.  It is also difficult to clean in certain parts that are hard to access for scrubbing, but good at trapping orange mold.  I also bought one for my neighbor a while back and her cats refused to use it
Kong Air Dog Squeaker Jack. My Collie doesn't like this toy and has only ever had it out of her toy box once and then it just sat on the floor.  Would not recommend it to anyone else
Just too flimsy to rely on. We travel in third world countries and ordered this to provide a little more security while we're sleeping.  The materials used in this lock are just too flimsy to inspire much confidence.  The main body is plastic.  The metal bar which fits into the door jamb is thin and flexible so easily bends out of the way when pressure is put on the door.  The serrations on the bar are not deep, so don't promise much strength.  While none of these locks can be expected to withstand someone trying to kick the door in, this one, while prettily-designed is overly expensive and unimpressive. We're going to try a few others.By the way, in returning this item, which we consider unsatisfactory, Amazon will charge us doubly:  the cost to return the item to Amazon and also charge us for what we originally saved with our "Super Saver" shipping.  The end result is far from the full refund other merchants offer
Not what its cracked up to be... I was really dissappointed in the quality of the Comfort Clinic topper.  It doesnt state what density this memory foam is made of, but it is not very supportive at all.  Cannot recommend this product at all
Tropix Tumblers. Tumblers keep drinks cool, but do not appear to be very durable (compared to Tervis tumblers).  One tumbler was cracked upon receipt
it sucked - i've sent it back. more thought needs to be put into the design of this produc
Similar problem as the first reviewer.. The blender I received also smelled as if it was overheating and the tachometer did not work. I am sending it back and will be asking for a refund. This clearly is not a reliable blender
Plastic piece will break. My mother-in-law and I both had this blender. Hers broke in a couple of months. I was lucky that mine lasted a couple of years. It is a great blender for crushing ice for smoothies/icees, etc., however it has a flaw that the piece that the pitcher sits on when it spins is made out of plastic. It eventually cracks from the heat/friction produced. I bought the Oster Beehive blender to replace it, and it has a metal piece beneath it and I have had it for a few years now with no problem. I am even happier with the Oster Beehive blender, as it is a much better quality blender which will last a lot longer than the Cuisinart one (it was also cheaper), and it crushes ice exactly as good if not better than the Cuisinart blender
This unit is worthless. I bought this unit a few years back.  Worthless at best!  I wish someone - even the mfg could come up with some kind of solution to retain the heat with these units.  I called their customer service - who said, "Good Luck" as their best solution.  The problem is - Aluminum cools off too fast.  It will NOT retain heat.  I wish I could locate a Cast Iron Krumkake!  Do they make them anymore?  eBay - HELP!!
Not what it appears. I recently ordered these spice tins -- 4 sets.  What I received was 4 tins.  When you look at this set and read the description, "12 pc s/s spice tins," you think you are getting a set of 4 tins per order, right?  Wrong.  I got one tin per order.  Someone must have done a poor job describing this item, because it is not the set pictured nor described.  The tins are nice, but they are a push on/off lid that I'm afraid will soon loosen.  I wish they were screw on/off instead.  The shipping was so costly that I kept them, but I am going to make some noise about this order.
microwave popper. This didn't do as well as an old microwve poper I've used for yers.  It didn't showa great increase in kernals popped,and they were not as light and crispy.  It is absolutely necessary to use the 'power packs', which I couldn't find in local stores.  Since I gave several of the poppers as gifts I shopped on line for replacement 'power packs' for all and found the postage/handling fee for 10 packages was ten times what it cost for one (incredibly light) pack.
Dishes arrived damaged. I received the set in the mail, and immediately noticed that the contents inside were damaged.  I returned the item to Amazon, who issued a prompt refund.  It appears that the persons handling these fragile items aren't very cautious, so I would advise against buying this.  Amazon was great with a prompt refund, though
Difficult to use. This is my third salad spinner and by far the most difficult to use. It was, however, easier than washing lettuce by hand. I purchased it in Dec. 2005 and used it at least weekly for the past year.  Yesterday the inner basket cracked/broke. The plunger/pump takes moderate effort to push down. I am 5'10" tall and had a hard time on average height counters.  The stop button is also on the top of  the pump, mine would lock down every other pump, stopping the spin. A lot of effort to get desired results, but it is doable.The outer bowl and top are attractive and durable. I did not have any problems with it slipping on the counter.I would not recommend this product, I am going back to the string pull zylis
Outstanding growth medium. I am editing this review for clarity. No, I am not talking about carbon.This is one of the best Brita filter systems I've used. I also use the large water cooler model that offers hot and cold dispensing, and I've used several pitcher sizes over the years. This large dispenser fits almost anywhere and holds far more water than the pitcher sizes. The valve works perfectly and closes securely. So, if capacity is more important than portability, this is a great dispenser. Because of the valve, kids can use this much easier than they might a full, large pitcher.My only problem with it is the mould-like stuff that grows in mine. No, that's not the carbon all us Brita users are used to ignoring. It's fuzzy stuff that grows in clumps and sticks to the plastic and is very hard to remove. Maybe that's because the large upper reservoir remains damp and closed longer than a smaller pitcher system would and because it's upstairs where my air conditioning doesn't reach. It's hot up there most of the year.And because of the relatively small, but convenient, filler opening, it's not easy to see into the reservoir through it. So, it's easier to just keep filling without looking into it until filler time. I was going to discard this, but after realizing that nobody in the household got sick, I decided to keep it. I'm leaving the one-star rating in place because I can't edit it, and because I'm tired of household members who complain about the growths. Hey, that's what the faucet is for. What do they think grows in there?
Pls take my advice...DNT BUY THIS PRODUCT. I ordered this pan even though i had never heard about this brand before.But the picture on the site and the product review looked good.When i recieved this item the lid that was promised was not shipped.The pan looked worn out and it looked factory refurbished.I returned the pan today and i promised myself that this is the last time i order brands that i have never heard about through the internet.Its better to stick to brands like faberware and calphalon which have not caused me any problems earlier and have lasted for such a long time
Malfunctioned after 2 weeks!. It's noisy and expensive - you can get that from reading the other reviews on this page. Ours stopped working within 2 weeks of light use. I called the company and when I described the problem they said it was a faulty unit. Thankfully the store let me return it and I got my money back. We have bought the Hamilton Beach TrueAir 04381 Allergen Reducer Air Cleaner which is cheaper, smaller, and very quiet. Most importantly, it works!!!
Size doesn't match product description. When I got this table I was shocked to see that the table measured 24 inches wide by 24 inches deep. The product description says that it is only 14 inches deep. That was the size I wanted, not a square!!! Too bad they did not put a more accurate size in the description. Now I'm stuck with a table that is too wide!!! Buy beware!!
Egg Boiler Much Worse Than It Looks. After the FIRST use the teflon coating started to bubble up and after the FIRST WEEK it looked as if were decades old!It looks nice on the outside, makes consistently perfect hard or soft boiled eggs BUT it looks like crap after a week
Don't use  hard water. This humidifier is great for programing humidity, fan speed, sleep mode, etc.BUT IF YOU HAVE HARD WATER DO NOT BUY IT. It puts out white dust that will go all over your house. I have three Sharper Image Ionic breezes, on two floors of my house. I had to clean them every day and they were covered with white dust. Besides that;  my furnature , TV screen, etc.were covered with white dust within two days. I buought a Honeywell with a exchangable filter that uses vapor rather than mist to humidify the air. This works great. Very little white dust. Half the cost
Poor mixer. Very disappointed with this Hamilton Beach "mixer".  It does not have the power or blade to mix ice cream shakes as advertised.  A spoon does a better job.
rusts. This can opener works perfectly but the two gripper and cutting spoked wheels rusted early on. This can opener got a top rating from a consumer products review show but I wish I owned a can opener that didn't rust
Glue problem. Saw the other review and had to share my similar experience. The glue is still not off of my pan after hours and hours of scrubbing. It's now spread out a bit into a larger dark grey spot surrounded by steel wool scrapings. I have to return it because I know will get angry every time I pull it out of the cupboard and see the mess
I hate having to change the sponge. This is the worst mop when it comes to having to change the mop head, after the second time of having to change it i was so frusterated with the thing that i just went to the dollar store and got a really cheap one and that works better than that thing. I even attempted to try and get it off with plyers and that did not even work.
great design poor execution. I just returned mine. It leaked -- just as others have reported.Twice the top fell off while I was pouring my martini. The first time I thought I must have put it on too loosely. The second time I knew it was not anything I did. Its a shame that such a well designed utensil has such poor quality control
Good coffee.  Not worth the aggravation!. A friend of ours bought this for us.  He owns several coffee shops and we were excited to have great coffee at home.  Out of the box, I needed to tinker with it for a while and had to refer to online chat rooms to figure out how to get it to work correctly.  The problem was that the coffee didn't stay perculating long enough in the top and then it shot down into the carafe. I called Bodum of North America and their customer service person was a surley $$***!!!!!!*****.  They offered no help at all and had no idea what I was talking about which unless they totally disregard internet reviews was a lie.  Several people wrote, in online articles, to cut down the tube that goes in to the carafe by small dimension.  I didn't do that but I learned that if you don't push the top down all the way it will work okay.After I got it working okay, it did make really good, and hot coffee.  Then the poorly designed flip top broke and Bodum has never had it back in stock (I wonder why!),  then we got really sick of trying (in vane) to clean the inside of the carafe.  Finally the annoyance of the thing as a whole overrode the quality of the coffee.My advice is if you want really great coffee go to your local cafe.  For day to day coffee at home don't buy this.It looks cool and does make good coffee but at a big price
Worst rice cooker. Its life is only 2 weeks, one of the worst rice cooker
Terrible Product. From the dates on the reviews below, it seems we all got suckered by the low price--but this product it HORRIBLE.  The package labeling says it has a 210 count "Down and Feather Proof" shell.But if you want to experience this product without buying it, just throw a handfull of straight pins in you bed.This stupid thing has drawn BLOOD.  I am requesting full refunds from amazon for both sizes that I ordered, and may even speak to an attorney.
Not for the 17400. Listen to Lynn from New England, I wish she had written her review before I purchased these.The 17400 model that I use requires 2 of these HRF-14 filters and 2 foam spacers. The reduction in the quality of the filtered air is very noticeable. (The plastic edges of the 2 HEPA filters touching in the middle + the two foam spacers at the end reduce the total filter surface area dramatically) Also, changing the prefilter is much more of a hastle when you are trying to juggle 4 pieces wrapped by the prefilter instead of one. I suppose you could use heavy duct tape to keep them bound together, but then you would lose even more filtering capacity.The competition's late night infomercials try to demonstrate that the Honeywell (I am pretty sure they show the 17400) is difficult to clean, but because it isn't when using the single HEPA filter, the actors overdramatize and you can tell it. If they had used THIS filter set up in their demo, though, it would have been much more convincing.This may be slightly cheaper in the (very) short run, but in the long run, if you would rather not have to replace the HEPA filter more often and if you want your Honeywell to work at maximum efficiency, use the single filter option instead.
It Broke!. It was great while it lasted, but the garlic press handle broke off easily, and we had to replace it with a sturdier brand
Not worth the money. It is best to invest a few more dollars and purchase a better itemLight and not providing the warmth expected from this price level.Feels incomplet
Not Happy. This came broken the packaging was not good. Damage good don't make happy custome
A complete waste of money. I have no idea what Hoover's engineers were thinking when they came up with this rotating HEPA filter concept...the filter stopped rotating after the second use and requires EXTENSIVE cleaning after every vacuuming session, or the suction drops to almost nothing.  You have to manually rotate the filter after each use to dislodge a ton of fine dust that plugs the filter, and usually makes a huge mess that has to be cleaned up with another vacuum while this one is disassembled.  I'd love to take it back for a refund, but it's too late now.  The first and last Hoover product I ever buy....
well!!!. At first I thought it was great. The cat likes it and loves to watch it clear itself. Now the cat uses it to poo but not to pee. There is way!!! to much cat litter. When it cleans itself it trys to pulls half the cat litter into the SMALL cardboard tray. I still have to clean the box once a week which I guess is better than three times a day. I guess our cat poos a lot. The poo does get stuck in the prongs from time to time and that is your que to clean the tray out. I also don't like that the cat really shuffles the litter around before he goes so it sets the sensor off and we have to shake the box often or just push the button to get it to run. That is kind of anoying. I think they really need to make some adjustments to the box but if you have an older cat that doesn't dig a lot or poop a lot then this is the box for you. Be aware though you will most likely have to clean it every week. I had to actually flip the lid around so the cat would push the litter away from the tray. He was helping push the litter into the tray so it would fill up clean litter and the poop would get stuck in the grid. All in all it's not to bad!
Bubbles, Buldges, and Other Imperfections. I purchased four of these shot glasses. Of the four, one has tiny bubbles throughout, one has black specs in the glass, one has a bulge in the glass, and the last is taller than the other three.The shape is beautiful, but with all the imperfections, I'd recommend something else.My most disappointing Bodum purchase ever
Poor Packaging. The first item I received was highly dented.  This is because the packaging is so inadequate for this type of item.  Since it was to be used outside, I sucked it up, figuring it was was easier than returning the unit.  Then the item dod not work, so i had to return it.  The next refrigerator I received was damamged again, but much less than the first one...and it worked...so, i kept it.  I read other complaints about the packaging of this item, but purchased anyway thinking it was over-stated...it's not.  Sanyo really needs to work this out as I am sure 90% of the refrigerators that are sent out become dented if they are all packaged the way mine were.  The fridge works fine...but does need frequent defrosting
Not So Sharper Image. This is the last item I will ever purchase from Sharper Image...it broke the second week I had it...spewing hand soap at will and not when I placed my hand under the infrared sensor.  It's pure crap.  Stay away!!
Trust me on this one...save your money. I am NOT a coffee snob...I like all kinds and strengths of coffee, however, melitta does not do its one:one machine justice with these pods.  I tried all of the pods in the variety pak and was not happy with any of them.(...) Really good coffee, lots of variety to choose from and extremely quick shipping.  Skip the melitta pods and try the Arabica Express pods (I like the Italian and vanilla pods) from podheads
Bad product. I'm really upset with this item. I registered for it and when I got it the thing didn't work. I called the 800 number trying to see if I did everything right but couldn't get a live person on the phone. I went and exchange the item and the second one didn't work. Horrible Horrible product and business
Dingy and dirty looking. Be careful ordering this item.  What you see is not what you might get.  I ordered it and expected a white new crisp feather down comforter. What I received was a very visibly "used" dingy, old comforter.  This was my first experience with Amazon that I ever rated a one!  I put it in the garbage and did not dare take the chance of putting it on my bed
No hardware. Not a single screw, bolt, allan wrench, etc. enclosed with this desk.  The wood looked nice but getting it back into the box to return was like unscrambling an egg.  Hopefully UPS will pick it up although I've been waiting for more than a day now.  Amazon is paying for the return and that's a good thing
BROWN RICE BLEW THERMAL FUSE. HAD MACHINE FOR 1 1/2 YEARS.  TRIED BROWN RICE FOR THE FIRST TIME AND IT BLEW THE THERMAL FUSE INSIDE.  HAD PLENTY OF WATER, IT JUST NEVER SWITCHED OVER TO THE WARMING FUNCTION WHEN IT WAS DONE. REPLACED THE FUSE WITH THE SAME RESULTS.  POSSIBLE THAT THE SWITCH OVER CIRCUITRY WENT SOUTH.  WOULDN'T BUY THIS MODEL AGAIN.  THE RICE COOKER WE HAD BEFORE THIS ONE LASTED ALMOST 20 YEARS.
Good espresso but flawed design. This is my second machine in ~1 month, the first was returned because the overflow tray started to jam. The second machine now has the same problem. As mentioned in other reviews, this tray fills up very fast. There's a nozzle that dispenses hot water directly into the tray towards the back of the machine (not sure why). I think what is happening is that the hot water bows the plastic tray slightly but enough to cause jamming. By jamming, I mean I have to pull so hard to slide the tray out that I'm afraid I'll break it. This is not just a minor annoyance since you'll have to turn the whole machine upside down in the sink to empty the tray. Hopefully, my experiences were the exception and not the rule, or this problem can be avoided by emtying out the tray more frequently. Me personally, I expect a machine to be idiot-proof. Thankfully I bought mine at Bloomingdale's so returning it will be easy. I would not recommend ordering this machine online
Image is Misleading. The image in this product is misleading. It looks like this product contains more than 1 piece, but when I opened it I got only one piece which is very small size and also the quality is inferior
wrong collar doesn't work. Neither Amazon, nor the vendor would make good on this purchase. the item was misrepresented. I wil never purchase from Amazon again. They will take your money and give you nothing
Cute but not practical. This toaster is so adorable but it's really not worth the trouble. The bread takes a while to toast and when it's finished, Hello Kitty's head is barely visible. The only way to get her to show up would be by actually burning the bread. Opt for the waffle or sandwich maker instead--they're so much better
Damaged. I really like the look of this bread bin, but the manufacturer does not package it in a box.  It only has a clear plastic bag around it.  Even though Amazon uses it's own box for shipping, it arrived with dents and cracks.  Amazon quickly replaced it with another one, which had dents, cracks, and the entire bottom was was badly scratched.  I don't have time to keep sending these back hoping to get a replacement which isn't damaged, so I gave up after returning the second one
It's too thin on its' leading edge and warps. I love my other silcone spatula's by Mario but this one is not what I expected.  The edge warps, and it is very difficult to get it under a pancake for example and turn it over.  It literally was sticking and tearing the pancake and I was using a non stick griddle.  I think perhaps it needed to be a little less long so there would be more support for the food item. Not sure what the warping problem is cause I have only used it once...to try and turn the pancake and washed by hand.  I tried putting a weight on the leading edge and leaving it weighed down several days but when I checked to see if that fixed it...it was still warped
I love to use it, but hate to clean it. I have had this for years and it is great to use. I am a college student often cooking for just myself and find it very quick and nice. My major problem is in its cleaning. People may say it is easy to clean, but it really isnt. The lid only does not completely open making the top hard to clean and the whole thing is really just a pain. I still use it, but curse it afterwards. I would reccommend getting a little more expensive model with removable plates. Trust me, for the extra money it is definitely worth it. I am looking forward to getting the new one with multiple removable plates
Deluxe? Try "Cheap". I decided to return this about 45 seconds after opening it.  The metal is thin and flimsy, and the construction very poor (e.g., little plastic end guards cheap looking and loose).  Also, it was a bit lopsided, so it did not sit squarely on my counter.Maybe it works fine.  Who knows.  The design and manufacture were so poor, I didn't keep it long enough to find out
Don't buy this product. Light is beautiful and functional, and so great for traveling, but first LED light failed almost immediately and second after about 2 months.  Too bad.
Poorly constructed low strength. If you only need to hang a dozen blouses on this hanger it might be OK but if you need to hang a dozen pairs of jeans choose a different product
Once it is on, do not take it off!. The plastic threads were stripped after taking the unit off the faucet once!  A very frustrating product!  Do not buy
Once it breaks, forget it. Well it made good waffles, but one day the hinge pins broke.  Black & Decker told me when I called that they do not sell replacement parts for it.  I guess they want you to buy a new waffle maker, which I will.  But you can bet it won't be Black & Decker.  I don't care if it's just a waffle maker or if it's a car, the company that sells a product must stand behind it or I'm looking elsewhere.  And that goes for Black & Decker drills, saws, and other tools as well.  I'm done with them
Cereal dispenser problem. I ordered this cereal dispenser for my adult son.  He filled it with raisin bran.  When he turned the knob to release the cereal into a bowl, the flakes of cereal broke up.  Some missed the bowl and went on the floor.  He's going to try putting Cheerios in it to replace the raisin bran.  If it doesn't work well with the Cheerios, I plan to return the item
Not built to last. I had my machine for 6 weeks, I loved it! I didn't like the coffee pot - it was very light and I was so worried I'd break it, but it made good espresso and it was easy to use.  BUT...after 5 weeks I was having trouble getting it to pump the espresso.  I thought the filter was clogged, but it wouldn't even put out water without a filter.  So, I returned it.  The guy told me "we get a lot of these back".  Apparently, the pump had failed...after only 6 weeks
Terrible product. My husband and I bought this toaster looking to upgrade. This toaster was the biggest waste of money. Sounds like many other reviewers had trouble with their toast being burned, but we couldn't even get that far. From the moment we took it out of the box, we had trouble even getting the toasting lever to stay down. After a couple of months it wouldn't stay down at all, and we'd have to stand there holding the lever down to get the toaster to work. We recently replaced this toaster with a cheaper Philips toaster, which so far is working gloriously well. Stay away from T-Fal
Junk!!!. I don't know if these positive reviews are coming from Gaggia employees, but the machine is an overpriced piece of junk!  Leaking, loud, hard to use/clean, this machine didn't do as well as my $50 Krups.  I spent a lot of time researching machines, and like an idiot I took these reviews to heart, DON'T believe them!  I am returning the unit tomorrow
Terrible!. Buy this vacuum is you want to spread dirt around.  Looks like a nice little cleaner but dirt just shoots back at your feet.  Does an okay job on carpet but worthless on bare floors.  I have to go over them many times to pick up anything.  I consider it a complete waste of money and time.  It took a some time to put together so once you find out it's a piece of junk you have to take it all apart and box it up to return it.  For the price I didn't even bother.  Spend a little more money and buy a better machine
dead on arival. my wife recived the roses the next day of the order in a box. the roses were dead and black. she thought i was mad at her. do not buy. i repeat... do not buy
Be careful to buy RONCO products !!!. I placed an online order of the set at RONCO and cancelled it 5 minutes later.  To confirm my concellation is in time, I called RONCO hours later.  Despite their promise on the phone, they still send the package.  After I refuses to accept the shipment (follow their instruction), they still charge me $35 for the shipping.  These people do business in such disgraceful way.  How can you expect a good quality product from them
Bad Taste. I've had this crock pot for a year and I've given it every chance possible.  Now I'm going to ditch it.  The problem for me has been TASTE.  I hate the taste of food cooked in this pot.Yes, the aluminum gets hot enough to burn fingers.  I don't know about the handles cracking - maybe that would happen in another year, but I'm not going to wait to find out.I've used the crock pot for soups, either presoaking lentils (peas, etc) or cooking the soup or both.  Which ever way I do it, I always get a bad taste from the crockpot (yes, it is clean).  I've done comparisons and my soups cooked in my steel pots are much better!
"bummed". I am way disappointed in these sheets I just got them and read the instructions on how to wash them and I did so, I put them on my bed and they feel like paper. I thought they were supposed to be soft???? they are 800 thread count but I am new at this. maybe if I keep washing them they will get bette
This is as trashy as what its expected to pick up from the floor. I can't believe what a useless waste of space this "vacuum cleaner" is. I've had it less than a year. On the 2nd use, the first belt broke. It goes through belts like my 3 year old goes through clothes. The hose won't consistently stay clamped to the handle, falling into your knees as you try to push the thing. I can't get through a single job without it clogging and respreading the dirt everywhere as I try to unclog it. Its a 3-4 step process if it clogs further inside the filter sending me into a full-blown asthma attack (and my asthma is pretty mild). Its going to the curb on the next trash pick-up because now the clamp that holds it locked upright is now broken and I don't even know how that managed to happen. I guess at about $90 you get what you pay for. Those Dyson's better be worth the $[...] because I'm getting one tomorrow
TV Armoire. The armoire arrived with the doors damaged and a nick on the top.  I was sent new doors but they didn't fit.  Frustrated, I accepted the promised $175.00 off to keep the doors, knowing they would have to be repaired by my husband later.  I have yet to receive this refund.   The delivery was also a major problem.  There was only one guy and he said he was told to leave the furniture in the driveway and go.  There was no way I could get this furniture in my house alone, so I tipped him to bring it in for me.  I will never buy anything from this company again!!!!!!
Do not order this from Amazon!!. I ordered these as a Christmas gift, and although they were ordered before the "Holiday guaranteed shipping deadline", they still arrived a few days after Christmas. Also, when they did arrive, they were packed so poorly in the box that one of the crocks was cracked in half. I ended up finding the same exact crocks at a local department store for a lower cost. As much as I've loved the books, electronics, DVD's, etc, that I order from Amazon, I will never order these knowing that the packaging will not get it here in one piece. It was a complete disappointment
TERRIBLE TOASTER. This toaster worked great for a month. Then the lever stopped working properly and half the time we can't get the slots to stay down at all. I do not recommend this toaster.  The warranty from Cuisinart is useless - we would have to spend our own money to ship it to them and then include $7 for them to ship a replacement or repaired toaster back.
Buy a different one to use indoors. If you are buying this bed to use at home as a guest bed...DON'T!I have two areobeds; I bought the first one in 1993 when they had just come out.  The pump is attached to the bed and it needs to be plugged to charge it. Fifteen years later it still works like a charm.  I liked it so much; I recently bought a Minute bed because I needed another guest bed.  It does not say anywhere on the box that you cannot use the pump without having to charge it first for 24 hours.  Needles to say one of my unexpected guests had to sleep on the sofa.  The battery is NiCad, which means it develops a memory, so now even if I remembered to charge it the day before, it does not run long enough to inflate the bed.  They do not offer a separate electric, detachable pump, so now I'm stuck with a "plastic carpet" that cannot be inflated with anything else.  The areobeds work great, but if you need one that can be used for any unexpected occasion, buy a different type.
Don't Waste Your Money... Don't waste your money.  Buy the 8 in pan.  It's a real All-Clad.  As I read these reviews, I keep seeing people rave about how good All-Clad is, not really how an individual pan actually performers.  Yes, I have All-Clad.  Lots of All-Clad.  When the company brings out a new pan, I buy it.  In the small pans that I use the most, I am likely to have 2 of each.  But, I don't recommend the 7-? inch.  All-Clad likes to bring out pans that are almost a `try me'; as was the case with the 7 ? inch and 1 qt pan a few years ago.  They priced them attractively.  To me the pan is handle heavy.  It does not sit properly on my electric stove.  Thus it has poor heat conductivity.  For a few dollars more, buy the 8 inch fry pan.  The 8 inch is US made, and the 7 ? inch is imported.
Terrible--Does Not Work. I'm looking for a timer.  Simple as can be.  I should have listened to the previous reviews.  This thing simply did not work right out of the box.  It would "catch" at the 20 minute mark and just get stuck there.  Great.I would definitely not recommend this product
Boston Shaker is much better!. Alton states on his episode titled "Raising the Bar" that he prefers a Boston Cocktail Shaker over traditional ones like this. So if you're willing to spend a few extra dollars you will have a much better shaker
Dysfunctional. Sent it back.  Couldn't see the read-out with a plate or saucer on the scale.  Needs a tilted or canted face
Bad teapot design!!. I am giving it two stars because at least it looks attractive, but beware: Fill the pot with tea and the spout starts spilling! Yes, the end of the spout is considerably lower than the top of the pot, thus it spills tea all over the place when you make a full pot. I am amazed that apparently nobody tested this design before it went into production.
You only get the small one... I purchased this item, after having read about "Banneton" in the book "Rustic European Breads from your Bread Machine". The picture clearly shows 4 baskets, and the description is vague - but you only get one. The basket you get is quite small, all but the smallest loaves would quickly overflow the basket. It looks sturdy and well made. It would have been good value for four baskets - it was too much to pay for a single basket. I didn't actually use it, choosing instead to return it, so I can't comment on how well it worked..
A Tea kettle that doesn't whistle. In my opinion:  Well, I just wanted a tea kettle for my country kitchen, and I own some Original Franciscan hand Decorated plates. For $23.99 I wasn't expecting an antique, and this certainly isn't, but the decorations on ceramic were acceptable. But, the tea kettle has design flaws when it comes to whistling. The whistle does have a low mellow sound (only when you blow into it!), but it rarely works unless you fill the pot to the top and turn up the heat , which is NOT what they advise you to do. The problem is the fit of the spout cover to the kettle, the whistle being in the cover. Also, the water fill cover fits too sloppily and allows excess steam to escape. The amount of steam that escapes from the spout cover and from the water fill cap could scald you. I returned mine
Warning - Defective Design. STAY AWAY from this product.The first one I got couldn't keep time properly -- on a digital clock! It was slow, and lost a lot of time.I returned it to Target and got a new one. It had the same problem. I finally gave up and used it as it was. I never liked the super loud beeping sound it would make as you press a button, though. Too loud.Now, the Microwave broke completely (won't run), and I'm having to send it back for a replacement
Where is the NSF certification?. Interesting that the description invokes EPA standards, but fails to mention if the unit is NSF certified.  It's the least any vendor of drinking water filters can do.
We loved it...while it worked- update they replaced it!. We bought this on amazon about 5 months ago after a cheaper black & decker one had the heat element buckle after 6 months.  I thought if I upgraded a bit, I could get a bit more milege out of it- like maybe 2 years...but now with only 5 months of usage...suddenly no power.  Totally dead.  It is still under warranty so if the shipping costs to get it to a warranty center aren't too outrageous we'll try that route, other wise, looks like another waste of money.  I have to say that while it did work, we enjoyed it.  It was roomy enough to cook a few cookies or heat up leftovers as needed without heating up the whole big oven, and made great bacon in the warmer- a bonus we weren't expecting.update to this review: I sent in to warranty center and they replaced it with a new one.  It took a while and then they sent the wrong item (same name different product-honest mistake) but were very very nice when I called and sent the right one out right away- now just hoping this one lasts more than 5 months
Wrong Bowls sent and returned twice/Billing a BIG question. I never received the large bowls. The small cereal bowls were sent twice (quickly but wrong size both times) and I returned both orders. I was sent an e-mail stating something significant was wrong with the system and I would not be receiving the larger bowls. Then I got an e-mail saying I was being billed for them to which I replied what I received was NOT what I ordered and had been returned twice. I have all the paperwork on both orders. The plates I ordered were never received at all. I have NO idea what is going on now. It makes sense that I be allowed to talk to a person at this point but that isn't happening eithe
Fails quickly. Very disappointed with this fan.  Failed within six months of purchasing.  Don't buy a Lasko fan
Deceptive photo. I thought I was getting a SET of forks NOT one fork. The picture and description are deceptive. The picture depicts a set(s) I am sure the ONE fork I got is great but I have 5 other hands that need a fork as well
LOW TECH IS BEST... This sounded so promising--a magic dispenser!  Unfortunately, the promise outweighs the reality.  The dispensing mechanism is so sensitively set, soap comes forth when one's hand is anywhere near it.  It leaks from the bottom and the spout and can't be cleaned without getting the  battery compartment wet.  Wet batteries, of course, mean that's all, folks.  Back to the pumps for me..
Makes you want to invent new swear words. This is by far the worst PRODUCT I have ever purchased.  I hate this coffee maker.  I paid $79 for this item and I want to smash it with a hammer.  I'm not a violent person but when coffee floods your counter you want to crush it.  The only way to safely make a pot of coffee is to place it in the sink for fear of flooding.  Even with the lid perfectly clean and on properly, it leaks coffee between the carafe and the lid.To boot, pouring water into the reservoir is a chore & no matter how careful you are, you will have coffee on the counter.  Like another reviewer the clock does not keep time.  You need to reset it on a regular basis.For the first 30 days or so I actually liked the thing but as you can tell my opinion has definitely changed.  Good luck to you if you buy this product.
Not worth the money. I purchased this because I thought that it would be a convenient fryer to own. I thought that since it was one of the more expensive fryer available, it must be good.  Oil leaked all over my kitchen before I even had a chance to use it.  If you're going to buy this, make sure that the oil does not leak through the valve before you set it in the frame.  You may have to play with the valve a little to make sure that it's tight.  I had to keep this fryer because it was too much trouble to return to Amazon.  Save your money and buy something less tricky
bad buttons!. After my first Cuisinart hand mixer died from 10 years of heavy use, I decided to be brand loyal. Now, I am questionning my decision. The buttons for increasing/decreasing speed seem to be backwards (not intuitive!) -- I would prefer they were reversed. Beyond that, the button to eject the beaters cracked and the pieces fell inside the mixer after just a few uses. Additionally, the power seems weak - especially for cookie dough. I am very disappointed
Hated it, threw it away and learned how to use real hones. Get a couple of good hones instead and learn to use them. I got one of these a couple of years ago. I figured I would now enter "easy sharp knife heaven", but it ruined all my knives. They are sharp, but only kind of sharp. It ground the bevels to flat and I never managed to get anything that was remotely razor sharp, and trust me, I have tried. Anyhone who says razor sharp, doesn't really mean razor razor sharp or may never have seen a really sharp knife. If it isn't as sharp as that scalpel you used in biology class, it is not razor sharp.I recently bought the book Razor Edge sharpening, and a couple of Razor Edge hones and hand reground all the knives I had ruined (doesn't take long if you do it right, even form a destroyed edge). Now I finally have the ultra scalpel sharp knives I always wanted. So sharp it is almost scary. Good hones aren't cheap either, but you can use them for your other tools too, like chisels, etc
NO QUALITY AT ALL. I purchased one of the shark pro steamers and used it once.  Came back to it a month later and the cap had seized totally shut.  They are aware of the problem but fail to document it or do anything about it.  The steamer is about 100 buck and to send it back for repair is 25 buck shipping and another 50 to Inspect.  For that price I should just toss it in the trash or use it as a $100 paper weight that's all it's good for.  Don't buy anything from euro pro!!!! they make junk.
Haven't even used it, and it's already defective. I bought mine at Bed Bath and Beyond with a coupon. It was one of two crock pots they sold, so there wasn't much choice. I had to replace my previous Rival as steam kept coming out of the lid and spewing liquid everywhere, and the knob melted off!!Right away this lid doesn't even fit the crock. Not only does it rock back and forth, it has a gap in it that you can actually see inside of. I get that you can't pressure seal these things, but I can see steam, liquids, and what-not spewing from this one too. After reading the reviews of it being too hot, I am returning it
Great cutting power, but blade lock is badly designed. I was thrilled when I first began to use this project - it's very sharp & very strong, crunching through small bones with ease.  However, the safety lock is in a bad place - it's small & easily engaged, and on quite a few occasions now, the mere action of cutting - when the lock gets sideswiped by the chicken itself - will engage the lock, and then I have to manually open it up again.  It's EXTREMELY irritating - I would call it a major design flaw.  If it weren't for that lock, I'd reccomend these shears to anyone - but I'd hesitate to recommend them now.  I will deal with them, and I'm sure there's a way to learn to live with them well (after all, they do cut beautifully, so long as you can avoid activating that lock) - but I don't feel there should need to be a "break-in" period for a new pair of poultry shears
overheats when used twice in a row. after i drilled holes near the top of the bucket, as others have mentioned, the popcorn was quite good - and provided enough for our family of five to eat.the problem we have with this unit is that it overheats after one batch - in reading the owners manual, it even says it will(!) - and there is a cut-out that turns it off until it cools down.if you only want to run it once, and you can drill holes in it, i guess it's okay.if you want to supply a family with popcorn for the duration of a movie, find something else that works when used continuously
Believe other reviewers, fan arrived broken. I didn't believe other reviewers who indicated that their fan arrived perfectly packaged, but inoperable. I should have believed them. There was no damage to the packaging on my fan, but like others have reported, the control panel had power, but the fan motor was dead. I called the company's tech support line, and left a message (it was a weekend) and they never called me back. I called them on the following Monday and I was hung up on once, and when I called back the person who answered rudely told me to return it through the website company at which I had purchased it. I am returning it, for sure, but will be less willing to buy items like this online in the future
Smore's maker I didn't receive. I never received this item therefore I cannot submit a review
NO Response. I had a problem with the container leaking and wrote them and I didn't get an answer. SO it just sits here not being used. Poor communication
what a mess!!. If you try to wash this product be prepared for a real mess.first of all, it does feel nice, although difficult to cover your comforter.this product (no matter what you do) compresses into a ball, and doesn't wash well, or dry well.then trying to unravel this product will take you a really long time. very frustrating
Falsely advertised capacity. I bought this fountain because it is advertised to hold 6L / 216 oz.  It does not.  This fountain, when filled per the manufacturer's recommendations to 1/2 inch below the rim, only holds ~160 oz.  In this state, it is still possible to move it from the sink to the floor with minimal spilling.  If you fill it on the floor, and fill it to the very rim (including the clear reservoir and the top fountain reservoir), the fountain maxes out at ~190 oz, anymore and it promptly spills over the edge.  That's only ~5 L.  I called this to Petmate's attention, who did nothing... I even offered to send them a video demonstrating this and they ignored it.  If you buy this thinking it holds what they say, be forewarned that it does not
Cost??. I have seen this online on other sites and in catalogs for $20 (not on sale either - regular price). Same siz
cracked in the microwave. I was cooking 5 strips of bacon on the platter in the microwave and the platter actually cracked in half! I have cooked bacon on my other platters with no problem. This is dangerous and annoying. I couldn't find Sango customer service anywhere, therefore, had to return to retailer, etc.
Don't waste your money. These are cheap knock-offs, feather light and a sad misrepresentation of the fine Lagioule name. Buy anything else, because you won't like these ratty little cheapos
Not up to par. We are very disappointed in the peformance of this toaster. The bread will toast good on the inside but barley on the outside. I sent email to West Bend and was told the maybe the bagle switch was stuck--no help.  If I return it, shipping cost makes it not worth it. Good appearance and Company name fooled me. FY
Good idea, poor execution. I really like the raised edges of these boards when working with wet ingredients, like cutting tomatoes. However, the thin material of the boards warps/cups, making the board rock on its center on the counter. This combined with the slippery nature of the material itself makes for a very frustrating if not dangerous situation while chopping. The only solution I have found is to put a folded damp kitchen towel under the board to stabilize it. Frankly, that's more trouble than it's worth. For now, I am just using them for holding ingredients after I have prepped them on a better cutting board
Makes lofty claims, fails to live up to them. This is a good, if somewhat pricey regular pillow. Expect nothing else and you'll likely be fairly happy. The 'temperature regulation' claims are just that, claims. Any temp regulation experienced is placebo factor. My rating is based upon the mfgr. claims
Grinder. This product wasn't working and the handle was broken. I don't recommend to purchase this and it's way to much money for it
VERY VERY Disappointed. I looked around and read reviews and information on numerous down comforters, and I thought I was getting a real bargain with the Royal Velvet.  Boy, was I wrong!  I have already had to replace it and I used it less than a month.  All the down settled down the channels to the sides, so there was NONE covering the body at night.  Not good!  Do not buy this comforter, it is crap
buyer beware. Read the fine (or missing) print carefully.  This is not a general purpose vacuum purchase.  You need to buy the carpet attachment to be able to vacuum carpets (another $100).  If you want to return this item, they charge a restocking fee of 10% and also deduct for the shipment (even if you got "free" shipping) AND you pay to ship the thing back.  We ended up buying locally from Sears and are much happier with it than from Central Vacuum Stores - which is where the Miele came from.
Disposable at best. I'm on my second Sassafras pizza stone. The first broke in half after maybe a dozen uses. The second now has distinct cracking after about a half dozen uses. I treat my kitchen tools well, following all care instructions. These are just plain dogs; don't waste your money. The only saving graces are that they're cheap and hence easy to replace, and that they really do help make good pizza
i also wish there was 0 star. i've had this for only a couple months and this grill is HORRIBLE headache and as soon as i can afford to replace it its going in the trash. i should have stayed with presto. i had 2 of thier grills that i used constantly until the non stick surface was worn out and each of them lasted over a year and a half before that happened. but they always heated evenly.  never did i have the problems with them and especially when i've only had it a couple months and its surfaces looks worse than either of them..  not only do i have to put everything on 400 degrees to get any sort of heat. it does not cook evenly the entire center of the grill won't get hot enough to grill  and the heat sensor will not only NOT turn on without jiggling it countless times when it DOES finally heat up it wont stay hot and turns off mid cooking my food and i have to rejiggle the element to get it to RE turn on.. i also wish i would have read these reviews before purchasing, i was going to get a presto but this one had a cheap price so i got it instead cause i was trying to get a good deal.. big mistake!!!    awaiting the day i can throw this horrible waste of money away.. the heating surface IS large and i like the warming basket.. it does work well.. but that is it..SAVE your money
Torture Chamber. My son received a beta as a gift, and when we went to the store to buy an aquarium, the clerk recommended this tank, and also recommended getting a second beta to add.  In hindsight, he wasn't looking out for our fish, but for his profit.Even though betas CAN live in small spaces, I would not recommend it.  Even for one beta, this tank is too small.  It gets dirty easily and needs to be cleaned once a week, which is an immense stress on the fish.  The fake plants provided with the tank don't help with the water quality either.For now, we moved our beta to a large glass baking bowl, and we are in the process of shopping for a larger tank with an undergravel filter and live plants, plus a heater.  I absolutely agree with the other review:  If you can't afford a good tank for your fish, don't get one.  Betas like space, too
Kitchenaid can do better. My kitchen is all Kitchenaid so of course I had to have this, but as other commenters said - they can do better.  It's a pain to set, it's angle is awkward and you have to be right in front of it to see the display and at the right angle (I'm short).  And the beep isn't that loud.  There's no clock in it either.  The metal band around the outer rim corroded too so it doesn't look nice anymore.I have a non-Kitchenaid timer that's got the clock, 2 timers, a button to set H/M/S seperately, and shows you how long it's been since you missed the beep that beeps for over a minute.  I use this one more.  (I think it's an older West Bend model
it's ok, but I'd get something else. I've had this fryer for over 4 years.  It's held up fine, but doesn't have any of the features I think are important in a fryer.  The metal divider is ok, but I never use it as I find the 2 compartments too small.  The lid is worthless.  My roommate accidentally plugged it in instead of a different appliance and the lid melted right off in just a few minutes (a replacement lid is ridiculously priced after shipping, so I just use foil, but it's a pain). There are no temperature controls.  I bought a candy thermometer and the oil gets off the charts on the thermometer all the time.  I wish it were easier to control.  Also the outside gets very very hot. I've burned myself accidentally bumping into it.To sum up:Positives- Food comes out fine- Product has lasted yearsNeutrals- Price is okNegatives- no cool touch side insulation- no temp control- no fry basket.. comes only with a tiny scooper- plastic lid melts. you have to wait hours to put it on.- not easy to clean.  no parts come off, so you just have to wipe it out. it's also hard to pour the oil out because you have to lift the whole thing.This fryer is ok all in all, but there are so many better ones out there for about the same price.
Disappointed. We tried this popper after having the West Bend Stir Crazy.  We were shocked at how bad the popcorn tasted with the Cuisinart versus the West Bend.  We don't like how the non-stick coating comes off of the West Bend, but we are going back to it anyway
Sorry I bought it. This grater is fine when you can get it to work, but most often the handle doesn't screw in correctly and you can't get it to. It's mostly a waste of time, though the concept is a great one. I'd recommend trying maybe a stainless steel one instead of this plastic one
A junk. (if there is a no star option, I would select it). I expected this product to be soft, having a cotton cover and safe for my daughter to play. But it is not safe for babies. It is in such a shocking color that my daughter saw it and want it wherever I put it...until it was in a box and removed to the storage.
overengineered junk. Shame on OXO. This product is a waste of natural recources.Looked nice once installed, but difficult to operate, wouldn't tear consistantly, a pain to rewind, and the tab holding the crossbar broke during the first paper roll. Returned it. Bought a 'perfect tear' racheting undercounter type, love it
Leaks and cracks. We have used Pur filters for years now, not by choice but because we are always able to get a new one by calling in to the company because the unit either cracks or falls of the faucet before the warranty is up. The company is VERY good about sending a coupon for replacement with any Pur faucet mounted unit.  The filter is junk, the free filters in the future kind of make up for that.  If you don't want the hassle, go with another filter
noise makers. Hello,Both the Proctor Silex 31115 4-Slice Toaster Oven/Broiler and the Proctor Silex 31117 4-Slice Toaster Oven/Broiler make noise when in use.Both products make audible sounds when in use.  It sounds like this; tick, tick, tick, tick, tick..
waste of money. For $20 I don't even bother to return things, but this article is a disgrace, almost completely useless. Save your money
NOT SMALL PILLOW. I too got the dinosaur pillow! And laughed and laughed! I don't know whether to give it as a gag gift or not...The trouble is that I really needed it for my neck...Do NOT buy this particular pillow if you want the small, regular sized one.
Beware.............. Consumers BEWARE! The GE Smartwater GWF filter is not a replacement for the old 'Culligan' FXRC metal filter. Despite the available adapter, the new Smartwater GWF filter was designed for a newer 'high-pressure' system installed in GE refrigerators manufactured after 2001. On the older models using normal water pressure [mine is a GE Performance Profile] these filters do not work. They will seem fine at first, only to run to a trickle in less than a month. I burned through several of these at @ $40.00 each until I discovered the problem.With millions of wasted filters and dollars at stake, GE refuses to acknowledge the problem.  I was told to find a technician at my expense. GE refused to replace the filters with a properly designed compatible model.
the horror. ordered and reordered, it kept showing up busted, and i went through consumer hell to return it.  actually, i'm still in consumer hell.  sometimes amazon blows
broke after 2 years of (very occasional) use. i had this for 2 years and used it about once a month. i was very happy with it at first, since it was very easy to use. however i found that it had no way of stopping when the cork had been screwed up high enough, and it just kept going, so that the cork would become wedged in the opener, then it would break off and i would have to use a knife to try and prise the cork out of the device. this happened a few times, and the last time i just couldn't get the cork out, which meant i couldn't use the corkscrew, because it already had a cork around the top part of it. after a while i had to throw it out
Lid is a problem. This percolator would be great except the lid was too tight and extremely difficult to remove. After only about a week the gasket around the glass window in the top cracked from having to pull the handle so hard to get the lid off, and coffee leaked out through the break as it perked. I called customer service and they said they'd replace the lid but it is on backorder...I have been waiting for over two months now. I don't know how you are supposed to get the lid off without using the handle, though, so what's the point
Sateen Sheet Set. They are very heavy, hard to wash because of weight.  Also they wrinkle even when taken right out of the dryer.  Hard to fold because weight
Be suspicious of the other reviews. So, I just bought this item.  Does it work?  I don't know, I haven't tested the water yet to see if it has actually reduced the amount of chlorine in the water.  But, what does make me suspicious of this product is that one of the reviews for this product is word-for-word the same on amazon as it is on other sites selling this product.  It seems likely then that the manufacturer of this item finds it necessary to plant reviews.  Do you really want to patronize a business that falsifies reviews of its products
Beautiful but WAY too delicate. I received these glasses and both were craked during shipping.  They were well packed, but just WAY too delicate.  I'm sure that during use they would have cracked on their own. . . . you're better off to order the plastic ones
beautiful but lid chipped when I dropped it. Just want to warn everyone that it chips pretty easily.  I took it off the shelf and the lid (which was not securely in place) fell to the floor.  About a 1.5-inch chip resulted on the edge.  It won't affect the function of the kettle but I was disappointed to see the beautiful enamel chip off so easily.  Handle yours with care
Absolute Best For a Few Months - 1 YR Later Useless. I almost never write reviews, but this is the second I just HAD to write - or better said, warn about.  I am glad I didn't review this when we got it - we loved it!  But a year later and it is literally useless.  You would swear the thing is plugged, but it isn't!  We replaced the filter - no help.  Believe it or not, even a new bag makes little to no difference and what difference it does make is over in a few minutes.  We are shopping again, and as I stumbled upon this one again, I had to give our experience.
not heavy weight at all. I was disappointed in this towel set advertised as heavyweight.  It looked to be WalMart type quality.  I would have been better off buyingfrom Linens and Things
Pretty much useless. I wish I had my money back.  I haven't found any time I tried to use this thing that it was any easier than a washrag or sponge.  I try to use it once in a while like when there's grease baked on something, but it doesn't come thru for me.  The attachments are sitting in my sink getting stinky.  Pretty soon I'll write it off and toss it
Poor Design. The design is such that when you pour out liquid, some of it seeps into the space between the outer plastic and the vacuum glass container. Then, when one sets the carafe on a counter, the liquid leaks out.This could be a problem with a particular unit or a marginal design
Description. Your description of the Popover Pan did not did not contain &quot;MINI&quot;.  The item I wanted was the standard size popover pan, not the mini.  &quot;MINI&quot; should be added to your description
Would not cycle all the water. After about 10 days from date of purchase, only 4 of the 8 cups would cycle. I would have to push the On button, get another 2 cups. After 5 or 6 tries I would finally get all 8 cups through. The design is bad for left handed people. It's very hard to pour water in left handed without it going out the back overflow slot or too far forward on to the plate. The lid is a bit of a struggle to screw on and I would rather have a thumb operated carafe than this screw to pour lid. Overall not a good design. I got my money back and am bought a Hamilton Beach Brewstation which I think is a great coffemaker.
Doesn't work properly !!. With all the great revues on this frother, I thought I couldn't go wrong buying one.  Not so though!!  After following instructions in detail, the frother I received keeps getting stuck in the 'on' position and also seems to have 2 speeds.  Also, just to prove a point more to myself, I frequently have to take the top/cap off and press the button to get it to go fast (I don't actually use it to froth this way) ... or use 2 hands to hold it and press the button which is very awkward and then even that doesn't help sometimes.  The bottom line is that it will very seldom operate at it's normal speed or it gets stuck on!!  Clearly this frother isn't working the way it should and is somehow getting stuck or the button doesn't go down enough.  I was going to keep it anyway, but decided to return it as I seem to have no control over wheather it wants to go fast or slow.  I really like that it has it's own stand, so I'm very dissappointed that I can't get it to work properly.  This is a real shame as I was prepared to love this little frothing machine
Great pottery, ruined expectations by Macy's. We love Fiesta Ware pottery.  This is a quality product made of tough clay with well matched durable glaze. Because of this and its famous assortment of sumptious colors, I will buy it every time.  However, when buying this product from Macy's I found the following to be true:1.) Items or colors listed as in stock and shipping (the pizza plate for example)get listed as backordered after you purchase and languish for months before the order is inexplicably canceled.2.) Items that are seconds quality being sold as first quality. On average, 10% of our orders included slay slubs, glaze missing in spots and other imperfections.3.) Range of products severely limited4.) Color choice from available range severly limited.So, in short, buy Fiesta Ware. A quality product, made in the United States, of charming beauty--but reconsider Macy's as your Amazon supplier
Poor Quality. Ugly and Cheap looking  Wife hated them  now using as rags to wash the ca
coffee pot. I do not like this because when I pour EVERY cup of coffee, it has a stream of coffee that runs down the side of the pot and all over my counter and myself.  Which is not good when I have to change shirts everytime I poured a cup of coffee.  It is the pouring spout, somehow it leaks everytime.My sugesstion is NOT to buy this certain 4 cup coffee pot.  I paid 25 + dollars for it and now it's sitting under my cabinet
Broken with no chance of return. The coat rack broke within two week of my purchacing it. Because of where I had set it up I was completely unaware though. When I tried to repair the peice the wood completely fell apart. Target would not take it back as I had no sales slip - and the item was not purchaced in a store
Stainless Steel Container. My mother gave us our Rival F69204 Electric White Mountain Ice Cream Freezer, which worked well for three seasons.  Yesterday, I made a batch of frozen custard for company for dinner.  The result was terribly salty and had to be thrown out.  I filled the stainless steel container with water, which seeped out overnight.  Apparently ice cream salt bled into the custard mix while the ice cream was making.  Online, I discovered (1) that Mother paid much too much for this item and (2) there seemed no way to order replacement parts--as in a new tank.  Can you help
Not impressed. It does cool your coffee by tipping the mug to fill the reservoir -- not something you want to do while you are driving.  The more you drink the further you have to tip the mug.  Also, the lock position on the mug does not work causing coffee to spill out if the mug is tipped over.
I didn't like it; cat didn't like it. This is a great idea, but I think it might need more tweaking. The reservoir holds a lot of water, which is good, but there is no filter. So any cat hair, stray food, or whatever your 18-month-old might be trying to throw will end up in the bowl. Then it sits there, usually after sinking to the bottom, until you dig it out. Also, with mine at least, you had to fiddle with it and fiddle with it to get any real bubbles to appear. A shame, since the cat really did like the few bubbles I was able to coax out.If this somehow filtered the water AND made bubbles, I'd be all over it (like cat hair on a pastel couch)
Total Junk. Black and Decker should simpy stay out of the appliance business and stick with what they do best.This grill is simply junk. Just threw it out after a few weeks. Got a presto gral instead. Much better.This black and decker grill says it is non stick - NOT!!!!!!!!!!YOu better have a big can of Pam if you are going to use this grill. Hard to clean. Will never be clean again after the first use. AN ok job of cooking but i wanted an item that was non stick. Buy the presto cool touch grill instead. In fact it appears that in general it is best to stay away from kitchen appliances made by black and decker. This is the second product of theirs in a month that i threw away. I need to start saving receipts so i can return junky items back to Walmart
Piece of junk. 1. bad guality - hall for driver shaft was off center.2. bad body metal - was reacting with meat made it dark and darkened itself.3. Body is too deep - hard to reach to wash it
I Got White Too!!. I read the reviews but, because Amazon has been so reliable over the years, decided to order the red casseroles anyway.  My order arrived today and much to my displeasure, I also received the white casseroles!  They're being returned tomorrow and I'm asking for a refund.  I do not want to take the chance of receiving another incorrect order.  My advice is do NOT order this casserole!
Sea Salt Grinder. I keep it on my table for company, but actually, it grinds so little, so slow, I don't use it myself. I thought from the ad on it I had at last found something that would grind sea salt (This is the third kind I have bought)but I'm still not satisfied. I doubt I will try any more brands. I may buy a mortar and pestle, which is what my son uses at his house
Poor locking design. I was very disappointed with this teaball. It is not readily apparent from the picture but this product is actually shaped like a small cylinder, 3cm high with ~ a 6cm diameter. The cylinder twists apart in the middle to open. The problem is that first of all it is not tall enough to grasp firmly and has no 'handle' points, and second the actual locking mechanism is simply based on a push and twist design, but the metal parts do not fit together properly and are very hard to twist. Wrenching the teaball seems a good way to get tea all over the floor.In fact, this first day I received the teaball I practiced opening it several times and eventually it became stuck, I was unable to open it until the next morning. Even if my particular product was somehow bent I cannot see how this mechanism could hold up to repeated use.Hopefully Amazon will have another teaball soon
Very poor quality. I actually ordered the National Sleep Products Luxury Down but was sent a Pacific Coast down comforter instead without explanation.  It was entirely too thin, with large areas that were completely empty,no feathers, no type of fill at all.  Not acceptable
not very big. I thought it would cover two burners.  It covers the big burner and then the edges don't sit on any heat.  If I would have looked into it better I would have known this, and I would have just bought the square one.  I was looking for a two burner one for when I was cooking for more than tw
Too hot not to watch. I have used one crock pot or another for many years. I bought this one because I was delighted with the sturdy removable stoneware bowl; I really like this feature. Clean-up is easy.I use this crock pot for soups and beans because it cooks way too hot for anything else. Even so, I need to stir from time to time. Apparently, excessive temperature is the problem most people are having with this pot. This might be a safety issue; I would not keep this pot on and leave the house.I am disappointed that the handle has broken off of the lid, which really should not happen with normal use. I lifted the lid, to stir of course, and off came the handle! Lifting the lid is definately normal use!
Adult Proof lid?????. Okay, I got hooked on MiGo mugs a few years ago because they keep my coffee hot. They are suberb for that purpose. However this new version has a lid that apparently requires a special tool to remove. I used a butter knife. How convenient! Perhaps next time they could pencil in a lip to make it easier to remove!
Farberware Urn. Our Church purchesed 2 Urns.  They were used about 5 times and one burned out.  It does not heat up or perk the coffee anymore.We were very disappointed as they were purchased in March of 2004
Screwpull. This is really not a typical review.This product (quantity of 3) was not the Screwpull I ordered but received, not once but twice.I had ordered the Screwpull Pocket Model, but apparently there was a error with the online description. I had ordered these in September for 3 Christmas presents and finally gave up when this error could not be  resolved in time.I have been extremely satisfied with the other prodeucts ordered from this site, yet dissapointed that I never got an answer on this in time for Chrismas
Not as advertised. I have returned this item because the description indicated the fitted bottom sheet had elastic all around.  When I received it there was elastic only on the corners.  I am still waiting for my refund
MOST UNCOMFORTABLE SHEETS EVER MADE. These sheets are strictly for apprearances. I bought them for my almost 5 year old son who LOVES Star Wars. He was very excited about them, but they were stiff and felt like a nylon curtain. As cute as they appear, I would NOT recommend buying them to sleep on. After several washings, they softened up only a little. I have to put another sheet under them and another pillow case under the pillow case in an attempt to make them bearable
Not for all uses. I have owned a few OXO brand utensils over the past few years, and in general I have been happy with them.  But I was disappointed with this spatula when the edge of the head melted the very first time it was used.  The product description does warn you that it's only heat resistant to 250 degrees, but I was flipping eggs in a skillet, which I consider a basic use for a spatula.  If it can't handle the heat of a hot skillet, than I don't think it's a useful spatula.  Not to mention that it's neither healty nor esthetically pleasing to have bits of black plastic in your food
beautiful but lid chipped when I dropped it. Just want to warn everyone that it chips pretty easily.  I took it off the shelf and the lid (which was not securely in place) fell to the floor.  About a 1.5-inch chip resulted on the edge.  It won't affect the function of the kettle but I was disappointed to see the beautiful enamel chip off so easily.  Handle yours with care
Terrible Packaging. I received this item as a gift and had to return it due to the plates being broken.  The replacement was sent, but the plates in the replacement were broken.  So I ordered another set that arrived broken.  Until the packaging changes, I would recommend choosing a different brand.
THEY RUST!  Big disappointment... I have probably seen hundreds of tea kettles by now and still love the look of this one the best.  Only problem is that they RUST!!!  I had mine a few weeks when I noticed the rust spots on the interior.  I don't imagine the enamel could have been chipped on the inside of the pot, so it must have happened simply because I leave water in my tea kettle at all times.  The directions that come with this kettle say not to do so, but any serious tea drinker like me knows that's unrealistic.I threw mine out and am very disapointed that something that cost so much money didn't last long at all.  I thought Le Creuset was supposed to be really high quality but I'm officially disillusioned thanks to this tea pot
Great--Except for..... I see this model is no longer listed by Amazon, so I don't know how you got here. First, it was sold by J&R, not for the advertised price of $59.21, but for $69.99!!However, shipping and handling was half of what DBROTH wanted.Second, there is no light on the timer. Unreadable even with normal ambient light.Third, the start and stop buttons are hard to find. Used the old standby, fingernail polish to highlight them.Fourth, and most serious, the Power Setting doesn't work. I have no idea what the power setting is set at. Buy a microwave or similar putchase locally. That way you can take it back and complain like hell. As for me, I will keep it because of the high cost of shipping it back, but not buy similar products from Amazon unless shipped directly from Amazon and with free shipping
All show --no Go. If you like the styling -- buy it!  hey, it comes in COLORS!But, if you want performance and reliability  - AVOID any Francis unit.They are made poorly, and of light materials.Dave -- professional espresso repairman
DO NOT Buy Ronco!. I bought the previous model of this dehydrator.  I seriously would not even give this machine 1 star, but there is no lower rating.  I bought mine a year ago, used it once, and the bottom heating element burned every single tray that I rotated to the bottom, which you have to do in order to get anywhere.  The entire machine was worthless within a week of me owning it.  I did eat the beef jerky, but that was the most expensive jerky I will ever make!  I called immediately to complain, talked to a guy named Saul, who said the unit must be defective, DUH! and he would send me a new unit and a return authorization.  I have gotten neither, I am just out the money.  I have called back, faxed, mailed, waited on hold, and finally decided that Ronco products are CRAP.  I will never give him or his company another cent.  Buyers please research your purchases, I see from other reviews that I am not the only one with a complaint.  Buy a different machine
Do Not Buy. My mother-in-law bought this popper for my two small children for Valentine's Day.  What a piece of junk!  My kids were so excited about it since popcorn is their favorite snack.  Half a jar of Orville Redenbacher's kernels and 30 minutes later, it managed to pop enough to fill 2 sandwich-sized zip-lock bags.  I'd also like to warn you that it spits out hot unpopped kernels...my 2 year old picked one up before I could get to it and burned her finger.  I wish I could throw this thing away since it takes up so much space to store, but I'm sure my mother-in-law will look for it on her next visit.
Cheesy handle for the price. The handle and pump mechanism for this dispenser are cheesy plastic - they will not last at all.  The previous reviewer also pointed out - correctly, that the honey drips out very slowly.  Not worth the money.  They should have used a metal handle and pump and charged a reasonable price for decent quality.  Not worth your money
These pillows are uncomfortable. These pillows are too soft and too small. They don't provide adequate neck support, and are more uncomfortable than the pillows I bought them to replace
Disappointed... I fell in love with the Swivel Sweeper at my cousin's house, where I babysit 3 preschoolers four days a week, and couldn't wait to buy one myself.  Unfortunately, I second guessed myself after reading some negative reviews of the Swivel Sweeper and purchased this more positively-reviewed (and more expensive) Bissell sweeper about 4 months ago.  Big mistake!  I've been kicking myself ever since.The Bissell sweeper doesn't pick up nearly as well as the S.Sweeper and tends to throw the dirt all over the floor - usually to a place where you just swept.  The wheels and handle are stiff (lubricating didn't help), making it difficult to maneuver.  It's bulky and too tall to fit under many pieces of furniture, whereas the S.S. has a much lower profile.   The S.S. picks up most dirt on the first pass; with the Bissell, I'm having to constantly go back and forth over the same spot.  By far, the greatest advantage of the S.S. is it's ability to swivel 360 degrees.  At my cousin's house I can stand in one spot and just swing the S.S. around on the hardwoods at every-which-angle.  It's light and rolls beautifully.  The Bissell's wheels grip the floor and seem stiff - a great disadvantage.  It's like steering a truck - you have to do multiple K-turns and parallel parking-type maneuvers to move it around - sometimes it's just easier to pick it up off the floor and move it to where you need it.  As for corners and edges, the S.S. does a better job.Buyers of the S.S. complained that it appears "junky", and that there are problems keeping a charge.  My cousin has owned her Swivel Sweeper for about a year.  It's used numerous times a day, and she has had zero problems with it.  On the other hand, the right-hand rotating edge brush on my Bissell quit working after about 2 months.  As for the S.S. fragile appearance, don't judge a book by it's cover.  The Bissell looks great and appears sturdy and substantial, but in my opinion is the lesser product by far.
not worth the money. I read the preceding reviews and really question what I did wrong with this unit. I tried for 6 months to get this to work right and it never did. The ice cream would be too frozen to get to come out of the unit. even when I used it to make alcoholic drinks...it STILL froze up! (and alcohol is not suppose to freeze) Luckily, I had purchased it at Williams-Sonoma and even w/o a receipt, they refunded the purchase. I only wished it would have worked like it promised, it's an impressive unit and people would just look at it in awe but every time I used it, people would just be disappointed (especially me for what I paid for it!) Unless my unit was just defective, I will never know, but would not even risk trying to buy it again! It is a beautiful unit, but that alone is not worth paying $$$$ to have it as a pretty countertop decoration
A good price, but not a great bed topper. I got mine for $19.99 so I was't expecting much.  The part that has padding is fine, but the filling is done in 4 sections and one of them has no filling at all.  If I lay in cetain positions it's fine, but sometimes it's really unfortable to lay on if in a differnt position.  Also getting it to stay in position on the bed is difficult.  We usually have to fix it once a week, to get it centered on the bed
Misleading-dissapointed. We ordered what we thought was a Drinkwell fresh water fountain based on the header and description of the product.  However, when we received it, there was just the resevoir in the box.  We returned the item to Petsmart and then went to Petco and purchased a different model.  We felt the ad was very misleading.  It should have clearly stated that the item we were purchasing was only the resevoir and not the fountain.
Very, very dissapointed. Like several other reviews, I was very dissapointed.  We have looked at several machines from FrancisFrancis!, Gaggia & Ascaso.  While these are certainly more expensive machines, the machine we are replacing is on price parity with the Breville.  My observations:pros:Solid well built constructionLong steamer wand.  This allows you to rest your carafe on the unit and steam your milk while you put away a dish or toast a bagelSimple to operate and pleasant to look atNice ergonomic features like a storage compartment for the accessories under the unit, removable foam wand, etc.ConsIt fails horribly at its core function, making good expresso and steaming/foaming your milk.I use pods and the machine takes very long to pull the shot, it splattered all over (due to the funky way they try to "create" crema), and the ultimate product was weak & bitterThe steam was very weak, took about 30% longer to warm up my machine than any machine we tested, and it was very inconsistent in how much steam it injected.The machine wastes a lot of water.  They are proud of all the priming and purging features, but as it steams and belches it makes quite the mess.  I found myself reaching for a sponge and towel several times during the brewing process.Net this is a great machine architecturally but a horrid expresso maker.  If this kind of coffee is acceptable to you, there are a thousand less expensive brands that will do the trick.  For the price, the performance must be better.
Pfaltzgraff Tea Rose Trivet. This trivet is plastic and not shure how it will stand up to high temperatures.  Nothing in the packaging states this also.  I know that melamine does burn.  I probably would not have purchased if description had stated it was not stoneware
DO NOT BUY-NO PYREX GLASS!!!. I can not rate the actual Wilton metal baker because I haven't used it yet but you may want to pick another item to purchase. The Pyrex glass insert does not come included in the box. I received my first one with no Pyrex insert, returned it and waited for the replacement just to receive another Wilton baker with no glass insert! It has been a hassle and Amazon said this is a widespread problem. It still hasn't been resolved and it's been a month!! I don't see why the glass insert can't just be shipped out alone
Looks chintzy, stainless steel only on the interior. I have no opinion on how this cooks because I never turned it on.  Opened the box and saw that 1) the front of the microwave was cheap-looking silver plastic, and 2) only the interior is actually stainless steel and so it didn't match anything in my kitchen.  Sealed it up and sent it back to Amazon.  If you read the description right you'll see they disclose it's only the interior that's stainless, but definitely not what I was expecting for the price
If you have a PS2, or a DVD player, DON'T  buy this!. I was very excited when the box first arrived at our doorstep.  My eight year old son and I managed to get the unit put together, after a little tugging to get some of the screws to go into place.  We carried it up to his room, and put the T.V. and V.C.R. into place.  My excitement turned to bitter dissapointment, however, when I tried to fit my son's PS2 games into the shelves desighned to hold CD's or VCR tapes.  The PS2, and DVD cases are too big to fit into these slots. I had just not realized that they would not work with this model. The whole reason I ordered this unit was too try to organize some of the mess in his room, so this will not work for me. I will probably try to return it, and order the newer model
if i could have given it zero stars i would have. This vacuum worked the first time I used it, but that was the only time.  With the amount of noise it makes, you would hope that it would be removing dirt from the floor.  However, what it appears to be doing is using its rotating bristles to redistribute the dirt in a thinner more homogenous layer.If you are looking for a machine to use as a sound effect prop for a jet engine, this is the one for you
Defective Jack Lalanne Juicer with Crappy Warranty. I'm selling my LEMON on Ebay with this descriptionDefective Jack Lalanne Juicer with Crappy Warranty:Here's my juicer. Sorry Jack. Somebody buy it from me PLEASE!!! I'm sick of looking at it as it takes up space in my home. I purchased the item 3 summers ago. Enjoyed using it 3 or 4 times until the top broke. Just needs a simple part replacement or repair. I've written & emailed Tristar several times without a single response. Other customers write about their troubles in dealing with the service phone operators. In doing the math a great product plus a company who's actual service practices drains their customers that equals a juicer I don't want to look at. Any altruistic soul or energetic consumer activist out there that wants to take this thorn in the flesh off my hands and soothe my pain with some of my initial investment back?
not so good. the thought is good but quality is not...thing broke in second day odf use and the replacement string broke a week l;ater then the little foot fell off... would not reccommen
I bought it before it was reduced., so. now I would likely upgrade to 3 stars since one can't expect much for 1.99. It is a large thin plastic bag and I really doubt it will hold up long term. But it is much thicker than any plastic bag I've found to use as a dust cover for christmas and other seasonal items to store in the attic.
poorly manufactured piece of crap. 1) The screws that came in the box have no relation to the screws shown on the assembly diagram--nor do they fit in the various holes available to screw them into.2) Even if the right screws came with it, the pieces are so mis-aligned that it would be impossible to assemble the unit. The screw holes just don't line up
Bakes well, but hard to clean. Even though the pan is pre-seasoned and using baking spray, cornbread frequently sticks, resulting in a non-cactus shaped lump of food. Then it is difficult to clean the small crevices. Not recommended
waste of money. I bought these pillows as a Christmas gift for my fiance who definitely needs new pillows as his are old and have completely lost their shape. I have always had down/feather pillows and he loves mine. I thought these were a great deal and bought them for him. However, once they got here i was greatly dissapointed. Even if you stack up all 4 of them, they squish completely flat and are worthless as pillows. Plus, the feathers are of very low guality and are mostly hard quills that stick you in the face. I promptly returned these the next day. Please don't waste your money on these pillows
Stopped working. This electric blanket has the nicest texture of the last "five" electric blankets we have purchased. However it stopped working within a month, like the other four. Who makes a realiable electric blanket? Not Sunbeam and not this brand. Since the texture on this one is nice, we can at least keep it as an extra cuddling blanket
Quality control is TERRIBLE. I was extremely disappointed that BOTH the 45-piece sets I purchased were defective. There are black speckles, brown spots, even a green spot in the glaze. This is on nearly every single piece. I have contacted Mikasa by their 800 number and was told they were aware of the problem and would send me good sets, but so far nothing has been done. This is creamware and it should be creamy white with no dirty looking spots on it. I love the pattern, the size of the plates, everything but the quality. They really need to address this problem at the factory, and not sell seconds as top quality china
If I could I would give it and it's mfg negative stars!. This thing was the biggest waste of $200+ that I have ever spent.  First off, I bought it to mainly clean hard floors (vinyl flooring mostly) but the steam sprays forward from one nozzel as opposed to down onto the floor.  It sprays forward into a terry pocket that fits on the end of a wand, so the terry gets soaking wet and the floor gets the same cleaning as if you mopped with hot water!  I used to own a Eureka Enviro-steamer that sprayed the steam down through several vents directly thru a terry bonnet onto the floor... straight down!!  The Eureka worked fabulously except that I had to refill it 3 or 4 times to do all my floors so I gave it away and wasted my hard earned $$$ on this piece of garbage.  Now, fast forward to 8 months after I buy it and the on/off switch that controls the steam flow is broken and I cannot turn it OFF!!   So I can't use this thing at all because it doesn't build up pressure because the water is spraying out of the tip before it can generate any steam because it won't shut off!!  I called the company after an hour of searching the web to find out who to call and guess what????? I have to pay to ship this thing to them with ALL the attachments and then pay to have it shipped back to me!!! DO I NEED TO SPEND ANOTHER 40 OR 50 DOLLARS ON SHIPPING?????????  Needless to say, I'm aggravated as all get-out over this thing and my husband is mad that I gave away the Eureka on top of it all!!DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY!!! BETTER YET, EVEN IF YOU ARE OFFERED IT FOR FREE DON'T BOTHER!!!
Not Recommended. The unit is designed more for an external appeal, but not for real use. If you're buying a fish tank for a certain style, then this might work for you. If you want to keep fish, stay away!A lot of people reviewing this tank may not have a good understanding of aquaria, or what tank filtration and maintenance should be.  This is the only reason I can see as to why it gets good reviews.  Read below and you'll see in detail why I do NOT like this tank, and why I think it's bad even for beginners.However, nothing is all-bad, and I want to start with the Good Things:What I LIKE about this tank:- Acrylic looks nice.  The best way to describe it is that it looks like it's not there.- Acrylic doesn't way as much as glass- I've never had cloudy waterWhat I don't like:- Hard to maintain due to poor design:The opening/lid is very small. It can only be used to feed the fish, and supposedly change the filter cartridge.  Want to scrape algae? Scoop up floating debris(from plants, etc).  Better take the top off.  If you DO take the top off, it's bulky, since the light is integrated, you can no longer see in the tank to do any work! In addition, the light causes condensation of the top of the lid, so wherever you set it will get very wet.  If you're lucky enough to have somewhere to set the top so you can SEE, the surface WILL get very wet when the condensation drips onto the surface.  In addition, the entire back half is occupied by the filter(which I'll get to later), and the front has a support bar. for a 20" tank? That means you have 10" on either side to work, and with 4" in the back gone, you're working in a 4.5"x 6" area... this makes catching a fish, or scrubbing algae a pain because you're always taking your hand out of the water to skip to the other side.  This causes water to drip off your hand all over the place.  Acrylic also scratches easily, and is impossible to cover up once scratched.  Glass is more durable (but much heavier)-- The Filter:This is a filter? It apparently does a good job keeping my water clear, but if you look at the design (Impeller pulls water up in to a "trough" that flows water across the length of the tank OVER (that's right, not THROUGH) the filter media, at the end, it flows over a "bio-wheel" and back into the tank.  Because it flows OVER the filter there is potential for a LARGE amount of bypass of mechanical filtration. This means a lot of gunk will stay in your water. Filter pads are a bit on the pricey side. Some will tell you they just rinse in tank water, but how do you replace the carbon?  Also, if I have a power outage while I'm at work, I'll come hope and have to "prime" the filter to get it going again.  Cleaning the filter involved removing this "trough" from the tank top, removing the impeller (that clogs easily). It's bulky and hard to work with.- The Bio Wheel:  If there has ever been a case of undeserved hype this is it.  Marineland has somehow convinced people, even very knowledgeable fish people that this is the best thing since sliced bread.  "This" is a case of the emperors no clothes!  It may "work", but no better, if even as well as other methods.  Color me unimpressed.  My reasons? I've tried this and the Emperor and actually get slower/worse biological filtration than on a simple AquaClear.   The wheel is another moving part, creating noise(splash noises) and occasionally stops. When it stops, the can bacteria DIE!   What's more is that every time I change the filter pad, the tank goes through a mini cycle again.  What does this tell me? That much of the nitrifying bacteria is living on the pad and not the wheel.  Even supporters of the biowheel will tell you that this happens.- The light:  It's a compact fluorescent, and it proprietary. It is located in the center, so the sides of the tank tend to be darker.  The tank is not evenly lit!- Surface Area  The tank measures 20.5(front)17.25(back)x10 deep.    When you keep fish, how many you can keep is about surface area.  The eclipse has about 205 square inches of surface area, negligible to a 10 gallon, and far less than a much cheaper 20 gallon kit(288 square inches) and with a standard 24x12 footprint, you have better options and prices on stands as well.- A standard 10/20/29 gallon would be much more cost effective. A 29 gallon would be about the same price at a Eclipse at more than twice the volume. If space is an issue, a 20 gallon isn't much larger(3 inches across the front, 2 inches deeper) You can get a complete kit with heater and filter for much cheaper, Shoot, you can buy the tank and hood and pick your own filter and heater and still save money.   These tanks are easy for to maintain, Stands are common and cheap.-	My fish don't seem happy in this tank, when I move them to other tanks, they seem to perk up.  Granted, this is not fair as this is my smallest tank, but in general, fish prefer room.  Maybe if you bought guppies and neon tetras. A single Goldfish would work well, or two small goldfish.If I were just getting started and purchased this tank, this may be my last venture into the world of aquaria. The tank has been a nightmare, and I've had it with the small openings and constant mini cycles.  I'm going to replace it as soon as possible.My personal recommendation is to avoid the nightmare.  Acrylic looks nice, but if you go that rout, don't go with the `eclipse system".
This is the best thing ever!!!. Man this item is fantastic. I love wasting $80 on pointless furniture. Getting a great cheap plastic looking set that holds all my games and systems.... Man I must be in heaven. Not only that but it breaks easily, does this thing have no limit? So I bought this great video center around a year ago.... And what happens it breaks. I had it for a couple of weeks and does it look like dog crap. It looks like you're in a baby kids room. Similar to those play centers in day cares or McDonalds. Man that is lame.... I just love having children decor in my house, and it has to be $80. If I were you.... I would just let my systems, TV, and CDs sit in some tubberware. Believe me it would be 50X safer!
not good for the money. Haier RTC1700 Extra Large Capacity Convection Oven would be great if the company did a better job puting it together. The first one worked for 1.5 weeks then the power went out on it. Sent for a new one and it came with the door not put together right. Part of the hinge was missing. Not happy with this at all. Will not deal with this company again. I bought this as a gift for my mother and she is the one who has had to deal with this mess. Elizbeth, NV.
All form,poor function. After waiting a month to receive this item I am very dissapointed in its functionality. The spout is an inconvenient turn valve design as opposed to a push button. I could get over this if it were the only problem, but it is not. If you want to use the jar as a dispenser you will need to remove the gasket on the cover otherwise you will have a vacumn in the container, but even if you do this the flow is TERRIBLY slow and worse when the jar is nearly empty.Looks nice though, might look good on a shelf with some pennies in it.
unpleasantly surprised. Received the item with a small dent on top which I thought nothing of, shouldn't affect the performance I thought.  But when I plug everything in, the machine just makes a whirring noise, no water spraying, no movement of the dial.  After 15 optimistic minutes, I gave up.  Returning back for exchange.  Crossing my fingers for the next box
Lasts only two months on average. I've gone through so many of these that I have lost count. For someone like myself who reads every night for at least an hour, the light lasts no more than two months. I don't mean the batteries -- I only use the light plugged into an outlet. But it just stops working suddenly after about two months on average. Very flimsy design, I guess. Yet I have continued to buy it because there's nothing else that lets you avoid batteries and is bright enough for a comfortable read. No wonder they don't offer any warranties! But now it looks like there are some other options and I have vowed never to buy this light again
Look for a shot glass with additional measuring units. I found at a housewares store (Bed Bath &amp; Beyond or the like) a shot glass with several different units of measurement: fluid ounces, teaspoons, tablespoons (in half-tablespoon increments) and ML's.  Much more useful than this product, especially if you're measuring for weight loss purposes and can have EXACTLY two and a half tablespoons of that salad dressing
did not get. i ordered this item 5 months ago was told by amazon that i would get this item and it was avaliable and then after 5 months they tell me that they cant get it and it is still avaliable on there web site as far as im concerned amazon is not worth shopping if they cant hold there promises and say it is avaliable please take this very seriously when ordering from amazon thank
Lower your expectations. The first star is because it fits. The measurements are exactly as described. The second star is because it does indeed hold things, including spices. The stars stop there. I'd give another star if the stainless steel was more than an afterthought. Save 50% and get the plastic version. That's what 90% of this product is after all... cheap plastic. I'd give another star if this thing was sturdier. It's flimsy and the "action" is herky jerky at best. Contrary to the product listing, it doesn't, "fit any size bottle or tin... by adjusting the shelves just as you like."  There are in fact very few shelf positions, and one of the two shelves has only one placement option. The bottom of this thing is one of the most visible parts. They've conveniently left it totally unadorned. There's none of that stainless steel to shine all pretty-like, and the cheap plastic that's there didn't receive any aesthetic attention. I.e. it's rough and ugly. Get the plastic version and spraypaint it to match your kitchen. You'll be happier
Wet Vac NOT. We bought this wet/dry vac because we thought it would be handy to use on spills that occur on carpeting.  This does not work at all on wet spills - just smears them around making a bigger mess. I would not recommend this product.
obviously not durable enough. Never got a chance to use this bake & serve set. The first time I ordered it was received smashed into many pieces. The packaging was barely there for a glass product. Amazon was nice enough to send me another replacement immediately. Although the shipping packaging was better, part of it arrived broken again. If this product can't handle even being shipped, how long will it last in the kitchen? I have sinced asked for my money back. Too heavy to keep returning damaged goods to the post office.
not heavy weight at all. I was disappointed in this towel set advertised as heavyweight.  It looked to be WalMart type quality.  I would have been better off buyingfrom Linens and Things
Does not work for inappropriate elimination. We purchased this and the diffuser on recommendation from our vet.  We have 4 cats and one insists on pooing once a day outside the box, otherwise she always uses the box...well it has not helped
Damaged item on two seperate orders.. I ordered this item because of the great reviews and was excited to receive it. I received the first shipment damaged on both the lid and pot. It wasn't in the original box and the packaging was terrible. I was sent a second pot and even though it was in the original box, it had a 3 inch long scratch on the lid. If I am paying full price for an all clad stainless pot, I expect it to be pristine. I have not received a response from Amazon yet about a replacement. I will give them one more shot
a waste of time and money. This item is a waste of time, money and AA batteries.Unless you're fanatic about foam....forget it
Cheese slicer doesn't cut the mustard. I wouldn't buy this product again or recommend it to others. The marble surface had a crack. When I washed it, a chunk fell out, revealing putty that had been used to hold it together. In other words, the company knowingly sold a defective product
GREAT BUT CHEAP!!!!!!!. The peeler does a fantastic job of peeling potatos. Having said that the cheap engineering for the cheap plastic gears causes it to fail prematurely. After beautifuly peeling 50 lbs. of potatos the dinky cheap plastic motor gears stripped and quit.
Expensive mistake from Krups. I bought this coffee maker with great faith in the Krups name -- willing to order online without the "touch factor" -- I was sorely disappointed.  WHile the concept seems promising, the actual product is a failure.  The carafe is awkward and you have to fiddle with it every time to pour your coffee.  And, the handle simply came off after just 6 months of normal use (a.m. coffee only).  And there is no way to fix it as the bolts are lodged inside and can't be accessed.  An expensive mistake and to think I'd looked to Krups to solve my problem of having to replace coffee makers every six months or so.  Don't waste your money and I personally will avoid the Krups brand from now on.
awful engineering, awful service. i purchased a 2 1/2 qt WMF pressure cooker. from the beginning the valve that closes by means of the steam pressure lifting a 'ball-bearing' to close a hole in a rubber safety plug sometimes closed, sometimes did not.once when it did not i was out of the room: burned pot; burned contents; fire alarms; smoky smell in house for weeks.when i finally found the office of the company and described what had happened i was told how great their engineers were and how many of their products had been sold world-wide for many years. in effect, i was probably lying, but i could return the pot for their inspection.i did.ultimately WMF replaced it [while i was shopping for a reliable product manufactured by someone else].the guage on the replacement is now stuck open, making it unuseable. i still haven't been able to find the direct address of the manufacturer to ask for my money back [although i suppose the probability of receiving 3 lemons are in my favor].my advice: stay away from WMF's poorly manufactured product and insulting response to complaints
Neat concept; but just a heavy broom. Ended up giving it to my parents and buying the Shark. Liked the concept of the broom with a vacuum, but tends to get just a little heavier as you keep cleaning. Not such a great job cleaning around the edges of the tiles and doesn't pick up as much when on a low angle. Just not bad that's all
I think it works. I have a reef tank, but i'm just not sure if this product works.  It does increase the calcium levels in the tank simply because it is a solution of pulverized argonite or other calcium compound.  I had great success with a part a&b solution.  My father uses it and likes it but it does leave the argonite residue on everything, and it has harden in the sump so when it is disturbed, white flakes shoot out the return.
Don't waste your money!. The LitterMaid is designed to automatically empty your litter box, making it easier for busy cat owners like myself. Having owned one for about 3 months I have found significant issues with it:1) It always dumps litter between the cracks of the receptacle, meaning I have to vacuum the area under the LitterMaid everyday.2) It gets stuck very often and I have to manually even out the poop.3) It often pushes much of the unused litter into the receptacle, I have to replace the litter often.4) With two cats, the receptacle has to be replaced every two days because it fills up! The receptacles are about $2 a piece, making this expensive!5) LitterMaid brand litter works the best, but it is $14 a bag which lasts about two weeks with two cats.Bottom line: the LitterMaid is not really an automatic litter box since you are actually performing maintenance on it every other day. I have found that it is just as much work as a regular litter box. Don't waste your money!! I am going to be looking into the Scoop Free automatic litter box system that has gotten some great reviews.
Hate it. Ok well unlike the other reviewers, I hate this ice cream scoop. Yes, it's heavy and seems to be well-engineered. However, I don't like the somewhat square shape of the handle and have a hard time getting a good grip on it. And as another reviewer already mentioned, it has a tendency to collect water in the handle when it is washed. When I'm scooping the ice cream, the water drips out and down the handle, thus making it even harder to grip the handle. It makes the handle slippery and my hand just slides right down to the scoop and I get ice cream all over my hand. I have a cheap $2 plastic scoop that I bought when I was in college, and I prefer it to this one.
Light Timer was a dud. I bought my light timer from Target.when I got it I thought "Hey, this oughtta be a good one..." seeing as it's made by Timex, I figured it would be a good buy.I found out it was a piece of [...]I would set the time just as it said on the back instructions, I had everything set correctly.When the day ran to 5PM, I expected it to turn on, but it didn't.I pulled out my couch and looked behind it to find that the dial AM/PM buttons on the timer had went all the way around with the ticker and pulled themselves next to eachother and the time had been reset.No matter how many times I fixed it, over and over again it would repeat the same process.I was VERY annoied.so... on my 23rd attempt at setting it correctly, I CAREFULLY read the instructions on the back of the timer, set it, making sure it was correct, and pluged it in once more.five o'clock rolls around and nothing happens.When it turned to 5:30 the light timer turned on.I had the timer set to 5PM turn on time and 2AM turn off time.the timer turned off at 11PM.That was the one and ONLY time it ALMOST did something correctly.Today, frustrated with the timer, I tried setting it again.Well, it's broke now.I twisted it the wrong way on purpose, putting the horrible item out of it's misery.I wouldn't reccomend this timer to anyone.
I AGREE!. I bought this sheet set, the newest blue comforter with the light saber duel, and the micro bead pillow as a Christmas gift for my 9 year old son.  He, too, loves Star Wars...and as I read the other reviews, Im nodding my head.  THESE SHEETS FEEL LIKE BURLAP!  I have washed them regularly since December...with no improvement.  They dont fade, though..which I suppose was the motivation behind the manufacturer making them with 70% polyester and only 30% cotton. VERY STIFF AND SCRATCHY
sandpaper. these sheets feel like sandpaper....they didnt fit my pillowtop either, thankfully, so i had to return the
The Terrible Toaster. Over the years I've had several toasters and all have performed acceptably but this overpriced unit is unbelieveably bad at doing the job. I tried several slices in different positions and all came out toasted on one side with virtually no browning on the other plus the left edge of all slices were burned black. Unless you want it for an "art" display in your kitchen get another brand. I'm going back to my old Cuisinart which has worked flawlessly for years
sent wrong item for the second time. Once again Amazon sent me the tablecloth only, no napkins.  This is the second time.   I don't need anymore tablecloths.  I need napkins
Picture used and actual color do not match. I ordered these for my Mom who has several different items of the Corelle Coordinates.  When they arrived, the color was no where close to the ones in the picture.  The picture appears to be a bright, almost fire engine red color.  In reality, it is a dull purplish-red color.  My sister also bought the same set for our mother and again the cajun red was the same purplish-red and not the bright red in the picture.  I can say that both sets did arrive undamaged and seemed to be packed well.  The bakeware itself if very nice to use however, I'm rating it one star since the color wasn't even close to what I expected
doesn't work. This steamer just doesn't work. I got it today and tested it out on three different garments and it didn't remove any of the wrinkles. I am very disappointed
Very Small. Nowhere in the description of this product did it state that it was only six inches tall, and made three (4 oz) cups. What a disappointment
Disappointed. The machine was hard to assemble.  It never worked so it will be difficult to tell you how well we liked it
? no manual ?. This product came w/o an assembly manual (except for dusting instructions). I would not normally consider that a problem except I can't figure out how to install coat holder arms? Can anyone help?There do not appear to be any places on the central cylinder to put arms on. I did receive bolts and the arms themselves appear to have little indentations???Any help appreciated. Email; smithwmg1@comcast.ne
Yes, too hot. I like this slow cooker somewhat, but I have to agree - it gets way too hot.  I have been using slow cookers now for 17+ years, so I understand that cooking time will vary based on individual models, food temperature and power source.  But really, you can't use any lower of a setting than *LOW*!  If you plan on cooking your meal while you are out (isn't that the idea here?) you will return to a dried out, overcooked disappointment.  I have even tried using extra liquid and semi-frozen meats with no improvement - still overcooked.  And God forbid, you get stuck in traffic!  You may as well just order pizza from the car!As the hot dog man suggests, it is good for some things.  Mac and cheese in less than two hours comes out nice and creamy (although it does stick to the pot regardless of how well you grease it up).  It also generates less heat than stove top, so we use it during hot summer months to help keep the kitchen cool.  The removeable pot is easy to clean (it better be, since everything sticks while it is overcooking....) and the handles do stay cool. The shape is nice also.  Two stars for that.Overall, if you are going to use the pot for cooking while you are out, I would stay away from this one.
Bought two, both quite after 3 weeks. I bought two of these and within 3 days of each other they both stopped putting out any moisture. What a waste of my time and effort
did a man measure this lid ?. the lid is only 13" wide NOT the 14" as described so if you want a 14" wok lid don't buy it, but if you have a 13" wok it looks like a nice li
Worked great... for the first 11 months. I loved this blender while it was working.  I mostly used it to make smoothies with frozen fruit.  I love that it has seamless buttons so food can't get caught in little cracks.  I rarely used the food processor.After about 11 months, mine also started to smell like it was catching fire - however, it was the black piece in the bottom of the blending jar, which was basically being "Shaved" by the base motor.  I had to order a replacement "blender cutting assembly" from the Cuisinart website for $15 with shipping, only to have it happen again.Plus, it was a pain to clean - the base threading didn't match up well with the jar and screwing and unscrewing the base was often difficult.  We've replaced the blender with another brand but I have kept the bottom motor part for the processor
Poor Quality Fountain. If I were to purchase another chocolate fountain I would spend more money and get a better quality one.  I couldn't get an even cascade of chocolate, even though the fountain was perfectly level.  The chocolate doesn't stay hot enough either.  It only stays hot for a few minutes, then it stays at room temperature.  I wouldn't recommend purchasing this unit
Good design, awful performance. I took a risk and bought this item without reading any reviews, it was definitely a bad idea. Today I'm returning it due to the poor performance.It's a great idea, easy to clean, plus you get a sandwich maker and a grill all in one. The bad part is that unless you really enjoy chewy soft waffles or sandwiches, you better stay away from this item.The instruction manual says that a waffle will probably take 2-3 minutes. After 4 minutes inside I had to take my soft albino waffle and put it in the toaster.It simply doesn't get hot enough!!!If it wasn't for the design I would have given it 1 star...
not able to use. The comforter is soft and pretty however, it isn't very full and fluffy. The worst of it is that the down feathers fall out of the comforter's thin material and make a mess in the bed. We are not able to use this comforter at all.
poor heat and only lasted a year. too expensive, too little heat, unit quit after a year of intermittent use - I won't buy Vornado again.
Big disappointment. This pitcher did not withstand the test of time.  We had it for approximately two months when the area where the handle connects to the pitcher began to crack.  We never handle it rough nor even put it in the dishwasher.
utterly confused. i am desperately trying to figure out what is wrong with my machine.  i  read heaps of wonderful reviews about the great coffee the gaggia is suppose to make and the ease of use. these were some of the main reasons i went with gaggia. i have tried everything to get even a half decent shot of espresso from the machine without success. it leaks, pours bitter shots without creme (no matter what grind used) and it doesn't froth milk it just blows bubbles in it. i am terribley dissappointed wtih the machine and the company.  i have tried to contact them several times to get help and have gotten no response.  i would not recommend this machine or company to anyone.  i wish i had coughed up the extra money to get a better espresso machine
Not as described. I bought this item - "Drinkwell Fresh Water Fountain and Reservoir for Cats or Small Dogs - Fountain (6 cup Capacity)" from PetSmart at Amazon.  Though the title clearly advertises that a reservoir is included, one did not arrive.  I contacted customer service who told me that the reservoir is not included and would only assist me in ordering one.  Otherwise, the unit is nice, though simple.  I will be returning it used to purchase elsewhere
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
Bed pillows. Not worth buying.  Pillow flattens out as soon as your head hits the pillow and it is noisy.
replacement fit is poor. Granted, I probably should replace my processor because of its age, but it works fine.I had to replace my bowl recently for myDCL -8 Plus; and the bowl is very difficult to get on and even more difficult to get off. The fit is not the same
Keep searching. . . I have been searching for a baster with an injector.  This one looked good.  It works OK with the injector but it does not work at all as a regular baster.  I guess I will keep searching
good for mopping tile. Leaves floor rather wet,I would not use on wood. This unit performs NOTHING like the infomercials. I kept it for mopping only. I have alot of tile and it works great on it. If I had to do it again I would buy the other shark machine for $99. NOTHING ELSE really worked on this machine.
Not worth the price...keep on shopping. I've had the toaster for over 5 years and have enjoyed it very much with the speed it toast and how well it evenly toast.  Owners must use this item with great caution though.  Bagels will need to be squished/flatten or suffer getting stuck and you spending time retrieving the item--be careful with children as they are tempted not to unplug the toaster when inserting their metal fork to retrieve their bagel.  The timer will fail with no warning aside from the day you are preparing for work and the fire detectors go off.  As fate would have it, the timer did not stop so the cooking continued leaving the detectors goings off and dogs barking.  For a short term investment, this is a great item to have but for the long haul, keep on shopping
Lots of problems. Please don't buy this if you think you are going to be juicing carrots and apples and other hard vegetables. Because it is manual, it would take anyone forever to get a 12 oz. glass of carrot juice. I can get a glass of carrot juice in less than 1 minute with my centrifugal juicer which is a Juiceman pro. But, a centrifugal juicer can't do what this little juicer can do, juice grass and leafy greens.I have mixed feelings about this little juicer.  First the pros. This juicer does a fine job of juicing wheatgrass. The pulp is dry and it is not hard to crank. Cleanup is fairly easy. It is portable. It is cheap. You get a slick dvd and extra parts. In an emergency this juicer would be an ideal survivor tool.Now the cons. The so called indestructible plastic auger cracked after the first two weeks of juicing wheatgrass. I have to send it back for a replacement. Sometimes the crank hits the clamp or the edge of the counter. That means I have to readjust the clamp to make sure it is on correctly. Not a big problem but something you have to be careful about. If the lip on your kitchen counter does not protrude out far enough, the clamp might not attach properly. We actually have to open the dishwasher in order to have enough clearance for the clamp to attach under the kitchen counter. I ended up juicing in my backyard attaching the unit to the side table of my grill because of the clamp, the clearances and the drippy mess.Next, the designers decided it would be best to reverse the threads of the end cap. That means in order to tighten it, you turn it counter clockwise. This is the opposite of every standard thread on the planet. It's confusing. In order to take off the end cap after juicing, you have to use the wrench supplied and use a moderate amount of force. I don't like it.Also, the hopper body is hard to slide off the locking base. Sometimes I really have to push it. Next, the juice cup is very close to the handle crank. You have to be careful not to knock over the juice cup as you are cranking. Not a huge deal but again, something you have to put up with.  Lastly, when you slide off the hopper, there are some drips. Because you must attach the locking base close to the edge of a counter, that means some drips on the kitchen floor. It can get messy.I bought an Omega 8005 electric juicer three weeks after buying this healthy juicer. The omega is terrific and has none of the problems I have with the healthy juicer.
Horrible, horrible, horrible. I was sooooo happy when I read these reviews because I was ready to give up on slow cooking entirely.  I have burned EVERYTHING I've ever cooked in this- I thought it was me!  I'm actually a great cook and used to make fun of slow cooking, but with a family it made sense.I bought this because i had started with a smaller version and I wanted a larger crock pot with the 10 hour setting.  I had some success with the smaller RIVAL, but it was simply too small to do anything except reheat soup.  I thought I'd try this one since it was bigger, had more features, etc.  WRONG.I promise I'm not exaggerating- after 6 hours in this thing (at the 10 hour setting) everything has been burned beyond recognition- I was told it was impossible to burn anything in a crock pot.  WRONG.Seriously, get another one.  I'm online now searching for a different brand that hopefully won't set my house on fire
Lentek does not support their product. I have had my Super Bark Free for 3 years. Never really worked the way I hoped but I spent so much on it I keep trying. Well now it doesn't work. Can't turn it off and it doesn't cycle when the dog barks.I called Lentek and the pleasant young man on the phone told me if it was within the warranty period "1 year" they would just replace it. I told him I was willing to pay to have it repaired. He said, "We are just the distributor and don't support repairs of our product. That is the key, "THEY DO NOT SUPPORT THEIR PRODUCT"
I AM WET. I HAVE TWO BATH SHEETS AND TWO HAND TOWELS. THEY DO NOT ABSORB WATER
Disappointed, very poor performance, wonder how these others are happy with it... I bought this blender because I liked its retro design, and I thought it would function well.  Well, every single time I've tried to use it has been a disaster.  Even for very simple tasks, like blending soft avocado, the blender has not worked. The blades spit big chunks onto the sides of the glass jar and then spin around without blending anything... It's horrible.  And I even threw away my old, ugly blender when I bought this one... and the other worked just fine. :
Doesn't do the job. I found these nearly worthless for drying dishes.  They are not absorbent enough.  I gave these two stars only because you can use them for something besides dishes,  and because one towel in the set is a thick, loose weave that actually absorbs water
The carafe is defective. I purchased this item from an appliance store in my city. Though pictured here (and elsewhere) with a stainless steel carafe, it actually comes with a glass pot with a plastic black handle. The carafe has a defect and breaks easily while cleaning the inside due to pressure from a screw attaching a steel rim to the bottom of the pot. I called LG after my first pot cracked, and was told a replacement glass pot would be $56! Because it was still under warranty, they offered me a "one-time complimentary replacement", but I didn't receive it for over 10 weeks (and several phone calls) after that. The same cracking problem occured the first time I tried to clean the second pot (other than just rinsing with water). This time, I noticed that online the pictures seemed to show a stainless steel pot. So I called LG parts to see if I could order the stainless steel carafe, and was told that there is not such a thing. So, although the convenience of having a combo appliance was great, the hassle of replacing a defective, yet highly overpriced carafe every couple of months is not worth it. I feel that this product would be worth it if it actually DID come with a stainless steel carafe, but don't count on it
Heavy weight, Super sucking machine. It sure sucks everything up including carpet itself.  I'm concerned that my carpet will be paper thin in few years.  Long cord is good, but both body and wind tunnel part are so heavy to carry around the house and it is not made for wood floor at all.  I don't think it's worth the money and I don't recommend anyone to buy it
OVERPRICED!. I just had to write something because I can't believe the amount that this tea kettle is listed for on here.  $90.00!  Come on!  The exact tea kettle is available directly from Kitchen Aid for almost half that price!  (Specifically referring to the "KitchenAid Cook For the Cure Limited Edition 2-Quart Stainless Steel Tea Kettle with Pink Silicone")
They look nice and cut well but 2 of 4 broke. after just 7 months. So be aware that you might buy into some hassle by exchanging the knifes with Henckels. I am very dissappointed and will not spend that much money ($80) on knifes ever again, at least not on Henckels. My K-mart knifes hold up better
LACKS the  main appeal of having a crock*pot and dangerous!. Bought this crockpot from a local dept. store hoping to enjoy it's nice size and color and the good crockpot name. Nope... As another reviewer stated, the lid is poorly designed. Moisture boils and sprays around the outside of the lid and causes the lid to bounce around. Drives me and my dog crazy. No way would I feel safe throwing something in it and going away for even a few hours much less a whole day. In this day and age it seems cheap products and profits are more important than long lasting quality and craftsmanship. Shame shame on CrockPot!
Juiceman 410, Junk Juicer. I've had this juicer about 15 months and the motor just stopped without warning.  SALTON does NOT sell ANY JUICER REPLACEMENT PARTS, so I now own more junk that must be thrown out.
cute but don't. Looks like cute little bunnies on my fridge, but they're just eye candy.  Shakers don't store a lot of salt or pepper.  Handles are too small to comfortably hold, and it's hard to detect any salt and pepper coming out.
Very Dissapointed. Upon receiving the sharpener I read the instructions thoroughly.   I attempted to sharpen standard, good quality, kitchen knives with very poor results.  In fact, some of the knives that had a fair edge when I started were less sharp when I finished.  I tried several knives, using the manufacturers instructions, to no avail.  Finally, I returned the sharpener to Amazon
WHAT Toaster?. After shopping carefully online and off, I bought this item at JC Penney on March 25, 2006.  Penney's stated regular price is $69.99, with a sale price of $49.99, the same price Amazon is currently charging.It replaces a 10-year old Black & Decker, primarily because I read several reviews suggesting a dramatic drop in the quality of B&D small kitchen appliances and that Hamilton Beach was performing well.  I also have several other Hamilton Beach small appliances and all of them function well at what they are designed to do.  This seemed my best choice for a reasonably priced toaster oven, since I am not looking for a cheap convection oven, just an acceptable toaster large enough for baking a potato now and then or some other small item too large or the wrong shape for a slot-style toaster.  In shopping I found no current toaster ovens with a lever to press for toasting - all now have some variation of twist dial for this purpose.It is (so far) performing acceptably as an oven, though the top gets very hot.  However, only the first few uses produced acceptable toast on even the darkest toast setting.  Toast set at dark got lighter and lighter and now, only three weeks after purchase, it no longer toasts at all.  It does not darken beyond the palest coloring and toasting a second time leaves the bread only drier, not at all darker.The top elements do not seem to heat properly and do not reach the red color needed to toast bread ... or presumably to broil anything, though I haven't (and won't) use it as a broiler.  As hot as the top gets from regular oven use, I am not confident it would be safe as a broiler, even if the upper heating elements were working.At three weeks post-purchase I have no toasting capability at all.  I fully expect the rest of the oven to cease functioning soon and, regardless, it is of no practical use to me as a toaster, which is the small appliance I want and need.  I am returning it to the store and starting the search for a toaster oven over again from scratch.
This is not the item pictured - wrong model. This filter is NOT the item pictured (flatter top with the orange indicator) but the new and awful dome top style that starts filtering slowly (to where it takes days to filter a tank) after much less use and doesn't seem to produce water that tastes as good as the old style.PUR has discontinued the orange indicator model, it looks like Amazon doesn't sell from a supply of these older and better ones
not worth the money. Not only did this product have no effect on the manic barking of our own dogs, but the company also refused to provide a refund/replacement after the product arrived with a broken chunk out of the cheap plastic casing.  After sitting out in a rainstorm, the Super Bark Stop shorted out and is now totally worthless.  Find another product - You'll thank me later
Doesn't toast very well. Just purchased this toaster and it is being sent back.  Even on maximum setting, it hardly toasts.  We tried different breads, different settings and it just doesn't work right.  We even tried toasting (on maximum) one lot of bread (not good) and followed it by another lot of bread (better, but not adequate)on the theory that it was warmed up after the first lot of bread.  Forget it.On the up side, the toaster looks good.  But for $80 it should toast better than my old $9.99 Black and Decker!!
Useless. I'd actually rate less than zero. Ads for this sweeper are very misleading.  I've used it 3 times and each time it has only picked up some dog hair and nothing else.  It will never pick up: Tiny pieces of thread, paper, leaves, dirt, etc and these were all very tiny pieces.  You can roll the thing back and forth over these items 20 times and all it does is move them an inch or two, never pick up. The amount of time it takes to use the tiny comb they provide to clean the roller brush takes longer than getting out the vacuum to do the job over.  The handle comes in several pieces and even when assembled as instructed the handle will not stay together. It constantly falls apart and has to be put back together.  You can get around this at least by using duct tape.  Unless you have a very low pile carpet or berber, and the ONLY thing you ever have to pick up is pet hair, this Bissell product is a total waste of mone
At altitutudes about 3,000 feet. Just got the pressure cooker, and it looks like a great, heavy duty pot.  Very nice.  Because of the other reviews, my main purpose in purchasing this was for canning.However, after reading the manual, I learned that this CAN NOT be used at altitudes above 3,000 feet -- which leaves out a lot of Colorado, New Mexico, Utah......Otherwise, I'm sure it's great
Doesn't hold up over time. I have had 4 various sizes of the skillets for 2 - 3 years now.  When I first got them I was so impressed....and thrilled that I finally had a quality set of skillets.  That excitement has gone away.  The non stick coating does not hold up over time.  I have babied this cookware and used only the correct utensils with them, and no scouring pads...only sponge and cloth as they recommend.  The non stick coating is coming off all but one...so far.  And of course foods now stick.  I don't recommend this cookware at all anymore.  I am now trying an 18/10 stainless steel set of cookware because I have had two 18/10 stainless steel pots for several years now that I LOVE.  I have not babied those at all, and they just keep going as strong as when I first got them.  I'm hoping the stainless skillets work as well as the pots that I love
think the price is incorrect?. the ad states questionable price? sale price is more than list price
Doesn't feel like Sateen. These sheets say they are sateen, but, they don't feel like it, they are no where near as soft as the sateen ones that I had before. They also don't fit my matress quite right. However, they do feel like they are of a good quality and would last a long time.
Good Design Does Not Have To Be Expensive?. Bought something similar, small crack between the seams where the two walls join after less than a month's use
Industrial-looking but not industrial strength!. I was happy with the sleek look - but unfortunately it's kind of cheap-O. The vertical rods that keep the paper towel in place are loose and bending - and really no way to tighten! Nice looking until you use it, then kind of cheesy.  The quest for a decent paper-towel holder continues, I'm afraid.
Don't buy this product. Light is beautiful and functional, and so great for traveling, but first LED light failed almost immediately and second after about 2 months.  Too bad.
Worked for a while... I purchased this ice cream scoop after I ruined one of the antifreeze scoops by washing it in the dishwasher. The scoop works well. However, although it was advertised as dishwasher safe, the inside of the scoop has begun to pit. Also, the handle collects water in the dishwasher, which slowly leaks out in the drawer. I'm tossing it
Piece of junk. This lamp, while very pretty, is a piece of junk. I used it to read in bed and would swing the arm over the bed to read, and swing it back to go to sleep. Within ONE month of owning it, the top arm portion detached from the base - stripped from its screw grooves and impossible to reattach. No amount of glue, tape or what have you would fix it. I think if you want something more durable, look elsewhere
Great Idea, Poor Execution. I LOVED this for the 3 months I used it before the head fell apart, despite hot water leaking onto my hand.  It removed wrinkles from dress shrit and slacks very well.  Now it's useless and no replacement head is available.  I would put the effort into repair, but it appears from reviews that more trouble is inevitable.  If you haven't experienced problems with this machine, either you haven't had it long enough or don't use it
NOT Pottery Barn!. If what you're looking for is lush, plush truly thick towels, these are NOT it. If you want Pottery Barn luxe, you'll have to go there. These are a poor substitute. I could not have been more disappointed. I returned them all.
Very small individual Round Baker, Red. I really thought this was a big enough bowl to make soup for a family of 6 and it turns out that this is made to fill enough soup for 1 only. This is a great item, I was just misled to think it was a large dutch oven. Next time I make individual French Onion Soup this will come in handy.
Designed by Robots, for Robots. This vacuum cleaner is great in theory.  In practice, it appears to have been designed by someone who has never actually had to use a vacuum cleaner under realistic conditions.  My kids hate using it because it is so bulky and inflexible, even though it is substantially lighter than our previous cleaner; often you have to vacuum over small ordinary bits of thread and lint many many times before the cleaner will grab them...I guess it's some consolation to know that in the meantime, it is sucking up invisible microparticles.  Forget about vacuuming under furniture ever again; the hose is held in a long inflexible cumbersome wand that prevents you from working in small spaces; the suction causes the hose to collapse upon itself.  The bagless suction is great, but it belongs in machines designed by people who have already come to grips with all the other things a decent vacuum cleaner needs to do.  We would never buy one again, never recommend one, and have had frequent cause to regret this expensive purchase
Useless - do not buy!. This product is useless. The pump broke after 1 week and the entire thing started to rust after not more than 2 weeks of use. Do not buy this product; you're throwing away your money!I'll reiterate:1) the pump breaks, yielding the thing useless2) it will rust after just 2 weeks and won't stop3) do not bu
disappointed. While the sweeper does do an excellent job of sweeping up everything on the kitchen floor, the next time you use it it dumps most of the debris back on the floor.  I have tried emptying the containers, rolling and using the comb to clean the bottom. No luck.  It still dumps dirt on the floor at the beginning of each use.  You then have to sweep over the pile several times to get it picked up again.  The handle also has come apart but that I can live with.  The base of the unit is a large square and even though I have a large floor it would be more useful if it was smaller and more rectangular.  If you have a small kitchen floor that is not an open rectangle for cleaning the size  may be a problem.  I should probably have sent it back since it is more work to clean with it.  But I keep hoping I can figure out why it is dumping debris.  If I could get it to stop doing it it would be useful
Dissapointing. The product was very dissapointing.  The bars (that hang/support the hanger bar) are not long enough, they don't even clear a women's size medium T-shirt!  After rearranging my closet three times, I gave up and put the "Space Expander" up in the attic.  Maybe it can be used in a child's closet?  Not for adult clothing
Not Absorbent. They look nice, but the towels do not absorb much water.  I am very disappointed.  I suspect I'll use them a few times, then give them to Goodwill
hollow ground. This is a hollow ground blade (not flat ground) which does not cut straight.  The blade tends to want to rotate in the cut because of this.  Get a knife with a flat ground blade, not this one.  You can see the ground part at the bottom of the blade.  It is a cheaper way to make knives
a2Z home center problems-beware before buying. I placed a substantial order, mattresses, sofa set, table set and cocktail tables with this vendor and they cancelled my shipment becuase the cost to deliver the items they said was "too much"Nothing in their ads states they will cancel your order for such a reason and they state the shipping charge on the items and their site.  This was a great inconvenience to me and I feel they are not a reputable dealer and do not conduct their business in an honorable fashio
Belgian Waffle Maker. I own this product but on choosing a waffle maker for my daughter, I did not consider purchasing another one.  I have had it a year, using it about once a month.  It sticks and the light doesn't always work. It does make waffles but I will be purchasing a different one in the near furture.
Stay away from Igloo products!!. I purchased an Igloo refrigerator and within a few weeks it completely stopped working. Curtis International (Igloo's parent company) has terrible customer service and will not honor customer warranties. After a year of trying to ge this resolved, I have found out that they have an unsatisfactory record with the Better Business Bureau and have many of these types of complaints. STAY AWAY FROM IGLOO PRODUCTS!!
Works for a short time -  poor battery charge. It works great when it's charged, but keeping a charge is difficult. I experienced the same as a previous review - even with a full charge it drains very quickly when being used - no more than 5 minutes.
Poor quality control. All 6 of of the glasses in my set were at least slightly misshapen, one was positively a mutant!  The stems were not centered, and there were, for lack of a better description, glass tumors where the bowls meet the stems.  The glasses were also thicker than I expected from Spiegalau.  Other Spiegalau items I've purchased have been superb, so this could very well be an anomaly.  ..
No Lifespan!. I loved this grinder when we first got it because we use a french press, an automatic coffee pot, and an espresso maker. The array of grinds is wonderful! If it only lasted.... I had the same problem as everyone else, the ring broke & I found myself shoving paper in just to get a seal. Would be a superior product if they made it to last
Total gimmick!!. I'm sorry, but I have to be the naysayer when it comes to these knives. The television ad claims that these knives never require sharpening, and that is simply not true. Yes, the knives were super sharp out of the box but after about a dozen uses they became completely dull. And don't even try to argue this point with Miracle Blade because their customer service base is practically non-existent, even though these knives are supposed to be guaranteed for life. All I got from this deal were empty promises and dull knives. If you truly want nice knives but don't want to spend a fortune on good German or Japanese steel, then I recommend you try out Forschner Victorinox products. They are very reasonably priced and are excellent products that should last you many, many years. Don't be seduced by the gimmick of Miracle Blade. The low cost of these knives today will not justify the replacement cost of new knives later.
What glasses do the manufacturer  use???. Unless you are cleaning the fishbowl, this thing is useless
Lodge Original Finish Cast Iron Eight-Section Cornbread Skillet. ok for cornbread but NOT at all for scone
Not worth it. I could not believe it was for only one cup.  I did not read throughly and thought it was for four.  Big dissapointment
defective glasses. We are HUGE Amazon customers and we have always been so pleased with our purchases.  However we were shocked when we went to use 4 out of 6  of these expensive wine glasses.  THEY FELL APART!  The glass is tissue thin!  Perhaps from shipping there are many fine fractures????  One fell apart in my guest's hand...three fell apart later that night while being rinsed out.  we handled these glasses so delicatly...I have 2 more and we would like to send them back and be reimbursed for all 6.
Water is great, pitcher sucks. The pitcher is difficult to disassemble for cleaning.  While in the process of trying to remove it one day, the whole thing bounced across the kitchen and broke apart.  I'm glad, because that kept me from having to deal with any more frustration from this.  I like to wash pitchers in the dishwasher every time I change a filter, and it was Pur hell every time I had to change this thing.  Pur designers came up with a good looking pitcher that is a trial to use because it cracks, leaks, or gets broke when the consumer tries to take it apart.  Didn't they employ any real people to test this thing before they took our money to do the same thing???  Regardless of the instructions, which I re-read every time I had to take it apart, this pitcher is NOT easy to disassemble.  It's PUR torture.  The filter is good, the water tastes good, but I wish there were a way to get my money back on this pitcher that turned me into a raving lunatic with minor cuts & abrasions every time I wanted to take it apart.
The label says King, but it's really Queen!. I ordered King size, the label says King, but the sheets are Queen size!  Plus, there are light blue (ink?) spots splattered on them! I wouldn't have ordered them if I had known, because they're not worth the price. This is misrepresentation & false advertising.  Not happy with these
The Alfi Is Iffy. It's a beautiful design and color but that's as far as it goes in the world of coffee carafes.  The handle on top is very thin and requires some strength in turning the top (I've had to go so far as to utilizing a screwdriver or knife as a lever!). It keeps the coffee moderately warm but not hot, but that may be a by-product of my fear of really screwing the top on too tightly.  If looks are what you are after, this is the one for you.  If you require your coffee to be kept with some modicum of heat retention, look elsewhere
Terrible Topper. I bought this for an Xmas present and it has since been returned. It never "opened up" except in small spots throughout the pad.  It was a lumpy hard pad not more than 1/8 inch thick in most places.  It had yellow stains all over, like it had been left in the sun while rolled up.  Terrible.I bought another one elsewhere and it was perfect.  Buyer, be aware.
Doesn't work!. It's very cute, but it didn't work - you'd wind it up and it would just sit there, not moving, despite all sorts of prodding. I opened it up and managed to pry a metal coil away from the plastic casing, against which it seemed to be rubbing. It worked for a couple of weeks after that, but eventually went back to not working. Too bad..
Fun toy for light chewers. This has the potential to be a great toy.  There are two squeakers that make two different sounds, and also some crinkly stuffing in part of the dog.  However, in less than an hour, my dog was ripping the stuffing out, and that was after I had amputated the chewed up ears and tail.  Even though I bought his on sale, these things cost too much to last less than a day
Tree Storage bag. The storage bag was too small despite saying it fit up to a 7 1/2 ft. artificial tree.
Cat-owners Beware. These sheets are indeed much more wrinkle resistant than my old 100% cotton 400-thread count (and VERY expensive) sheets, but are much thinner, surprisingly, suggesting more delicate threads. This fact was borne out when less than a month after starting to use them, one of my cats "kneaded" on the bed with his claws, and the sheet was irreparably shredded. This has never happened before with ANY sheets I have owned in 40 years of multiple cat owning. Sure, I've gotten thread pulls and tiny little holes in other sheets, but not the knife-like cuts that appeared with these sheets, after just one kneading session. It really looked like someone had taken a pair of scissors and stabbed the sheet repeatedly. Despite the high thread count, this cotton is thin and delicate. So beware if you are a pet-owner. You do get what you pay for with these inexpensive sheets
Piece of Junk. Take it from a Norwegian, avoid this product at all costs if you are seeking a real krumkake iron.  It is not a solid cast iron device.  Look elsewhere for quality
The only Wilton product that has disappointed me thus far. I purchased this item hoping that it would make leveling and torting round cakes easier.  The &quot;blade&quot; (a simple wire) does nothing to work through a sturdier or crusty cake, and in the process of trying to get it to do so, the cake gets damaged.  I had nothing but problems with this item, and had to use my trusty bread knife to repair the damage from the leveler!  I am back to using my knife to level and torte my cakes, and feel stupid for wasting the money on this item.  My recommendation: stick with the tried and true method.  It works perfectly every time
PETSAFE 6 VOLT BATTERIES. I DO NOT THINK THAT THE BATTERIES WERE FRESH.  DOESN'T SEEM TO BOTHER MY DOG WHEN HE BARKS
Rusted out. Although a pretty kettle, and with a wide enough base to support a full flame on commercial range such as Viking or Wolf, the inside became pitted and rusted within months. When I inquired from LeCreuset, they explained that it was not an isolated incident, but rather that they had been having problems with the vendor that produced this particular item. Unless you are looking for a disposable teapot you will have to replace within 6 months, stay away from this on
Don't buy this vacuum. I bought this vacuum several months ago and to say I was disappointed with it is putting it mildly.  I found this vacuum to be extremely noisy and dirty.  More dust is created when you empty the bagless container than is eliminated.  I HATE this vacuum to the point that I'm going out tomorrow to purchase a new one even thought this one is only a few months old.  My advise - buy something else.  I would rate this at a -5 star
Too Many Defects for Me. I returned the Honeywell 6011i humidifier because the product had 2 defects and the product was very poorly designed.The 6011i humidifier had 2 defects right out of the box.  The first was that the 6011i humidifier would not run on the High speed setting but did run on the low and medium speed settings.  The second defect was that the cap for one water container had no rubber o-ring seal and the water bottle leaked when upright in its normal operating position.  The fact that this 6011i humidifier had 2 defects says that the quality control for this product must be very low and implies this product suffers from an above average failure rate.The 6011i humidifier has major design defects that make it difficult to operate and maintain the 6011i humidifier.  The design defects are somajor that the person(s) that designed and approved the design of the6011i humidifier should be shot or at least fired!  The first major design defect is that the water bottles will not stand up by themselves in my sink.  Because of this I must hold the water containers vertically with my hand and still cannot completely fill the water container to the top.The screw-on caps for the water containers are so large they are difficult for my wife with small hands to screw on while holding the water container vertically upright.The next design defect is that one cannot at a glance check the water level in the water containers but must pick up the water containers and turn them over to check the water level in the container.  One can see if the water container is empty or nearly empty at a glance, but this is of no use if one wants to quickly see if there is enough water in the water containers to last until one returns home from work or will last through the night.The last design defect of the 6011i humidifier is that the water containers and humidifier fan housing do not just "drop into place" on the base.  One must use one hand as a guide for the water container and then still fiddle with the position/angle of the water container to get it to seat properly.  This is even more difficult if both water containers are removed for filling at the same time.I bought this 6011i humidifier to replace a Honeywell humidifier that finally failed after many years of faithful service.  I also selected the 6011i Humidifier because of its many desirable features.  However the positive product features were significantly outweighed by the poor quality control and the poor design of the 6011i Humidifier.  I believe   that a humidifier should be designed for usability first and esthetics second, not the other way around as is the case with the 6011i humidifier.  Thus I returned the 6011i humidifier
junk. This is a revision of the "salad shooter".   Leave this one on the shelf, guys and gals, and go out and buy a real food processor.  It doesn't handle the medium not to mention the tough jobs, and it is a real pain, literally, for anyone with an arthritic hand.  Mine went to the Salvation Army after just one use.  Maybe there it will be worth ten cents to someone who needs a sturdy cardboard box
not good heat. will not last long only a few months old and getting weak alread
Strong suction, but  hard to move around. Ive had this vacumn for about 2 years. After about a year the spinning brush only goes on when the handle is tilted a certain way. Still has very good power. Bad news, it doesnt move around easy. It is like dragging an old tire around, hard to turn and direct, canister always rolls over. The only reason i am still using it is because i only have area rugs in a large apt, and dont vacumn that often, i guess because i dread using it. I am looking for a simipler unit with a bag because the hepa filter starts to smell after a while. But still like i said, lots of power if you keep the filter clean
Same problem. If you are looking for a plastic box that rotates, then look no further. If you are looking for a space heater, keep looking
The System Description is Incorrect. This item is actually for the purchase of a radio receiver collar not a wireless system. The description is very misleading and should be corrected immediately!!
Not as thick as I expected. The washcloths are "ok" but I was really expecting athicker more absorbent washcloth that holds a lot ofsoap while in the shower. Good for the money I guess
Not very durable. I have purchased a total of three of these collar. They seem to work great for a while then they they need the dog to bark louder and more often to get them to activate. Then, after a few months, they quit working altogether. I check the charge and the batteries and that's not the problem. I don't think they are for large outdoor dogs
No Way!  Sent it Back!. I own a typical glass french press, which works great.  I was willing to try this one because of the traveling capability.  I would not purchase this again, and actually sent two back.  It may have had great insulation to keep coffee warm, but it leaked grounds into the coffee! Yuck
Worked somewhat well for five years with problems, then failed. The idea is great, and when this attractive mister worked, it was excellent.  However, it frequently emitted the olive oil (we never used it for anything else) in a thin stream instead of a mist.  When that happened, I tried to clean the spray valve to no avail, then suddently it would mist again.  The pump mechanism (manual) is somewhat difficult to create adequate pressure, and we suspect persons with arthritic hands would not be able to use it.  After somewhat satisfactory use for about five years, it failed completely.  So maybe we did get our money's worth all things considered.  Am now looking for a better model as a replacement
Cracked case. Had this grinder for 8 months.  Two large cracks have formed in the side of the unit, now they are widening and trapping lots of coffee grounds.  I'm tossing it and getting a different brand.  All form, no function
A little too noisy. The unit seemed to work well, and produced a nice vapor, but we bought it for bedroom use and it was just too noisy.  It produced a high pitched whine which was uncomfortable.  I could hear it from adjacent rooms.  We tried it in the TV room where our Christmas Tree is and it worked better there but it we could still hear it so we returned the unit
NOT MICROWAVE SAFE or SAFE FOR MICROWAVE!. They should have stated that it the item desciption...who doesn't microwave everything these days?  I tired to anyway and sparks flew!!!!I had planned on tossing my old mixed stuff, but can't.  THESE ARE ONLY NICE FOR THOSE WHO LIVE IN THE WOODS W/O A MICROWAVE or FOR THOSE WHO DON'T USE A MICROWAVE....WITH THESE YOU HAVE TO MICROWAVE IN ANOTHER CONTAINER TO PLACE ON THE PLATE OR IN THE BOWLS, I LIVE ALONE AND THAT'S A WASTE OF A CLEAN DISH! NOTHING IN THE SET IS MICROWAVE SAFE
Don't buy this one. I have this dispenser in an area where it only gets used once a day.  It takes 3 activations even at the max setting to get enough soap to wash your hands.  If you let it sit without using it for a couple days, it takes 1-2 activations before any soap at all comes out.  Performance degrades further as amount of soap in dispenser decreases.  Soap in it is Dial antibacterial.   A mechanical dispenser would work better than this
Battery Dies. I used to love the blender (two years ago). Fast clean up, easy set up, great for making mayo, hollandaise, whipped cream, soup... Then into hot water and soap, hit the blend and you're clean.But the battery dies and won't hold a charge. This is forseeable, but does Cuisinart offer spares/replacements at reasonable cost? Nooooooooo!Guess what? We'll buy a cheap corded model. We're disappointed. Every product has some limitations, but one should be able to use it for 3 years with no problem and replace failure-prone parts quickly, easily and at a good price, if desired.This product is just another example of bad business and we don't want to reward it
Regret the buy. The product came chipped on the bottom so its lopsided.  Much smaller than anticipated, I can only fit a tablespoon in it
broke on the first use. COmpletely useless, bad design and very bad quality. broke on the first use. Have used similar ones for 6 years, and never had one broken before. Got these, cause they looked polished and good. well bad idea
Good for about 10 openings. You would think that after spending a hundred bucks on a wine opener that would be about it.  No.  After about 10 bottles the screw part gets dull and just pushes the cork into the bottle.  Apparently, the manufacturer doesn't provide or sell replacements...no luck on the web site nor through e-mail.  The machine has all the usefullnes of a dead bunny
Not worth it. I bought this to simplify making fries, it was a disappointment. It takes a lot of effort to push through a potato, and when it does go through it most likely won't go straight. Either save your money and use a knife, or spend more and get a mandoline
not soft. I would not use this unless it had a featherbed on top.  I have two other waterproof pads from bloomingdales that are more expensive but much softer
Rival Crockpot. Very disappointed.  This pot looks great, but it cooks WAY TOO HOT...even on the lowest setting.  The ceramic pot also cracked on my 8th use. I think it was too hot.  All the contents leaked out and burned.  A waste of money
Update - Okay, finally can get the handle out!. This tool works well, but one must remove the handle before putting it in the dishwasher.  When first obtained, could not get the wooden handle out of the spoon.  Now that I have had it a while, it can be removed, but it still troubles me that the handle, which does get exposed to food when using, can't be sanitized in the dishwasher.  There are other silicone spatula/spoons that have dishwasher-safe handles and I'd recommend those instead
Save Your Warrenty!. Item worked for one year, three weeks.  Then had widely varing temperature readings, or indications that the oven had reached over maximum temperature (500+ degrees) when oven was set for 325 degrees.
huge, and they broke within 2 months. I was very impressed by their size... they were a bit unmanageable though.The first one broke, which was my fault (although a sturdier glass would have been fine), and then the second broke when I was cleaning it with a sponge...I clean lots of things with a sponge, and that has never happened. I don't have huge hands, and I didn't rough up the glass or anything -- it just broke... I don't know how I didn't cut my hand during that experience.
Lightless Book light. I used it regularly for 2 weeks and the light went out
Don't Get Burned--Buy the 2-Slice instead. One day my gorgeous Russell Hobbs toaster went crazy. I started to research another nice looking toaster that would also satisfy my needs for a high-tech gadget. I thought the Breville 4-Slice Toaster met my needs. I didn't want the 2-slice because I thought that there were times that I'd like to toast long slices of bread. I read the stunning reviews for the 2-Slice and the mediocre reviews for the 4-slice, and thought "How different can they be?"Let me tell you, I bought the first Breville 4-Slice, put it on the '4' setting and ended up with charcoal. Actually, I ended up with a whole loaf of charcoal. I kept trying different slices, other kinds of bread, and even different outlets, but in the end, I figured I had a bunk toaster. However, when I exchanged the toaster for another one I had the same trouble. The toaster burned my bread everytime I used it above the '2' setting. Whats the point of having 10 settings? Finally, I exchanged the 4-slice for the 2-slice toaster. Perfection! Whoever did quality control for the 4-slice model--not so good. Buy the 2-slice and you'll be OK
Hard to clean. I have to agree with another reviewer.  I got one of these as a gift and I was really excited about it.  But it's a devil to keep clean.  The inner canister has a textured surface where flour gets easily trapped.  I only used it once, and now it just takes up space in my tool drawer next to my beloved measuring cups.  Great idea, really bad execution
Very disappointed!. I have several other pieces in this collection which I absolutely love. When I was able to find the salad server set at Amazon.com for a cheaper price, I couldn't wait to order it. When it came, I was more than disappointed. The set looked like it had either been 100 years old and was all tarnished (which it is not supposed to ever do), or someone had bought it, tried to clean it with a polish (again, something that is not supposed to be done) and it wore away the finish. I also bought the medium size bowl to go with the salad server set, and when that came, it was all scratched! Needless to say, I returned both for a full refund immediately. Obviously, the cheaper price meant cheaper quality in this case...and it wasn't dirt cheap to begin with, I still had paid $75.00 for it, compared to $150.00 that it is sold in stores for
Pick a different brand!. The quality of the workmanship is awful! I didn't even get to use it - the top had chips in it and the bottom of the pestle had a huge crack that looks like it happened during the firing process
don't waste your money. This devise leaks and works marginally for spraying oil but it does raise frustration levels. I followed directions very carefully and after finding puddles of oil on the counter from this contraption, I relagated it to the garage.
Was below-average for a while, then jammed. I received this blender for x-mas last year.  It has some nice design features (good heavy base to prevent tipping, measuring cup built into the cap).  However, I experienced the same problems that others here have -- the blender doesn't do well with anything thick like milkshakes.  It just shoves everything against the sides of the pitcher and spins helplessly, forcing you to stop and manual stir everything back towards the blades and restart.  While it worked OK for a while, the cutter unit mysteriously jammed after about 9 months
Don't Order This if you expect to get it. Ordered the item twice and both times it was rejected in transit by the local shipping station because it was damaged in transit.  Ordered the item two months early in time to get it here by Thanksgiving.  Amazon was happy to provide a full refund but this doesn't cut it as it looks like we'll be drinking out of plastic.
Egg Rings Stick. If you are after the egg rings, forget it. Your eggs leave their edges in the rings.As for the bacon press, good grief, how can you mess up a flat piece of iron with a handle
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
The only thing getting steamed was me. There is a clear echo here, so to simply quote the experience of another reviewer, "after two months the steamer ceased to function properly and steam came out of the espresso head instead."Rather than paying to ship the unit to Krups myself---clearly, the company cannot afford to pay shipping on the thousands of these cheaply made units---I hauled the Krups FNP112-42 down to my workshop and found that the hose to the steamer had detached.Well, fixing that problem did not render the FNP112-42 usable, for now it simply exhaled steam in great plumes like a bull in a Bugs Bunny cartoon. Cleaning the unit per the directions from Krups did nothing whatsoever. Nor did shaking it robustly or inserting various instruments into the nonworking nozzles serve any purpose, but at least I felt a bit better.Turns out the only thing getting steamed was me. . .I'm going to buy a good espresso maker this year for Christmas and I can promise you that it will not have the word Krups emblazoned on it.
sm bamboo steamer. Quality is fine but the 6-inch size is too small to be usefull
Liked until it broke. We bought this model because it had the different grind capabilities. It quit working after 1 year. We also bought one for my mom and her's quit much sooner. :-
enthusiasm faded after the thing broke. Corrected review:On September 1st, after using it five times to stir soft ice cream,  I used this spatula to stir flour into oil and it broke with the steel stem sticking out.Amazon emailed the promise to refund this product but I haven't seen the refund yet.
Bad Bad Bad and Bad. We bought this sweeper at Christmas over a year ago, IT has never started and they sent another one ofter several months and it did the same then we have never even had one that wil start once, and My poor mom who is 88 years old is very disappointed. they are hard to get parts out of it take months to get a part. I will never buy another one, If you get one that works it is great but getting that one that will work is almost impossible.
Waste of money. All this did was make continuous noise in the bathroom. The plug-in from the grocery store was far superior
Pretty - but small. Love the matching sugar bowl that comes with this butter dish, and the butter dish is very pretty, however it is too small!! or short rather.. you put a standard cube of butter in the dish and it squeezes the top of the butter and gets stuck. The lid does not touch the bottom of the dish  until you have used most of the butter. Also it has to reach room temperature, so it becomes molded to the shape of the lid better, which in turn makes a mess. Really, very unusual and it drives me nuts. I do not recomend the butter dish, sadly
Death Trap for Smaller Fish!. I installed one of these in my aquarium this weekend and sat back looking forward to lush greenery in my tank.  The system is a sturdy canister in which you mix sugar, yeast, a "stabilizing agent" and water.  These do their thing and the gas comes through a tube down into a bubble track that makes the bubbles zig zag up, exposing them to the water for as long as possible.  Good concept and I'd read pretty good reviews.But here's the problem.  The track affixes to the wall of your tank with suction cups which create a narrow gap between the tank wall and the track.  I noticed my tetras were getting in there, but since they were getting back out I didn't worry.  Then this morning I found one of the larger females firmly stuck.  I thought she was dead until I released her.  She swam off with an ugly red mark where the thing had caught her.  I hope she's OK.  I removed this death trap from my tank and am seeking safer ways to diffuse the CO2 in my tank.The canister thing is nice, though, particularly if you're not handy enough to make an airtight seal with a DIY soda bottle system.  It might get another star for that, but seeing how it injured and could've killed one of my fish, I'd like to give it 0.UPDATE 11/30/06:  After several aquarist friends insisted that I must have improperly installed my diffuser, I tried again, this time making sure the suction cups were squeezed as flat as possible, and one of my friends checked it and assured me that this time there was just not enough space to admit even a small fish.  Two days later, I checked the diffuser and there was an otocinclus trapped behind it.  This one was dead.  Find a better way to feed your plants
bad units. it seems that the steamer only works twice the two times it does work its great but then it  is over the steamer just quits all together this is my second one to quit and my friends third one so we will not try another thank you i was so dissapointed it was so good and a needed item for cleaning but it wont hold up
Very disappointing. The Hoover Floormate was great the first two times we used it.  Along with the Old English it did a great job cleaning and picking up the solution.  After using it twice, it had difficulty dispensing solution from the Reservoir.  This was remedied by having to apply downward pressure constantly.  It still got the job done.  Not too long after that it wouldn't vacuum the solution back into the unit.  I got a great clean for the price divided by four uses.  You do the math.  I'll stick to the "cheap" clorox thing we pulled out of the closet after I put the Floor ex-Mate into the trash.  Very disappointe
Must Be Seconds?. These have to be seconds. Soon as I opened the packages.. I ordered 10 packages with 2 each inside I noticed frayed edges... a immediate ut oh to me. The seams aren't sewn smoothly all the way around there are strings hanging.Looked closer and the tags on them weren't in uniform spots. For the price I thought I would give them a shot so I washed them as advised by the manufactor before using. They came out of the washer and dryer as in different colors. A bad dye lot I guess. These washclothes ARE soft so thats why I gave them one star, however, they are badly sewn and I expected much more from Martex quality than this. Buyer beware
Design and size good....the rest is marginal. I like the design and size but have been very disappointed that I can't get the smell of paint out of it.  Fortunately, I'm not using it for bread or other food products.  I'm using it as storage on my counter for vitamins and various other small items that are in jars or bottles.  I thought when we were finished using it for the current purpose, I would use it for bread.  But now I question whether that will be possible
Very poor quality. This filter was purchased to use with our news Krups coffeemaker. I was skeptical from the beginning, as the basket was flimsy compared to our older Krups filter. The filter cracked after two weeks. I would not recommend
A piece of junk. It isn't worth the box it's mailed in, let alone $12.  The poles and pieces of balsa wood that supposedly hold the thing together break apart while assembling it.  (The poles are all the right length by the way, you just have to assemble it correctly - not an easy feat.  It's very easy to put it together backwards.  And then taking it apart and putting it back together the right way is nigh impossible
reconditioned by whom?. This vacuum was highly rated by Consumer Reports and at $99.00( reconditioned )seemed a good buy.  It arrived by U.S. Mail very poorly packed with chunks of styrofoam all over the inside of the box.  Upon assembling I noticed it was missing the attachment tubes and when turned on the brushroll didn't work.  In addition, the finish was marred and smudged.  I sent it back and ordered a Hoover Windtunnel 2.  It works well and appears to be of higher quality
Used very little, knob cracked, lid "spits" steam. I own 4 other Rival crock pots and have never had any problems.  One of those is a VERY old one inherited from my wonderful mother.  This one spits so much steam from the lid while cooking I was afraid to leave it on while I was away from the house.  I came home after first use to find the pot sitting in a lake of water!  I was sure I must have not put lid on correctly.  I still used it a few more times while I was home to supervise.  This has been used very rarely and today the knob just disintegrated in my hand when I turned it on!  This is not the usual good quality of my other Rival products.  Found this site searching for a replacement knob only to find out there has been a recall
WARPS WHEN YOU BAKE EM!. DON'T BUY THESE BAKING SHEETS.  I PLACED ONE IN A 425 OVEN AND IT WARPED, CAUSING A SPILL AND MESS IN THE OVEN
Item was not as represented. I chose this item partially because of the on board duster. The vacuum works well but did not have the on board duster. The number on the box matches the model number, but it is a different item than pictured and described.
Saucepan made in Indonesia. Saucepan made in Indonesia was extremely lightweight and pan was distorted so that the lid did not fit securely.  There was no way to realign the pan so the lid would fit.  It was in the construction of the pan.  As a long time user of Revere Ware, we were very disappointed in this product sent to us.  We will never purchase another Revere Ware product.  Once burned we will not go back to a second treatment
Lentek does not support their product. I have had my Super Bark Free for 3 years. Never really worked the way I hoped but I spent so much on it I keep trying. Well now it doesn't work. Can't turn it off and it doesn't cycle when the dog barks.I called Lentek and the pleasant young man on the phone told me if it was within the warranty period "1 year" they would just replace it. I told him I was willing to pay to have it repaired. He said, "We are just the distributor and don't support repairs of our product. That is the key, "THEY DO NOT SUPPORT THEIR PRODUCT"
Spacemaker By Black &amp; Decker. I purchased this model yesterday. This morning I decided to install it under my cabinet and per the instructions, held up to the bottom of the cabinet for lever placement. After several minutes of this, it went back in the box so I can return it to the store. There was not enough clearance for the lever to be pulled up so the can could be placed on it. Actually if there were a no star rating I would use it based on the fact that the can opener was out of the box for all of 5 minutes before it went back in.
didn't hold up-- all form, lacks function. If a kettle whistle is important to you, this doesn't have one.  The OGGI Zephyr is a sleek looking kettle.  However, after a few months of use, the plastic handle on the lid became lose.  I would have to tighten it with a mini screw driver a few times a week.  After a few months of tightening, the threads gave out.  Without the plastic handle on the lid, I actually have to pry the lid off the kettle with a butter knife.  All of this happened in less than 12 months from the date of purchase.  I searched, but don't know where to find OGGI or their replacement parts.  Time to get a new kettle; different brand
Dog interested in noise, not detered from barking. My beagle (13 mo.) cocks her head showing that she hears something with a slight pause in the barking process but does not deter her from barking at a later time.  Does nothing for howling and will only go off for loud barks, not smaller barking or any form of whining (even if extremely loud)
Delonghi = defective by design. We had a rude awaking today, our Delonghi toaster was on fire. I will never again buy any Delonghi product. The defective design is in the toast switch. It is mechanical. When it finishes toasting, it sometimes continues to the "Always On" position thus leaving the toaster oven on toast: very, very hot. We literally had a house full of smoke & a toaster full of flames. You were warned.Funny thing is, Delonghi makes an attractive product.Sad thing is, they can cost you your house or worse
I bought the mini verson. My wife an I saw this unit in a specialty store, thought is was pretty neat.  Then we purchased it on Amazon.  We like it for a number of reasons, it has a magnet that was handy for storing it on the bottom of our microwave oven, in reach for that quick launch of ground pepper.  However, we hadn't used it more than maybe 10 times and the handle broke off!  Now it is kaput!  Can't fix it, etc.  Piss poor quality control, but a nice idea!
Do not get!. I also had a problem with the coating flaking off... within the first week of using it. The only reason I still use it is because I'm a poor college student that got it as a gift in the first place and can't afford a new one. After scrubbing the inside bottom of the wok furiously, I managed to get all the flakes off and then some. The lid is made of thin aluminum and has bent almost completely out of shape. Awful product. DO NOT BUY THIS WOK
Poor Design. This product is poorly designed. It appears to be very sturdy but soon broke. The case itself is very heavy but the cutiing wires are flimsy and quickly broke. Mow I am left with a very sturdy, inoperable tool. You should sell replacement wires
YOU WON'T GET HOT COFFEE WITH THIS PIECE OF [....]. I purchased this coffee maker and in three months time, threw it out. What a piece of [....]. You can NEVER get a decent HOT cup of coffee (it is lukewarm at best) and the carafe not only breaks, so you have to replace it, but it is designed to spill coffee everywhere as you attempt to pour coffee from the carafe into the cup. What a dissapointment this machine is. Mr. Coffee used to make a good product that would actually make a good hot cup of coffee, but the quality and design of their machines today are very poor. I would not recommend this coffee maker to anyone. The only nice thing I can say about it is the programmable timer worked.  I would not give this coffee maker one star, but that was the lowest rating available. If it were up to me, I would give this coffeemaker a minus zero rating!
Disappointing at best. Disappointing at bestI was truly disappointed in this item. After purchasing it we followed the directions  for conditioning the non-stick grids both before using it for the first time as well as  before each use as listed in the "use and care guide."It sounds simple enough. Wait for the green indicator light to come on, add the batter close but do not latch the lid. The green light will go off, when it comes back on the waffle is ready. The only problem is the waffles were burnt and were stuck to the lid as though glued in place with epoxy glue. The waffles ripped into pieces when trying to get them loose from the maker and they also tasted like burnt toast crusts.We said  "Well, OK, maybe it just needs a couple of waffles cooked in it  before they start to come out right."  7 sheets of waffles later they were still coming out as bad as the first.The price is great, the design is nice, the over all appearances are wonderful but it simply does not work, at least not for us.I told my wife I would take it back to the store and exchange it. She said, "don't you dare bring another one of those things home with you."It's to bad too, we both love waffles.
Not all that great, but has a couple of nice features .... I bought this while in search of a replacement for my badly missed Bissell steam mop (which is no longer made). While the cordless feature IS great, it does a rather poor job of mopping a floor, the actual "mop" part is only a small velcroed microfiber cloth over a hard plastic head, which doesn't absorb any major dirt or mess. Stick vac part is ok, one bright spot was it came with a small bottle of Bissell floor cleaner (which, as it turns out IS a good product). But, I was not very impressed with this as a useful cleaning device, so back to the store it goes!
DITTO! DON'T BUY THIS. I bought this nice looking grater to replace a plastic one that felt rickity. It was always awkward to grate with, and after a few months the barrel of the grater became dented, and unusable
Relatively thin, poorly constructed cheapo towels. I got a pair of these from Amazon because the price was right.Or was it? Turns out that even at a bargain basement price these towels were no deal. They're relatively thin and poorly constructed (they shed like crazy and I suspect they'll be dust in short order...not that they're gonna stay in my house long enough to find out...) These are hardly "luxury" quality towels.I made a mistake with my money. Now I'm trying to help you avoid the same mistake. Put...the...mouse...down...now...and...walk...away...from...the...terminal...
Great idea ... poor execution. Great idea.  It took about a week, but after a period of time my cat loved it and now won't drink much without it.  But like so many modern products, consumerism runs rampant.  Unless you spend 15 to 30 minutes every two weeks to scrub it clean, expect to buy a new one every 6 months to a year.  Mine lasted about 8 months due to being continuously filled with water and cleaned. The main issue is poor material selection and saving about a buck on the motor. First, better quality brushless motors (freely available for incorporation into the design) would work here, but would add about a buck to material costs. This shows a design decision to trade quality for more sales due to burned out motors.  This warrants a recommendation to wait as a better quality competitor will likely soon arise and knock Drinkwell off.Second, they made a design decision to use very cheap plastic that gets dirty and stains far too easily. A higher quality stain resistant plastic would also add a buck to their $40+ product.Great product ... but wait for a competitor who will do things right
Disappointing. I bought this model over a Cuisinart due to positive reviews here and elsewhere.  Problems however began right out of the box.The machine uses a complicated safety mechanism of levers housed within the handle of the work bowl and the work bowl cover.  These levers are not lubricated and sealed so when new I couldn't assemble the cover to the bowl or the bowl to the motor due to the stickiness of the plastic.  After I washed these parts they reluctantly slid together, the water acting as a lubricant. A few months later the handle of the bowl cracked and was replaced under warranty. Now a month after the 1 year warranty the cover is cracked and must be replaced as well at a cost of $30. These cracks are due to the design and operation of the safety mechanism so I am sure these parts will continue to break, costing me $60 a year.  This is unacceptable, especially since I only use the machine every two weeks or so.
Avoid this product and beware of iRobot customer service. It appears that there are fans of Roomba products however, iRobot definitely got ahead of itself with the introduction of this model.  The scheduler is a great feature although programming it is rather clumsy in its design.  The Intelli-bin feature does not live up to its name.  It does not work.  Either iRobot did not test it fully before release or it is plagued by manufacturing defects.  To make matters worse, iRobot's customer service is inexcusable.  After several emails and lengthy waits on hold, I have yet to get a replacement or any kind of resolution.  I'm given a different answer each time I contact them and I never hear back from them when promised.  My advice is save your money and avoid the frustration.  If you're still convinced you want one, wait until iRobot fixes this model and gets its act together
Loud and Annoying. For such a little fan it sure makes a ton of noise. The power is inconsistent and will start blowing harder and then softer for no reason. It rattles like a car engine. I would not recommend it for anyone. I think it was a waste of money. If I still had the box I would return it
pike sheet set. This is an order I have been waiting to get since I order it on 1/23/07.  I ordered other items with this, I have received them all except this order of Pike Flannel full sheet set, forest green. I have been e-mail that they make take as long as the end of March or the 1st of April. They are already paid for and I would like to know if they are being sent soon. I'am an employee at the Chambersburg, Pa. Amazon.com I know we like to make are cumtomers # 1. Thank-You Lisa Barnhar
Mine did not work; seller won't refund; says I used it????. I think this may be a great product, and is why I bought it. However, mine NEVER worked (and hence was never actually used, it was just taken out of the box!)The remote would beep the collar but not spray. Seller did have manufacturer send new batteries (which further delayed my getting a good response to this situation). New batteries arrived, item still didn't spray, but seller would only refer me to dealing directly with the manufacturer, to get a replacement, even though I responded within their advertised 30 day return policy. Please read seller information and return policies CAREFULLY! Even if you get them to take something back (only if never opened...if opened and doesn't work, they toss you to the manufacturer), there is a 25% RESTOCKING FEE!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Pretty exorbitant and not Amazon type service I have come to expect over many years of buying from Amazon! Be very careful of sellers that are not Amazon...sometimes it isn't very clear it is not Amazon. My feedback on Seller is on feedback page and seller responded, but I don't get a chance to respond to their feedback, which gives the misconception that I actually used this product! I couldn't have used it as it didn't work! If you want to buy this, I'd recommend a reputable pet store such as Pet Smart where you can easily take an item back if it doesn't work and get a refund. Even if they are willing to replace something, you may not want to risk having future problems with it in a month or two and would want a refund, which most stores have no problem with doing for you. Next time I go the established pet stores
Dr. TMS. Not worth the high price.  Difficult to clean and very persnickety.  Comes with a bunch of sensors that, if not properly triggered, keep it from roasting.  Not long after I bought it, I couldn't get it to start without jamming a pencil in one spot, and now it doesn't work at all.  When it works, it works fine, but it doesn't always work nor does it last very long.
Broke after a week of use. After a week of use, the knobs on the blade drive coupling chipped/broke off.  A look at those knobs revealed that they are made of plastic!  No wonder they broke.  The blender looks sturdy and solid - yet such an important part that makes it operate is made of some cheap plastic!  As far as I am concerned, this blender is a piece of garbage.  Why bother to have it repaired if it's bound to break again?!
shower guard. Looked for a shower guard for kids. Doesn't fit any of our showers. Has a square corner. All ours have curves where there is grout and corian
HUGE honkin' ugly glasses. We bought some white wine glasses a while back and the Metrokane Rabbits were truly beautiful.  We use them 10:1 over our Reidels.  After my wife broke ANOTHER Reidel burgundy glass, I ordered these.  They are HUUUUGE.  I'm very serious when I say that an entire bottle of wine would easily fit into one of these glasses (with room to spare!)  There is nothing attractive about THESE monsters and storage is a big issue (literally.)  They would make a fine fish bowl
Switch broke. I gave this Espresso Maker to my daughter as a Christmas Gift. Unfortunately, the "Off/On" switch broke after the second try.Amazon delivered it quickly--on time & was wonderful about returning it and issuing a refund
Worked great...until it died. I have always had first alert smoke alarms and they always worked great and lasted for what seems like forever, in fact, i have never had a smoke alarm die, until now.  When I moved into my aparment 10 years ago, my first alert smoke alarm was there already and to this day, it still works.  I only changed the alarm because of new laws. A year after I started using this one, it died on me.  I was very disappointed in the longevity of the product
Good as a blender, cheap canister. As a blender, this works really well. It has a lot of power and the stir stick helps knock out air bubbles and keeps things moving. The blades are well set so that I can wash it (carefully) without gloves and I've never cut myself. The lid is good and tight, although at high speeds the suction in the center works the lid right off. Once you've used it you know what blended food is, lesser blenders just mix food.The problem is the cheap aluminum metal covering below the blades in the canister peels off. How about ingesting little shards of aluminum with your food? I use mine every day but I wash it by hand with a soft sponge. I'm not rough on it, but that aluminum covering peeled and little bits found their way into my food. I realized it when I was drinking a smoothie, something hurt my tongue I and went to see where they came from. Supposedly the warranty should cover it, but I have to pay to ship it and I can't get L'Equip on the phone or by e-mail. It would actually be less expensive to just buy a new pitcher/blade assembly than bother with the warranty for it but they have been out of stock on that for months.I would not buy this again. It's too expensive to have had such a problem without a good solution.
Not enough steam power. Quick to heat up, but takes a long time to steam a garment, and still does NOT get most of the wrinkles out.  Don't waste your money.
Just threw mine out. I'm looking for a new humidifier after throwing this one out. I had kept it for a few years thinking I'll use it, but as the other reviewer said, it is so impractical because it literally wets the floor every time I use it. The vent is shaped in such a way that the mist does not go 'up' but 'sideways' and falls down. I tried taking out the vent, but then the mist would not come up out of the humidifier at all. I tried putting it on the top of the bookshelf and putting a towel on the floor, but after a few times, I just gave up. And this year, I finally decided to chuck this useless thing.
Bad Choice. I bought this fryer and used it twice.  The 3rd time I got the error message on the screen and could not get it to work, even hitting the reset button wouldn't get it going. I had to take it to an authorized dealer for repair and he got it working.  I used it one more time and it went out again. I took it back and two months later I received a new fryer in the mail.  The new one doesn't have the digital controls, it's back to the old fashion dial for temperature setting.  If you look on their web site this fryer is no longer there.  The one that they sent me is there instead of the Dual Zone.  When the fryer worked, it did a great job, however it didn't work very long.  I will be using my new one tonight to fry some fish and french fries.  My guess is that it will work as it should, since they got rid of that stupid Dual Zone control.
Worked great... for a while. This thing worked fine for about 6 months, I used it mainly for grilling steaks, pork and chicken.  But once the cord starts to come loose from the probe it's time to chuck this piece of junk in the trash. I'm shopping for a wireless thermo now.
crap. Be smarter than me and save your money! Description of this vacuum sounds so great I went against my better judgement "if it is too good to be true..." Motor is loud and exhaust spread dust away from vacuum. If you have pets, you see those hairs running for corners. And Hepa filter can be washed only up to 3 times. It is very hard to clean filter, and it is dirty job. Hepa replacement cost 10 dollars--am I nuts to keep feeding bad product? I got rid of it. Eureka is part of the problem of environmental polution by creating this kind of throw aways. From what I read only commercial Eurekas are any good.
This thing doesn't suck!. The one item in your house that you really wish would suck and it certainly doesn't! This thing blows more air than it sucks dirt. What a useless thing. I'm looking for one that will actually pick up the dirt from the recessed areas of my prefinished floor. This thing certainly doesn't do it! If you're looking to buy this thing, look again -- there MUST be something better if not just your regular broom
Fine while it worked. It does the job while it works.. then the wire went slack and finally broke, like everyone else. I could call and get a replacement but do I want to bother? Perhaps I'll get a replacement and give it away as a gift to someone who will never use it. It does look very nice. Anyone have a recommendation for an alternative product
Garbage sharpener, great magnet. This is a nice fridge magnet to hold pieces of paper on your refridgerator.  Not so much to sharpen knives, it's hard to get the right angle to make a keen edge, and isn't a very well-built tool.I just got the Presto brand electric sharpener, and for only twice the price of this hunk of plastic, it does an AWESOME job.  Look for that instead
Do not buy. Unfortunately I also purchased this product and within a few uses I began getting cracks in all my containers.Plastic is very thin and is very low quality, not what I had expected from Black & Decker.Both continers broke within a week, used only a couple of times...I would rate this product a ZERO if it would let me
broken. I was looking forward to giving this to a friend for Chrismtas but when it was delivered to my house,the sound of broken ceramic rolling around inside prevented me from even opening it. Very disappointing
not working. When i first got this item i loved it I used it 4 times and it stopped working
Do not buy this product. I bought this set of four stoppers for use with my Metrokane Rabbit Vacuum Pump because I was not getting good results with the two that came with the pump.  With the 4 stoppers from this set, I was able to form a seal and create a vacuum, however, the vacuum lasts only a few hours, no matter what bottle it was being used on.  I do not recommend this product
Disappointed, very poor performance, wonder how these others are happy with it... I bought this blender because I liked its retro design, and I thought it would function well.  Well, every single time I've tried to use it has been a disaster.  Even for very simple tasks, like blending soft avocado, the blender has not worked. The blades spit big chunks onto the sides of the glass jar and then spin around without blending anything... It's horrible.  And I even threw away my old, ugly blender when I bought this one... and the other worked just fine. :
I can see why the price dropped!. I had one of the originals...with the vaneer look.  --Ugly yes, but it was actually very sturdy & well made.  Unfortunately, it got lost in a move.Then I purchased the newer one.  It just wasn't as good of quality & the latch section cracked on me on the fourth or fifth use!  Garbage!Pay more $ on a Cuisenart or Delongi...you'll be happier.
Cheap Plastic Cleaner. I have gone through two of these in the past year.  Different brands, but look exactly the same.  Eventually the cleaner self destructs.  The ultra-sonic vibration cracks the plastic... first the plastic hinge on the cover cracks, then the plastic rim around the top of the stainless steel tank cracks and crumbles, and eventually the outer plastic shell of the machine starts cracking.It cleans extremely well.  I use it to for cleaning the dirt and grime out of antique watch movements... works like a charm!If you use fairly frequently, expect to replace it about once every 6 months.  I've learned my lesson... although they're not the prettiest, I'm going to invest in an ultrasonic cleaner that has a metal shell and cover
Don't waste your money. We got this vacuum as a wedding present and within the first 5 minutes of use, it completely died.  The on/off switch no longer functioned--we tried different outlets, etc.  It had not tripped a circuit and the plug was firmly in the wall (the two "solutions" Sanyo suggests), so the problem had to be with the vacuum itself.  The nearest Sanyo service center was over 20 miles from our house, and we don't have a car, so getting it repaired is a total hassle.  Don't expect any sympathy from Sanyo on this one.  There are a lot of other reviewers here who have had the same problem, so take our advice and don't buy this piece of crap
Not as good as I expected. I bought mine from JC Penney and I absolutely hate it! (I even have two of them!) Then my mother bought one from QVC and she hates it as well.  The worst part about these spice racks is that they are NOT airtight.  Thus, many of my spices have gotten moisture from the air inside and well, they've caked up which renders this product useless.  And, with the cost of spices these days, that can be pricey.  I didn't receive any more than 5 spices with my set and they were mostly ones that I would never use.  Weird stuff like Cajun seasoning - not things you use almost every day like Cinnamon.  When you try to measure out the spices as directed, you get at least double the amount so I don't recommend just holding it over your recipe and dumping it in unmeasured.  It WILL be off.  Check out the reviews for this product on cooking.com - they all concur with mine.  I definitely DO NOT recommend this product.  In fact, mine's going to the Salvation Army after 5 years of aggravation and I'm now here on Amazon looking for something else
Great idea, poor reliability. This pet chime was a good idea, but I am sending it back.  Sometimes the chime won't ring and at other times it rings on its own and worst of all it starts ringing and won't stop.  Clearly the manufacturer needs to work on quality control
You need three arms... I returned this--absolutely unusable. Could not keep bottle engaged WHILE pulling down the two rather unforgiving arms
Never ever buy!. It's absolutely awful! It burns everything you put in it. The lid doesn't come close to sealing, and it rattles and allows steam to escape, resulting in sauces drying out instead of "juicing up" as they should. I literally had chicken turn to charcoal when I left it on for 5 hours on low. I would not give this product a zero. I would not want this thing even for free! Don't buy! You will be disappointed
Doesn't block-out the light is very low quality material!!. My little 2 years boy is crazy about thomas & friends....his  bedroom was decorated with thomas....but the Drapes is very low quality material looks like drapes sold at dollar stores for $3.99 no soft is like when  you use ironing starch.... i left only 1 start because matching with the bedding!I used only one pair with denim drapes liner under to block-out light....because I opened- package the other set i send back to Amazon.I do not recommend this product ....and if your boy likes dark room to sleep do not buy!!!....I bought Pottery Barn THIN WALE Corduroy panels are excellent light material and block-out light
Makes Good Waffles, But Needs Re-engineering. This was given to us as a gift. We returned it the next day. Although it made nice waffles, it had three major faults which are the reasons we returned it.1) The handle is part plastic and part metal. The metal portions become extremely hot when the appliance is on.2) The latch on the lid was very difficult to release once the waffles were cooked. However, on one occasion, during the middle of cooking, the lid blew open with explosive force and could have caused serious injury if anyone had been standing over it.3) The batter really does go everywhere on this machine. It leaked all over the sides and the switch, making it a pain to clean.There are better, safer, machines on the market
Not a high quality insulated tumbler. Received set and tumblers are not good quality. The edges are quite sharp and the glass still sweats. Would not recommend
Defective. A very impressive looking oven. The temperature dial did not reflect the actual internal temperature of the oven by 50 to 75 degrees. Once I got that sorted out, the oven worked well about 20 times. Then the motor started to sputter on and off. Burning electrical odor filled the air and an arcing sound could be heard. While it worked, it worked well. I do not know if the defect is common or rare. I tested only one oven
Useless. This can opener worked once and never again.  Even with brand new batteries the can opener did not have enogh strength to open a can after the first time.  Don't waste your money
Great cup of coffee, but bad design. Recieved as a gift from my parents.  Made 2 pots of coffee before the machine broke.  The down button got stuck (seems this has happened to others) making the machine unusable.  I will try the melitta grind and brew without the weather because the buttons are different and hopefully won't stick.  Also the reviews for that machine are great, and it is about half the price of this one
All hat, no cattle. This dispenser is made of heavy-gauge brushed stainless, and looks and feels great.  Unfortunately, it won't pump soap.The pump head is made of plastic, and feels flimsy.  After using for about a day, it apparently began to "lose it's prime" and would only dispense soap after pumping repeatedly.  Eventually, it wouldn't pump at all, and I returned it.Another example of a potentially-great product ruined by corner-cutting
Nice, but not sturdy. Broke after less than 4 months. A seal isn't holding anymore and won't hold pressure for more than a few seconds. Doesn't seem to be repairable.
Too fragile for a Rock 'n' Roller!. Very cute, worked for a little while, but when it fell off the bathroom vanity, that was that.  It never worked again.  Not that you should throw your timers around or anything, but I think a timer should be worth at least one fall, don't you
Soft, but not very absorbant. I bought two sets of these towels. The ad said name brand, but when I saw the label, I had never heard of them. They feel nice, soft and cushy. But they are not very absorbent. When drying my hands, after repeated rubbing and patting,  my hands were still wet. My old towels (17 years old) do a much better job of drying me off quickly
Even "keep warm" too hot. I took water temperatures at high, low, and keepwarm. I am at 5200 ft altitude so water boils at about 195. All temps reached 203 and the water was in a rapid boil!I have a small Rival I picked up for $12 and it works great low 190, high 199, and Warm 160
PIECE OF JUNK. Initially purchased this item due to the easy cleaning feature, however have been very disappointed with the performance since I purchased it only 3 months ago.  Edges of the lids are extrememly jagged and scraps of metal & label often land in the food!  And now after 3 months, the motor is worn out and the unit buzzes whenever I attempt to use it.  The cutting tool won't even pierce the can without some forcefull manipulations.  Bottom line, don't waste your money.
Does not crack small nuts and seeds. Do not believe this line - "Ergonomically designed nut cracker is ideal for cracking all sizes of nuts."  This nutcracker does not work with smaller nuts, such as unopened pistachios (or, for those who love Japanese foods, the shells of of large ume plum seeds -- which are about the same size as a pistachio.)From the description, the design seemed like it should have worked.  There were two problems - (1) the cone is still too wide to trap and wedge smaller nuts even at the bottom and (2) range of the lever does not reach the smaller nuts when inside the cone.  Because the nuts don't wedge themselves, squeezing the handle simply moves smaller nuts inside the cone.  Because the lever doesn't reach the smaller nuts, the nuts ultimately reorient themselves until they are "safe from harm's way."While I could see how this item might work for a larger nut - like a large walnut, it's not why we purchased the unit.In fairness, I wouldn't have been so harsh in my one-star review here if the manufacturer's description set the proper expectation of nut sizes or types that this unit would work for
Dogs will pay attention to this..but.. it requires effort from owners.  Bought this to help control our Sheltie's barking behavior.  When we first tried it, he would stop and look around to see where the sound was coming from.  We noticed that this alone wouldn't stop his bark and required us to work with him by using voice commands like 'No' or 'Quiet'. This  meant alot of time and patience working with him and my kids didn't help very much.  They have a tendency to push the button and not do the commands.  So now the dog thinks that the sound comes from the birds that he likes to bark at...lots of re-training to do here.Well the dog hasn't stopped barking and obeying yet, but we haven't been as good at working with him either.  My next purchase will probably be a Citronella Collar..I'm opposed to the shock treatment from shock collars as this seems cruel and can teach some dogs to be mean.  Better still maybe a good book on dog training is in order.My oldest daughter used this when walking the dog around the neighborhood and found that it did stop some of the neighbor's dogs from barking or at least got their attention.My question now is could this possibly stop or delay a dog attack??...at least long enough to get away or somehow protect yourself.   Not sure I would want to risk trying this though but it might be worth taking on walks..just in case.
Dangerous Unit. The Deni 6000 works good for only a few weeks before it fails dangerously. I have 2 units that did the exact same thing. One of the rotating blades breaks off and comes out with the ice. Fortunately for me I noticed it in my glass before eating it. Two units-identical failures. This machine is a potential safety hazzard. I will be contacting Deni about their defective design. If you use this ice crusher and it starts sounding louder than usual, one of your blades is probably bent and about to break off. Beware
Wish that I could give zero stars..... HORRIBLY loud, when I use the food processor i have to leave the room because of the high pitch screech (sp?), and it's still bad in the other room.Does NOT work well, when i make hummus the liquid comes out the sides, when I make a smoothie it takes forever to get smooth.  I really thought it would be nice to have a 2 in 1 appliance, but this is not the one
Be Careful. I ordered the plates and they were warped, like they were from the outlet mall. I was very dissapointed
Don't bother with this toy!. I was extremely DISAPPOINTED with this toy. The directions basically say "pull, twist and let go" how hard is that??? Apparently very... I thought the toy was broken. The company sent me another one and it still did not work!!!! My dog doesn't even pay attention to it. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY on this item. I would recommend something else..
dont waste your money. Owned for 6 months and several times I ended up with coffee all over the counter and floor... Coffee got under my laminated floor and now I need to replace several sections of the floor... Its home is now in my garbage can
Very bad quality. I bought this ottoman and  I was very disappointed with the quality of this product.  One caster was already broken when it is arrived. The casters did not match the correspondent wholes in the ottoman. These wholes were framed by plastic, so this plastic did not work at all. So to make it  work somehow I bought new casters. Also it is  not beautiful ottoman, everything made inaccurate, the leather on the lid consist from different pieces without any order. I tried to use the ottoman as a foot rest. I'm using it  during just few days, but already at the lid I can see the permanent place  from my legs. So my advice, don't buy this product. It is a waste of money
The WORST LAMP. if your looking for something to add light to your room try looking somewhere else because it doesnt add light becuase the base is a piece of crud that wont stay streight even though its supposed to, i will always be leaning in 1 or 2 directions but yea i wouldnt buy this lamp with out a degree in engerniering becuase it is impossible for this lamp to look respectful with out one beucase of its low quality base
not as loud as I expected!. I was looking for a timer that had a loud ringer I could hear from another room while cleaning, so I could check on what I'm cooking..This one just didn't do that for me.I notice the sound it sends out is not always the same..sometimes it is a bit louder then other times..to me that does not do me much good..I cannot depent on it all the time!So now I just use it to keep near me when I'm at the computer, but I do notice more of the sound comes out of the back, but then you can't see how much time you have left, if you turn it backwards!!!The ringer goes for 1 min.This does not count backward.The numbers and buttons are large, which is probably the reason I bought this timer.The two magnets are not very big, and does not stay on my frig very good.When its on my frig, and I start to press the buttons, it starts moving all over.Price wise, this is probably a good buy , depending on what you want to use it for.I bought another timer that the ringer is louder, but the buttons and are very small..Guess you cannot have it all, no matter at what the price is!
Stopped working!!!. Stayed warm when turned off.Suddenly stopped working after 4 months (even though I hardly ever used it).Need to buy another electric burner, but don't know what company to go with
It would have gotten 5 stars, but... This is a great sponge brush - for right-handed people!  The sponge twists off when you use it in a counter-clockwise direction, as lefties are apt to do, so I really can't use it.The description says that all you have to do to refill it is to twist the sponge.  That's true, but to actually get more detergent into the handle, you also have to remove the sponge.  So once you twist it, it comes away from the handle. For lefties like me this means a waste of time and detergent as well as a lot of annoyance.I emailed Oxo about this a month or so ago and never even received an acknowledgement.  It's not an expensive item, so I'm ok with having spent the money, but I am very disappointed in Oxo's lack of response.So if you're right-handed, go for it.  It's a nice kitchen tool.  If you're a lefty, keep looking!I emailed Oxo recently and - after a second try - got a response that the item has been retooled.  I'll update this review again after I use it
Holes Too Small. I've used this colander for close to two years, and am sort of surprised by the positive comments on Amazon here.  I regularly use it for noodles, stuffed pastas, and more.  I'm now looking for a new colander because the holes to drain the water are just too small, so bits of food tend to get stuck in them, and then it's almost impossible to clean.  Sure it works, but the maintenance is too much for me
Canister and Filter are Messy to Empty!. Do not buy this vacuum if you have a pet.  Cleaning out the canister is a very MESSY job and the dirt and pet hair stick all over the filter.  Replacement filters are difficult to find and must be ordered on-line.  I've put up with this vacuum for a year and I'm now buying a new BAGGED vacuum.  I've put up with it this long because it is very lightweight, it has a nice retractable handle, and you can set it to "suction only" and use it on bare floors.  But cleaning out the dirt and pet hair is messy, messy, messy
Disappointment for an organization freak. The organizer is well made and matched my cabinets and drawers perfectly. However, most of the compartments are stationary, only a few of the pieces are adjustable. I did not have the desired freedom that I imagined when purchasing the product. There is nothing wrong with the organizer itself but it is not as adjustable as I would have liked
Table is incomplete. We ordered this table twice and both times it shipped with out a base.  Amazon assured us the table would be complete the second time we ordered it, but we still ended up with a top and no base.  We were told the shippment from The Carolina Table and Chair company was to blame and the table would be pulled from Amazon until they got the complete table.  It is still on the web site and I suspect it is still incomplete
Very Dissapointed!!!. I waited along time to buy this coffee maker...after it finally went on sale I went and made the plunge and bought it.  I was so excited when I finally got it, but boy...was I wrong.  It is very complicated to get it programed.  It was very unclear...also there are too many parts to it and too hard to clean.  The most dissapointing part was the thermal caraf.  It took at least about 30 seconds for a full cup to be poured...it was so slow.  There is no adjustment to the lid.  What a waste of time and money.  I wish I had read all the reviews before I bought it
The worst vacuum I have ever used. I just use it on hardwood and tile and it still doesn't pick up cat hair - basically it's a very noisy fake vacuum cleaner. The suction   on it after 2 months of light use is about the same as a very soft breeze
Defective Coffeemakers. I purchased this item because of the good inital reviews however, I have just received my replacement coffeemaker and it has the same problem as the first one I received.Look at the picture of the Coffeemaker. Do you see the metal plate that covers the buttons? That plate slides down and makes the buttons stick. You are unable to turn the coffeemaker on/off, press the up/down & timer buttons because of it.Additionally, the original coffeemaker failed to make coffee as programmed about every other time it was set?I would steer clear of this item. It's great when you can get it to work but because of the obvious engineering defects (see other reviews with the same problem)it is more of a hassle than it's worth; especially at the current price.I guess all the time and effort into getting a coffeemaker to tell the weather made the designers forget about basic functionality
This pot is a bust. Our Krups 199 was a wedding gift two years ago.  We loved it--until this morning.  See the "2 consumer photos" linked above?  That's my coffee pot.  It's the same story you've read from the other six people.  I contacted Krups and they informed me the Krups carafe in this machine is particularly delicate--you aren't to even use a sponge to clean it! I was told to wipe it out with a cloth.  Gross.  Suffice to say, if you don't like your fresh coffee to taste like moldy, stale coffee, go spend your money on another machine and carafe.
Wanted to Love it... Bought this as a Xmas present for my child and we used it a couple of times...loved the idea...cute concept, worked with just ice cubes...easy to use and loved the idea that it had the snow cone holder built right in....BUT...we kept getting little white shards of plastic in our snow cones...I cleaned the machine out twice, and tried again...still plastic shards...called the manufacturer...no response at all.  I wanted to love this machine...it had all the makings of a success, and had the manufacturer responded, I might have even tried another to see if I had just gotten a lemon...but no response, thru email or phone.  Now I am trying to find another one, by a different manufacturer, that won't leave me with a bad taste in my mouth...from poor customer service OR white shaved pieces of plastic
Just broke today. It stopped working 6 months after the warranty ran out.  According to Sanyo will cost more to fix than I paid.  While it lasted it worked fine.
Use a Roomba instead :-). I bought this attachment after discovering that the base of my new Dyson vacuum stood too high off the floor to be used under and around furniture. The attachment cleans as promised, but I have decided that using it is more trouble than it's worth.The attachment connects to the wand (not to the base), which requires a several step process to use it, back and forth, as you clean the floors. It is bulky (12" x 10.5" x 7") and there's no built-in place to store it on the vacuum, so it's taking up a lot of shelf space in my cleaning closet (and I have to carry it around with me from room to room, as I clean.)Dyson makes a great vacuum, with especially brilliant design features - it's disappointing that the standard vacuum doesn't allow for under-furniture cleaning, which should be a basic.  And this attachment doesn't really make up for it.After using the floor-tool attachment a few times, I decided to rely upon my Roomba, instead, for the areas that the Dyson (without attachment) can't cover - the Roomba does a much better job of going around chair legs, etc., and I don't have to be there!If I had it to do over, I wouldn't have purchased this item - put your $$ toward a robot cleaner. :-)
Didn't like at all!. The can opener does not swing tight and once installed, kept swinging out instead of staying stowed. I bought it because it was so highly rated, but I am very disappointed. There is no magnet to hold the can lid either. Although it was intended to save space, it is kind of a clunky eyesore
WORST TOASTER EVER!!!. This is my second Cuisinart toaster. I must say they didn't make a big fuss when I called and said that the first one kicked the bucket. They sent another one in the mail. I thought just maybe it was THAT toaster. I was wrong we've had the new one for about two months now and the toast is getting more burnt on one side and the other isn't even brown. The last one did the same thing and then one side quit working. I don't recomend this product. It's ashame that a company like cuisinart with such a good reputation can't make a toaster that actually works
zero stars, really!. Like the other reviewers, I was impressed by this skillet...until I used it!  This should be taken off the market so no one else has to waste their time!  How this passed any tests is beyond me!  It does heat unevenly, sticks, etc...  e.g., to cook bacon, one should start with cold skillet, but for this skillet you are supposed to heat the skillet for 15 min. with the lid on first!  Even holding heat is unpredictable.  It is just terrible!  They should be ashamed, and really, Amazon should not carry this except for the fact that we can warn others about it via this form
Hilfer Cotton Sheets. If I could have given this a ZERO rating, I would have.  I bought these sheets because they were "deep pocket" sheets.  They have shrunk and no longer fit my bed
too easily broken. I have a habit of wiping the edge of my wine glass during dinner.  When I wiped one of these with the edge of a soft napkin, the glass broke
Table Fan. I purchased this fan less than 60 days ago in a different color and from a different source.  I was very pleased with it until it suddenly started dripping black oil from the motor.  Since we leave it on while we sleep I find this scary
Garbage that should cost about 50 cents. You can buy a better product at an all-for-a-dollar store. This is a complete rip-off for naive cat owners. Please don't waste your money! You can do much better with a large bowl.
Didn't last long. It started out great.  Then the step mechanism broke after two months.  Not worth the money
Poor Quality.  Save Your Money!!!!!. I wish I had read some of the reviews for this product before I bought it.  I was SO disappointed with the quality of the product. The sheets are extremely rough, thin and scratchy. The comforter required restitching because the original stitching looked more like a basting stitch and came apart as easily as one. Since Thomas the Tank Engine is such a popular character, I would have thought more effort would have been put into the integrity and quality of products bearing  it's trademark. As such, I am very reluctant to purchase anymore character bedding
Nice while it lasted... As with the reviewer above, I purchased this fan from another store and it worked well at first.  The remote was a nice touch and the fan speeds and settings worked well.  However within 4 months of owning it, when we tried to have it rotate, it turns slightly, gets stuck, and proceeds to just make a clicking sound until you stop it from rotating.  Needless to say it no longer rotates, so it is now just a stationary fan.  I even tried taking it apart to unjam it, but came to discover that the rotating gear was already worn down and that was the problem, so without new parts it could not be fixed.  Buy another fan if you want it to last, I know I am.
Warm, but not toasty. The Sharp Warm and Toasty microwave is a clunky hybrid of toaster and microwave. It takes 10 minutes to toast a muffin. The software is buggy-- I can't program it to toast a muffin to the end, but must get up and re-start half way though. The interface is clunky--it has little relationship to most appliance interface design, so must keep manual handy.Plus, ours JUST DIED died, after only 2 1/2 years of moderate use.The user manual has no troubleshooting section. (Like nothing will ever go wrong). Neither does their Website. So I tried to contact Sharp through their Website and after filling out all my info and problem details, found their site doesn't work with Firefox. The end.
Not Absorbent. They look nice, but the towels do not absorb much water.  I am very disappointed.  I suspect I'll use them a few times, then give them to Goodwill
These mats smoked terribly in the oven and made food taste like plastic. I purchased these and hand washed as stated. I placed them on a cookie sheet and made a batch of cookies- While they were baking- my smoke detector went off- there wasn't any smoke that I could "see" but it set it off. When I opened the oven there was some smoke- but I thought perhaps it was some baked over food. The cookies took longer to bake by 2-3minutes. They also had a strange taste to them- sort of like plastic.I later tried using these again- but put breaded fish on them and in a 350deg oven- within minutes of the oven coming to temp. smoke was pouring out of the oven- I had to take the whole pan and food out onto the porch as it was very toxic smelling and smoke everywhere!!I would not recommend these to ANYONE and I am going to try contacting the company with my problem.Hope this review helps
This fan will cook you at night.... The fan works well as long as you do not use the temperature control feature.  The biggest flaw is its design.  It does not measure the room's temperature.  Scenario:  You set it to 65 degrees (lowest setting), it is 75 inside of the room and 60 outside.  The fan will not kick in, because it is outside below 65 degrees.  Bummer!!!  We live at 4000 feet, it gets hot in the daytime, and below 65 at night time.  Keeping the fan at permanent blow will make us freeze in the morning.  Setting the auto temperature setting will make us cook.  I've opened up the machine to see where the sensor is.  It has no connection to the inside of the room, and only measures the temperature of the wind it sucks through.  Poor design, go buy another brand
Blender's motor died after 2.5 months. I received this blender as a Chirstmas gift.  I use it several times each week to blend bananas and milk, that's it.  It is now mid-March and the motor has already burned up.  It started with a burning smell and then progressed to bright &quot;welding&quot;-type light (from the motor sparking) being emitted from the back of the blender.  I am quite disappointed and have since bought a new more reliable blender
Just Say NO!. I purchased this fryer after the death of our previous deep fryer thinking you get what you pay for.  So I splurged.  Yes, I read the reviews which had a lot to do with my decision to purchase this particular fryer - mistake....No one explains that the plug is extremely short or the fact that the magnet holding this heavy cord has a difficult time keep it plugged into the fryer.The temperature doesn't seem to stay consistent as my previous fryer - yes, I know that adding food to the oil will reduce the temp.After only 6 months with average use of once per month - it's dead.Bewar
Sharp R-230KW 800-Watt 4/5 Cubic-Foot Compact Microwave. The Sharp microwave was reasonably priced and arrived just as promised.  The packaging was extremely poor and I was elated to discover the microwave was not destroyed during transit because the box it was shipped in was
Borderline dangerous. I have four 16-piece sets that I received for my wedding.  They are beautiful plates, but they have a tendency to split in half with normal use - like heating food up in the microwave, going through the dishwasher or serving hot food.Within 3 months, several plates cracked down the middle, making them unusable.  A large serving bowl also split in half when hot food was added.  I did a search on www.epinions.com and found I wasn't the only person having these problems.  EVERYONE is having these problems.Plus, it is impossible to find individual replacement pieces.  You have to buy another set.  What a racket.  The clincher is that they are located in Indonesia, so customer service and responsiveness is nonexistent.  I've gotten nothing but the international run-around
A Dud!!!!. I remodeled my kitchen and purchased a ceramic stove top and was no longer able to use my cast iron gridle to make my tortillas, so I was looking for something I could continue making them.  I finally came across this grill which stated that you could make tortillas on.  WRONG!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!   It does not work, it does not get hot enough.  If you want to eat a raw tortilla, then it works fine.  I called Bethany Housewares in Cresco, Iowa and spoke to a Lynn Sorenson, who identified herself as the owner.  She was a very rude person and does care about customer satisfaction.  She stated that since I had used the grill that I could not get a refund.  I stated to her that I could not tell if it worked by looking at it.  She then went on to state "if you buy clothes at a store and wear them you can't return them."  That statement does not make any sense.  I am going to attempt to get this matter resolved through Amazon.  If they can't help I will be out one hundred dollars.  Their product is overpriced but I thought that if it worked, it would be worth the money.  What is wrong with this world.  Most people just care about the all mightly dollar.  I will make sure when I order a kitchenware or appliance again that it is not from Kitchen Kraft doing business as Bethany Housewares again!!!!!! BOILING IN ARIZONA!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Worst customer service experienced via a product purchased on Amazon. I purchased this product based on the features and the fact it has a one year warranty.  After 6 months is stopped working.  Calling DeLonghi they said they would replace it.  The next week they said no and told me to take it to a repair center they authorized that was out of town.  Took it to the repair center and one week later they said it could not be fixed and DeLonghi was sending a new one.  One week later I called DeLonghi and they said they never told the repair center they would replace.  Instead they would send parts in 'a few weeks.'  8 weeks since the oven stopped working and I still do not know when or if I will ever get it back.  Amazon should black-list DeLonghi as a vendor due to horrific customer service
Looks cool, kept me sort of cool...too bad it broke so quickly. Bought this to cool my office desk.  I would say it provided a very gentle breeze.  I didn't mind that, I do not like being blasted with a shock of air anyway.  But almost exactly three months after  I bought it, the cheap plastic shaft broke.  I suppose I could try to fix it, the motor seems OK, but it is just not good enough to warrant the effort.  One star for good looks
I wasted my money. There is a flat-out lie on the side of this box.  It reads, "Available in 3 sizes to easily accommodate any size aquatic turtle."  I have two red ear sliders, probably the most common of all aquatic turtle pets, and they are large so I bought the largest size of this Turtle Dock.  Forget my big turtle, who didn't even try to climb on this thing...The SMALLER of my two turtles sunk this; he probably weighs in at 3 or 4 pounds.  He certainly doesn't look any larger than the turle they show on the box, yet when he climbs on it, the whole floating thing submerges so that half his body is under water.  The same rods mechanism that allows it to float at any water level and keeps it connected to the side of the tank also lets the thing sink if your turtle is too heavy for it, which proves the other lie on the box, that it "Allows aquatic turtles a dry basking area..."  I am very disappointed in this product and unless your turtles are under a pound in weight I don't think it works, despite their promise that is accommodates any size aquatic turtle.  And because I tried it, now I can't return it to the Amazon Merchant.  Thanks a lot, Zoo Med
An ill-conceived affair. It's hard to describe what a mess these shelves are.  What you cannot see from the photo is that it is held together with PLASTIC parts that allegedly "snap" together, but they simply don't stay together.  You will need a large empty room & 2 people & still you won't ever get it together.  I bought it for use in a closet, but it's impossible to move it into the closet because it falls apart every time we attempt to move it.  So, you can imagine that it can only hold VERY light items.  Since it's ugly, I can't imagine any other use for it BUT the closet.  But it's ugliness is not the main problem, which is, that it is simply UNUSABLE
Bare Floors Maybe, Carpet Not So Much. I bought this cleaner for use in between major vacuuming.  It clogs very quickly without having swept up very much.  It is probably fine for floors without carpet
Disappointed. I received this for Christmas from my mother and it worked only once.  The motor burned out and the company would not honor the warranty.  Both the company and the fountain were a HUGE diappointment.  DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY
Not even close to professional. So that others do not make the mistake that I did, I am writing this review. This cookware performed well for about two years. However, we have a large family and put it in the dishwasher regularly. It has been 5 years and this cookware has not stood up to regular use. Do not mistake Kitchen Essentials for professional cookware.  Now when we cook mashed potatoes, we do not know if the potatoes were peppered or just the flaking Teflon. All of the pieces used daily are now un-coated aluminum. The outside of the cookware is chalky in appearance.  I am sure this is from the dishwasher.  We used plastic utensils most of the time, but you know how it is when you are in a hurry to feed to kids.  My recommendation is to spend the money on high quality stainless steel cookware. We have recently purchased Calphalon tri-ply and so far we are really pleased. The stainless steel cleans up easily, or at least as easy as the Kitchen Essentials. For the money, go stainless and you will never have to purchase cookware again.
Hard to clean. The textured surface sounded like a good idea but wait until you try to clean it!  When frying ground beef or browning anything all the brown bits get stuck in the little "dimples" and it's almost impossible to get them out unless you soak the thing for days and then scrub and scrub.  Stick with the flat teflon coated surface on another electric skillet
timer is difficult to use. I've never sent in a review before, but after reading the one posted Dec 6, in which the writer says that she loves the timer, I felt obligated to write. Another reviewer mentioned that he doesn't use the timer.Having used oil-filled heaters (usually great) in the past I was hoping that the Solaris with a timer would be the ultimate gentle heater.Unfortunately, the timer is nearly impossible to use. It is on the side and the only way to adjust the timer is to lift the whole unit- hot or cold, or get down on your hands and knees. The timer is 7" above the floor. Because there is no manual override, which is unbelievable, for occasional use it is necessary to adjust the entire timer- over, and over again. That's means pushing up or down 96 fragile little plastic pins.  The timer is obsolete.After closer review of other heaters I believe there are better products out there
It's too small. The description is wrong for this product. I thought it was going to be a regular sized pie dish, but deeper. It looks like it would make a "personal pie". I think the 6 inches refers to the diameter, not the depth of the pie pan, even though the description says it is 10 inches
Great while it worked. For the last six months I've loved this. It did it all. Unfortunately, it's now off by 75 degrees. I'll be sending it back on warranty but, regardless, pretty poor quality if it can't survive a year of basic kitchen use
Short life span. These refills are ridiculous.  Yes, they are simple to use, but the maximum life span is about two weeks.  I've gone through at least 6 sets of refills this winter season already, and the results are consistent.  I run the Vornado humidifier 24/7, as recommended by the manufacturer and clean it regularly, especially when changing out the wicks.  There is never any gunky build-up to blame the short life-span on.  These are clearly manufactured to last only two weeks.  My ancient Duracraft, which is no longer manufactured, but is the best humidifier I've ever had, easily goes 4 to 6 weeks between wick filter changes, with no deterioration in performance.  This will be the last year I use the Vornado...for next year I'll be purchasing a second Air-o-Swiss, which runs like a dream, but is quite pricey up front
Not very good. Bought this at Target, returned it the next day.  Not even close to the quality of B&D T-R-O's from even a few years ago.  Summed up in one word, 'cheesy' is the appropriate descriptor
You can do better. I purchased this item last May, and although at first I was thrilled to have an automatic litter box, I soon realized that it was very noisy, difficult to clean (container holder is flimsy, gaps between holder and box mean litter spills out the side & underneath. To cut down on the mess, I purchased the tent to keep the litter inside.  Very bad idea!  Tent is flimsy, ripped upon assembly & makes it extremely difficult to empty box.  It seemed I was spending as much time maintaining this box as I was a regular litter box.I was just about to order replacement cartridges (which don't really snap shut, by the way, when you go to take them out) when I decided to see what else is out there in the world of automatic litterboxes.  I purchased a Purrforma jumbo box, and, so far, it is wonderful.  It is sturdy, has a huge hood that you just lift off, is so quiet that it doesn't need a sleep timer like the littermaid one.  It is well thought out and I would urge anyone to spend the extra dollars to get it, it's a small price to pay for your sanity
It will block the flow of the water. I have found the leaking problem for the fountain.  It is the filter.  It will somehow block the flow of the water, so the water starts to accumulate and then you have a leak.
Pay more get more. Not the best sheet experience. My legs broke out in a rash. Best to wash before using, I guess. The thread count is a bit lacking, too. For microfiber sheets, I want a cloud-like surface. I will go for a higher priced item next time
Never again. I could not believe the condition in which this rolling pin arrived.  When I opened the bag around the pin one handle fell off.  When I looked at the pin I noticed huge dark gouges in the wood pieces that make the ravioli.  I thought that was bad enough but when I turned the pin over there was a huge chunk out of one of the wood pieces.  Needless to say, it's useless.  This was my first experience with amazon and it will be my last
It would be great if Packaging was BETTER!. First off, a big thumbs down to the packing of this product!Mine arrived in the mail...BROKEN, and the box was full of holes due to a lose product inside the box because of poor packaging! I wonder if I lost something in shipping? Not sure because the box was half empty with only the product and a tiny instruction booklet.It made me realize just how cheap this product is made.BOOOO to Amazon for selling such a cheap product for soo much money!This makes me question if Amazon.com is such a great place to do my shopping
Great stockpot. I love this stockpot.  It has a nice heavy-duty bottom, so food doesn't burn.  The offset handles don't get hot.  Great pot for the money
DO NOT BUY ANY SELF PROPELLED HOOVER VACUUMS. HOOVER HAS A KNOWN PROBLEM WITH THE BELTS STRETCHING OUT ON ALL THE SELF PROPELLED VACUUMS, BUT WILL DO NOTHING FOR CUSTOMERS STUCK WITH THEM! WE MUST REPLACE THE DRIVE AND PROPEL BELTS EVERY COUPLE OF MONTHS. REDICULOUS POOR CUSTOMER SERVIC
Warning: Good Chance It Will Leak!. I bought this aquarium for my son for his birthday last summer and thought it was great... that is until it started leaking about 4 months after I bought it.  Giving the benefit of the doubt, and thinking the leak was a QA issue rather than a design issue, I managed to exchange it for the exact same model.Well it's been 4 months since I got the new one, and this morning what did I notice?  Yup, a leak. The tank was full yesterday and this morning it's 2/3's full, with a pool of water on the table that holds it.  Luckily, no damage was done to the floor either time.I understand there are sometimes manufacturing issues with a product now and then,  but when the same leak occurs in the same product after the same length of time, well then, it's just a cruddy product.Stay away from this aquarium
Rotten little finger-slicer. The professional "review" is a puff-piece. This is a horrible piece of kitchen equipment. It is a flimsy piece of plastic and a danger to the cook.There is no built-in holder for the blades. These, inevitably, float aound your kitchen cupboards and, just as inevitably, get lost. And, if you have never scrambled around in a drawer for a razor-sharp metal hedgehog, you have still have a treat in store for you.The finger-guard is a travesty. It is flat, small piece of plastic. It cannot be attached to the machine, so it will get lost too. Your fingers run very close to the blades when cutting. One mis-slice and you can cut a deep little pocket in your finger.The blades are badly designed and catch and tear, rather than slice, your food. They are small, easily lost and fall out when you are cutting.(As I did. Coulda studded it with garlic and baked it, but seeing the bone in my finger turned me off meat for a while. Sorry folks, a description of the taste of long pig will have to wait awhile.)The blades are attached with a small, badly designed screw which you have to tighten HARD with your fingers a few mm from the blades. Same problem when you remove a blade.And it has a ridiculously high price. You can get better mandolines right here at Amazon at a much lower price. Also MUCH better mandolins at somewhat higher prices.Take my advice: If you don't cook enough to be very handy with knivies, then a mandolin (despite "finger guards" and the like) are dangerous. The mandolin is a lovely thing for the serious cook. Slicing, julliennes, etc are a breeze. But, as with kitchen knives, dont get a piece of junk.
not worth for the money paid. This is not a non-stick. When I cook rice it sticks to vessel. becoming difficult for cleaning
Not happy with the set. The picture shown on the package is not on the sheet set. It is the picture that is on the comforter. Because it was on the package, I assumed it would be on the sheets. The picture is of figures wielding lightsabers. Only the pillow case had this.I was very dissappointed as this was a gift for a grandchild.Sandra LaPort
saintluciejudy. This item is not what I thought it would be.  It does not even hold a 1 1/2 pound loaf of bread.  It is not worth the price and I would not reccomend it to anyone
Don't bother. I echo the former review.  The filter becomes clogged almost immediately and the motor starts to overheat.  I don't know what this thing is meant to suck up, but it sure is useless on hair and small particles, dust, cat litter, sawdust, etc..  It was a waste of money and I should have returned it right away
Waste of Money!. It's a beautiful mug (we've bought 2) but it drips, doesn't keep the temperature, it's a nightmare to clean and it's not higienic - unbelievable bad product
don't bother - it won't bubble. I bought and returned 3 of these in one week. The first one never bubbled, the second one bubbled for 10 mins and the third one bubbled for 3 minutes. The valve and hose attachment is poorly designed and cracks when the bubbler is assembled. The pet store where I bought this said they are constantly returned and suggested another type of pet fountain. Save yourself the return postage and look at another brand
not a good buy. Very wobbly, and sharp edges on the edges of the shelves.  I cut myself bad enough to require stitches on the underside of the shelf.  I don't recommend
AWEFUL Product... I have a Rottie and the large 48x36 wire crate with the ABS Plastic pan.  AWEFUL, AWEFUL, AWEFUL.  The "tough, durable" plastic pan has cracked 3 times in 2 years.  The first time Midwest replaced it for free, the second time they basically said too bad and I had to buy it.  Not 6 months passed before I had to buy another.  There is no other pan that fits this size cage. I Tried to buy a metal one from JB Pet and it was lower quality than HVAC metal and came damaged 2 times from UPS.Also, I have a water bottle attached to the side which drips occasionally onto the ABS pan.  When I let my dog out...she brings black paw prints out to the white carpet.  =
Rival No Customer Service. I recieved one of these for Christmas, I would love to tell you how it works.....but it is missing a plastic piece. Now to be fair, I lost it, in the confusion of Christmas it must have gotten tossed. I called Rival to purchase a replacement piece. What a joke. I emailed....no response. I called, they don't know what I am talking about (even though it is clearly listed in the instruction manual), or if I get a rep who does know what the piece is, they say they don't have one to sell, but if I want to pay to ship the unit back and forth,they will replace it. I have left voice mail messages for non-existent supervisors. So, instead of being happy to pay for my own mistake of losing the piece, I will return this to the store as defective and get the money back. They lose a sale, the store loses a sale, they get in return an unhappy former customer and a defective unit. DO NOT BUY RIVAL PRODUCTS, we need to start showing these big companies who hide in voice mail hells that we are tired of poor, illogical treatment
half gone. I received 2 sets of these glasses for a shower gift in April.  Of the 12 larger glasses that I started with, I only have 5 left.  They look great but break very easily.  We don't use the smaller ones that often, but we have managed to break 2 of those also
Poorly designed, labor intensive product. This is a poorly desgined humidifier that has four seperate pieces, on wheels, that are held together by gravity only.  They warn you not to attempt to move it unless you remove both water tanks(so why have 4 wheels?).  I believe them because nothing is fastened and it would fall apart if bumped. They call it an 11 gallon unit, but, that means it may be able to put that much in the air in 24 hours.  They fail to tell you that you will have to refill the 2 water tanks, about five times each, to do this.  It can only be used on level floors that are water resistant, so that eliminates 95% of my house as wall to wall carpet and hardwood floors are normal in many homes.  Before you can use the unit you have to soak the filter and they suggest you do this each time you fill the water tanks.
Not a winner. This holder comes in two parts - the small one, for steak and small knives, was adequate and compact, but our drawer was a quarter inch too shallow for the two organizers to fit inside as designed.  The small one stuck up too far.Tried using the big one by itself, but it is a space hog.  It is an inefficient and wasteful way to store a modest number of knives.If I keep this item (returning it will result in shipping charges and a small refund), I'll use just the small tray and toss Moby Dick.It looked useful in the picture, but in real life, it is no match for other types of knife holders, and I shall spend the money to get a really nice wooden one instead
works ok but bad warranty. I bought this for $5 and while it did an ok job at picking up little things, it did after only a handful of uses. I was considering sending it back to get a new one, but the Euro-Pro warranty requires you to send them $8.95 to cover shipping. That's more than I paid, and frankly, more than I think it's worth. The Mini Turbo Shark is now sleeping with the fishes
Is this supposed to be a "Cooling" Fan?. I recently purchased this fan to cool my bedroom & have even the slightest noise while I sleep. Well, I guess the fact that the fan does not make a sound isn't a problem, even though that was one of the things I was looking for. The actual cooling part is horrible!!! The fastest speed on this fan is the slowest speed on all the other fans I've owned! I can barely feel it when I'm lying in bed. And the slowest speed is just a joke! I think I would get cooled off more by someone blowing on me!I would return it if I didn't have to take it all apart and fit it into the box, and pay for shipping
Neat concept; but just a heavy broom. Ended up giving it to my parents and buying the Shark. Liked the concept of the broom with a vacuum, but tends to get just a little heavier as you keep cleaning. Not such a great job cleaning around the edges of the tiles and doesn't pick up as much when on a low angle. Just not bad that's all
not for all dogs. I have a very hyper mini schnauzer and i thought that i could control her aggressive barking and yapping.  It is very out of control and this device didnt help at all. I know am purchasing a tritronic no bark shock collar.  A friend has one and recommended it to me.  They are 99 dollars but this is 25 and not worth a dime to me. The dazer does get animals attention for a while but they soon get use to it and then all you can do for it to be effective is to throw it at them.
Auto Shut Off?. I did a lot of research and chose this juicer based on reputation, motor power and style.  I exchanged the first one and am now going to have to exchange/return the second one because it automatically turns off after about 90 seconds, even if nothing is being juiced and the motor just runs!  It is not the electricity as I have used several more powerful appliances in the same outlet
What I don't know about my hot plate. 1. At least it arrived. 2. It didn't cost too much. 3. I haven'tused it, so can only give it one star.I am concerned that it apparently does not have a variable(rheostat) adjustable heat switch, going from 1-10 but maybe itdoes, as I haven't used it yet
Nice wood, awful hardware, worse instructions. First off, this is available at the Ewins site for $30, should you decide to plunge.The construction of the wooden parts is pretty nice, better than what you'd expect for $50, but that's about the only positive thing. The hardware is terrible and they only ship as many as you "need", so you're kind of SOL when the crappy aluminum cams break. I'm sure they'd send some more if I asked, but for now my piece is hanging out, half way assembled because I'm scared of breaking any more of the hardware. Either way, I think I'm going to ditch the cam/bolt paradigm and use wood glue and screws to finish it up.The instructions consist of an exploded diagram that looks like it was blown up from an image on the web. If you've never built flat pack furniture before you will not be able to figure it out. Even if you have, you will put something together incorrectly and have to disassemble the piece
Not like they used to be.... I returned the set, it was not the quality of the Revere Ware I'm accustomed to.  I have some Revere Ware that is 30+ years old and it's night and day to this new stuff.  I instead purchased a used older set at auction, which was cheaper and is heavier and much higher quality and made in the USA, not Indonesia as the new set was.  Disappointing too, that I had to pay shipping both ways, as they back-charge you the shipping for the initial "free shipping" as well as the return shipping.
Better than nothing . . . If I had to do it over again I would try a different mat (something larger made of soft foam rather than hard plastic)Pros1. reduces tracking somewhat2. more attractive than other litter mats3. doesn't take up too much spaceCons1. my cat doesn't like it--most of the time she races out of her domed box just to avoid stepping on it and ends up flinging litter and other stuff that really should stay in the box onto the carpet2. it's too smal
Don't waste your money. I bought 3 of these and I threw them all away.  Your coffee will stay hotter in a thermos than on this warmer.  I think a light bulb would do a better job!  I wrote to Mr Coffee several times and never even had the courtesy of a reply
Bad experience. I added this as a backup to an older Oster that works great, and have been very disappointed with this one.  It takes 10+ minutes to make a bad waffle.  Perhaps it isn't working properly.  Not sure
Yes, but no. The hot pot worked great--I could use it at my desk at work to heat up water for a cup of tea super-fast (under 2 minutes).  However, the heating element died after just a few months!  I am really upset--I hate heating up water in the microwave, but I love my cup of tea.  I am searching for a similar item, but one better made than the Rival hot pot
Bad warranty policy. My collar stopped working after 3 months. Innotek doesn't honor their warranty unless you buy from an authorized dealer (which doesn't include Amazon)
The above picture is not correct. Read the info about this product carefully.  This listing is not for kitchen scissors, but rather poultry shears.  Chef's choice does make the 8" kitchen scissors in the picture, but that is not what you will get if you order these.  I had these on my wishlist and my brother ordered them for me for christmas.  I am now returning the poultry shears to amazon
Don't waste your money!. I thought this little steamer would be perfect for removing wrinkles before I leave the house for work.  It worked great the first time that I used it, but that was it.  Since then it spurts water over the clothing, leaving large wet spots-what a mess!  It is also dangerous, because the steaming water spurts onto exposed skin as well.  I am careful not to fill the reservoir above the fill line.  I have gone back to using a wet towel and hairdryer to freshen clothing before I leave the house
Nothing like the picture!  Yuck. I was completely dismayed with the overall appearance of these dishes - the "fleur-de-lis" looked like a bug, and the patina was very blotchy and uneven....my husband said it looked like someone had wiped something brown and nasty on them.  Very disappointing, and expensive to ship back!  Don't use the photo as a guideline - it looks nothing like the actual product
can't afford to shop like this. Toaster was defective. Had to send it back. Cost me $20 in shipping and I have nothing to show for it
Terrible, DO NOT ignore negative reviews!. I ignored the negative reviews. What I got myself was a huge pain! This thing is a terrible vaccuum. It vaccuums dust and sand- if you go over it twice. It does NOT vaccuum Kix, Cheerios, Goldfish, dried Play-Doh, corners, under low clearance furniture, along edges of walls or cabinets... I was so disappointed. I usually use a Shop Vac with a wide brush floor attachment. I wanted something that would do 2 jobs at once and save me time. It took me twice as long to vaccuum. If an object is too large to suck up you are out of luck. Here is why...*The debris on the floor has to be able to fit in the same narrow opening that sucks up the water.*The rubber edging is set too low to the floor and pushes or flings larger objects ahead of it. If you go over it backwards you hit the first problem stated above.*The suction is not great enough to pull debris from edges and corners.In addition, the water and dry dirt end up in the same container unless you wish to clean out the container twice. The filters clog easily if you have pets. The fluid runs out quickly. The brushes are weak and ineffectual on thicker grime and spots, a hidden jelly stain or a drop of congealed juice for example. I did notice that the water method sucked up more dirt then the intended dry method. It does clean, I had dirty water as proof, but this product leaves too much behind. I was very bummed and it was a hassle to return because I live 25 miles from the store. I wish that I had accepted the negative reviews. I hope other readers will learn from me and not the hard way like I did! There really is no better way than a broom or a good cannister vaccuum to get dirt and there is a reason that the mop is still #1 after all this time!
IT SHRANK!!. The 800 count weave is wonderful. BUT - we washed it exactlyas advised in the instructions, and the thing SHRANK!!! Itfits 3 corners of the bed, but even I, a former weight lifterweighing 270 pounds, could not pull it down over the 4thcorner more than one pad's width. So, the "corner" sits ONthe top of the bed, some 6 inches into the sleeping area.I would NOT buy this item again, nor would I ever recommendit. Perhaps the shrinkage is the reason the sheets are discountedso much
Stripped screws, leg falls off. I have had this chair for 6 months now and I am dissatisfied.   The screws were stripped for the legs and after just a little use its rickety and shifts a lot.  I cannot keep one of the screws in the leg and that leg falls off shortly after the screw falls out.  This is tras
Product apparently doesn't exist. Be Aware Before you Order! On Oct. 31, 2006 I ordered two cases of bottles through Amazon, to be delivered from Stacks and Stacks. When they arrived, the cases were only 16 count instead of 48 count. I called Stacks and Stacks and a supervisor was to return my call, I received an email instead (supervisor claimed my home number was a fax). She offered to credit me shipping cost ($18.47 for the heavier weight boxes - the 16 count boxes are only 5.99 to ship)if I wanted to keep the boxes, otherwise they would arrange to pick them up. She claimed that J.K. Adams does not make a 48 ct case. I responded that I wished to return the boxes (I had less than half of the bottles I needed, and the cost per bottle was now more than doubled). I have since written two more times and as of 11/16/06 have received no response, no instructions to return, and no credit to my account. I have filed a claim with Amazon A-Z Guarantee, hopefully this will be resolved soon
It really sucks!  And not in the way it's supposed to!. Moved into a new home. Wanted a brand new vacuum for my brand new carpets, decided to try a bagless model. This thing is a total waste of money. It has barely any suction whatsoever, especially when trying to use the hose, so for now after running this thing I have resorted to getting down on my hands and knees and raking my hand in a circular motion one square foot at a time across the carpets, to pick up lint and people hairs and fuzz from a brand new carpet that this thing just couldn't suck up. It's ridiculous,it's a brand new vacuum! I have never had to do this with any other vacuum. I had my husband make sure it was working right and it is, it just has a very weak suction. This thing is going back to the store and I am getting my money back and using it to buy a better vacuum. DON"T WASTE YOUR MONEY! Also, I have always vacuumed my bare floors instead of sweeping, and this thing is supposed to work on bare floors (well, they all pretty much do that job, but for some reason this has a bare floor setting, whoop de do!)it wont even pick up a little dust on my bathroom floor, nor can it suck up a cobweb! DON'T BUY
defective product. found product to have serious flaws . however I still like the design
works well but very small capacity. I thought it would be good for heating chocolate for the Sephra fountain. It's really very small and therefore has limited usefullness
Terrible quality. This toy was destroyed by my 6 month old Shepherd pup within the 5 minutes that I turned my back on him.Caveat: This review is about the product, not the seller
Can you say Sweat shop. For the price I paid for the sheets and comfortor, I could have gotten a really nice set at the store.  The sheets are see through and rough, the blanket is nothing but a cheap piece of foam with some fabric sewn around it.  I am very very dissapointed.  The company made a big big buck off of me with this set.  never again.  They must have made a 60 dollar profit, because what they sent me looks like it only cost 5 dollars to make
Mini-Mixer vs Aerolatte... edited review - 4 Stars. I tried to change the # of stars to 4 in this edited review but couldn't.  The Mini-Mixer (MM) is cheaply made even by current Chinese standards... doesn't have a switch - you just press a plastic thingy against a metal reed to make voltage contact.   Length of MM with frother is 7.25".  Length of Aerolatte (AL) is 8.25".  Weight with batteries: MM - 94g.  AL - 102g. MM motor is as powerful as the AL.  MM shaft is thicker than AL shaft.  The AL has a little circular whisk on the bottom.  The MM has a dime-sized disc with 16 little teeth @ a 45 degree angle to the disk. Surprisingly, the MM frother disc generates less drag in liquid and spins faster than the AE.  I believe the MM actually does a BETTER job.  It frothes like hell.  I give the AL 4 stars (mostly for apparent quality/durability) and the MM 4 stars (for outstanding cheap performance)
nonstick coating peeling off. We've had our skillet a few months and now the nonstick coating is peeling off like crazy.  What a waste of money and natural resources.  It also makes me concerned about toxic substances that we might have been ingesting all this time.  Terrible product.  They really should offer a recall.  It's a good design idea.  They should offer it with a cast iron pan
I don't think I like it. Well, its uz hot to the touch and it hasn't really seemed to help my cat with her tension.  Maybe she just doesn't have a problem that Feliway can help.  Anyway, I'm not too thrilled.  Speedy delivery though
Villaware V3400. I bought this belgiam waffle maker 30 days ago.  It worked fine for 30 days and then the iron stopped heating up.  I contacted Villaware and they suggested getting Amazon.com to replace the unit which they did.  Time will tell on the replacement
Brewer Leaks. It brews good coffee, looks great.  Problem is it leaks (a lot) onto the burner and below the unit.  We have sent it back and had 2 replacements.  All three started leaking within a few weeks.  I am now looking for another make or model of coffee maker as it appears they have not been able to resolve the leakage problem with this machine
DO NOT BUY - Lifetime Warantee my... I received this set of knives for Christmas 2006 and the larger knife came defective. And since they advertise a "limited lifetime warranty" I figured I go straight to the manufacturer for a replacement. Bad idea. I contacted them in early January 2007 and no one got back to me. Then in early February I contacted them again. When I called they told me to email them describing the issue. I did and after a couple weeks and a lot of frustration I called back. This time I was told to send an email. Oh, what a surprise. I explained that I already sent an email and I was told that they were going through some changes and I was assured that someone would respond to my email this time. So I sent yet another email describing the problem. But unlike the previous emails, this one received a response. The email asked that I submit their return authorization form, which I completed and faxed back. Over two months later and I'm still wondering when this knife will be replaced.So what good is a "warranty" if you can't get in touch with the company so they can honor their warranty?
PUR WATER COOLER & FILTERS. As of 3/9/07 these new filters (w/out the life indicator) do NOT fit in the water cooler (they do fit other Pur Products).  If you call Pur (1.800.Pur.Line) and tell them your situation with the cooler, they will send you a replacement until the solution (new filter) is released since the standard ones (with the life indicator) are discontinued. They were trying to make a good percent of their coolers, dispensers, & pitchers use only one type of filter rather than have multiple filters.  There was a mistake on their part and if you call them, they are very nice and trying to fix the problem as soon as possible.
No effect on the dogs. I picked this up after reading the 50/50 reviews.  One of our dogs ran over to it and jumped up to see what it was as it buzzed away.  The other just wandered around and took no notice.  Neither seemed scared/bothered at all.  This product had zero affect on our dogs' barking.  I'm going to return it
Color is way off.... Per the photo I was expecting hunter or forrest green. The color is a pale ugly yellowish green. I haven't used them so I can't comment on use, as I plan to donate them to Goodwill. I doubt any of the colors except maybe black will be accurate
Poor engineered coffee grinder. Makes good coffee but grinder lid breaks very often and has to be replaced. Since the lid is costly to replaced we bought a separate Krups grinder. Cusinart does't answer e-mails about the problem. Look at the number of recondition makers for sale and draw your own conclusions
Pinzon Hotel Sheets. The feel of the sheet is good, but the details, such as the elastic are questionable.  Elastic on fitted sheet is loose and slips off easily
Gravel Vac  needs more power. The idea is good, but there just doesn't seem to be enough suction power...unless you want to spend 5 or 6 hours vacuuming your fish tank.I have a small 10 gallon tank.  I keep it very clean.  I use all the chemicals and additives to keep the water clear and free from odor.  I change the water every couple of months, so it shouldn't take me forever and a day to vacuum the gravel once a month...but it does
VERY SMALL IN SIZE. Although solidly made, this is a VERY SMALL whisk.  Nine inches sounds big, but this will only suffice for whisking 2-3 eggs, or for those occasions when you don't want a full sized whisk.  I was disappointed in it when it arrived.  It's not what you want if you think it's a regular sized whisk
Pourly Made. I have used this ice cream maker 4 times and on the 4th time themetal pin that turns the paddle broke. I find that the metal pin onlygoes into the plastic paddle about 3 inches.  The ice cream froze on thesides of the bucket and the plastic paddle couldn't turn the frozencream causing the paddle to crumble.  I would not recommend this to anyone as it is cheaply made
coffeemaker. The coffee is extremely hot from this coffeemaker. Beware! I find the product adequate but not outstanding. It is difficult to insert the pot all the way in after use
It drives us nuts...... We bought this LG Stainless Steel Toaster for our office, and the nightmare has started ever since. We've had them (we bought 2)for about half a year now, there are still people, including myself sometimes, standing in front of the mechanism hopelessly and trying to figure out what they are looking at and how they should use it. There is no primary visual clues that guide you through the using process ( all the buttons look exactly the same). The captions under those buttons as equally confusing. In short, you can only force yourself to get used to it, let alone taking pleasure of using the product. Personally, it doesn't matter how good it performs, because all the aggravations you get from the user interface are enough to kill a good brand like LG. My advice - think twice on this item
Won't Buy Again. This opener does not last. It cuts all the way around and fails at the end of the cut, leaving a shred of metal that must be twisted off.  This endangers the user. I have used three and all of them fail after used a while.  A new cutting wheel would solve the problem, burt where can you buy them
ULTRASONIC JEWELRY CLEANER. This product cleans no better than a cup of soapy water and a toothbrush.  In addition, the order was shipped in duplicate
Lousy froth!. My previous espresso machines were Krups and Starbucks Barista.  Having good experience with my previous Krups, I thought this machine would be as good.  NOT.  No crema.  Steam wand is weird, doesn't froth well.  The machine feels cheap.  I'm going to take it back.
Slow, messy, overpriced. I was very excited about this product when I ordered it, unfourtunatly the product didn't meet my expetations. It is extreamly slow, much slower than a George Foreman which really surprised me. Also, as another reviewer wrote it is very messy, I never appreciated the design of a foreman until I used this, the sides of the Cuisinart do not extend past the cooking surface much so they don't block any spray and when you open the griddler any condensation or food residue can slide off the back onto your counter because of where it is hinged.In conclusion get a foreman
Good, but not Great. I loved this item for the first few months and then it broke down for whatever reason.  My problem was with the company.  I spent about 6 months to a year trying to get a hold of the company for help.  I tried emails, numerous phone calls and snail mail, but I never got any response.  So I gave up and tossed it and pray that someone else (who understands what the phone is for) will make another version
unimpressed. these glasses don't have the heft or size to accomodate a serious whisky drinker.  Cute juice glasses, but not a cornerstone to your bar collectio
Great concept - Poor execution. I ordered two of them - one was broken; the other developed a hairline crack as soon as I put water in it.  I'll order another butter bell, but I guess this is a case of you get what you pay for - inexpensive, and cheaply made.  I'll keep that in mind when I order other NorPro products.
Krups could have done better. This product performs poorly. Within 1 month of receiving it, water no longer flowed through the coffee. After complaining to Krups, sending it for repairs and finally getting a replacement, I am still not very happy with it. The frothing part is unpredictable in its creation of quality foam. Krups did better with their older model of this machine
Bad product from the start. I wish I read the bad review before I bought this. I may return it, but it  took me more than an hour to peel the sticker and cut myself in the  process. I have never seen something stuck like that before. I got four  items from Amazon this time, and the fact that they keep such an item in  stock make me wonder. I haven't had enough experience with it but look like  someone else had. And it is not good. Also it is a very simple utensil and  sells for a good amount so you expect a good one. All what it takes is one  bad experience for me and I don't buy again from the same site
Don't buy it. If you're looking for a pan that will last several years, this isn't the pan for you.  If you want one that will last 1 maybe 2 years before you have to throw it away, go ahead.  The so called "thick" copper on the bottom is leaf-thin and comes off within several months.  The handle doesn't do a very good job of resisting heat and gets quite hot if cooking food in the pan for a while.  The non-stick coating starting coming off within 1-2 years of using this pan.  Not only that, the price here sucks.  They sell this pan at Walmart for about half the price it is here.  You don't have to spend multiple hundreds of dollars to get a decent frying pan, I recommend shopping around elsewhere
cheap, noisy and messy. cheap and splashes water all over the place.  noisy to
Mattress is too thin. Very disappointed in this.  The futon is too thin, and you can feel the slats right through it.
nice gimmick, but not a nice sharpener. The hype and sales pitch sounds great, but this is far from great.  I tried it out on a couple of my cheaper knifes to test it first.  I had a dull knife and brought back a decent edge, then I used the diamond fingers and ended up with a blunt edge.  Hmmmm.... lets try the honing fingers.   nothing.... I tried to hone another knife... nothing... pulled out my steel and achieved a nice sharp edge.  The Furi is junk!  A pro knife sharpening system.  I don't know on professional cook who uses this peice of crap...  don't waste your time or money
You Get What You Pay For. I opted for a less expensive heart waffle iron based on the Cuisinart name.  Yuck.  Although the redlight/greenlight is a nice feature the waffles were paper thin and quite frankly weren't worth the effort.  I had ordered one for me and one for a gift.  Phew...was I glad I tested it first and then returned the one I planned to give as a gift.  I guess I just have to spring for the big bucks if I want waffles that are easy to make.....AND taste like waffles
Defective. I received this coffeemaker for Christmas.  After two months of use, it quit working. I contacted Hamilton Beach and they sent me something to clean my coffeemaker.  It still did not work so I contacted Hamilton Beach again.  Now I have to cut off my appliance cord and send it back to them along with $6 to get a new cord.  Since it wasn't my fault, why should it cost me anything to get my coffeemaker restored.  Stay away from Hamilton Beach products
Didn't fit, low quality. Most of the time I get a good deal shopping for bargains on Amazon, but this wasn't one of those times.  The sheets were mediocre quality.  That would've been fine had they fit properly, but they were exceptionally baggy and the elastic was weak.  Waste of my money
The knife from hell. I purchased this knife and was twice sent the wrong knife.  I returned the first wrong knife and was sent a second wrong knife.  When I returned the second knife I got conflicting e-mails.  One said I would be receiving the correct knife and the second said I was being issued a refund.  I waited and received neither.  I had to call twice to finally get by money refunded.  I would have liked to receive the knife I ordered.  I think Amazon owes me the knife for all the inconvenience I was put through.  Thank you
Disappointed. I bought this knife for $35.00 at linens and things. I vacillated between this and the $80 version. I made a mistake. When the knife was finally extricated from it's mega-vinyl prison. I hefted it, felt the edge and examined construction. I got less than I paid for.  The feel and look of this knife is similar to those late night TV special knives. "But wait, there's more... Now how much would you pay?"It is just a cheap feeling product. Also, the tip of the knife had a pronounced burr on it that I had to hone off.I am too old to be re-learning that you get what you pay for.
Not Happy. This mattress is very very hard. I have tried many memory foam mattresses in the retail shops and expected something similar. It is not. I slept on it for 13 days until I gave up. They charge a 20% restocking fee and the shipping is outrageous so returning it is out of the question. It comes vacuumed packed from the factory. How are we supposed to return it when no one will ship it after it is opened?? It now lies (sleeping peacefully) in my daughter's abandoned bedroom
I was very disappointed in this product. The second time we used the meat fork, the handle snapped off
Awkward. This wok is heavy and unbalanced - it can tip while on the element.The long handle is thick and uncomfortable, and its solid weight is probably what unbalances the wok.  Lifting it up is difficult with one hand and trying to shift the food to a plate is a dangerous task.The flat bottom isn't wide enough to really be stable or to capture enough heat for the high temperature required for stir-frying.  If I wanted to saut, I'd have gotten a saut pan.The lid is also heavy and difficult to put anywhere.  You need lots of counter space.As well, this wok just isn't large enough for stir-frying for more than two people
No base and broken when delivered. I, too, received this table with no base. Not only that, there was inadequate packing materials and the table top was cracked and falling apart as a result. Why doesn't Amazon pull this? Too bad, because it would have been a nice piece if company knew how to ship properly.
Arrived damaged. Beautiful item, mine also arrived with chips on the outside rim. Beautiful set, have not received my refund yet but suspect it is a delay due to the holidays.
Two thumbs down. Please read David Maces's review. I bought mine about two years ago and just today the plastic part mentioned by Mr. Mace failed. A sturdy, sleek can opener is now going to the trash permaturely because Hamilton Beach does not provide a replacement part
Very Difficult. I bought this ready to do a lot of things with it. I haven't been able to sew one thing. You have to use it with the laptop at all times or it will complain with an annoying beep again and again. I tried to sew a light material curtain with it the needle poked at the bobbin holder and now I can never use it again. I have to get it repaired because I am unable to find a replacement part for it where I have looked. Offers a lot of options and I am sure once its repaired if ever I will eventually get to sew one thing
Worst can opener I have ever owned!!!. Bought this to replace a cheap Rivan can opener that had a broken lid-retaining magnet. Biggest mistake. It routinely drops cans - even light ones like soup and mushrooms. Difficult to attach the can to it - and even harder to clean. Aviod this model at all costs
over priced plastic leaking doesn't keep coffee hot JUNK. No stars is what this should be. Where do I start???  The machine brews the coffee everywhere but into the caraffe.  You will have coffee grinds and water all over your counter if you don't position the caraffe in the exact spot it needs to be (so forget setting the timer for the a.m. or you will be needing your mop).  The so called thermal caraffe is junk.  Plan on a refill 15 minutes after your first cup?  You'll have to nuke it as the thermal caraffe does not keep coffee warm at all.  You know those little holes that the coffee pours into during brewing...I think it lets the heat out as well.  This is the WORST coffee machine I have ever owned and it is the most expensive one I have ever owned.  I'm going back to the nine ninety nine specials.  At least they work
tropix rainbow tumblers. they are advertised to be 16oz tumblers and hold less than 12 ozs of liquid without ice so with ice they hold about 8 ozs of liquid.  Very dissappointed with my purchase
Mediocre in every way. This was a seventh anniversaty gift, and being made of copper is its only real benefit.  Two of the welded connections between the rings were broken upon receipt and it's light and relatively shabby in construction.It's difficult to find a 7th anniversary gift made of copper, and to that end, this fit the bill.  But its real value, even for the intended purpose, is very limited
insane, dope smoking engineers designed this. Had the original Toshiba until it died ; no longer is that one made. We  bought the ugly round Cuisinart, which lasted for 5 years until it just quit working. Way too expensive to pack it up for repair, so we decided to try this attractive chrome job :(it is difficult to clean, often drips and  is altogether  unreliable. Because it has a thermal carafe, I expected it to keep coffee hot for more than one hour, but no luck. So I have to force open the lid right after brewing (apparently is gets vapor lock) and transfer contents to another thermos. I am on the prowl for another grind and brew (probably a Melitta)and ran across this opportunity to review this ill designed  Cuisinart, so decided to save some other folks the grief we have had with it. Only get one if somebody promises to pay you to use it
Negative Stars Would be More Honest. I was desperate for a warm moisture humidifier and, despite the bad reviews, went ahead and bought this one.  What a mistake.  After working fine for a couple of weeks, the contacts became sensitive, and I had to play with it a bit to get it to work.  That worked fine for another couple of weeks.  Then it exploded all over my wooden floors.  I think that amazon should be held accountable for selling a product that is so obviously flawed and which they have perfectly good reason to know is flawed.  Enough people have told them that it is
I'd like to review but.... It would be nice if I could find 2.6 oz canned chafing fuel to use with item.  I'd like to test it out, but have searched high and low for the fuel!!! Can anyone help
Useless or defective. When the Zyliss arrived, I removed it from the shipping box.  I did not try to use the product until several weeks after receipt.It has a slider button which does not slide.  Perhaps that is the problem.  I have not been able to chop anything with it.  If I am using it incorrectly, I am unable to figure it out.  Unfortunately, I discarded the shipping package which I recycled as usual.  If I can obtain packaging for this disappointing tool, I will return it post-haste to Amazon.
If you want to feed your child metal, buy this one!!. I recommend not buying this product.  I used it to grind chicken, and was happy to see it working, until I noticed the chicken had a gray color to it on certain parts.  It turns out the coating of metal on the grinder was actually rubbing off and getting on both the food being grinded and the ground up chicken.  Making baby food at home is supposed to be healthy, but I beleive feeding your child metal is not considered part of their iron requirements
Dissappointed. I really wanted this set and this was the only site that I was able to find it.  My shippment was received shattered because no padding was included in the box.  I was sent two replacements after that with no padding and they were shattered also.  I have finally given up and accepted a refund
Hot- in a bad way. Wish I had read some of the reviews before I bought this-  They are right, what a piece of junk!!!!  The unit does get quite hot after very little use and blows hot air all the while.  The hose is awkward and there are no small attachments to allow you to get into small spaces.  VERY LOUD too.  Shoulder strap is useless since you have to get on your hands and knees to use the vac or the hose.  Filter is a pain to clean every time (who needs the bother and mess) and the dirt cup holds very little.  Don't waste your money
dissatisfied. I received this item - in the description is stated is was 17 inches long when in reallity it was 22 - unable to use still sitting in the box unused - tried to contact the 800 # given by the rep to return - to date no luc
Doesn't toast the tops. The toasting slots are too shallow.  When I use normal, presliced bread, the top half-inch of my toast doesn't get toasted at all.
Kaput after just 2 months. As several other reviewers said, the clock lost several minutes a week requiring that it be re-set periodically. This was tolerable since the coffee it made was decent. Then, about 2 months after I bought the unit, it stopped working altogether. The "on" light would illuminate, but nothing would happen. I only use this pot once a day, hardly heavy use, this shouldn't have happened.
save your money. Unless you look like Popeye and/or have the ability to rip phone books in half with your bare hands, you will struggle to wring this mop out. Even if you can move the wringer, the handle sections slide apart. I spent more time putting it back together and cursing than actually cleaning the floor
Shipping continues to be a problem. I adore Lenox Tuscany Classics, collect them myself and buy them as gifts for friends. I have ordered Lenox Tuscany Classics, or had them ordered for me from my wish list, on Amazon many times. In fact, I've ordered all sorts of wine glasses on Amazon and never had a problem. Last week, however, I decided to order these Grand Beaujolais glasses as a birthday gift for a friend. The glasses never reached my house because UPS reported them damaged in shipment. Amazon kindly offered to send a replacement and upgrade free to 2-day shipping. Once again, UPS reported them damaged in shipment. Amazon very kindly gave me a full refund at this point so that I could purchase the glasses locally in time for my friend's birthday.I have had a great experience, overall, ordering glassware from Amazon and will order glasses from them in the future, but there seems to be a shipping issue with these glasses in particular.
a mysteriously horrible product. It looked like it would work,It turned like a high quality itemIt won't open even 1/6 of a can as a newlypurchased item.Go cheap and shop old time stores forcan openers. This is an over-engineeredbenz-lemon of a can opener.I'm taking it back to Nob Hill tomorrowmorning
Not happy with product. We could not get the bread to rise properly no matter how much we tinkered with the ingredients.  We also tried the exact recipe that turned out beautifully in our old bread maker, but couldn't get it to work.  Must be the rising temparature is not appropriate
BEWARE. Yes watch out, pls always try to read review before buying. Its true the picture is deceiving, but what I don't understand is why Amazon keep using this picture
PASTA INSERT IMPOSTER. ITS GREAT IF YOU HAVE EVERY OTHER CALPHALON LINE ITEM.  BUT DON'T BE FOOLED WHEN THEY MENTION STAINLESS STEAL,  IT DOES NOT, AGAIN DOES NOT FIT THE TRI-PLY STAINLESS STEAL 8QT. STOCKPOT AS IT INDICATED!(...
Bodum Ceylon Ice Tea Maker w/Filter. Doesn't even come close to working with loose tea...........save your money! In short garbage at any price!!!!
Thin Sheets. You get what you pay for on these and I should have skipped it...but I've gotten some great deals on Amazon before.  However, these sheets were a wash!  I can't cry too much because they were inexpensive - but that's exactly how they feel.  Thin and cheap.  I would not recomend these sheets if you like the higher thread count, luxury feeling. Super 8 and Motel 6 have better sheets than this!  Disappointing
Tools. These are great towels if you can get them.  They are very soft and a great price but I ordered them in December and they came in one at a time. Took over 3 months to complete the order and still did not recieve the full order because after 3 months they refunded my money on one towel that was out of stock.  When I ordered them they stated that they were in stock and ready to ship.Buy these only if you have a life time to get the
Turntable did not work. The microwave was defective. Fortunately, Amazon agreed to take it back with full refund. I am definitely switching brands on my next purchase
good looks bad quality. I bought a blue one.The mug looks nice enough, but it cracked the first time I filled it with hot water for tea.Get your act together guys -- it really is not so difficult to make dishes that can withstanda little heat. As for the claim that this can go in the microwave...after the mug cracked, Ididn't bother to try
Time to Check the Warranty. The thermometer looks really good at first.  Great range for candy making (unlike one of the more inexpensive models that Amazon sells) and reasonable wire length.  For the past two months its been great.  Then it suddenly gave poor measurements (based on salt free ice water, fully equilibrated, and salt free boiling water).  It is approx 25 degrees below what it should read.  So I'm sending it back.  The unit comes with a 5 year warranty.  We'll see what type of response I get
Messy, messy, messy. I grind beans for my coffee every morning. I was using a Krups grinder and decided to switch to this quieter grinder...sold the old grinder in a garage sale. I do regret buying this grinder. It is loud and takes 30 seconds to grind instead of 10. My main complaint is that it is messy. The grounds stick to the sides and bottom and I have to smack it several times to get all the coffee out. I am tempted to purchase another Krups before I break this one by beating the grounds out of it. Also, coffee grounds are EVERYWHERE, I always have to use a cloth to clean up. Not a good buy
Same problem everyone else has with controller - piece of junk. We had the unit for two months before one of the controllers started giving an E 4 error message. Keep you documentation including receipt and warranty. West Point has a web-site designed to avoid customer interaction. The only way you will find out where to send the broken controller is on the warranty form
Very disapointed. I bought this as it was just a little bit bigger than my preent coffee maker..I could get 3 mugs of coffee out of it.., rather than 2...However, I used it exactly 5 days, and then it died...Granted, the econonical price was a factor when I purchased it, but I really expected it to last more than 5 days..Unfortunately, it would have cost me more than it was worth to have it fixed, so I was forced to throw it away...Lesson learned; some things are just not a bargain..!!
Broken upon arrival and fan broke yesterday. I bought this item no more than two months ago.  And the motor in the fan already broke.  When it arrived the plastic casing was cracked.Well done Amazon
soviet design -- bulky, heavy, and imprecisely put together. This juicer is extremely heavy, made of industrial type metal parts, but it's poorly machined and assembled.  The heavy parts don't fit together well, and the juicer is wobbly and unstable, despite it's heaviness.  I am sending this back without using it once, becuase there's no way to adjust the parts, and it's too unstable to use as is.  Also, it really is almost impossible to pick up and move, due to the weight, without straining your back.  Finally, like a reviewer of the orange-x large-size juicer, I find the industrial chemical smell of the parts unpleasant, and the enamel paint is chipped and scratched in many places.  It seem like the kind of company where to get a good product, you'd have to go to a store and look through several boxes to try to find an undamaged one
Not a Very Good Scale. I bought this scale from Target, and was disappointed with the results.  It took a long time to measure the food I placed on it, and even when I thought it was done, the measurement would jump around.  I don't think it's very accurate either.  I weighed a pre-weighted item to check the accuracy, and it was off by about 1 oz.  I returned this scale to the store, and purchased a Salter scale for the same price.
too sharp. I have been a homemaker for almost 20 years and I have a lot of experience peeling vegetables...I am fast and have rarely cut myself.  However, I bought this peeler during the holidays and a few days ago I cut myself so severly with it, I thought about going to the hospital.  This peeler seems to slide over the food quicker than others I have used and so it some how gives me an &quot;out of control&quot; feeling with each thrust.  It is also extra sharp.   I can't recomend this unless your fingers are made of stainless steel as well
cheap flatware. had to send it back.   Not hefty enough for us.   Felt like plasticwar
Don't buy this cooker. My experience is the same as the other two reviewer. This crockpot has a design flaw that the condensation leaks out. I will not leave anything cooking in this crockpot while I am away. Too dangerous
Piece of junk/ NO WARRANTY FROM MANUFACTURER. I bought this item in October 2005, by January it had developed a crack across the bottom and up the side of the pitcher. I contacted both Amazon and Emile Henry about it.  Amazon will only give a partial refund and Emile Henry told me to go through the merchant and DID NOT offer that supposed warranty on their shoddy product.  Don't buy this piece of junk
Did they listen!. Hamilton beach has ruined an expellant product the `TrueAir Cool Mist Humidifier' by making the replacement filters so badly.A big disappointment, the filter gets moldy after a month of usage making the operation very expensive.I hope they come up with a better solution.I dont know what happend but the the latest filter has last all winter and still looks new.
100% Failure. I purchased two of this item, for a total of four space-bags. I used them according to the instructions, putting less into them than the commercials indicate. Within days, all four had leaked - not one kept the air out.
Borderline dangerous. I have four 16-piece sets that I received for my wedding.  They are beautiful plates, but they have a tendency to split in half with normal use - like heating food up in the microwave, going through the dishwasher or serving hot food.Within 3 months, several plates cracked down the middle, making them unusable.  A large serving bowl also split in half when hot food was added.  I did a search on www.epinions.com and found I wasn't the only person having these problems.  EVERYONE is having these problems.Plus, it is impossible to find individual replacement pieces.  You have to buy another set.  What a racket.  The clincher is that they are located in Indonesia, so customer service and responsiveness is nonexistent.  I've gotten nothing but the international run-around
if you'd like a hot water sprinkler... this crock pot has 3 settings: warm, scalding and blast furnace. warm cooks nothing, scalding evaporates liquids and drys food in less than 2 hrs, and blast furnace should be used in place of kiln. The worst feature / drawback of this not-so-fine unit is the hot water spitting that occurs after 2 or so hours that leaves your countertops wet and messy. I returned this and bought a Rival. Far better - no comparison
NOOOO!  Don't Waste your $. I was wanting something to make cleaning the kitchen floor a bit easier.  This "broom" needs to be held at a particular angle for it even to suction anything.  Very frustrating...must be why it is on sale!!!!!
The honeymoon is over!. After burning through several "cheap" vacuums, I bought this product with confidence after my trepidation was eased by the great reviews.  I bought this 10 months ago and now it is dead.  I live in a house with wood floors and only used this to clean 4 of the rooms that had rugs.  The suction was initially great and at first use I thought it was broken until I discovered that the trap was full (duh).  That had me sold but after the last time I cleaned it out, it just died.  I'm no dummy with fixing things but that is why I bought a "good" vacuum.  Well, $200 in the trash
Not powerful enough and too tall!. This blender comes with the battery unit that sits on top of the removable motor which sits on top of the blender shaft. This makes the unit entirely too tall to apply the proper pressure and very uncomfortable to maneuver while on the stove or counter. I tried using it for whipping up some potatoes and the power proved too weak to do an adequate job. Sorry Cuisinart. This is quite a disappointing product
Horrible product!! Stinks! More work than traditional litter boxes. This is a very poor product. What you are buying is a cardboard box that holds the disposable litter tray cartridge that you must buy for the "Automated System" to work.  Urine will soak through the bottom of the cardboard tray within 2 days and I have 1 cat! The company wants you to stir the litter around every day so the cat urine will soak up in the crystals. I bought this "Automated System" so I didnt have to tend to a litter box every day. I tried stiring the litter every day and urine still soaked through the bottom of the cardboard litter tray.  How pathetic! Maybe the system might be a little better if the trays were made out of plastic rather than cardboard??  Avoid this system all together
Misleading?. These sheets were quite thin, and like the label said, needed "touch-up ironing" -- on every square inch.  I won't accept the excuse that "you get what you pay for."  I didn't intend to buy $13 sheets.  These were sold as $40 sheets marked down to $12.99, but I can't imagine anyone paying $40 for them.  This is not what I expect from Amazon
I hate it!. It's a piece junk.  The color rubs off and stained my sofa and all over the clothes that I was wearing.  The size was too small.  No washing instruction label included. The frabic was rough and discomfor.  This item should never puts out in the market.
looses suction, terrible on stairs, difficulty w/tools. I used this about 6 times.  the first time i could barely push and pull it bcs the suction was so strong.  It became a lot easier as time went on bcs the vac does loose suction.  I'm used to Canisters and will never get an upright again.  trying to vac stairs and get the wand thingy out is very difficult. I don't think this Vac is user friendly and its definetly not worth the price.  i returned it to target
Danby dissapointment. The first dishwasher that I received from Etronics was dented, dirty and looked as though it had been used.  I complained, they picked it up, and one month later I got the replacement.  It wasn't in much better shape, but I kept it anyway because I was tired of waiting. The dishwasher cycle takes about 90 minutes, and although it cleans well, the adapter to hook it up is cheaply made, and it leaks even with teflon tape.  I would not make this purchase again
Not for daily use. I bought a set of these glasses.  I was happy with the thick bottoms and thought they would be good sturdy glasses.  They did not last a year.  The bottoms never broke, but they all cracked along the top. I would not recommend these if you have children or teens that aren't careful with placing the glasses in the sink or dishwasher.
A bit disapointing. In viewing the product, I thought the warmer also came with the cup... as most coffee warmers do.  The cup was actually the selling point; so, I what I thought I ordered was different than the actual which was only warmer itself.  It's a shame, the cup displayed is beautiful.  Oh well, live and learn
Nice Name Poor Performance. I recently purchased the NEW Waring juice simply because I knew the name and quality of products they typically produce.This juicer does have a larger feed chute which makes juicing easier but there are these three metal bars inside to prevent people from sticking their hand in machine. These bars obviously are there for safety but caused my food push to get stuck in the machine while juicing spinach and created a suction action. I had to wiggle and use EXTREME force to extract the food push from the machine.I also tried to juice pineapple and green apples, two of my favorites but the machine over heated. I had to follow the instructions in the manual that covered overheating throughly, now I know why they devoted so much time to overheating as this happened twice with me. I could only proceed after unplugging the machine and waiting 5 minutes with no luck, and then after ten minutes I was ready to go again.Also noticed that the pulp container had large pieces of apple skin about the size of a fifty cent piece that was not juiced.  The food chute is justified to one side and also caused all the residue in the filter to collect on one side, so the longer I juiced the less juice it yeilded.The machine had two speeds, at last but never stated how many rotations per minute occured while on high or low.Overall disappointing
My Real Rating is 0 Stars. If you want to waste your money on a useless product, then buy shedender. The people that give it a decent review on this site do so because it removes a lot of hair (specifically undercoat). However, my guess is that you are considering this product because you want less shedding. The rub is that the undercoat doesn't shed (not that much anyway) the top coat does. So all your doing with shedender is removing the undercoat that isn't the root of your shedding problem in the first place, and is needed for protection from the cold should you have a pet that goes outside.As I said, this product does remove a lot of hair. However, after a full session with the shedender, I went back to my regular wire brush and brushed out just as much hair as I usually do. The next day, I wired out just as much as I would have if I didn't use shedender. The bottom line, your pets shed from their top coat, not the bottom coat; so you're wasting your time and money with this product
lack of instructions. I found it very awkward trying to stabilize the pump with one hand, and pull the pump up  and down to get the air out.Also I can not get the top out of the decanter. It seems stuck there.As a result, I can not say if it does what you claim
Underpowered, leaves sharp edge on can, slow. I was expecting a device that cut the roll-seam of the lid, but this one cuts the can just below the lid.  The resulting edge, while not razor sharp, is hazardous--in point of fact, the instructions warn, "Note: The cut edge of the can may be sharp and shoud be treated with care." contradicting the prominent "NO SHARP EDGES" claim on the packaging.On a typical can, the opener struggles to complete its task, coming to a near stop at times.  Of course this near stalling takes its toll on the battery life.  It has a fixed run cycle that will run around a typical  303 can about 1-1/2 times.  For large cans you just push the button to restart it for more than one cycle until it makes it all the way around.When the batteries give out and it comes to a stop in the middle of opening a can, there is a tiny reverse button on the underside that is used to reverse its motion until you get back to the starting poin where it will release he can. There is usually enough power left in drained batteries to backup to the release point, but if the reverse button doesn't work because the batteries are completely dead or the opener is jammed, you must use a screwdrive to turn a release screw on the bottom until the opener backs up far enough to release the can--this manual release operation is challenging (and generally messy) to perform .The cutter--a sharp edged wheel--is not removable for cleaning, so you are left to dabbing at it with a sponge or cloth (after removing the batteries).I recommend passing up this gadget
SMALL. Purchased this box from my daughters Amazon Wish List, so I have no one but myself to blame. It is so small that not much salt can be stored.  She was happy with receiving this item but would not buy again
Not for Senseo!!!!!!!!! Only for Black & Decker GT300. Replaces the Black & Decker GT300 HomeCafe coffeemaker's pod holder ONLY!
Unuseable and unreplaceable. Received this as a gift a year ago.  Pulled it out of the box set it up with a stew and when I got home...  Well, the stew was all over the cabinet.  Upon  further review, I found two hair like cracks in the pot itself.  Was unable to get it warenteed and couldn't even find a replacement crock.  Have been a crock pot user for decades,but won't buy one of these
The worst customer service and shipping ever. I ordered this item on 9/26/06 because I was gone over a weekend and somehow my roomates managed to gunk up my tank royally. I went to Petsmart in person and they didn't have these filters that I need. So I ordered these. I ended up not getting them until the middle of November. that's over a month!!!! I called customer service for Petsmart and the only thing they told me was they would cancel the order and I could go get them from the store. Basic they did absolutly nothing. I would not recommend ordering from Petsmart unless you don't need what you're ordering for a couple of months.
disappointment. The only good thing which occurred when I bought this item from Amazon was it arrived with in two days.  I was quite disappointed when I opened the package only to find it was a typical pop-up hamper I could have bought anywhere in a store thus in the long run I ended up paying more for it.  I wanted to buy a pop-up hamper with a lid that you can zip it to stay closed.  This hamper lacks a lid so I reccomend if you're looking for the same thing not to buy it.  If I had known it lacked a lid I would not have purchased the hamper.  It's partially my own fault for not doing enough research about the product.  I gave it two stars because it's still functional and sturdy
Run of the mill Colander. It was ok, but not grate. I found a better one on E bay and threw this one in the trash. It colandered the food ok, but did nothing to add excitement to my life. The antique one I found on E bay simply turned my life around in the kitchen. Now I'm cooking like a dream and gaining lots of weight. On the serious side, it was a little small and awfully shiny. It was a little deep compared to the width. It drained the spaghetti ok and I used it for vegetables.
Near worthless for candy. This thermometer gives completely inaccurate readings unless you have at least the first 1.5 inches in the food.  If any part of that sensor area is exposed to air, the reading will be way low.So, if you're using it for something like peanut brittle or fudge, chances are, your boiling liquids won't be deep enough to get accurate readings.However, it's a fairly sturdy device and reads very quickly so would probably be great for deep fat frying and meats
Skin is still dry. I moved out to LA from NY and there is considerable less amount of humidity in LA.My skin was drying up. So I asked and was recommended this humidifier.Unfortunately it did nothing to alleviate my dry skin. I blasted it on high and still nothing.The filter seems to run out pretty quickly. The product seems very fragile. The material is cheap and the water tank doesn't fit properly into the product, so that moving it even it a little causes water to leak.The plus side was that it was easy to assemble and it was cheap
Beautiful and broke. I can't believe the way Amazon packed these dishes. They were thrown in a box with virtually no padding. So of course several of the plates were cracked. They are cute. I have asked them to send me another set and hopefully they will ship them better.One thing I did notice -- the description says dishwasher/microwave safe but the dishes don't have that stamped on the bottom. I am also hoping they abide by our laws regarding lead free but you never know now a days what comes from china.
Not worth the money I paid!. Baring the Calphalon name I was expecting something really nice, especially for the price I paid through Amazon of $84.95 - boy was I disappointed. Although Amazon is selling it as high-quality piece the Calphalon Contemporary Stainless 1-1/2-Quart Saucepan with Glass Lid is clearly on the cheaper side of the Calphalon brand. It looks like one of the pans Calphalon gives away to get you to purchase their higher end cookware. The item arrived nicely boxed in the Calphalon box but when I opened the box the pan looked like it had originally been a Return item before it was sent to me - The pot and lid were both in orginal packaging but the lid was clearly broken. It looked like someone had taken a hammer to it and stuck it back in the box and sent it on to me. Amazon has agreed to send a replacement at no charge but I can't believe they would have sent something like this to me to begin with without first inspecting what they send out. Unless it's being given to you as a "freebie" I suggest you save your money.
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
You are buying rubbing alcohol!. Look up the ingredients yourself.  I foolishly bought this for my bikini line, because what good is hair removal if it is replaced by bumps?  But, after I got it and used it (it did work a little) I noticed that it is mostly alcohol, a little aspirin, another ingredient common in any moisturizer and then Propylene Glycol...which is the main ingredient in antifreeze.  Save yourself some money and go buy a 50 cent bottle of rubbing alcohol....I did, and it works just as well
Find a metal pan on eBay. Go to eBay. There is one seller whose ebay ID is valuecrate. They sell metal pans that are durable and tough
bad description. This is falsely advertised. These are cereal bowls. I had them replace and they sent cereal bowls again. DO NOT BUY!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Nice cooking, terrible nonstick surface. I've had my electric skillet for approximately 2 years. I love the way that it cooks and has easy cleanup. I had only used it a maximum of 7 times when I noticed that there was a spot that seemed to be stuck on the surface of the pan. I looked more closely and discovered that there was about a 2" square area where the nonstick coating had just rubbed off. I have always been very careful with the way I handle this skillet (no metal utensils, hand wash, no excessive heat.)I bought it at a really good sale price, but I think that I should have been able to get more than 7 uses before it destroyed the cooking surface
Poor exterior finish. Even though I am very careful with how I use and store my pots and pans the exterior of this set scratches very easity due to normal use. I store my set in a deep drawer in my new kitchen and removing and replacing these causes the scratches. I am very disappointed in the poor exterior finish and how badly this set looks. I would not buy this set again. I sent a pot back to Meyer for their inspection and am waiting to hear from them. I will probably replace this  set very soon, but not with another Anolon product
Norpro Chicken Timer. This timer arrived in two pieces  -  top half and bottom half.  They could be reconnected, but would never stay connected.  This is a piece of junk that I have thrown away.  Made in China
Underpowered, leaves sharp edge on can, slow. I was expecting a device that cut the roll-seam of the lid, but this one cuts the can just below the lid.  The resulting edge, while not razor sharp, is hazardous--in point of fact, the instructions warn, "Note: The cut edge of the can may be sharp and shoud be treated with care." contradicting the prominent "NO SHARP EDGES" claim on the packaging.On a typical can, the opener struggles to complete its task, coming to a near stop at times.  Of course this near stalling takes its toll on the battery life.  It has a fixed run cycle that will run around a typical  303 can about 1-1/2 times.  For large cans you just push the button to restart it for more than one cycle until it makes it all the way around.When the batteries give out and it comes to a stop in the middle of opening a can, there is a tiny reverse button on the underside that is used to reverse its motion until you get back to the starting poin where it will release he can. There is usually enough power left in drained batteries to backup to the release point, but if the reverse button doesn't work because the batteries are completely dead or the opener is jammed, you must use a screwdrive to turn a release screw on the bottom until the opener backs up far enough to release the can--this manual release operation is challenging (and generally messy) to perform .The cutter--a sharp edged wheel--is not removable for cleaning, so you are left to dabbing at it with a sponge or cloth (after removing the batteries).I recommend passing up this gadget
Wrong Bowls sent and returned twice/Billing a BIG question. I never received the large bowls. The small cereal bowls were sent twice (quickly but wrong size both times) and I returned both orders. I was sent an e-mail stating something significant was wrong with the system and I would not be receiving the larger bowls. Then I got an e-mail saying I was being billed for them to which I replied what I received was NOT what I ordered and had been returned twice. I have all the paperwork on both orders. The plates I ordered were never received at all. I have NO idea what is going on now. It makes sense that I be allowed to talk to a person at this point but that isn't happening eithe
Not to be confused with quality copper. These canisters are sort of decent, I suppose, just not anywhere near the quality I was looking for. If you've invested in quality copper cookware like Mauviel or Falk, don't even think of buying these to match. The laquer coating on mine started to show signs of wear by the second month, and the bottoms had started to rust from the occasional wet countertop. The biggest one doesn't even hold a 5lb bag of flour, so nearly worthless, in my opinion. I wish I'd saved my money. Even at $29, they are about $20 overpriced
Rip -off. Considering buying this vacuum?  Then just throw the money out the window.  I was so disapointed by this vacuum.  It does not pick up pet hair, it doesn't even pick up lint.  It's very good at  picking up dust, but, that's all.  It also if FABULOUS at getting over-heated very fast.  If you are looking for a great waste of money, and a fabulous workout from all the back and forth motion of desperately trying to get this to pick ANYTHING up off of a rug, this is the machine for you.  If you're looking for a reliable light-weight vacuum -- look else where
Not as easy to use as I thought. The sliding measuring spoons were very difficult to slide even for someone not having arthritis making this item not very user friendly. The big measurer did not easily expunge the food I was measuring and with having to grease the plunger to make it move easily added to prep and clean-up time. Liquids tended to leak. I think I am better off with a regular set of measuring cups and spoons
Would Never Order Anything Like This Again. I thought the dishes were beautiful when I saw them on line.  However, when I received them at home they were VERY POORLY packed and were broken!!!  I am handicapped and it is hard for me to get around.  Then, I had to lug this big package to a post office to return them!  NEVER ORDER ANYTHING THAT IS BREAKABLE!!
Pizza didnt cook well. OK Im not a great pizza maker. I donot know what went wrong, but my top portion of the pizza browned but botton crust was not cooked properly. I cooked it in a pan on stove, after taking it out from the oven
Worst set. Worst set of sheets I've ever owned.  Washed them, and put them on the bed directly out of the drier:  The fitted sheet ripped at two different corners
Nice at first... Bought the non-chrome version of this about 1 year ago.  Worked great.  After about 2 months of use, the innards fell apart.  No big deal, just tighten the screw again.  However, the metal blades are now rusting, the steel post is now rusting, and the outer spacer is now rusting.  Stainless steel is not that much more expensive than chromed steel
Martex Vellux Blanket. It looked okay when I opened it.  Then I washed it before using and my washer and dryer were full of "cranberry" colored lint (wet in the washer and dry in the dryer).  The next time I washed it was better but, still some lint in the washer and normal in the dryer.  It is not warm enough alone.  It might be okay in the warmer months but, not what I expected for winter
Don't Bother. I have hardwood floors and area rugs (no carpet). Although this vacuum sucks up enough for me to empty the container, I still run over and over the same areas and particles of dirt and I  move the debirs around. Sometimes it will seem to spit dirt back on the floor. It does not clean up outdoor dirt, potting soil, cat litter, or even small food particles off the kitchen floor. A broom works better than this vaccuum cleaner, although it says you can use it on floors. I have allergies and this also gets those going. As I said earlier- don't even bother
Will not keep an edge. We finally broke down and went looking for a complete set of quality kitchen knives. The name Wushof came up several times and we purchased a set of them.They work well until they started getting dull sooner then I thought they would . I have numerous sharpening stone ,(ceramic, diamond)and buffing wheels, and sharpened them myself to a razors edge.Again they worked well, but soon became very dull. We were very careful in the storing and handling of them which made no differance.They are well balanced , looked well made but are over rated and priced.The 2 Mac Japanese knives we have stay sharper longer, take abuse better and sharpen easier.
Didn't work. Tried attaching this to my tile sink splashboard... never would hold. Tried reattaching several times and would consistently fall off
It just doesn't work. My wife and I are tired of cleaning up after our 4 cats. Though the Catgenies are terribly expensive to purchase and to keep stocked with Sanisolution and granules, it would be worth it for more free time and a cleaner basement. Unfortunately, they just don't work.Becuase we have 4 cats we bought 2 Catgenies. Even with 2 of them it was more than the machines can handle. Even when we ran them right after the cats made their deposit the impeller was never able to grind up the turds properly. They clogged everytime and beeped incessantly.Another problem is the scoop. Even though it scoops 3 times for every cycle, it always left turds behind. Those turds would then go through the whole cyle, which includes drying. That means that, even if they're scooped up the next time it cycles, they're going to be so dry and hard they'll never be ground up properly. Again, this results in clogs.We had them for a little over 2 weeks. In that time we had to run extra cyles, backflush and even take them apart and clean them.This product results in far more work, not less
Not the most efficient gadget. Positives are that it is a sturdy, heavy, good-looking, loud and easy to read timer. However, while it's easy enough to set, it takes sooo long to set it compared to cheaper, lower quality timers. You have to turn the dial or press either button, wait for the numbers to show, wait for the hours to blink, turn the wheel to the desired hours, wait for the minutes to blink and then turn the wheel to the desired minutes. Doesn't sound so bad but it takes a couple of seconds between each step before the numbers start blinking. As others reviewers stated, Kitchen Aid can do better
Accident waiting to happen. This product seemed like a good idea.  I mix my own cereal, and add lots of nuts and seeds.  So it is a lot heavier than the fruit loops that are always shown in the pictures.  The way that the holder fits into the base is not at all secure, and when full of heavy cereal, disaster is assured.  Also, neither the top or the bottom cover is a really secure seal, so tipping the holder caused the top to fly off for me, and some interesting times for my dogs cleaning up the floor.  I had a hard time taking the bottom seal off when my cereal bowl was in position. If you take it off first, then some cereal leaks out, causing the problem I was trying to solve - namely no cereal laying around my counter inviting unwelcome guests.I tried this product for awhile, but threw it in the trash pretty fast.  Went back to a big tupperware container  Not as convenient as this could have been, but no awful spills either
Delonghi  Cafe Nabucco-  the leaking coffee maker. I bought this coffee maker about 2 years ago. Used 2 x daily and cleaned every month with either vinegar or special cleaner. Unfortunately it began leaking water from outside top of machine. Very poor quality machine .I just threw mine out in the trash bin. Just got tired of constantly having to mop up after it. Don't buy this coffeemaker- a waste of good money( I paid $99.99)
Inferior Quality and Sitram Poor Customer Service. After 6 months of use, the handle holder on the lid came off due to fatigue at welding joints. Since the other pieces also uses spot welding at the handle, I'm fearful for my safety and contacted Sitram Customer Support. This is their response"While we have the ability to authorize replacement for the defective products that have handles coming off, we are unable to satisfy a request to credit other product that has not shown signs of being defective"In otherwords, they're not surprised the product is defective and I'm not the only one complaining. If I'm stupid enough to buy a whole set, then I'll have to return each item as it falls apart. Too bad if the defective will maim me in the process.Stay away from this defective and inferior product if you value your health and safety.BTW, I contacted Amazon Customer Service and they agreed to accept the return. Love Amazon.
Okay but there are better options. I've had this pasta maker for 9 months and used it regularly over that period. Overall, it does what it is supposed to do. However, there are two major problems. First, two parts broke for seemingly no reason other than poor design and quality. The mixing bowl cracked on my first use and it took at least four months to get a replacement from DeLonghi. Recently the housing for the extruder shattered. I also lost one small part and had to wait months for a replacement part from DeLonghi. Overall it seems like there are too many parts, making it overcomplicated to clean and assemble, and the parts are of poor quality. The second major problem is that, the way dough is extruded through the circular feeding tube, the pasta easily falls together and sticks. You can work hard to keep the individual strands of pasta floured and separated---but isn't this supposed to be a machine that makes thing easier? Since buying this machine, I have also purchased the Kitchenaid stand mixer with the pasta roller and cutter attachments and feel this is just infinitely easier to use and produces much nicer pasta, particularly for flat pasta shapes such as fettuccine and spaghetti. I also ordered the ravioli shape for the DeLonghi and it produced sheets that were simply too small to work with. The Kitchenaid makes nice, wide sheets and you can adjust the dough thickness to meet your needs. Note that the extrusion machines (and also the extrusion attachment for the Kitchenaid) are your only options if you want to make shapes like macaroni.
Go with a different brand!. No lid!!!  Rather spend the money on a brand that thinks before selling 1/2 of a replacement piece
Update - Okay, finally can get the handle out!. This tool works well, but one must remove the handle before putting it in the dishwasher.  When first obtained, could not get the wooden handle out of the spoon.  Now that I have had it a while, it can be removed, but it still troubles me that the handle, which does get exposed to food when using, can't be sanitized in the dishwasher.  There are other silicone spatula/spoons that have dishwasher-safe handles and I'd recommend those instead
Didn't last long. I bought this item a few years ago and then it just stopped working.  First it wouldn't shut off, then it stopped all together.  I would not recommend this item
SCAM SCAM SCAM. What a piece of junk.  I bought this machine finally today as it was the only one available in any store near me and I didn't want to go with the $250 Fantom one advertised on HSN or QVC so I thought I would try a cheaper one ($100 is not cheap) to see if these products work.Well I agree with anyone else who says it doesn't work.  I have used it all this afternoon and get about 10 minutes worth of cleaning done with each load of water.  My oven looks still horrible as it didn't even attempt to touch anything caked on.It ripped all the paint off the top of my stove (and I have found out that is about $450 to replace the top of my stove to have it looking nice again, thanks Europro).The only thing it did help with was my gaskets around the fridge.  They were black and really disgussting because nothing not even a toothbrush could get in there and they are somewhat clean but while cleaning it sprays filth absolutely everywhere so you end up doing more than double the work to get it looking somewhat clean but the filth it sprays all over your walls is not easy to steam off and I ended up having to use Fantastic to get it off the walls.I am going to take this back to the store tomorrow and get the $250 one as all the reviews I have read for the Fantom is great.Sorry Europro but your products do not seem to last more than a couple of days.  I also bought the Shark cordless vaccum and although it was great in the beginning it broke after a few uses.Anyone who says this product actually works must have a spotlessly clean appliance to begin with as it doesn't even come close to what they advertise on tv.I will never be scammed again
SOOOO FRUSTRATED. Listen, I have bought several of these book lights, every time they break. It is not the bulb, or the plug or the batteries, it is the wiring. Don't bother. I am currently on search and destroy for a new book light that will last longer then 5 days and wont hurt my eyes. Any suggestions
Not what I expected. Given its price, I purchased this laundry hamper NOT expecting a top of the line solution to my laundry needs but this hamper didn't even meet my lower expectations.  The materials are cheap and flimsy, and under any kind of strain, the screws have a tendency to come loose and it jerks front and back when you pull it across the shortest of carpet.  If you are going to use it for laundry, look for something else more durable.  It might work for non-laundry functions (i.e. recycling)
Only for Small Books!!. After reading the one review on this site I ordered the bookmateand eagerly awaited it as I was using a Fellowes plastic bookstand for my softcover textbooks.  When it arrived I was sorely disappointed.  The back support for the book measures only about 7"x7" and the depth measurement for the book is 1".Any substantial softcover textbook whose frame is larger than 7"x7" is going to have its pages flop over backward because the stand isn't big enough.  In addition, because the depth is only 1", forget any book with say over 500 pages.  At least the Fellowes stand has a back support of 12" x 9", its deficiency is its page holding arms.  I can't see how anyone using a an average sized cookbook, as perhaps this amazon category is targeted, could use this bookmate usefully
looks and feels good but to thin. This is a nice looking comforter, however, it lacks in the filling. The comforter is thin in most areas so it is not as warm as it could have been.To bad they skimped on the filling
Clean immediately after use or experience mold. I got one of these attractive looking boards and treated it with a beewax-based wood maintenance product. The board sucked up very little wax compared to my other boards.After a good meal with friends I was prevented from doing the dishes right away and the board ended sitting for two days before cleaning. By this time it had collected mold that is situated deep into the surface of the board and which I regard impossible to remove. I haven't and didn't experience this with any other board. The board looks good (without mold) and is very resistant to cutting marks, but if you decide to get one you should probably make sure to clean it right away after any use. I do not know if this is a general characteristic of bamboo or a quality of this particular board. I would have appreciated a word of warning or a useful guide as to how the board needs to be treated differently from boards made of wood.For my next board I will probably try to find an end-grain board made of American maple. American maple is significantly harder than European maple.--Tor
Un-Du Adhesive Remover. I was very unhappy with how the product worked.  It squirted all over.  It only made the adhesive gummy.  And you could smell the petroleum.  Our waste disposal company would not even take it and I had to take it to a landfill site for them to dispose of it
Noise, low pressure, grounds in my coffee.... I was very excited when my F7 arrived.  Out of the box it looked good.  After that, it was all downhill.  The first problem was with the pressure.  It dripped liquid into the cup - that was the rinse cycle.  The coffee cycle was worse - nothing but slow drips with a rare drizzle.  The second problem I had was with all those coffee grounds in the coffee.  Of all the coffees I have had (and believe me that was a lot), I have never seen so many grounds in coffee.  I ran the rinse cycle several more times trying to get the pressure to work.  Nothing improved.  I ran a whole container of water through it with the same results every time.  I went on line to find answers - Capresso's web site was zero help (and they really do need to answer their Emails.  Good luck to you if you need to contact them).  The third problem I had was the noise.  WOW!  Is that a lumber mill inside the machine?!  Are they putting out a fire in there after the coffee finishes its dripping?The bottom line is this - for $1300.00, there had better be rockets shooting that coffee out.  It should be at least what they claim - same as a professional brew house espresso maker (or 18 bars).  This machine is clearly not.  The coffee grounds need to be reduced (a lot - my French press has fewer).  Finally, the noise has to be less than my $15 grinder.  I am not impressed at all.  My $150.00 espresso maker put this one to shame.  Too bad, the idea was a good but the F7 needs a lot of work.  My F7 is on its way back.
Get Stoned. Do not be tricked into buying an "easy" sharpener. They DO NOT work. Spend the same money (or less!) on a good stone set that has various angles (i.e. Lansky, w/ 17, 20, 25, and 30 degree angles, and 3-5 stones: use 20 degrees for your "slicing" and paring knives, and 25 degrees for you chefs). I opted for the stone set (I'm a bit of a purist), but I've heard good remarks about the diamond set, too; the 3 grit set is all you really need: coarse, medium, and fine - get the ultra fine if your sharpening razors and such.With proper care, and light steel use (it's the re-aligning tool, not the sharpening device - be gentle), you'll probably only need to touch-up your edge once every year or two, depending on the work load you put on your knife. But, if you do seriously muck the edge up, you'll have a system that can repair your knife to "good as new" condition.My chef fell onto the tile floor, point first, and I had a wonderfully sharpened instrument 30 minutes later. The normal touch-up takes less than 5 minutes per blade.And, at thirty dollars to have 5 knives professionally sharpened, you'll be ahead of the game after the first use!Hint: use a 5X+ magnifying glass/loupe to inspect your edge - by carefully rolling the knife to catch a bright light source, you'll be able to see shiny spots where the edge still needs to be sharpened. You can also take a look at your edge before using the steel, and see how bad you roll the edge while working with it, then see how it becomes magically aligned after the use of the steel. And, see chips and voids in your lower quality steel knives - I admit I have a couple, myself.In short: get stoned, not taken
wildly broken in delivery. Usually break free product but SMASHED in Amazon delivery and then had to wait 4 weeks for credit.BOO
Ravioli cutter that I never received. Thanks for reminding me!  I never received the ravioli cutter.  I had to purchase another one elsewhere.   Sorry I didn't let you know sooner.Mandy YeggyDinners D'finedPO Box 246Riverside, Iowa52327
bad buy. after one use the non stick teflon started to peel off in big pieces   an absolute waste of mone
its sucks. got it to work once    but can't now   dont buy it!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I wouldn't trust it. I'm glad that everyone else has had a good experience with this, but mine was horrible. This cart collapsed not once, but twice for me. The first time someone was there to catch it but the second time we were not so lucky and it crashed to the floor breaking dished and our microwave. Not worth the chance if you ask me
Best looking way to make a terrible cappuccino. I'm Italian (born and raised there) and I grew up on cappuccinos.  This is in absolute the most gorgeous way to make a terrible cappuccino. I have constant better result with the cheapest model made by Krupps.Pros:Beautiful to look atEspresso is goodCons:- It takes 15'-30' (minutes, not second!, and this is according to the manufacturer) to warm the machine up- The cappuccino is always watery- You need a stop watch to time exactly how much water you want in your espresso.  You get distracted, and suddenly your espresso looks like any 'American' style coffe
Stay away from this Coffemaker. I bought this coffeemaker as replacement for my Starbucks model that I accidentaly damaged. Unit stop working after a month. Quality and taste of coffee could not compare with my Starbucks machine which unfortunately is discontinued (I am not sure who built coffe maker for them, now they sell Kitchen Aid and Delonghi) I took my coffeemaker to local authorized repair shop. They told me that this is nonrepairable model and that I will receive replacement in 4 weeks, I even had to pay $12.50 for shipping. Its been more than 8 weeks, deLonghi customer service will not deal with customer and repair shop told me they are out of stock and there is nothing thay can do about it. Most of electronics stores have 30 days return/exchange policy and if your unit fail within this period, return it and buy something else. I did not do my homework since I did not consider coffemaker purchase to be major one but after reading horrible reviews about this product I would like to warn future customer of making same mistake
BEWARE! YOU WON'T GET WHAT YOU SEE!. I made the mistake of buying this, but what i got was not what is pictured. The filters that came did not have the little red indicator that goes around and shows you when the filter has reached the end of its life.I sent it back, and the merchant returned my money but it was still a big hassle.Again, PLEASE learn from my mistake. Don't buy this product because you won't get what is pictured.P.S. I have done some checking and from what i can tell, PUR has discontinued this particular filter. The new one no longer has the life indicator. If so, this is the most stupid thing they could have done
Big Mess. My credit card was charged $97.89 on Feb 3.  No book ever arrived.  I can't believe that the correct price is that high for one single book.Please advise
lapinator comfortable but hot!. I own a Lapworks laptop desk, which I loved until the little rubber bumbers lost their stickiness and my laptop started sliding. After a false start with antother type of laptop desk, I ordered a Lapinator. Fantastic customer service, lightning fast shipping, and I thought I was in love. The Lapinator is light-weight and comfortable, even though it's tilt angle is not adjustable. I ordered extra rubber bumpers and installed 5 rubber bumpers on the Lapinator just to make sure there was enough ventialtion. I was using a Sony S260 and just bought an SZ360. I placed the S260 on my old Lapworks laptop desk and had the SZ360 on the Lapinator while transferring files. At first I was shocked at how much hotter the SZ360's palmrest and mousepad were as compared with the S260, but then realized the problem was the Lapinator. Now that I have the SZ360 on the Lapworks laptop desk, it's much cooler! I  mean MUCH cooler. So I'm back to figuring out how to keep the laptop from sliding on my old Lapworks laptop desk or just biting the bullet and buying a new one. Sorry Lapinator, you need to change the design, punch some holes in it or install some fins or something. Sure it keeps my lap cool but it causes my laptop to heat up way too much.
Sometimes the Ordinary is Better. In use, the cutting blade is hidden from view, so you can't see what you're cutting. A minor inconvenience. One of the 2 tiny screws that holds the blade escaped and disappeared about the fifth time I used it. You might want to ensure they're secure before each use.It cuts in one direction. If that direction is away from you, you'll prefer the left-handed version unless you're left-handed.On the positive side, it cuts vegetables pretty well. But no better than the $2 bi-directonal ambidextrous supermarket version I replaced it with.I bought it because I like the Rosle can opener, also very pricy. This has the same high build quality, but I found it less useful than an ordinary peeler. And heavier.
loose lid. The ceramic is slightly cheap and the lid doesn't fit properly so it's kind of pointless because it is a travel mug! The cobalt blue is a nice colour.  I bought another mug through Creative Ventures through Amazon and it was cheaper and the quality was much better
Attractive but not functional. This dispenser has a strong resistance and makes it difficult to pull back the lever with the thumb.  When it closes, it tends to leave behind a drop of syrup that can run down the side
After a while it leaks, but give them a chance to make it right. This coffeemaker's design is flawed. But my customer service experience on complaining about it was the best I've received from any company in years. They sent their new thermal carafe model, which appears to have the design flaw with the filter carrier taken care of. Give them a chance to make it right. Customer service is part of the equation with any purchase, and Mr. Coffee/Sunbeam has impressed me on that score
Overrated and overpriced. Having bought this knife over a year ago I must say I have had much better for less. I have since purchased a carbon steel Japanese Sashimi knife with a wood handle that is equal to the Global save it's blade requires a quick wash and dry to avoid staining. I find the Global's stainless steel blade to require less maintenance, however, due to its brittle temper the tip broke soon after I purchased it. My main critisism is that the continous metal grip is slick and with wet hands (as one might have when slicing a large fish) there is the distinct possiblity of losing your grip and your hand sliding forward toward the blade. In addition, the rear cutting edge of the blade adjacent the grip has a sharp edge exposed and given the slippery handle it is not as safe as other designs.  I wouldn't mind the high price as long as you get equal value. In this case there are better traditional Japanese alternatives easily found on the web. I suspect I helped pay for celebrity chef endorsements. I would not reccomend it to anyone unless a contemporary appearance is  more important than functionality; It is a good looking knife-even with a broken tip!
Cute but not practical. This "Tea Cattle" is absolutely adorable.  It is not practical for daily use.  The spout doesn't pour cleanly and water ends up all over the stove.  The lid doesn't remove easily and more often then not knuckles will be knocked on the handle that does not move.
Can't Review the Black & Decker Power Scrubber, Because I CAN'T GET IT!. I assume that Amazon's refusal to ship the Power Scrubber to an FPO (Military Overseas) address is because the batteries are included. For the US asking price, I'd be more than willing to get the gadget without the batteries. I'm in Japan, folks, it's not like there are no AA batteries available here!Now, here's the kicker - I CAN buy it here in Japan, from a TV Shopping network just up the road in Hiroshima, so how the heck can they get it shipped here (batteries or no) when I can't? The price difference, BTW, is $39 locally vs. $19 from Amazon
It is not microwave safe. One of the plate I bought broken during a 50 seconds medium heat  microwaving, so I doubt it is really good for microwave. When I called Lenox, their rep. simply asked if I want to order a replacement from them as if the bad quality was not their problem. Disguesting.The design pattern was nice though
Not so Hot. This product works "ok" if you are simply taking something out of the oven or microwave and setting it down right away.  I wouldn't hold on to anything for too long with these.  You can definately feel the heat through these gloves.   I highly doubt this could handle heat over 500 as advertised.  For the price, it's hardly worth it, you'd be better off with a good old fashioned wash cloth
Don't  buy waste of money and Energy. We bought the Vitamix 5000 about 1 1/2 years ago. Since then we had  only trouble with the machine. With the easiest load the motor shuts off and I have to put it in the fridge, because it gets overheated. Despite returning it 3 times for repair the issue is still not resolved!I then asked for our money back but Vitamix's customer service was very unfriendly and refused to refund.To anyone who wants to buy one: Don't do it!!! You have only trouble and the customer service really sucks. Save yourself some trouble... I'm not a review writer but that Vitamix matter was really annoying. I just wanted to let you know what we ran into.We are most likely looking at the BlendTec instead hoping that a) it actually works and b) we get better service in case we do need it.
strange sheets. The quality was disappointing and does not compare with my old 200-thread-count 100% cotton percale sheets which were made in the USA (unfortunately the American factories are now closed).  The sheets are VERY thin and do not have the softness or body of 100% cotton. I ordered white sheets and the set that arrived was cream colored and yellowed.  A bleach wash removed some of the yellow.  I would not buy this product again nor do I recommend it.  I think Amazon should state that the sheets are made in China.  I need 100% cotton because I have an allergy problem with synthetics such as polyester.  I hope these sheets are all cotton but the thinness is reminescent of polyester.  Hope I am wrong
Omie and Izzy  's Review. Omie & Izzy are brother/sister kitties about 6 months old. They received this as a gift:"It's fun when someone plays with us with a chasing toy but we don't play in it much on our own. One of the wires broke already and we've had it less than one month."
Better than nothing. If you can't use dryer sheets or fabric softener, this is better than nothing at all.  Static cling still abounds, unfortunately.  Many times the balls get stuck in arms of clothing so it takes a bit of searching before starting the next load.  Not a big deal.  I'm glad I bought them, but I still long to use dryer sheets
Squeak squeak. The complaints about the pepper grinder squeaking and spitting out huge chunks of peppercorns are 100% true. Try to avoid this one if you can. I would try to get a refund, but it's just not worth the hassle. What a waste
Raggedy!. I made a mistake in buying this item thinking since I had one when I was little it would be similiar.It is not,the edges are stiff and strings are pulling out.The fuzz all over the blanket gets all over your sheets.It is a raggedy sorry substitute for my cozy soft one I remember
SIZE WRONG. Picture states 4 x 41/4 size measures 3 x 3 1/4 inch. Not the size that was stated with the picture
Don't buy it from Dynadirect. The Corningware dish is great, my 1 star is not for the item, it is for Dynadirect.  They are HORRIBLE!  Item was backordered, but they never told me and charged my credit card.  When I called they finally told me it was backordered and I ask that they cancel the order and refund my money.  Bad, Bad Servic
horrible. this design was flawed. I mean it was sorry. You lose suction. there is too much cording at the bottom. I had to use a coat hanger. It is noisy.It is very unreliable.
Works well, but  is it poisoning me?. I love the way this works , but the second time  I  used it the no stick coating starting  coming off in my  food- black strips of plastic -like stuff. When I wrote to Nesco about it , they sent me a price list  to buy a new liner. I do not believe I should have to pay for  that when I only used it twice. Also I asked them  several times  what the coating was and could it be harmful if it came off in food. Only after threatening   legal action, did customer service tell me it was harmless. I hope  that is true , but now  I am reluctant to use  this  cooker and surely don't want to pay $18.95 for a new liner that might do the same thing again. It  would have been nice if they had offered to replace it. I am going back to Rival for a slow cooker  now
Not actually queen sized. This memory foam piece was not nearly the same size as the other queen sized piece I purchased. But other than that, it's comfortable.
Plastic is better. I ordered this set for my Father in Law for Christmas this year. Although they shipped these glasses quickly, they were of the poorest quality I have seen.  Each of the rims of these glasses were uneven and one was even chipped!  There were very noticeable molding marks on each of the stems as well.   When I tried to contact the Wine Enthusiast it took forever just to reach a real person, and when I did she was VERY short with me.  I do not suggest this product whatsoever.
lousy quality towel!. It wasn't as fluffy or thick as expected, and the colour was more blue than purple (which didn't measure up to the image as well). I could get a WAY better quality target for the same price at Target (which i finally did!)
Used Once and it Destructed!. I bought this pot and I made Sauce in it. When I was stirring the sauce, I noticed white flecks floating around. I emptied the pot and saw a large burnt black hole in bottom of pot. I did not burn anything in the pot and the sauce was simmering on low. When I really looked at the burnt spot, half the enamel is gone and the steel is showing through.All this from Sauce and 1 use. No Thanks, the pot is being returned
Hard to put in place. The spice rack looks nice.  Won't know the quality until I can use it and see how much weight it will take.  I had a horrible time getting in under the cabinet.  It is definitely a 2-person job and there was only me.  The self-adhesive tabs didn't work at all even to just put the spice rack up to use the screws.  Very awkward to use the screws.  Doesn't allow for any room especially the back screws.  I did the wrong thing by taking the extending arm hardware off to get the spice rack in place and to make it easier to screw it under the cupboard and that is where it sits.  Now to get the hardware back onto the extender arms is almost impossible.  I wouldn't have purchased this knowing how hard it is to attach to the underneath of the cabinet.  Took much too much time to get it into place
Poor Product and Poor Customer Service. I used this dutch oven according to the manufacturer's instructions and after the second use, part of the enamel on the bottom of the pot bubbled up and chipped off.  I called the customer assistance number and found them to be rude and not very helpful.  I have not decided if I will return the product to Innova since they require that the customer pay for shipping the damaged item.  I will never buy a product from this manufacturer again
it's sucks. Please do not buy they do not packge the refigerator right it comes with dents and parts are missing!!!!!!
Does NOT fit all 12 cup coffeemakers. The writeup is incorrect.  This does not fit all cuisinart 12 cup coffee makers, it definitely does not fit the dcc 1200.  While returning it is not difficult through Amazon, it means a trip to UPS and another 2 weeks of waiting for a correct replacement
If I could rate it zero stars I would have. I had the CE100 for all of 3 days and it was just awful, I ended up exchanging it for the CE200 (so glad I did) The CE100, has some problems, first off, it doesn't sew, and considering this IS a sewing machine I find this to be a big problem!!  The bobbin thread will not lock your stitches, and on top of that the top thread breaks like every 4 stitches. And for those of you wondering I have sewn for over 15 years and believe me I called customer service, and they told me that the CE100 series has a problem with the bobbin casing cracking. Well call me crazy but why are they still selling the dumb thing then?? Seriously, I spent 3 very long days doing nothing but being upset, angry, and aggervated, not to mention saying ugly words and making up new ones when those didn't work:-) Save yourself from what I went through, just spend the extra money and get the CE200, once you get it and figure it out , it can be addictive! Good luck and happy sewing!
save your $. Save your 12 bucks.  This timer has a nice look, that is why I gave it the 2 stars. If your thinking of buying this timer, stop, buy a different one
Vexation on Ice. Forget this ice crusher.  It fails in all important areas.  It only succeeds in looking cool.  It is awkward to operate.  On ours, the screw which holds the works together keeps coming unscrewed requiring an annoying reassembly.  It is seriously unbalanced. There is no mechanical advantage built into its design.  Really, shop around, there must be a better idea out there somewhere
All but one glass arrived at my door smashed to bits!. I bought these glasses as a gift for a friend, only to be dismayed that I had nothing to give when the date arrived. I opened the shipment to find 3 of the 4 glasses shattered and had to clean glass shards off my living room floor and clothing. I immediately called the number I had associated with the purchase to report this, and was told that I would need to call yet another number to complain and seek redress. Hardly the customer service I deserved considering their error. I have yet to find the time to sit on hold again and call their other department to sort out this issue. Very disappointing experience to say the least. I will not be buying from them again!
Remove Item. Please remove this item from your stock.  I began putting this together and immediately the cross bars broke without any exertion on my part!  Very poor product
Kitchen Aid Egg Slicer Fails. The first time using the product, two of the stainless steel wires broke!  I am still able to use part of the slicer, but it is not effective
Photo was nicer than the product. I would not order these again as I thought they look rather cheap and flimsy.  I agree with the reviewer who stated the purple color was more like a brown color.  The photo of these show that they are vivid colors but they are all dull in actuality.  The photo also does not reflect how the tab assembly is extremely visible and the boxes are made so that the tab assembly on the lid is right in the front, instead of on the side where it might have a chance of hiding a bit more.  Those tab assemblies scream "cheap", not inexpensive - "cheap" - losing huge points for aesthetics.  All in all, I guess you get what you pay for with these.  I am using them but am keeping them tucked away in a closet where I don't have to look at them.  If I had to do it over again, I would have spent the extra bucks for something that didn't look quite so pasted together and would have added a nice look to my office.  If you want document storage with a little class, these are not for you
Rusty knives and worse customer service. I got these knives as a gift. Ironically, the first thing to rust was the part of each knife stamped "Stainless Steel".Let's be realistic. These knives are cheap. They're thin and they're not well weighted. However, they say stainless steel, and you figure that that's what you're getting. I hand-washed these knives and dried them immediately, but they still corroded.Now comes the bad part. I wrote to their customer service department twice and didn't hear back. I finally got their address (from the post office) and sent them back the knives. It took three months of me emailing and calling them (with 15+ minute wait times for Each Call) to get them to send me a replacement set.The replacement set rusted in about two weeks. That was in September. I just got off the phone with Miracle Blade, a call during which I was interrupted so many times that I actually had to say "I'm going to finish my sentence" so their rep would stop talking. They won't refund my money. In fact, they won't refund Anyone's money after 30 days. The lifetime warranty is for replacement only. They'll send me another set of soon-to-be-rusty knives, of course--if I pay the shipping and handling...Again. I asked the rep for his full name, for his ID#, and for a manager, and he refused all requests.In summary, if you buy these knives, they will rust. You will want to get rid of them. Your only option will be the garbage can
No Good. NOT a good light.  The light is already fading and I don't use it very often.  Very disappointed
Do Not Wast Your Time/Money. I have had the XP4000 for 2 months. It makes good coffee/espresso however, the frothing devise works poorly and is unreliable. I sent the machine out for repairs. The service center took two weeks to replace a gasket and retrun freight prepaid. The frothing devise still works poorly. I am disappointed and believe I wasted my time, effort, and money. Do not recommend. PS - I see Krups has  discontinued the XP4000.....I know why.
Returned  Danby. I tried twice, and both the original and the replacement were delivered damaged, so they were returned. Amazon/Target was good about returning the merchandise and refunding my money
cheap version. unlike the set from last year that was great!!... these have a cheap feel and a thiner and bendable blade they do not even carry the Laguiole name on the blade now.  not worth the money.   came in a  broken box that was pieces of two or three others that would not fit together.   a pure wast
You know how to take the order... I ordered this item 2 months ago when it was "in stock", I am now on my third "it will be in by" promise/lie, save yourself the aggravation
Great concept that needs refinement. I've had my Catgenie for several months now and I would have to give it mixed reviews. Like everyone else, the concept sounds incredible - never have to scoop a litter box again and it cleans itself? Sold! Well, the grass is greener but only slightly. Initially out of the box my unit had two issues: one, the scooper arm did not work at all. two, i received an error beep during one of the first few cycles and it shut off in the middle with the bowl full of water. Of course, trying to acclimate cats to a bowl full of water that is beeping at them is a bit difficult. I went through all the troubleshooting but finally had to call tech support. They were helpful and shipped me a new processing unit. The new unit had the same error once but then functioned ok afterwards. I had a month or two of ideal performance. Then recently, a horrendous noise coming from the unit while draining. Once again, I followed troubleshooting to no avail. Called tech support and they shipped another new processing unit after we went through a lot of troubleshooting. So three units in three months. The idea is great and when it's working, it is worth the money. But the amount of time I've spent on the phone with tech support and having to completely disassemble and clean out a very dirty hopper, makes me think my $300 could have bought a lot of other nice gadgets. My biggest concern is that I don't feel comfortable leaving for any extended period of time (like a long weekend) for fear it will stop working again. So although it is working now, I have the old litter box on standby in the garage for the next episode. Hopefully future versions of this will improve. Overall, it's a good product but it's not reliable
why are these in the toy section??. These aren't toys, so I'm not sure why they sell them in this department.  BUT, they are beautiful.  Really, really lovely.  My grown daughter hung them in her room and they are so much prettier than we thought they would be.  Not toys!  But, so pretty
Nearly useless. I say nearly useless because the ceramic pot is a nice size and weight for melting chocolate in the microwave (which is what you'll have to do), and the warmer makes a decent trivet...but, it does not ever get hot enough to actually melt the chocolate.We followed the directions, and allwed 1/2 hour for the chocolate to melt (putting chips in as we started dinner).  Half an hour later, some of the chocolate (on the outside of the crock, by the burner coil) had melted a bit.  An hour passed...still nothing much.  Now, given that cocoa butter melts at body temperature (which is why it is used in cosmetics), that's saying something.   The pot never reached 98 degrees!  If I'd put the chips in a zip-lock in my lap during dinner I would have had better results.Since this was a relatively inexpensive item, and I got it effectively for free during Amazon's recent Valentine's day promotion, I did not send it back (thinking it would be unfair to make them pay shipping both ways on an item which costs near as much to ship as it does to buy)...but, if you are actually paying for this- don't bother.  (or at least be advised that it will not actually melt the chocolate).  It does do a reasonable job of holding the temperature once you've melted the chocolate some other way.
Watch out if you purchase this item. I didn't heed the warnings from the other reviews, and took a chance.  When the item was delivered, in a timely fashion, it was broken.  There was no packing in the box, the box was not marked fragile anywhere.  I tried to return it to a Target store, which the site said was an option... but nope.  The store said I could not return it and they would not give me a refund. They did not carry that item.  It was too close to Christmas to try and do anything through the mail, so I had to get a different plate and make do with what I had.  Very disappointed in this and mad at myself for not believing the others who had the same experience.  Won't do any more business with Target.
Starbuck's here I come!!!. The clock lost time from the minute I plugged it in. It progressively lost minutes everyday. When it was 30 minutes slow I sent it back and received a new one that also lost time immediately after being plugged in. I waited a week and it was now 45 minutes slow.Contacted DeLonghi directly and they offered to send me the same model but a different serial number. That one also lost time.Contacted DeLonghi again, they then replaced the unit with a different model DC55TCB. this one the water does not drip through the grinds. They are now sending us a new basket to hopefully solve the problem. Well, we received the new basket unit and the water with coffee still does not drip through. Contacted DeLonghi and was asked to cut the cord and send it in and they would sent another replacement unit in 3 to 6 weeks. This will be our 5th unit. We aksed for a refund but were told they cannot do that!!!!!!Meanwhile we have purchased a unit through Gevalia and will keep getting replacements til they get it right!!!!!! This will be our 5th. Received a new unit on 1/4/07 and yet again the water failed to drip through the filter, contacted DeLonghi was told we weren't positionung the carafe correctly???? I am not a Harvard graduate however I do kn ow how to place a carafe into the unit. They said they will send out yet another basket unit. We received the basket and still the same problem. I finally contacted Amazon and pled my case to them, so much for dealing with the manufacturer directly. They authorized a return even though this unit is a replacement for the original defective one. I know who reads this must be tired by now and has given up, as have I
Disappointed. I bought this for my mom and had it sent to her address.  It worked for two days and then it stopped.  On my last visit I fiddled with it for an hour, but it only worked intermittently.  She didn't keep the receipt so I'm writing it off as a waste of money.  When you think about it the inexpensive Softsoap brand push pump dispensers make more sense.  You can see when they are empty and you don't have to keep up with batteries.  I don't buy the argument that the hands-free dispenser is more sanitary than the hand pumps because after you touch the hand pump you wash your hands
Worst $90 ever spent!. Purchased in October and it stopped working in January. Unfortunately, I was unaware the warranty is only 90 days... now I know why
Not the wafflemaker we wanted. We waited too long to try this out after it came.  We would return it if it wasn't so late.  It takes forever to warm up and forever to cook!  Then the waffle is not hot!  Not happy at all with it
Expensive piece of plastic/ metal. I bought this (in black) at Williams & Sonoma for over $100 -   thought I'd spend the extra $ thinking I was getting a quality item that would last . . .  boy was I WRONG, WRONG, WRONG!  My cheap Mr. Coffee lasted longer than this thing!Day 1 - the plastic smelled sooo bad that it turned the taste of my coffee into a cupful of plastic, chemical waste -   AFTER cleaning/ running vinegar through at last 4 - 5xThroughout - it did nothing but leak, flooding my kitchen counter every time I wanted a cup of coffee -    less then six months later the leaking got so bad that it was ready for the garbage can.  One last attempt before deep sixin' it -  figured that maybe the seal on the water measure just need a jiggle . . .  w/ hardly any pressure - the thing jiggled right off the coffee maker into my hand b/c the plastic was so brittle.Coffee also doesn't get all that hot & cools very quickly - even in the 'thermal carafe' which is perfect if you like lukewarm coffee that turns ice cold after adding cream2 stars for looks aloneMay be better off/cheaper buying a couple of disposable $40 coffee makers, replacing them every 6 mo
Too Pooped to Perk!. Well, this nicely designed pot is great on looks, but it's lifespan is not very long. Like the others reviewers said, the clear plastic top broke and so did ours.  After just a little over a year, the pot will not get the water hot enough to perk. Only luke warm water results and thus it doesn't perculate.  YES, WE DID START OFF BY PUTTING 'COLD' ONLY WATER IN IT!!  All electric coffee makers require cold water to start (in case any of you don't know this.)  The pot is used once a day....taken good care of, so there is no reason for it to break down so quickly. Salton, Inc. makes this pot, so we might all want to contact them about this problem and perhaps those of you who need new plastic tops can order a replacement from them. We were very disappointed with this pot.
Great coffee, flimsy machine. I received this coffee maker as a gift two years ago.  As a mechanical engineer, the machine itself makes my heart cry.  The parts are a flimsy plastic that have been cracking slowly but surely over time.  The pod holder is difficult to open and it feels like the handle will break if you push the end.  I haven't had any problems with leaking or lukewarm coffee; the coffee itself comes out hot and tastes good.  The only issue I've had is cracked parts
VERY DISAPPOINTED. I decided to try this one when my Melitta Mill n' Brew finally died and figured that for the two hundred dollar price tag, it was probably good.  Bad decision on my part.PROS:  Looks great, coffee is really hot, unlike some coffeemakers and their lukewarm coffee.  Quieter than most when grinding. Customer Service is exceptional.CONS:  The grind seems to have one setting...coarse.  I am a home coffee roaster and the beans I buy and roast call for a finer grind. I tried doing a grind and putting back in to regrind, but this did nothing except clog up the thing and make a mess. The "strong" setting makes much weaker coffee than we are used to. Also,  for a two hundred dollar unit, it is very cheaply made. Be very careful with the pouring spout...very poorly constructed = MESS.After a week of frustration with this thing, I put it away and went and bought another Melitta.  The $60 dollar Melitta is a much better value
Worse Filter and Doubt Reviews. I setup the filter yesterday, it was very very loud, trust me, you can't sleep that with in your bedroom. The Filter also doesn't not well with a 29 gallons saltwater tank.
items came chipped. Cheap quality production!!! This was a Holiday gift for my wife.  When she opened the package, both trays had large chips of enamel missing along the metal edges. It looked like neither tray had been inspected before being put inside the box. Then the "fun" began as I tried to get a replacement for the damaged items from Amazon.  I checked the box on Amazon's on-line site asking to have the set replaced, as I was requested to do, and waited for the E-mail to be sent that was promised in the instructions.  Five days later: nothing, not a word from the company by E-mail.  So, I went to a near-by store that ships things, paid to have the bake set packed up, and then paid for shipping.  Next, I went on-line and did a search on Google to find Amazon's 800 number.  As you will discover, you cannot find it on the Amazon site; at least I couldn't.  I called, sat on the phone for 15 minutes, and finally got through.  After discussing the problem with the representative of Amazon, I got reimbursed for the cost of the packing and postage to send the set back to the company.  And another set was sent.  It arrived five days later. There were no problems with these trays. Bottom line:  Too much time wasted to get the item replaced by Amazon.  Amazon: please, please put your 800 number on your site where people can find it easily.  Also, if someone checks a box asking for a replacement, please get back to the person by E-mail as you promised!!!!!!!!!
Mine was defective. I purchased this electric skillet because I was pleased with a previous skillet (Model 06852).  The model 06852 is an attractive looking electric skillet that cooks beautiful, but one that I wanted to keep nice for company and buffets.  I purchased this Model 06851 for everyday use. The only difference between the two models are the handles and the lids. The skillet size and design are identical. The first time I used the product it worked properly and was cooking up to my expectations.  I have been cooking on electric skillets for over 30 years.The second time I used this skillet it began making a lot of noise -- much like it might be shorting out.  It also started cooking much too hot, therefore, making the meat hard and burnt.  I tried the temperature control plug for the model 06852 on the unit, but the problem persisted which told me the problem was in the coil in the pan itself.Just to be sure before I contacted Presto about their warranty, I made some Chicken Fried Steak in both pans at the same time, being sure to use the same temperature, and turning the food at the same time, and then simmering the steak at 200 degrees in a covered skillet to make it extra tender as I always do.  The skillet model 06852 produced a beautiful meal, whereas the meat in the skillet model 06851 was hard and burnt.  The meat came from the same package, so I know it wasn't the food.This experiment told me for sure the newer skillet I purchased (model 06851)a month and a half ago was indeed defective.  So I called the Presto manufacturer at the number provided on the warranty paperwork.  They told me I needed to send the unit back to them -- BUT I MUST PAY FOR THE SHIPPING.  If I received a defective unit that is only one and a half months old then I believe THEY SHOULD be responsible for the shipping cost for the unit to be returned to them since they provide no place to drop it off for repairs or replacement.  It is apparent they have very little faith in their products and make the consumer pick up the tab for the shipping on their defective units.  This was unacceptable to me and now I am letting everyone know that if you buy ANY Presto Appliance, and the unit is defective, you will be responsible to spend yet more money (approx another $15 for further shipping costs) before you can obtain a working unit.In the future I plan on buying from a different manufacturer.  I have purchased my last Presto product. I will not do business with a company that refuses to stand behind their products in a decent manner.  I am not a person that throws away good money after bad.  They give no guarantee that they will replace the unit with a working unit, so I could spend the rest of my life and a ton of money on shipping fees for defective merchandise from this company.  You might want to think twice before you purchase a Presto Appliance, because any and all defective merchandise you receive YOU will have to PAY MORE MONEY for the shipping cost to get it fixed
uneven toasting. I have disappointed with the performance of this toaster.  After weeks of research I purchased this to replace my 8 year old Cuisinart which had been discontinued.  Six months later I have yet to get an evenly toasted piece of bread and have to continually adjust the settings.  Unfortunately since I purchased it through Amazon's merchant online, I can't return it.  Wish I'd gone with the Braun.
Do NOT buy these!!!. My Space Bags came in yesterday.  I couldn't wait to try them.  The first one amazed me with how flat it became.  However, the next two I tried doing both ripped!!!!!  Then this morning the one that worked last night has puffed back up.  I am extremely disappointed!!!!
they don't function. i hated these shakers. i got them as a gift and 1. they are too big and take up too much space and 2. the rubber stoppers were not a tight fit so the salt and pepper was always leaking out the bottom and 3. the holes in the top are too big and too much comes out at once. finally one broke and i was thrilled to toss them out. the other, smaller fiesta ware ones -- the round ones -- are much much better
Nice outside but cheap innards..... Broken after a year.  Way too expensive for what it doesn't supply, mainly 'mist'.  An overpriced 'toy'.  Customer service is excellent, however, and the broken part was replaced at no charge.I agree with one of the other reviewers...If the oil is heavy, such as EVOO, the oil will come out in a stream.  The best I can say is that the Misto might make an adequate plant mister
Mostly filler. My cats used to like this food because it is basically junk food for cats. I did not realize how unhealthy most of the big brand names in pet food were. Look at the ingredients. The main ingredients are corn and grain fillers and animal by-products. Is there even any real meat in this stuff? Check out the ingredients for high quality dry foods like Innova EVO or Felidae and you will see a big difference in the contents and their order. The good stuff has real meat as the first several ingredients. This stuff is basically Doritos in pellet form for cats and is  far from what a carnivore cat's natural diet would be. Yes, because this stuff is mostly filler, it is cheap. The real cost is to the cat whose health might suffer in the long run from eating junk food
Francesca C. Well I thought it was a great toy until my lab puppy chewed the knobs off.Don't get me wrong he was very excited(alittle too excited)The toy lasted 30 mins and it didn't work anymore.
Not what I expected. I bought two sets of candles from a Target store in Minneapolis and was very pleased.  You can't imagine my suprise when I recieved my online order. The candles looked nothing like what I had purchased previously. They didn't even look like the picture(not marble).  I let the candles burn for about an hour and half of the candle actually burned. This did not happen on the others I bought from the store.  I only regret that I gave some away as gifts and can not return them.
Don't buy this kettle. well, it's my first return to Amazon, followed by my second. This kettle blows steam out the edges of that big opening right onto the handle. Picking it up is risky business. It leaks water. I used to have a Revere kettle I loved, this one is nothing like it.
Disappointing compared to other All Clad. Same problem - the surface has begun to deteriorate.  We use this pan daily, always using appropriate implements and washing by hand, but still the non-stick surface has broken down.  I am going to contact All Clad to see if they will stand by their product and replace..
Don't buy this item!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. The coffee pot came with the down and timer buttons stucked together. Sent it back and received replacement quickly.  It was great when it worked, after the 3rd day it didn't come on as programed and the down button got stuck again.  The weather display was neat, too bad it didn't work out.  I think there is a design fault on the machine.  But I have to say Amazon has great customer service, we received our replacement very fast
Help! How do I get rid of the Zorb Smell?. Two days ago I used a bag of Zorb that had come with my Dyson a year or two ago.Maybe this stuff spoils? It left the most foul smell, smells like my father-in-laws basement, on the lake, with the leak, that he never used to go in to.We poured an entire box of baking soda on the floor in my daughter's room, but you can still smell it throughout the entire house. It's nauseating. It even seems like when I went to work this morning the smell had gotten into my clothes and went with me!I love my Dyson, but boy, this Zorb stuff, peee-yewwwwww!!!!
Absolutely no value!. The only european characteristic of this cup is it's price.  The picture is deceiving - this thing is tiny. I could only put three of my fingers through it's ear.  I am definitely returning it to Amazon - in my mind, it's worth 5 bucks and is more of a for a kid than an adult.
Need to buy multiple!. Beware, you need at least two, and most air cleaners require 3 of these. And when stacked they aren't as effcient as a large single filter. But if you can't find the larger single replacement filter these will do
No thank you. A good looking, substantial item butI had to return two of these units due to uneven heating. The only KitchenAid product that I've ever had that was sub-par. For this kind of money, they should be first rate and they're not. The company was good about the returns, however
Not a good investment..... We bought this a week ago, it did not have an owners manual, so we did not know what to do differently when the gauge said after 2 days that the filter needed replaced. Our water tank got broke today and I have been online for a long time trying to find a replacement tank for it, with NO luck.
2 x-3 units, both failed. I have now purhcased two Francis x-3 units and both have failed. The first unit blew-up where the brass pipe goes into the pressure tank, yes, it literally blew-up there and destroyed the unit. This happned on the fith use of the unit. The second unitl worked perfectly for 6 months, noow it too has failed. It does not heat up and a seal appears to be broke and the unit will not reach brewing or steaming temperature. For a $600 Espresso machine, this is rediculous! I would advise anyone against buying one of these machines.
Dont buy!! I'm sorry I did. I bought this for my son-in law for Christmas.  He wanted an adjustable cutting board.  This one looked nice and sturdy.  I am so embarrassed, the board is cracked and warped.  I felt horrible that this happened.  By February, or even before, it was a piece of crap. I know that I threw out my receipt because I thought it would last a very long time. I bought one made of bamboo w/o the adjustable wires for $10. at The Christmas Tree Store for my daughter.  It will last forever, it's beautiful
Cereal spitter. It seemed like it would be a great way to store cereal but it  made more of a mess than it was worth. It spit cereal all over the place. I used Special K and Kashi granola cereal so it may work better if you used it to store something soft like oatmeal or gummy bears! I returned it
Cannot Find Replacement Bowl. I agree with Jane who says that the glass bowl is very thin and can break very easily. Ours broke with very little pressure during cleaning. We went to a thrift store and bought a larger bowl made of heavy glass for just 50 cents. Our Betta is now swimming around more and the bowl is nearly break-proof
Junk. Don't buy it!. This is a real disappointment from a name brand that has built it's reputation on quality. (How hard can it be to build a good can opener??) The blade & gear that are supposed to hold the edge of the can, don't meet well. If you DO get it to cut, it requires tremendous hand strength and multiple stops and starts, leaving uncut gaps in the rim. The handle is loose, but can't be tightened. You can buy 4 cheap can openers for the same price, that will last you for years.
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
dual means "two". The bed warmer was described as "dual" controlled.  It comes with only one control.  The entire bed has to be at the same temperature.  The reason I wanted "dual" control was because my husband is always warm and I'm almost always cold --- hence, seperate controls were needed.  Since we had the coldest winter in years, I adapted the product to work because there was no time to return and request what was described. It does heat well though
no good. this corkscrew is flawed in several ways: in spite of its "ergonomic" design, it is awkward to use.  the screw is too short and often mauls the cork beyond recognition and reuse.  simply screwing it into the cork and pulling the wings down does not pull the cork far enough out of the bottle--you have to wiggle, wiggle, wiggle it.  save your money
Not so safe.... I bought six of these collars for my five cats. (I bought an extra just in case one of the cats lost one.) I thought the colors were great, and I was happy with the idea of the material, as opposed to cheap vynil. They do look fashionable, I think, and are discreet enough to not take away from the beauty of the cat itself. However, these collars are NOT "breakaway" collars. They enlarge if they get caught on something, but this actually only adds its own problems. Several times my cats came home with one leg through the collar (and the collar extended as far as possible). I hated to think what would have happened if the cat had gotten the collar caught on something AFTER getting the leg stuck. One cat finally did come home without his, and I didn't replace it. Another came home with the collar around her chest (both front legs had gone through), and it was constricting her. I pulled to try to get it off, but it was obviously very painful, and in the end the only solution was for me to cut it off. I decided these collars are not very safe after all--too bad I bought six at once (the reviews at the time were pretty good, generally). I've taken them all off, and now my daughters can play with them on their stuffed animals. They look do look cute! I just don't trust them on live animals.
Pre filters. These filters were not as dense as the filter that originally came with the unit
Hamilton Beach "Drip and Leak" Coffee Maker. This product leaks from the inferior quality plastic compartments. I returned it-spent the extra few dollars and bought Cuisinart version.My opinion is that for $20 more, Cuisinart makes the same product, but manufactures it 200% better allowing me to enjoy my morning coffee perfectly brewed without cleaning my kitchen counter from coffee that has leaked out from the warming unit
Cheesy, but not cheap!!!. Mak'n Bacon made "bacon" for the company that sells this product.Cheesy material, but not cheap.Hard to get all the bacon cooked without the tray getting too warm.Of course after you use it, you can't return it for your money back.Easier and cheaper to use paper towels.
Piece Of Garbage. No wonder this thing is cheap compared to Brita's other products.  The threads that hook onto the faucet are weak and easily stripped from simple hand tightening, not to mention they try to stick this rubber washer in it that's just about the same size of the screw-on apparatus attached to this item resulting in the whole thing popping off soon as you turn on the water. I can't say enough bad things about this piece of useless junk.
Good for only 2 years... We received this microwave as a wedding present, and it really was a good microwave. The toasting function is handy and seemed to work well. It is a bit small inside, but that was OK since it's just my husband and now. Now that we've had it for 2 years, it's starting to spark while it's running and I am scared it's going to start a fire in my kitchen! I know others have had this problem, and I'm actually shocked that Sharp has not recalled this item because it really poses a fire hazard. So here's what I think: great, but doesn't work long term. And for the price, you would expect to keep it longer than 2 years. Oh, and if you decide to cook popcorn, be sure and take out the turntable and try to cook it on a bowl or in a plate. As long as the bag does not touch the top or sides, it shouldn't burn. I have had much more success with it since I started doing that
didn't like it. I guess I'm the only one who did not like this knife.  I have French, German, Swiss, Japanese, and Chinese knives.  This one falls into the Chinese variety.  I was not at all impressed with the quality of this knife.  When I compare it to a global (Japanese), it just looked cheap.  I sent it back and ordered a golbal 7" santuko, which cost more.  I just could not live with a Chinese knife for $70
Info when I bought it was wrong - NOT AN 11 CUP as noted. Very disappointed to find out the size was wrong.  I should have looked at the other reviews and I would never have bought it.  It was sent as a gift and I am not happ
Awful. There isn't much to like about these sheets. They wrinkle like crazy when you wash them and the stitching leaves a lot to be desired - hanging threads are all over the place. I would not recommend these sheets at all
Not worth it. I see nothing special with this sharpener. Used it on a santuko knife with passible results. Tried using my sharpening steel on that knife and got the same results. The steel seems to be more versitile
Very expensive mistake, awful customer service. I've own my X3 for about 2 years now and overall, it has been used to make one double espresso daily. So when it stopped working a month ago, I was heartbroken. Called FF, after some back and forth I sent the machine in for repair. The cost of repairing it is about $200, incl. the shipping. Add that to the $499 I paid for it and this turns out to be one very expensive machine.After several days of back and forth with customer service, I still don't know what exactly is not working in my machine. Apparently, there are 3 items that have failed, one being the thermostat, a washer and something else, that CS was unable to explain. I really liked the machine when it was working, so I gave it some serious thought of shelling for repair, but at the end decided against it - I rather purchase a new Rancilio Silvia.When I called the CS with me decision and asked them to send the machine back, I was told that on top of the $12 shipping there will be a $13 handling charge for packaging the machine. I refused to pay that and the rep turned outright nasty. Long story short, I finally got them to send the machine back with just a shipping charge, but that was one very unpleasant experience. It is a whole another issue what additional damage they might have done to my machine after the nasty fight I had with them.I really liked the X3 when it was working, and I would love to have it back, but it is just not cost effective at all. What is really confusing to me is that with the low usage my machine had and the maintenance I provided, it has 3 parts needing replacement - if this was a good quality machine, it should have worked a lot longer without any problems.
It's dead, Jim. I have had this scale for about 4 months.  It worked fine the few times I used it, but last night I went to use it and it has given up the ghost.  I swapped batteries and still nothing.  The connection for the 9v battery is VERY loose, and even after crimping and holding it tight it didn't get any juice.  Not happy so I will order a different brand and hope it does better.  I do not abuse or heavily use my kitchen gadgets, so maybe I just got a lemon
Not worth it.  Spend wisely on soemthing else. These pillows end up being cardboard wafes when laid upon with your head, even when you have all four on top of each other.  This deal was too good to be true
Worked great...'til it broke. This press worked great, but only for about a month.  After that the press disc would not stay attached to the end of the plunger when I was pressing..
poor power level selection. The microwave worked well, but who designs a microwave where you have to press the power level button SEVEN times in order to get a power setting of 30%????? I just wanted to defrost a chicken breast.  Since that wasn't one of the pre-programmed foods for defrosting, I tried to set the microwave to defrost for a few minutes. But who has the patience to punch that power level button all those times to reduce the power level to 30% for defrosting????
Pleasant, but dim. I thought these lights would be just what I was looking for, but I was a bit disappointed at their lack of brightness; they just don't light the tank enough to show it off.  I have a 40 gallon tank and purchased one of these for each side.  It comes with two clips to hold the light.  The clips can be attached to the outside of the tank with double sided tape (included) or to the wall or other surface with screws (also included).  I placed mine in the existing hoods next to the florescent bulbs.  I think the soft, blue light is rather nice, but inadequate.
After few weeks it Leaks, Pads useless. The unit features automatic shut off when water is low by using a proximity switch via a float with a magnet in it. It has a shut off by setting humidity level and a shut off by count down timer. After a few weeks of use, the unit started leaking and you can't even tell where the leak is coming from. The pads do not prevent mineral build up on the hot plate. I am getting brownish deposits which I believe to be rust. The only way to remove it, is with white vinegar and old toothbrush which I had to bend into an "L" shape in order to get at and clean the stainless steel hotplate which boils the water. I was happy with the unit and preferred it over an ultrasonic unit I had, until it start leaking
Disappointed. I bought this merchandise as a Christmas gift for my daughter after investigating all brands of slow cookers.  My daughter was pleased with the gift and had all of her ingredients ready to try it, unfortunately the slow cooker was defective and did not work. This purchase was through Amazon via Target.  She tried to return to  Target and was informed they couldn't do an exchange, she would have to mail to Amazon. She did return back to Amazon and 6 weeks after Christmas, we still have no resolution.  Needless to say, we are not happy with the merchandise or the service provided
more trouble than it's worth. This was given to us about last christmas to replace our old one... not worth it...a couple months into our ownership of this item, it stopped working properly. The right burner remains on at all times - we have to actually unplug it when not in use because even though the dial is turned all the way down it is very very hot when it is plugged in and turned off. So the right burner remains on hi all the time, and the left burner is either lo or hi, there is no concept of temperature control with this device... if the knob is a centimeter below medium on the left burner then the heat will be very low too low to cook most things... if it's a centimeter above medium it's hot - if you want medium heat to work, good luck.It worked ok until it broke, however it was never especially powerful. I can't even tolerate trying to cook with it anymore, I just go to the apartment downstairs and cook on my boyfriend's mom's gas stove for nice even heating. But a ministove that they are dubbing 'professional' should not be breaking after like, three months
Emeril not so. This whisk does not stand up like a wire whisk, it is not sturdy, however it looks very nice sitting in my Emeril tin on the counter
Automatic Dish Dumping Rack. Unless you're planning on washing dinner plates only, this dish rack is not for you. Smaller plates (or bowls for that matter) are not secured by the inadequate wire lips ( about 1/8 inch )so they fall flat and then fall out onto the floor because the sides are completely open (3 1/4 inches) . Anything small dumps out of the side opening and onto the floor. The utensil basket has a divider which moves around and your utensils end up laying down in the bottom. I bought this thinking that since Polder has a good name, it would be a good product. I was wrong and Polder should be ashamed of such inadequate design
Embarassing for Chicago Cutlery. Years of trusting Chicago Cutlery went down the drain with this purchase.How the company could risk its reputation for quality by putting out such a poor product is beyond me.The wood knife holder is fine.  The handles are smooth and well finished. The knife blades are a complete and total disaster.  The so-called "STAINLESS" steel is really a poor quality carbon steel.  I have the distinct feeling that my set was unfinished, as the serrated edges were so rough that slicing meats or even a tomato ended up with a tearing of the food.  I finally used a sharpener to take the unfinished edges down a little.  That worked, but seems dumb that they came out of the factory unfinished.The blades are very heavy whch may seem like a feature, but because the serrations are only on one side, when you try to cut, the angle of the blade edge causes the blade to turn , and prevents even cuts.The worst part, is the rust.  I note that after I bought the item, the term "hand wash" was added to the descriptive copy.  Even hand washing and drying did not prevent rust, and then of course, if the rust is allowed to remain for any time... pitting takes place.My wife bought the set at Christmas from Kmart... supposedly a $59.95 value for $29.95.  Hey... I was happy... a set of Chicago, at a great price.  Not to be... I have thrown away the original box, but don't recall anything on the box or the descriptive card that was included that said the set was imported from China.  Usually, when this is the case, the words "made in China" are imbedded in the blade.  Not so.  The blade has only the embossed "Chicago" brand.I used to work near the Chicago headquarters, and knew some of the workers, who had pride in their product. That was then, this is now...They say you get what you pay for.  In this case, I must tell you that I bought a similar set for our cabin, with a few less steak knives, but the same basic carving knives... no wood knife holder but a nice wood cutting board.  The set doesn't rust, cuts better, and the best part is that it had a day in, day out price of a flat $8.00.  The stamped brand was "Gourmet Traditions", and the "made in China" stamp WAS on the blade.We gave our "Classic" set away to Goodwill, with a warning that it wasn't worth more than $5-8.00"Chicago Cutlery" made an enemy of me...  You can only trade on a magnificent reputation 'til your old customers catch on.
Buyer Beware. I made a poor decision based on a few good reviews when I decided to purchase these.  I should have listened to the multiple bad reviews.Lint...lint....lint....lint....EVERYWHERE!I made the mistake of washing my green, blue and maroon sheet sets together........HUGE MISTAKE!  The colors bled all over each other in the wash.  Then to make matters the colored lint totally overtook my dryer.It was a mess.  But I was determined to get at least one wear out of this useless mess and so I placed them on my son's bed as well as my own.  The pilling NEVER stops!  Just like others reported the lint was all in our hair, on our clothes and some even flaked all over the floor.On the positive note, I purchased the pink set as well.  It was not as bad as the darker colors--as far as not bleeding and having lint everywhere. So I was able to enjoy the softness and warmth these sets offer.So trying again......I decided to wash each of the darker colored sheet sets separately....as I still got the same results.  So I tossed them.  They are not even good for scraps because of the constant pilling. What a waste!  Please believe if you want softness and warmth that badly you are better off cuddling with a pet who sheds it's coat in the spring...at least it would be less messy
Lid arrived broken. The stainless steel lid has a glued in plastic piece that is supposed to provide an airtight seal to the canister.  My canister arrived with the plastic piece no longer glued in place.  I expected a bit more from a $50 coffee canister.  I'm returning it and going in search of a quality canister
You get what you pay for. Used the product for about a month.  I was deceived by the add thinking I was getting a knife sharpener with a electric grinding wheel like I had growing up on the back of the can opener.  The one on this can opener is just a slide though, and doesn't work well.  The unit is light weight and falls over easily with big cans.  The blade and lid carrier falls off quite a bit.  I didn't send it back because it was cheap and not worth the trouble.  If your looking for a can opener and an electric knife sharpener keep looking, don't buy this one.
HEPA FILTER MY FOOT. Had this vacuum cleaner for about 4 months before we started noticing that the room air seemed dustier everytime we used it.  At first, I thought it was because of the gap of the housing where the electrical cord emerged from its housing.  I took a closer look and behold, there is an half inch gap where the removable dust bin sits in the front of the machine.  It is supposed to be airtight as evidenced by the rubber gasket that lies superior to the plastic basket.  Nothing on the machine is broken - it just is poor quality control on the part of Eureka.  By the way, the other reviewer is correct.  They (Eureka customer service)do not answer their phones; you are put on an endless loop until, ultimately you are disconnected
PIECE of JUNK !. Junk, junk, junk.Thank heavens Amazon has such wonderful customer service.Myself as well as one of my friends purchased this so called food processor. We felt we researched it well BUT.......on the second use (shredding cheese) it fused together, forever.This seems to be a constant problem, which Kitchen Aid will not admit. They refused to take it back! Look at customer reviews on the KitchenAid website.We purchased Cuisinart, works great
ZERO. Zero best describes how well Amazon supports what they sell...great deal on this toaster absolutely. And it does a nice job on toast but after using the left side twice it stopped locking down so now we have a 2 slice toaster. Amazon just takes your money and runs, giving the standard answer that you have to take it up with Krups. Krups to their credit at least will look at the problem and repair or replace it IF they determine it is a warranty covered problem.....unfortunately you'll have to box the item up and ship it to one of about "Krups Service Centers" around the country to see if they fix it or not, at your cost - shipping cost more than the toaster did.....save yourself the aggravation; go buy your toaster at Walmart, Bed Bath & Beyond or someplace that will at least swap it out for you without all this hassle
Hardest feathers in the world. This pillow was hard as a rock and very uncomfortable. you might as well lay on your bed without any pillows if you are going to lay with this flat, uncomfortable, hard plank of a wood of a pillow.
Warning on Brewstation. It's a nice idea, but they are cheaply made and don't last very long.  In the space of 2 years, Brewstation number 3 has just quit working (doing what the other reviewer stated-just blinking on and off and you have to unplug it to reset it).  The first one was purchased new and lasted 13 months-1 month after the extended warranty I bought.  I figured it was just a fluke, and liked the design, so went out and bought another new one.  It lasted about 7 months before it checked out into that big coffeemaker station in the sky.  I wrote Hamilton Beach and was happy that they responded, and they had me cut off the plug and send it to them, and they sent me number 3.  That was about 7 months ago and now this one has percolated it's last.  So, instead of constantly replacing $10.00 broken decanters, I'm spending $50.00 to replace Brewstations.  Great idea, Hamilton Beach, cheap product.  I would pass.
Well balanced and pretty...but dull. Get the 4 star instead. These knives were really nice looking and felt good in the hand...much like the Henckels Pro S line, but they were not very sharp. This could have just been a bad set, but that may be due to lower standards at the manufacturing facility in Spain. I recommend spending the extra few bucks and getting the Henckels Four Star knives made at the original facility in Germany. When I got the Four Star set they were razor sharp, felt great and worked beautifully. There is a reason the International line is so much cheaper..
Either unpopped or overcooked kernels. I really like air popped corn and have a popper both at work and at home.  However, when I bought this popper, I was amazed at how many kernels went unpopped.  The corn that was popped was somewhat burned.  Both of these happened because of the design or the popper.  I also agreed that it rather large to store.  I returned the popper after trying it twice because I was so unhappy with how it did its job
The SkinnyGrillSatin BlACK TURNED OUT TO BE THE BUSTED UP CHESTNUT SKINNY GRILL. The Skinny Grill Satin Black came in chestnut brown and brokken to pieces. Still waiting for some relief in terms of a credit. I feel like the guilty party ,even though all I did was give them my hard earned money and trust that they would deliver a product to me. So far...computer form replys!
Buy it for looks, not for function. The other bad reviews about this toaster are all true, it really is just a gimmick. Buy this toaster for looks if you'd like to have it in your kitchen, but also buy another cheap ten dollar toastermaster toaster from kmart or walmart and use that to make your actual toast behind the scenes--believe me, the toast will come out a lot better and I bet the ten dollar toaster will even last longer
Starting to pill after one wash and dry. The material was very soft and the pockets certainly big enough for my double pillow-top mattress, but after the first washing (without chlorine bleach)and machine dry, it is starting to pill already.  That's disappointing. It still fits fine on the bed
Customer Service is the worst!!!. I have owned 2 machines by Capresso. First a C3000 that needed a new pump before the waranty period was up. After being without the machine for nearly a month, it was returned w/o charge. It began acting up 2 or 3 months later. Coffee was not as strong. Pump did not pump consistantly. Capresso was no help at all. They said that I could return the machine at my expense and for $100 they would take a look at it. The waranty period had expired...  I did not want to give their service dept. another chance, so I donated the machine to a friend. I assumed that since Jura had added their name to the Impressa Z-5 that reliability had been taken care of. My mistake. 6 months after spending over $3000 for this machine, The symptoms started. Cold steamed milk, machine mysteriously shuts off during frothing cycle, grinder continues to grind beans on capuccino setting until machine is shut off or unplugged. I contacted Capresso customer service(Jura not mentioned) the exact same disinterested help was received. They offered to mail me a UPS shiping label ETA 1 wk. Then I can send my machine in for up to 3 weeks and they will repair the machine and send it back, another week. So for $3000 dollars you can have convenient coffee for 11 months out of every year give or take a few glitches along the way. But what if the problems occur again after my 1 yr. waranty expires? I asked. "Call us right away and we can have you send it back."(for another month.I long for the days of companies that care about the people that buy their product. With a price tag so high, I expect high quality customer service. This is the last Capresso/Jura I will ever buy. I highly recommend that you DO NOT BUY FROM CAPRESSO!!
Nice glasses, but they are huge. You can hold this in both hands and your finger will only overlap a little.  18 oz's is a LOT of water
Magnum 350. I still have not gotten it to work. The motor works, but I can't get suction into the inlet tube. The basket that holds the carbon media is very poorly designed; it opens easily, spilling the charcoal out into the canister (where it doesn't belong). I did solve that by using 2 rubber bands to hold it in place. There is also a "rigid core" that fits inside the basket; my wife accidently threw it out after the basket opened when she had to clean it (I can see how it would happen). I reordered a replacement, and it was several WEEKS before it shipped.  Overall, I have not had a very good experience with this filter, although if I could get the $@#% thing to work, I might form a different opinion.
THIS FRENCH PRESS SUCKS!. WHY DO THEY CALL IT a 3 CUP PRESS..I barely get ONE cup out of it!! Are they talking EXPRESSO cups?Well anyway, every single time I use it I get grounds in my cup! EVERYTIME! GROUNDS!!!! yuck!This is the third French Press I have owned and it is the worst of the three! I guess I will continue my search for a fourth French Press before I choke on too many grounds!!!!
attachment is a piece of junk. I love my Dyson vacuum because it works better than any other vacuum I've ever owned and I have spent more money on other vacuums and I have been disappointed until now.  But the floor attachment is an overpriced piece of junk and I am being polite.  Mr. Dyson should have made it differently because I am afraid of scratching my wood floors with this attachment
perfect for ICED coffee. My cuisinart grind & brew recently died so I've been shopping for a new coffee pot.  (digression: cuisinart has the WORST customer service i've ever experienced in my life...)  I've read on virtually every customer review website out there that the coffee for the java studio is only luke warm, but since I'm a big fan of kitchenaid's appliances I figured I'd still give it a chance - especially since I don't like my coffee super hot.  I picked up the java studio nearly a week ago and it went back to the store yesterday.  The coffee was barely luke warm, and 'preheating' the thermal carafe hardly made a difference at all.  If the coffee isn't hot enough for someone who doesn't care for piping hot coffee, I can only imagine the frustration of those who do crave it piping hot.  On the note of needing to 'preheat' a thermal carafe, this is simply rediculous.  For all of cuisinart's faults, in the 3+ years I had my thermal grind & brew the coffee was ALWAYS piping hot and kept it's heat for hours (never needing to be 'preheated').  Needing to preheat a carafe renders an automatic coffeemaker useless - bottom line.  Kitchenaid needs to rectify this situation ASAP if they want to continue to keep their loyal customers.I swear by kitchenaid - the quality is amazing and the customer service is great.  With that said, I'm now the owner of a Bunn Thermalbrew (which is WONDERFUL).
CHEAP. This vacuum is sooooo cheap.  The suction on carpet to pick up pet hair is terrible and on vacuuming an area rug it doesn't pick up hair either.  This was rated good/great on pet hair and that is why I bought it.  I really hate it!  My last vacuum was a Royal canister and I should have stuck with this brand as it is far superior.  You get what you pay for
Tennis Balls As Good As Dryer Balls! And Less $$!. I did a little test while I was visiting my Daughter-In-Law, who possesses not only Dryer Balls, but a nice supply of tennis balls. For the test I washed two feather pillows from our motor home, which had become musty during storage. I washed them separately, each with a towel to balance the load. After washing, I dried each set with a dryer sheet in addition to the balls, mostly for fragrance: one set of pillow and towel with the dryer balls and one set with two tennis balls. Both thumped noisily around in the dryer and both walloped the feather pillows and towels back to equal fluffiness. I had considered purchasing dryer balls, but my daughter-in-law contributed the two test tennis balls and I am have been perfectly happy with the results
Annoying and only somewhat useful. I live in a narrow and cluttered NYC apartment so I purchased this vacuum thinking that it could be used to clean up the floors and the attached hose could be used get under all the futurniture and other surfaces.It works ok at best on the open floor but when you get down on your hands and knees to try to get under the futons and behind bookcases, the exhaust ends up blowing the dust bunnies all over the place.  Unless you cradle the body of the vacuum against your body so that the strong exhaust dosen't end up scattering the dust you were trying to pick up, it ends up creating a bigger mess than when you started.It could be extremely useful as its light weight and versitile, but the design flaws make it a complete waste of money
Waste of money!. Another disposable product by Shark. Gets clogged easily and the bottom breaks off easily - Don't believe what they say about lifting 150 lbs- that's not true unless you can use it on the moon! In my oppinion, This vacuum is not much better than a cheap stick vac except it doesn't last as long
Drippy Tea Kettle. I paid too much money for this tea kettle to drip from under the spout and spit water all over the stove before it even whistles.  This is a disappointment!  Save your money and search for a better kettle.  This one isn't a good buy or a good produc
Looks great - but is really too wimpy. After reading reviews on the less expensive Hamilton Beach drink mixer, I decided to step up to the more powerful version.  Very disappointing.  Cup is way too small to make a decent milkshake and it doesn't crush frozen fruit cubes for smoothies.  It's definitely going back
It brews coffee but has some downsides. This item will indeed brew coffee, but not without some shortcomings.First, the mechanism that allows you to remove and pour a cup while it is brewing doesn't work very well. You have to use one hand to hold the unit in place while you forcibly shove the coffee pot into place; usually resulting in some spilt coffee all over the inside of the unit.Second, for some reason, the spout that empties hot water over the grounds inside is mounted on a swivel that you have to move in and out of the way every time you use it. Only a mild nusience, really , but nevertheless, annoying. I suppose the moron who designed it would have you believe it brews a better cup that way, but that is obviously nonsense.Also, The opening to pour the water into is very small--your aim better be good. If this is on an average counter top, you're going to have to lift the water up quite high and hope you can hit the opening without spilling.Lastly, the steam that comes off while it is brewing condenses on the front faceplate, where the switches and circuitry is and I can't help but believe over time, the moisture will penetrate inside and probably short out the wiring-probably just after the warrantly runs out.To sum up: Overpriced! Poor value! Idiotic design. [...
Seal between layers breaks too easily. This is the 3rd of this type of travel press I have had, and all of them seem to have this problem. I've only had the latest one for less than a month, and now the seal is broken again. I'm really quite disappointed. I expected more from Bodum
I was hoping for something better. I was excited to get this muffin tin so I could make a dozen muffins for my boys at a time and for a cheap price, but like they say, you get what you pay for.  The tin is nice to start off with, but it rusts all over VERY easily.  So now, after I know that, the rust pretty much never comes off all the way and so I am stuck with it.  It is still very suitable for use with muffin cups (liners), so oh well
Great sweeper when it works. This is my second pro sweeper and my third Shark sweeper. The first model lasted almost three years so when I saw the Pro I upgraded because of it's few extra features. It was fantastic for about a year and then it just didn't work anymore. I bought a new battery and cradle for it, still nothing. After much thought I decided to just buy a new one to my dismay the cradle I had just purchased for the very same model didn't work for my new one... I am not a glutton for punishment, I just found myself invested in accessories for this model. As it happens the second "improved" pro model does not work as well or last as long as the first one did. Additionally, DO NOT EXPECT ANYTHING FROM THIS COMPANY WITH REGARD TO CUSTOMER SERVICE! If you actually get a living breathing person on the line, it is unlikely you will be able to understand them because of a thick accent and horrible long distance connection. Overall, I am done with Shark.
On off switch broke!. Beware! On off switch broke machine would not cut off unless unplugged. The place they recommended based on my zip code still has my vacuum and it's been about 2 weeks. :-
HATE. This is the most loathesome appliance I have ever owned. I hate everything about it. Some genius put the power cord at the bottom of the unit, so you have to hold the cord up all the time to keep from backing over it. This may not be such a problem if the stupid "self propelled" function weren't constantly trying to shoot backward, meaning I need both hands just to push the unit forward. It's like I'm dancing with my vacuum and we're fighting for the lead. Ridiculous. I have almost 2000 sf of carpet in my house, and I wake up sore the next day after a round with this monster.Oh--it also came with a free little red DD sweeper--the handle of which broke the first time I tried to use it. I don't know if DD came under new management or what, but I will never buy one of their products again
Too much work to get it to work. I have carefully analyzed all the reviews (positive and negative) before deciding to buy this product in order that the right level of expectation may be set.  My need is very simple.  I have almost all hard floors in my house, either tile or hardwood.  So floor keeping is a relatively low maintenance chore.  I know Flip-It serves both as a dry vacuum and wet mop.  Knowing that both dry and wet debris are going into the same place and I want to eliminate the messy task of cleaning out the wet gunk, so I opt to use the cleaner solely as an electric mop.I like the idea that while it is mopping, the machine can also take care of the small amount of debris that I missed in my "pre-mopped" vacuuming.  It does take some practice to get the machine to do the job right.  Although I don't have the problem of puddles of water as other have experienced, I have other issue such as the cleaning pad kept sliding out.  I find the maneuvering quite exhausting due to the squeegee design.  Also, my finger gets very tired from squeezing the solution release button.  I don't find the cleaning result dramatic perhaps because my floors are normally quite clean.  The machine will not get to the wall edges so it won't eliminate manual laboring.  I'm also not sure if the heating feature does anything to produce a cleaner floor since the water temperature does not felt very warm.  After two days of experimentation, I decided that the machine is going back to the store.  For light mopping, I am going back to my Swiffer Wetjet.  It is cheaper, quiet, lighter, easy to use, and best of all, no cleaning up required.
0 Stars -  Shame on you Rival!. Rival,  Do yourself a favor a take this electric skillet off the market asap!  You should offer a $50 rebate coupon for every poor soul who purchased your junk product - starting with me.   After 5 uses, the heating element stopped working and could not be fixed. Before it broke, the non-stick surface ended up with several of our meals.  You guys ever heard of a six-sigma program?  I will not buy any of your products again!
Functional, but breaks easily. Cute bookshelf -- looks goods and serves its purpose. However, the tips of it that screw together break really easily.  We were using it at trade shows where we put it up and took it down once a week; it only lasted through 3 shows.  Two tips snapped off the last time we unscrewed it, even though we put very little weight on it when it was in use, and NO weight or funny angles on it when unscrewing.  Probably would work well if you never plan to take it down, but I'd question how much weight it can hold over a long period of time
BEWARE!!!!  Buttons will stop working. It did the job til it became defective.  After a year of light use (avg 3 times a week), three of the most important buttons stopped working: the start button, power level button and minute plus button.  Now the only way we can get it to heat anything is to use the popcorn button.
Save your money. This item is cheaply made and I sent it back.  The picture looks cool but it's deceiving.  The minute hand was so loose that when it was on the right side, it flopped down to the right and then when it was on the left, it plopped down to the left.  It couldn't keep the right time
Opening in bottom of  bowl. I would not have bought this item if I realized that you can only put a small amount of liquid in the bowl.  The blade sits on a shaft that is open and therefore liquid will leak out if you try to remove the bowl from the processor.  This was not the case with my last processor so I never realized I needed to worry about this.  I can't believe anyone would design an item like this
Nor Pro 2066 Grip- Ez Nonstick 13-Inch Splatter Screen. The edges hold in water and it rust extremely fast
unbreakble but breakable. First I liked this press - good coffee, reasonable price.But in 3 weeks operation, the press itself has already broken. The plastic holder for mesh filter has broken...May be this pres is good for ones a year usage, but not for everyday...
Beautiful But Dangerous: Buy For Display Use Only. The Fiestaware Scarlet mugs are beautiful but dangerous.  The handle is much too small for this size mug.  If you can get your finger through the small hole, your finger will soon be as scarlet as the Fiestaware.  The first and only time my family used these mugs, two of us burned ourselves.Fiestaware really screwed up on this one, a shame given the beauty of the Scarlet Fiestaware
Went Up In Smoke After 2 1/2 Years. I got a lot of use out of this toaster oven for the first 2 1/2 years. It toasts fairly evenly, the broiler works well, and the controls are easy.Unfortunately, a problem started about 3 weeks ago. The toast setting would click off after just a few seconds, making it impossible to toast anything. Today I turned on the oven, and the wiring inside the controls started to smoke. I unplugged it immediately and now have to replace the whole unit.I would not recommend this oven. Internal wiring should not burn under normal use, especially after just a few years.
Leaks water all over the place!    &*%#$!!!!!!. I have been anxious for such a device for a long time.  I want hot strong espresso made in my office and not a bulky countertop model.  The first time ever I used this, I  used 'untamped' Illy espresso. Once hot the pressure started shooting hot water out the base of the bottom pot. (It was not the joining gasket area.)Now that the pressure had broke whatever was holding it together in the first place the water leaks out just by gravity.I will have to return this one and hope for a better made one but I suspect it is poor design and others will also fail.In the meantime I am back to drinking the office swill.#$&$#^$% the people that made this item
Wrong product. I ordered this vacuum and was sent a "CleanFast" Model OC-910 that looks pretty much like this one.  I don't know if CleanFast bought Orca, but I expect the same product I ordered.  I haven't opened the box yet to try the vacuum because I'm considering returning it
smelly. these sheets smell like kerosene, even after two washings.  I'm not letting my son sleep on them
Cheap!. Table came with chipped wood on one leg. When put together, the chip got even worse. The table is horribly unsteady. Would not recommend to anyone.
Not so safe.... I bought six of these collars for my five cats. (I bought an extra just in case one of the cats lost one.) I thought the colors were great, and I was happy with the idea of the material, as opposed to cheap vynil. They do look fashionable, I think, and are discreet enough to not take away from the beauty of the cat itself. However, these collars are NOT "breakaway" collars. They enlarge if they get caught on something, but this actually only adds its own problems. Several times my cats came home with one leg through the collar (and the collar extended as far as possible). I hated to think what would have happened if the cat had gotten the collar caught on something AFTER getting the leg stuck. One cat finally did come home without his, and I didn't replace it. Another came home with the collar around her chest (both front legs had gone through), and it was constricting her. I pulled to try to get it off, but it was obviously very painful, and in the end the only solution was for me to cut it off. I decided these collars are not very safe after all--too bad I bought six at once (the reviews at the time were pretty good, generally). I've taken them all off, and now my daughters can play with them on their stuffed animals. They look do look cute! I just don't trust them on live animals
Like watching paint dry .... Drip, drip, drip. One drip at a time. It takes 20 minutes to fill a pasta pot. We've had it 3 years (it never worked any faster than this) and sometimes I'm just tempted to just use the tap water and not worry about lead poisoning from the pipes
worthless. I hope those who just got this and think this is a great product don't get burned like I did.  I thought it was great at first too, but after a few weeks the battery held less and less charge and finally wouldn't charge at all.  No help from customer service.  Do not buy this
Kitchenaid... WHAT were you thinking?!?!. I thought I was the only one who had problems with it!!  I also thought that maybe I had received a defective one, but after reading the other reviews, I'm glad I'm not crazy!!  Just like the others, I had to have it to match my other pink Kitchenaid and Le Creuset kitchen equipment.  I also replaced the battery.  If you almost smash the buttons to pieces, it is possible to set it.  However, if it doesn't go completely blank on you before your food is done, you might have a decent meal
Spray Commander. Only worked for a couple days.  Wouldn't spend my money on it again
WARNING-  FLAMMABLE. Sleep better?  How could you sleep better when your pillow has a WARNING- FLAMABLE label?  Scary.  The pillows are soft but does not have great neck support.  I'm usually a side or stomach sleeper.  The pillows are better for hugging
Go Japanese. There is no substitute for Japanese steel.  Anything based on Yoshkin steel; I recommend Global.German steel is decent, don't get me wrong, but it's sub-par.  I've gone through 2 sets of Henkels and was unimpressed.  I've had my Globals for years and can't even consider a substitute.  These things are so sharp, my girlfriend is too scared to even touch them
tables. the coffe table arrived broken the item where easy to asemble and look good
Poor Construction. We ordered one of these racks and it was OK. Then we ordered another one and one of the pieces was bent making it impossible to contruct. Target replaced it and the replacement was similarly defective- not worth the hassle of going back and forth to the post office
Disappointing quality. I bought this set to add to the single 4 piece set I bought at a  retail store several years ago, which I was totally satisfied with, and Pfaltzgraff isn't what it use to be. My original set was made here in the U.S. and was perfect and defect free. This new set comes by way of China and it shows. Obvious flaws and defects were found on several pieces, one of the dinner plates now has clearly visible scratch marks on it just from eating off of it ONCE! I suspect I will be replacing this set a lot sooner than anticipated. My made in the States set looks brand new after all the years I've had it now. That's why I bought Pfaltzgraff again. I'm sorry I did. It's a shame to see a company sacrifice quality and reputation for the sake of profit!!! Also be wary of buying online. My first shipment had several broken plates in it upon arrival and I had to request a second set be sent to me. That process did go smooth and I was credited for the first set I sent back at Amazon's expense. Bottom line is Pfaltzgraff disappoints me they need to seriously review their quality control of their over seas production
More work than it's worth. Yes, this electric sweeper picks up some dust and lint from floor and carpet, but it spews what it has picked up right back out again. Even if you repeatedly empty the waste container while you are sweeping, you will end up with more dust and dirt on the floor than when you started. You'll either have to use another appliance, or a broom, to pick up what the sweeper has deposited or get down on your hands and knees to pick up what's been  left on the floor. This product not only doesn't do what it is supposed to; it makes matters worse
Please read!. Hello - My wife and I are big Rachael Ray fans, and since I love to cook she bought this item for me. We thought it was a neat idea, because I had been using 2 cutting boards and this might eliminate the need for both. I used a thick wooden one for most stuff, and a thinner plastic one for raw meats. The plastic one was always hard to wash and store, and if you cook 2 or 3 days in a row was hard to always get in the dishwasher and be available.When we first started using this it was great, I actually gave away my other 2 cutting boards! Now keep in mind this was a Christmas gift Dec 2006. Today is Jan 30 2007, and the board has "bowed" across the middle. Kind of like someone grabbed each side and bent it up a little, it looks almost warped. Also, a large crack has developed that spans the length of the board. I have taken pictures of this and plan to submit them to the manufacturer to see if they would like to do anything about it.We never put it in the dishwasher, and didnt treat it any differently than the other wooden cutting board we had for the last 4 years, right now we are very dissapointed with it. I decided to give it 2 stars instead of 1, because the idea is a good one, and for the first month we thought we had a very cool and functional product.We will update this post when we hear back from the manufacturer.(Note: We did not purchase this board from Amazon, although I wish we had. They are awesome at making their customers happy, and have great customer service!!
Bark Control. I set it up for my dogs because they bark whenever they hear a noise or if someone rings bell, I have 3 dogs, I put it on and they went beserk, they started going after each other, I didn't hear anything myself, but I am quite sure the dogs did, like I said they acted very badly towards each other, the tone must have made them lash out like that. I cannot use it anymore.
poor quality grinder. When the box was opened a strong lacquer odor was present and the grinder had to be aired out for several days. The grinder is crudely constructed and therefore, crudely grinds beans. The finest grind that could be obtained was course with some half and even whole beans falling through. Multiple telephone and email messages were not answered by the vendor/supplier
Canisters store but not air or bug proof. The seals are not air or water tight.  There is no problem with the cansiter or the clear window, but I cannot store any flour or rice type products as the seals are not airtight and allow bugs in them.  The canisters themselves do not rust and the lids are not easy to remove
Japanese knives made in China?. I think claims like these would have gotten the two countries into war in the old, old days."Finest Japanese blade steel" on all the knives... but, on the box there is a clear plastic label that says (hold your breath) "Made in China."I think Amazon should make it clear just where these are from. I think they are good knives... and I bought the five piece set for $60 on the Gold Box deal. No doubt they are worth that much... but, more? I don't know..
Just get the cone. The good points: the blue color is as gorgeous as it looks in the picture.  The metal interior keeps beverages warmer longer.  The sip hole is closeable, but not leak-proof. The cone method is awesome for someone who only drinks one cup at a time and doesn't want to fuss with a coffee-maker.The bad points: within twenty days of receiving the mug, the lid's seal was leaking and dribbling in two places from merely one use or less a day.  The bottom of the mug was not cut flat and wobbles dangerously, making gentle stirring a two-handed production. Calling for help was a bear because of different customer service companies handling different Melitta products.  The manufacturer refused to replace it because it was purchased online.To sum up: get the cone alone for a cheaper price either online or at the store. I use it with another commuter mug daily and love it.  The Melitta mug is junk
If you like a BASE model... We've always used Mr Coffee coffeemakers. A friend raved about this Bunn model...really fast coffee with great taste... so much so she sent one to us as a birthday gift.  Well, its great if you dont care about auto shut-off (I DO!) and if you dont care about spilling the coffee when you sneak a cup before the entire brew cycle is finished, the good ol' pause and serve feature (I DO..) and if you could care less about programming your next pot (I DO). Granted, it does brew quickly. But it just doesnt have the features that I want and use, therefore it rates a 1 out of 5
Bad Chicken. I was excited about getting a cute timer that worked with the decor of my kitchen.  Unfortunately, the timer never worked on the product!  Now I am sad
Shark should not be in business. Save your money. This item is aggravation plus. It may or may not work out of the box. If it works, dont get used to it because it will probably die within a few weeks.It will cost almost $30.00 with shipping to have it replaced under their "so called warranty". I can honestly say that if they were 100% free w/free shipping, I would not want or accept another one. Amazon should stop selling all Shark products.Correction: NO ONE should sell these Shark products.
Inferior Product. The only thing this unit filtered was the money from my wallet. Filtration is less effective than an ordinary Brita pitcher. I even purchased a TDS meter (which checks the amount of particles in your water) and found that my suspicions were correct. The Brita pitcher outscores this unit! Emails to the manufacturer were ignored. Do yourself a favor and stick with a Brita or go one step further and get an under-the-sink unit for $100 more than this piece of garbage. Clean water is so important to your health. Spend the money if you can
Crap. I was really looking forward to getting the shoes off the floor of my closet.  Then I hung it up and started to try to fit my high heel into the compartments.  None of them fit.  Apparently when they say that this accommodates heels they mean heels under two inches.  I am really very disappointed.  I am going to have to try to send it back.
Great idea, too bad it doesn't work. I bought this for my mother-in-law at her request.  She has arthritis and saw it on TV.  She also wanted the free gripper that came with it.  I scoured the listings at Amazon looking for one that included the gripper, even paid a little more for it.  She used the can opener once and it broke.  The "free" gripper required sending away for it and an inflated S&H fee
Dissapointed. Worked great for a couple months and then the gears stripped out. Guess you get what you pay for
I'm not impressed. The unit is hefty and nice looking but that is about all nice I can say about it. The grind was no better than from the $20 burr mill it was replacing. On the third use the motor burned up. I also had problems with it making a mess when removing the jar -- such a defect should never have left the factory since it is so obvious
Don't waste your time or money!. Short and not so sweet:First unit did not work at all,Second unit worked for about 3 months, then sporatically, then quit.I should have believed the other reviewers.Going to try the Senseo Supreme unit now
Simple, Effective While it Was Working. The Timex electronic timer is a convenient gadget for controlling lights and appliances.  With basic functions such as current time and a single event timer, the Timex electronic timer can easily control one or more electrical devices.Unfortunately, this particular timer is lacking in a few areas, which would otherwise make it simpler and more powerful. For example, it would be helpful to have a set of colored LEDs indicating the timer's event status and override status. Being a wall timer, which effectively locates the user interface very close to an electrical outlet, it can be difficult to reach. "Table" electronic timers are much easier to place as the interface is located several feet from the IN (power) and OUT (control) receptacles via an electrical cord with one extra conductor.With the recent focus in energy conservation, consumers are often using electronic timers to reduce their electrical usage. In my case, I use my timer as a third alarm clock. Connected to a very powerful full-spectrum light box(Sunray by Sunbox), it is set to fill up my bedroom with light, five minutes before my alarm clock(s) are set to go off. Additionally, it engages a powerful speaker system connected to a digital audio source. In this arrangement, the timer serves as a multi-sensory wakeup tool.While the design appears solid and robust, I have not been happy with its longevity. About a year after purchasing the timer, it stopped working. There is no physical damage. Moreover, opening the unit revealed no fuse nor obviously damaged components. This isn't a problem, however, as I have decided to upgrade to a table electronic timer for easier access.ProsSimpleCompactSleek designConsAmbiguous status (especially from more than 18 inches away)Only One EventLack of DurabilityPossibly InaccessibleLack of clear status indication
Don't believe the fake positive reviews!!! BAD Machine. It is clear that the November reviewers are all the same person... loser!Anyway, this machine is not easy to use, leaks, very wet foam... bla bla yuck!I opted for a Breville... the die cast 800ESXL and immediately noticed the ease and consistency. Of course my best recommendation is a Rancilio Silvia for home (friend has one) but it is labour intensive, have to wait for the boiler to heat up after pulling your shot... etc... if you want consistency in taste, ease of use, and good steam on command... do not buy this machine
worst coffee maker. I agree with most reviewers.  This coffee maker is a piece of junk.  The few cups that I made were the worst tasting coffee ever
DRIPPY AND MESSY. My mother swore by Hamilton Beach appliances.  This is one that I find myself swearing at!  The carafe itself is very drippy - I cannot pour a cup of coffee without having to wipe down the counter afterwards.  The paper filters constantly collapse in the brewing basket and then come out drippy and messy also.I miss my old Mellita - This coffee maker needs alot of help.Sorry Hamilton Beach - I'm calling it as I see it!
Not too impressed. I purchased this espresso maker about 2-1/2 months ago. I have used it about 2-3 times per week. My first disappoinment was the frothing wand. Not only is it placed in a place in which it is difficult to get a mug of milk or water for cleaning without first sloshing some on the counter. Second, the shape and style of the wand does all the frothing itself. If I wanted an automatic frother I'd have bought something cheaper. This allows no proper room for style. For someone who has not operated as a professional barista this may be fine, but I prefer to have more control over how much and what type of foam I create, thus I purchased a "nicer machine" or so I thought.For the most part I am pleased with the espresso itself. I most often get a healthy creme, and when I don't I'm sure it's operator error (improper tamping or whatever).One week ago I made a latte and left to run some errands. I returned to find all my incoming and outgoing mail sopping wet. Perplexed I took a good look around the counter, and noticed that the water carafe in my espresso maker was empty. I always fill it after making the last latte and remembered doing so before I left. I have absolutely no idea how this managed to get cracked.I called the customer service for Delonghi and requested a replacement. I was not asked many questions and the item will be shipped at no charge, however - they tell me that it won't arrive for 5-8 weeks. In the meantime, I am only able to put enough water in the tank to make one latte.I had thought this was the machine to last me for years, but now I am wondering how long it will really hold out.
I wish I'd paid more attention to the dimensions. Just when I thought I was getting used to everything being so much bigger in the US... I should have taken more notice of the other reviews. Beautiful glasses but they are way too small. My set will also be returned, they are a really odd size somewhere in between any use I would have for them
buy a different brand - 1 star is too many for this one. Dogs and cats react only because the sound is novel to them.  The device I received and the replacement after that were so low powered that some animals walk over out of curiosity, some don't react at all and the ones that it scares is only because the new sound startles them.  I had a chance to try a different brand years ago and I know from that experience that this brand is a toy in comparison.  If you think this will protect then give it to your kids and watch how fast they get themselve eaten.  There you go, suicide by dog, that's a good use for it.  May be it is just quality control, you might get lucky,  if not then you might have to deal with a seller that won't return calls or e-mail, like i did.  So you bypass by finding his supplier and get a replacement that is just as bad.  Go to the website and they are obviously throwing away the bad reviews they get and posting only favorable ones.  I hate being cheated.  Score another point for the bad guys
QC getting worse at Braun. My last one (same model) was good.  This one, the auto shut-off just buzzes and doesn't shut off
Lenox Eternal Bath Sheet and Face Cloth. I rate this set very poor.  In less than six months the face cloth has holes in it.  The towel absorption is ok
It Stinks!!!. Be forewarned, there is a 1-hour "curing" process that must be performed in a well ventilated area outside your home. I was aware of this requirement and performed the procedure on my patio. The instructions warn that the roaster will smoke during this procedure and it certainly does.The next day I used the roaster inside the house and that was a mistake. It only gave off  a small amount of smoke, but the smell was overpowering. If you want your house to smell like burning electrical insulation, your throat to burn, and your mouth to taste like you are sucking on a copper penny; then follow the manufacturer's directions. If you really want a Nesco roaster, I would suggest that you repeat the "curing" process at least two or three times before using it inside your home. I'm not sure this will work, it is only a guess as I was so angry that I threw mine in the trash.My recommendation would be to buy a roaster that doesn't require a "curing" procedure before use. If such a procedure is necessary, then the manufacturer should perform it.
not good at all. i had high expectation on this product since i was very satisfied with previous Revere purchase. but this time i was completely disappointed. the saucepans and stockpot have extremely thin walls. as a result, they are to be handled with care, otherwise they will be out of shape easily.
Not good!. This toy is good to keep the dogs attention. The only problem is my labwas able to chew the knobs off the outside and it had sharp pieces on itso I disregarded it! The price is too high as well
The Leaky Machine. We have had this machine for about 9 months. The machine has been in transit and in the repair shop 6 of those nine months. A friend wanted one but I told ,"Don't waste your money". This thing leaks froms the overflow above the coffee basket. Many reviews tell the same story. The manufacture claims they are not aware of the problem. One rep actually told me I must be lying, as the machine can not leak as I discribed. It is finnally fixed. The next failure and it goes in the dump. This was suposed to be a treat for my wife and I. It has been a nightmare!!
Disappointing, totally defective item. I would give it zero stars if I could.Got the product, followed the manual to get everything ready, plugged it in, turn the knob on....and NOTHING!  No power, no fan sound, no light, NOTHING!That's about what this product is worth to me right now, NOTHING!Disappointed to put it mildly.Shame on Rival for slapping a quality control sticker on an item that doesn't even power up.**UPDATE**Amazon sent me a replacement unit, and guess what?  The replacement unit didn't work either!  I made sure the pieces went together as instructed, and that the auger was properly snapped into place, but no dice.Amazon told me they could not ship another replacement because it was, and I quote "As it seems that the problem with this item is more widespread than we originally thought, we are not able to send another replacement. [Hence, I request you to return the item for a full refund]."...and yet it is still for sale here on Amazon.
Su Weet. I just purchased the new one :(. I put it upstairs in the bonus room and bought another just like this. I gave the old away when I purchased the new one. Shame on me. This thing makes tea waaayyy better than the new ones. The new ones wouldn't come close to melting all the ice. Therefore the first bit if tea was okay the last was way watered down..This one rocks !!
Stay away from this one!. This coffeemaker has many flaws and is made of very cheap materials.  I bought it a couple of months ago.  The basket has a tiny spring inside that positions the lever properly in order to control the pause and serve feature.  The screw pops off very easily.  This happened to me when I cleaned the coffee maker for the first time before ever using it.  I figured out how to put the spring back in place, but it pops out almost every time it's cleaned.  Also, the lid to the carafe no longer secures properly.  I'm still using this coffee maker while in the process of trying to find another one
A LEAKING MESS. I was really looking forward to this pillow, I have heard good things from my friends about them. First night was a bit odd, the pillow is very firm and takes some getting used to. I could also feel little beads under the cover, between the pillow and the cover. During the second night I could feel there were more little beads under the pillow case. I looked to see what was going on in the middle of the night, the pillow was leaking beads at an end seam. This is like a bean bag leak but the beads very small. So, after two nights this thing goes back and I clean up the beads. I am disappointed as the pillow itself felt good, but this is a mess. I am opting for a refund of the product and shipping. I don't think I want to roll the dice on a replacement, I'll find something else
Save your money- buy a better quality. The quality of this isnt great- the sound of the "waterproof" material is loud.  I dont like the side material and think it will fall apart easily.  I would save your money and buy the more expensive one that has better quality.
is this the best cleaver?. I made a big decision to invest this expensive cleaver, but very dispointed after first use. It is not sharp, it is difficult to cut through meat and bones. Maybe it is the cleaver for professionals because they know how to sharpen and hone it on daily basis.
Not Absorbent. They look nice, but the towels do not absorb much water.  I am very disappointed.  I suspect I'll use them a few times, then give them to Goodwill
Frame doesn't hold up. I bought this laundry sorter and loved it at first. The concept is great. The frame, however, did not hold up to our family of 6. After using it a short time, the whole unit started leaning. Now it tips over completely. It was only about $18. but it only lasted a few months in good condition. Next time, I'll go for the heavy duty laundry sorter
It broke in one week. Worked great for one week.  Hope I can return it.
awful. Changing the canister (which you have to do once for every large room) is a messy undertaking.  Even if you're careful, dust and dirt slide out with the canister - dropping a mess onto the floor you just had to roll the Hoover WindTunnel over several times to get "clean."  What a waste of money
Horrible Oven. I bought this toaster oven because it had a convection oven.  I have not toasted anything yet but I did make a small roast beef which took as long to cook it as it would if I had used my regular oven and the bottom burnt also. I only used it on the lowest degree and had to guess on how long to cook it.  The instructions do not give you any help with deciding how long and what temperature to use, so you just have to guess. I emailed Oster Customer Service to ask how long to cook things or if they had a some other instructions that might be of help, they got back to me and said "use the temperature that you would normally use to cook the item and cut the cooking time in half" that was not much of a help. I will not buy anything else made by Oster because of the trouble I had with another toaster oven made by them. This one looked good and the inside was large so I thought I would give it a try, I guess that was a bad idea.  I will be returning the oven to Amazon and I have no idea what brand to buy next
Contains bad chemicals. We've had it for a few days and haven't used it yet. It has a chemical smell similar to packing tape. We've placed it in a room with a lot of ventilation. It has the ability to fill the room withthe smell.I'm sure we could manage to fall asleep with the smell but I would like to know that it's safe. The company has not returned any answer on this.They did say to take off the cover and wash it. The cover now has no smell.The smell has gotten better but it is still intense when you get close to the mattress.Update: It contains TOLUENE DI ISOCYANATE 80/20 (T.D.I.). Based on looking at many websites this seems to be a carcinogen and asthma irritant asthma. Please look up on the web and you can find information on it and other people who have experienced problems.
Just Stopped Working & Not Even 1 Year Old!!!!. I loved this coffeemaker, until it just suddenly stopped working and it isn't even 1 year old!!  Previous coffeemakers I owned have lasted years and years.   I expect more from a coffeemaker that cost over $[...]+.  Now I have to find the warranty card and go through all that hassle.  I am NOT a happy customer
No good. I read tons and tons of reviews of this product and decided to take a chance on it.  Well that chance did not pay off.  Even in combination with the spray model my cat continued to spray everywhere.  If anyone else has ideas for something that does work i would really appreciate it.
Too Much Imperfection is Too Much Imperfection. To us, typical Fiestaware pieces have great design, color, durability and functioning wrapped up all-in-one. We ordered a set of Turquoise Candlesticks and were disappointed because the candlestick openings are very disparate in size and shape and it was obvious if one chose to use candles it would be a task to insert them properly with &quot;straight candle&quot; results.  Even more disappointing was the quality of the color application to the product.  Specifically, the lack of even color application to the scrollwork and edges of the bases plus around the edges of the openings for the candles.  We were sent a replacement set which had even more color variation but the openings for the candles were shaped somewhat better.  We are returning both sets because they are not pleasing to view due to the shaping and color variations.  Fiestaware can have a color variation that is subtle and uniform, a kind of &quot;softer&quot; look in the color application around the rims on plates, for example, and the piece will still look beautiful.  We don't want to pay for a product that is not as pleasing to the eye as the rest of our Fiestaware products far exceed the quality of these pieces
I must have got the bad one. It came missing 4 different pieces, including hardware to put it together. The instructions were stapled backward and I found three typos on the first few pages. (I'm glad I read all the instructions over before starting.) I am usually the one in our household that assembles furniture, because I usually enjoy it. This was just a pain in the ass, though. I am more than a little annoyed at all of the stupid stickers they felt the need to label everything with. I had a lot of sticky residue to clean off when I was done, although most of the stickers are in inside or bottom places, there were a few in the front and on top as well. This is the first time I've ever assembled anything and had problems with cam locks, too. I came very close to taking it back to the store, but it was a gift and I had no reciept. It looks gorgeous assembled, but they really need to do something about the packaging. There is no excuse for missing so many pieces
Argh! This is a rotten blender!. This blender died after 4 months of light use. I never asked it to crush ice or do anything really strenuous. I only used it to blend smoothies and tofu desserts - so the toughest thing it ever had to handle was a couple of half-frozen berries. After two months the motor started to have that burned smell when I used it. After three months the plastic bottom part of the canister started to crack. At four months, the motor started making funny noises, it smelled terrible, and the crack on the canister widened so that liquid started to spill out when in use. All in all, this blender was a total waste of money and ended up in the trash. I will NEVER buy a Hamilton Beach product again
Disappointed. Even though I have many knives I purchased this expecting it to be reliably superior.  After a few uses it is less sharp than my other  knives, does not slice vegetables or fruits well and is quite a disappointment
Don't buy if you drink more than 2 cups at a time. I was trying to go retro.  My old coffee pot had a grinder builtin.  My new one did not.  So I decided to purchase this hand mill.It is not very easy to use and does not grind very well.  Plusthe tray where the grounds are deposited is very small and tends tocause a mess.  It is on my kitchen countertop as an ornament.  I wishI would have returned it
Pet Chime. In December 2002, I purchased the pet chime and paw &amp; two additional paws.  I was extremely satisfied with them until the past couple of weeks.  In the past couple of weeks 2 paws have stopped working for unknown reasons and repeated emails and phone calls have gone unanswered by Lentek.  They're great, IF THEY WORK
ridiculous delays. After ordering in December, received notice after notice of delays and more delays. Then, delivery was not promised until at least APRIL. We are talking 4 months after ordering: For 4 wine galsses I could have walked down the street and bought at any wine shop. A very, very disapointed customer. These were gifts. No explanation was given.
Misleading add!!. This add is extremely misleading.  There is nothing in the product features or product description to indicate that this price is for THE RESERVIOR ONLY.  I read the description several times because the price seemed low and the only thing that saved me from ordering it was L. Kozlen's review and the very obscure "- Reservoir" at the end of the product name.  The fountain is probably a fine product but I will do my shopping elsewhere, somewhere without such misleading advertizing
Cheap and low quality. When I read that these sheets were 300 thread count, I expected high quality.  In fact, they are seconds.  On the top sheet, a rip had been hand-repaired, and not very well.  The sheets are thin, wrinkled, and need ironing, even out of the package.  They are also very plain.  Buy something else unless you just need a cheap set for a cottage or someplace you won't use them often
Good concept, weak design. I like the features of this light - nightlight is a good color and the right brightness, motion sensor is sensitive. The down side: after a week or so one of the 3 LEDs in the flashlight part started to flicker and got very dim. Two weeks later another LED did the same thing, so I am in the process of getting it repaired under warranty, which costs me shipping to them and $5.00 more for them to ship it back. Hope this was an isolated case of a defective unit
Rena Air Pumps Model 200. Not what is represented or I have a bad one. I don't know which. Should have returned this one but didn't
works great.......... for 2 months! Then it is DONE!. Although it appears to be a great product for the first couple of months... when it's done.. it's done!  It simply STOPPED working after 2 months.  If you purchase this item, be certain you purchase the small appliance replacement warranty from Amazon.. because the manufacturer certainly will not replace it!
Burner Covers. Pretty, but started rusting on the edges after first wash..Would not buy these again..
Electric stove? Try this other griddle model. For those who have electric stoves, check out the Dbl Burner Reversible Grill/Griddle, item 3535, also available on this website. It is from the same company and can be used on high heat over electric burners. I have had mine for over 8 years and love it. It is easy to clean up
Great pottery, ruined expectations by Macy's. We love Fiesta Ware pottery.  This is a quality product made of tough clay with well matched durable glaze. Because of this and its famous assortment of sumptious colors, I will buy it every time.  However, when buying this product from Macy's I found the following to be true:1.) Items or colors listed as in stock and shipping (the pizza plate for example)get listed as backordered after you purchase and languish for months before the order is inexplicably canceled.2.) Items that are seconds quality being sold as first quality. On average, 10% of our orders included slay slubs, glaze missing in spots and other imperfections.3.) Range of products severely limited4.) Color choice from available range severly limited.So, in short, buy Fiesta Ware. A quality product, made in the United States, of charming beauty--but reconsider Macy's as your Amazon supplier
extra light weight. I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice
Absolutely the Worst Item I have ever Purchased!!!!!. The advertisement for this item says that it can be used on cats, having a daughter who may or may not have difficulty with dander I was under the impression that this was the answer to those problems.  The description is a "massaging brush" but when one turns it on it sounds almost like a small vacuum cleaner.  As you are able to guess, cats scramble from it like a real vacuum cleaner!  On pure accident, it was knocked onto the ground, about two feet to the floor, and ceased working, so the sound was no longer a problem.  The brush surface disloded as well and I have yet to get it back in place.
Junk. Expensive piece of junk that you can buy at Target. Don''t pay for the shipping on this when you can just buy it in a store. Really not worth the money. Shipping  was 169, the unit was 250
Not for hard water!!!. I suppose I should have read the above review but...I washed the flatware in the dishwasher as soon as I received it.  After just a single wash, the knives as well as some of the other pieces had developed pitted rust spots.  I was aware that I had hard water in my new apartment, but I didn't think it would effect the flatware after only a single wash.  And I'd never had a problem with the mishmash of flatware that I was attempting to replace with this set.If I had been able to wash the flatware without ruining it, I would have been very impressed by the pieces.  They're sturdy and large.  Unforunately, I had to return it
Looks good, but. The jar is very nice looking, but the spigot is most difficult to use.  It is a needle valve type spigot that takes about 8 turns to open and close.  By the time you get the valve closed, most of your drink is on the floor.  I would not recomend this item
not good. this product is not worth its high cost.  The bubbles in the water gauge is a hassle--I have to "burp" it with almost every pot.  The spring on the filter basket spout broke almost immediately.  I also have to agree that the coffee is not very hot.  I have used this for 18 months or so.  This product needs work
Works Great, Briefly... As far as whisks for non-stick surfaces go, the silicone-encased wires are very flexible--a far cry from the hard, thick plastic whisks with only a few wires.  They are ideal for non-stick surfaces except for one problem.  The silicone is soft and not durable.  After a few uses or getting banged around with other utensils in the drawer, the silicone gets easily cut.  The silicon then easily peels exposing the stainless wire inside which defeats the purpose.  I have been very careful, but this works out to probably $... each time I used it
Not up to expectations. I bought this product in December 2004.  After two months of use (about once a week) the on/off switch broke.  Eventually after using it for a year (and trying to get Hoover to correct the problem), just before Christmas 2005 I got quite a fright when I started smelling smoke whilst using it.  I discontinued the use of the product, and asked Hoover once again to please look at it.  Their reply was that I should take it to one of their authorised shops, where they'll repair it, charge me.  Then Hoover will see if it was in fact a factory error and only then refund me when they feel they're not in the wrong.Please.  Don't waste your money on this product.  It is defnitely not worth it.  It is noisy, vacuums carpets well when used to work, but is unable to vacuum floors at all.  (One of the options on it).Sorry, Hoover.  But you have lost a loyal customer.  (My whole family for 3 generations back has always bought Hoover, including myself...
Disappointed. I thought I was the only one having trouble with the crate pans.  I have a Golden retriever and have the crate only six months and the crate pan totally broke apart.  I cannot find a replacement for it.  I have one on order from J-B Wholesale but after reading the other review, I am going to cancel my order.  I don't know what to do for my puppy now?I truly am disappointed with the product.
Doesn't fit the Farberware 8 quart pot!. I was VERY disappointed in this item.  I own the Farberware 8 quart pot that this insert is supposed to fit inside, but when I set the insert into the pot, it didn't fit!  The insert handles - which are plastic - sit on the metal side of the 8 quart pot (that can't be good), and the little "feet" on the insert may or may not touch the bottom of the pot.  The ridge around the insert, which I assumed would hold the insert in place in the 8 quart pot, don't fit on any part of the Farberware 8 quart pot! Has Farberware changed the diameter of their Classic 8-quart pot? If I was trying to fit a non-Farberware item into my Farberware pot, I would have had no complaints.  But my 8-quart pot AND the 8-quart insert were both Farberware Classic pieces.  Believe it or not, I had a Cusinart pot which the insert fit, i.e., the ridge held the insert in place, so I'll use it with that pot, but the insert sits some three inches above the bottom of the Cuisinart pot, so when I cook, the boiling water seeps over.  Very very disappointing.  If I'd bought this item from a local store, I would definitely have returned it
Disappointing!. No thermostatic control.  Does not heat uniformly. Pizzelles are dark in some places, light in others.  Is most definitely NOT non-stick...count on the first two batches becoming firmly affixed in every tiny groove, even when oiled well. Have a firm toothbrush handy and lots of patience
Works but is a bit wobbly and had problems assembling. I didn't think I could be unsatisfied with a paper towel holderbut this one was annoying enough to write a review.The main rod would not screw into the base as described in the instructions. Maybe the screw hole was just faulty in this onebut ended up having to use use my own nuts/washers to tighten the holder.Also, when replacing the paper towels, you have to unscrew thetop "knob" which is not very convenient.
Not impressed. I followed all instructions and these bulbs did not grow.  Even with proper llighting and water temperature I had no success.  The company, however, does offer a great guarantee, but I did not pursue this
Workd well, then quit. This kettle worked well, although noisily, for about nine months. Then it just quit. The indicator light would glow when turned on, but the water was ont heated. I would not buy this model again
NEVER BUY THIS PRODUCT. This is the worst product I have ever bought. In fact, I had bought 3 of this disaster and had to throw all away as useless. Its one function in life is to hold coffee, and it can't do that because the lid falls off if there is even slight wind. If you want to buy this product, just flush money down the drain
Very Very Disappointed. I am very disappointed with this product.Its does not look like anything in the picture displayed.Its not worth your money.
Chantal Ceramic 1-Quart Teapot. poor quality.  returned product shortly after it arrived.  it drips all over the place.  recommend against purchasing this product, as you will probably be disappointed
My impression. Dear Customer Service,I am please about the refund; I am please about all thinks that I purchase from you.The web page where I bought: Zelco "itty bitty" Book Light, Volume 2 I believe is not clear.By looking the page I had the impression that I was going to buy a mini lamp where I was able to use the adapter for 110 volt and the lamp is a LED lamp.At list this was my impression.Sincerely,Adrian
Imbues hot food with chemical flavor. I bought this board at my Whole Foods store for many of the advertised reasons. It is easy to clean, nice to cut on, nice for presentation, etc.   My problem with this board (I've had it for 6 months now) is that it transfers a strange chemical flavor to hot foods. It has ruined an entire pizza, loaves of bread and toast I was buttering.  I've followed the break-in procedure (hot washing).  I just think it stinks, literally.  I will only use this to catch crumbs on my counter -I won't put foods on it anymore.
Seven fins, not nine. Yes, I ordered this directly off this amazon page, and yes, I can report that it has seven fins (counting the outermost ones that hold the control panel, etc) and not nine. I read all the reviews just as you probably are doing right now, and thought to give it a shot since the preponderance of opinion seemed to think that there were nine fins and it worked great, as opposed to seven fins and working badly. But the radiator appeared at my doorstep with the lesser number of fins, however which way I tried to count the greater.So. In summary, seven.In other news, the heat all seemed to radiate from the top of the radiator; I could hardly feel any heat when I put my hands on the sides. Of course, I ran it on the lower setting, so it might have just been a function of the power output that I couldn't feel the heat radiating from the sides. (But I doubt it)I ended up returning it, for which I received a full refund! Go Amazon! But someone should really update that picture they have up top to one that us obsessive fin-counters can get a more accurate reading from
Wish I had another slow cooker... My husband bought this for me for Christmas 2005.  I was thrilled to get it since I had an older, smaller model.  I had never burned any food in a slow cooker before I used this model.   I couldn't figure out how to get it to cook SLOWLY.  I finally called customer service and was told I wasn't using the right kinds of recipes.  She told me that the pot had to be at least 75% full.  I used her advice, but it still boils everything on every temperature level.  I use it to make roasts and that is all.  It "sweats" horribly and I have to put it on a cutting board so it doesn't burn my countertop.  The handle cracked after 6 months.  My biggest "ah-ha" moment was when I came home after a long day out.  There had been a power surge, and it had reset itself.  My whole meal was ruined and that is when I realized the value of a dial-knob slow cooker.  Just back away slowly from this one
Could be better. We purchased this machine for our small coffee shop 2 months ago as in the discription it was said to be for light commercial use. We make probably 20-30 cups of coffee a day. Our problems began the first week after receiving it. The machine makes great froth for cappuccinoes but if you want to have steamed milk instead of frothed it either comes out of luke warm temperature allthough the setting is on high temperature or if you put the dial almost on the line between latte and cappuccino it gives you too much foam, which lattes shouldn't have. So customers complain about their lattes being either too cool or too foamy. We called the manufacturer's customer service and were rudely brushed off. For a small business like us it is hard to close for 2-3 weeks to send the machine for temperature adjustment service, so we had to deal with it.Another problem came up 3-4 weeks later, when the machine started shutting off by itself in the middle of steaming/frothing cycle or frother cleaning cycle. Sometimes we had to restart it up to 5 times to make 1 cup of hot chocolate, just to steam milk. At the customer service we were told to reset the computer by unplugging the machine for a couple of hours, which we did. It did not shut off for 1 day! The next day the problem started again...I perform every neccessary cleaning or maintenance procedure that machine prompts and cappuccino cleaning daily, so you can not say that the machine is being neglected.We are very disappointed with this machine. For the price that you pay you would think that at least customer service would be polite, understanding and helpful. Now we are looking for another machine, a back up one, to be able to send Impressa Z5 for service..
Not So Good Coffee Maker. It was hard to clean and use.  I ended up throwing it away after one week.  Hated it..
dont buy this item. Not much to say about this item it sucks. very thin and cheap made. Does not seal at all and does not keep the bread freah This is the worst product i have every got from Amazon.
Not what we expected. We received this today and it turns out it's 60% cotton, 40% poly.  We are sending back
This product is toast!. We bought this microwave to accomodate our small counter.  We figured instead of buying a toaster and a microwave, we could just get this one appliance.  Wrong.  Although it does toast and microwave, it does neither well.  Toasting takes forever and you never get a "toasty, brown" color.  The surface of the bread/bagel just gets dried out.  It does microwave but it takes a long time.  The biggest disappointment, though, was that it does not work at all on microwave popcorn.  Most of the kernals remain unpopped while those that do pop burn as does the bag.  After a few months with this product, we're buying another microwave
Mission Computer Desk. This desk isn't adequately packaged for shipping.  Just a few pieces of brown paper and styrophome corners with the desk pieces inside the box. The first time the desk was shipped to me, both of the legs were broken and the top had a corner smashed and a gouge in the center.  When Target sent me a replacement desk, that one had broken legs also.  A desk with no legs is worthless.
bad experience. out of all the dowels 2-3 were of shorter length. This made entire cloth dryer unstable & useless.. I thought they would first check the product (assemble once) and send it.. dont think they did
This is a piece of junk!!!!. Packaged with four left legs (requires two left, two right)One briquette grate is smaller than the other and falls to bottom as a result.Had to drill / elongate hole to install grate support bracketPaint on handles started to run when I handled them with wet hands. I tried to rinse off the remaining paint or ink under running water so that it will not continue to bleed off. What paint do you know of that rinses off under plain water?Right cast iron grate cracked when it came in contact with heat.The design and construction of this product shows clear disregard for the consumer and is absolutely unacceptable at any price. I have to question at this point weather or not the paint used on the grill and grates is toxic or lead based. I've come across my share of junk but this is really bad!
I really wanted to like this. I have owed Hoovers for years.  When the old one started burning through belts, I found the WT II with the lifetime belt.  "Brilliant!" I thought.  I thought wrong.  This vacuum is clumbsy, roles poorly on any surface, and the gaskets don't seal well so all of the superfine dust falls behind the collection box instead of in it.  The plastic hook that holds the hose broke first time out.  For $300, it should work better.  I should have spent $400 for the Dyson-- anyone I know with one loves it
The designers should be forced to live in this. I dont like reviewing products usless I own them, but as a betta hobbiest ( and prepping to be a breeder) and freshwater tank hobbiest, this is awful! It first caught my eye because I thought it was cute, but it has many drawbacks:the decor in MUCH too large for ANY fishthe tank in MUCH too small for ANY fishBettas fins are delicate and will clamp or tear. They need soft surroundings like fabric or natural decor.Bettas need a MINIMUM of 1 gallon of water but perfer minimum 5 gallons.Goldfish need MINIMUM of 5 gallons , but are community fish so get at least a ten g and 3 fish.Most tropicals require 70 gal. but you can get away with 40 gal.Although they require air to survive and cannot handle much water movement, an adjustable speed-power filter, I love Penguin's bio wheel! Add a uv filter and a small air block for thin bubbles to remove ickies, bad bacteria and viriouses.Remember bettas jump! You don't want to have to go on treasure hunt for your dried crispy friend!I use a 20 gal. community tank w/ fish CAREFULLY sellect! Some will go after the beautiful fins of of the betta and males should never go in with other bettas. Try living and wasting in the smallest cubicle 24/7/375. Though betta probebly will not live that long. [...
for a small not very moist space only. this unit is smaller than i was expecting; it is 11" tall and 5.5" in diameter.  i have it in our small bathroom at the moment because it was too small to affect the humidity level in the 120 square foot room i had originally put it in (i have a hygrometer in the room to measure its humidity and this unit did not affect the humidity level in 24 hours).  i doubt it is adequate for our tiny bathroom.  it seems like it might be adequate for a not-too-humid closet.  it says it removes 16oz. a day at 86 degrees Fahrenheit, but whose house it 86 degrees?  in our humid bathroom it  sucks up a mere third of an inch a day; i guess it performs better in a warmer space.
JUNK, JUNK, JUNK. I ordered 5 sets (10 savers).  Within one week, 6 of them have fallen apart.  Don't bother.  JUNK
Dishes not packed well; broken. I'm glad some of you received these dishes not broken in a million pieces! Amazon or whoever is packaging these needs to learn how to properly pack.  There was no bubble wrap or popcorn at all - just flimsy sheets of cardboard!!  Duh??  I've sent them back twice now and third time won't be a "charm" for me, 'cause I won't go through this again. NEVER will I ever order breakables from Amazon again. The headache was not worth it - even if the dishes are nice and pretty.
DON'T BUY. Everything sticks to it. I thought it was a non-stick, in fact I didn't think they sold anything but that now. Dont buy
Didn't work for me. Made my cats worse!!. I have 5 cats, all who got along very well as they were from the same litter. When I adopted another cat 2 years later, it messed up the "balance", and everyone started hissing at each other.I tried Feliway because of all the great reviews I read on a couple websites. I used the product for 2 1/2 months, but finally decided to stop. My cats had always used their litterbox (even with the newcomer in the house because they had separate litterboxes). A couple days after I plugged in the Feliway, they started peeing on the rug in the living room, on the couch, the sofa bed, and finally in my own bed!! I tried everything to get them to stop, even to the point of throwing out all my bedding, yet nothing stopped them. The hissing got worse, they started having little "cat fights" (which they had never had before) and after 2 1/2 months, I finally unplugged the 2 Feliways I had purchased (note that I changed the refill every 30 days as suggested). It's been a week now, and things are a little better, but not back to the way it was before Feliway. I think it will take some time. My advice to you : Be very careful to monitor your cats if you use any artificial products. These things don't work for all pets
Not worth the money!. The first time I tried using this machine to make beef jerky it shut off in the middle of the process.  I had to stay next to it for 8 hours making sure it didn't shut off.   When it shut off I had to take the cover off and let the machine cool down.  And this happened about 15 times.  What a pain!  I called the company and they said that they would send me a new one but I needed to ship the old one to them at my cost - WHAT!  This is a brand new machine used once and I have to pay to ship the machine back.  Buy a different machine
Cracked the First Time They Were Used. Although these are rated for use in an oven up to 500 degrees, mine cracked the first time I used them in an oven (which was only set to 375 degrees).  They are pretty thin (not much thicker or heavier than dinner plates, really), so don't inspire a lot of confidence when you hold them.  So really they should get zero stars.  But if you don't plan to use them in the oven, but just as serving dishes they would be cute
Terrible cookware...save your money. The best thing I ever did was buy this pan.  Because it was a cheap lesson to learn and I returned my larger set before opening the box.  This is terrible cookware.  I have this pan and the wok and tried cooking on it for nearly a year but am now so frustrated that I'm giving it up.  I understand how to cook on stainless but still, who needs this aggravation of burning food and not being able to clean the pans!!!!  You can not cook an egg on this pan, it's a kitchen disaster!  Save your money, test with this pan first
DON'T BUY FROM THIS COMPANY!!!. In early December I ordered products from Sharper Image as Christmas gifts.  Half of my order did not arrive and I never received notice as to why.  Turns out I had to call them to find out the items were on backorder. I finally cancelled the order and a month and a half later THEY STILL HAVEN'T REFUNDED ME!Do yourself a favor don't buy from these guys they're comepletely disorganized
Poorly made. We have designed most of our kitchen around the KitchenAid red.  We thought in the pictures that this breadbox would match, so we bought it.  It does not match that color very well but the real reason we returned it was because it was so cheaply made.  It felt like it was ready to fall apart when we pulled it our of the box.  The lid did not move freely.  We ended up returning it and getting an all stainless box for $10 less that was much better built and looked better
too hot-too hot-too hot. i have been using this product for a few weeks now.  it is very comfortable and provides a great base for the laptopthe problem? it is TOO HOT...this is only marginally better than having no venting at all.  i have another type of lap desk without the padding and it keeps my lap top very cool.so you have a choice to make, comfort or cooling....unfortunately this product does NOT provide bot
Broken. I really truely wish I would read reviews and stop ordering from Amazon.All four pieces are broken. One in tiny bits. Stupid me just opened the package from a month ago!
Poor Customer Service. I purchase this itam for a Christmas gift for my Mother. I received it on 11-6-06. There is 4 broken pieces. I contacted customer service and the rep. kept reading the return policy that the whole set had to be returned. The Supervisor refused to get on the phone. I wrote an email and complained and I told them the reviews indicated Amazon worked with other customers to replace the broken pieces. I recieved, this morning, an email stating I had to return the whole set. I don't under the problem since they sell the individual pieces on their wed site. The set is pretty but not worth the aggravation. 11-9-0
NOOOO!  Don't Waste your $. I was wanting something to make cleaning the kitchen floor a bit easier.  This "broom" needs to be held at a particular angle for it even to suction anything.  Very frustrating...must be why it is on sale!!!!!
Warning! Not real Laguiloe that you know and love!. I knew better than to order a set at this price, but hey... you never know. Now I do. I thought perhaps the first price was reflective of the sets quality--boy was I wrong. This set would never sell for 60 some dollars.  Although the knives are useable (hence the 2 stars) they are NOT of good quality. The box is very flimsy and I wouldn't give this as a gift. If you want a knock-off go to TJMaxx or someplace and see these kind of knives for yourself before you buy. I'm going to save for some real Laguiole knives!
Wood handles suck!!!. After being introduced to Aebleskivers over a year ago, my whole family fell in love with them.  Never once owning any cast iron cookware, I did not know of the various atributes to look for when purchasing one.  NEVER BUY ONE WITH A WOOD HANDLE.  The cast iron may last a lifetime (and then some), however with regular use, the handle completely deteriorated inside one year.  I am now cooking entirely with cast iron and am looking to replace the aebleskiver pan with a fully cast iron one (Griswold being my choice for this pan, Lodge looks ugly
Get it at the grocery store. Unless you're really impressed with the color green, the filter itself can be picked up at the grocery store.  The one around the corner from me was selling them for about $1
Wait for version 2.0. A great idea, but falls short for the cat.  It needs to do more, maybe if it turned around in circles (the whole thing) ocationaly, and had a speed control.  Unless I am holding it and moving it myself, my cat simply stares at the beam or sniffs at the toy
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
DON'T BUY THIS CUISIPRO GRATER!!!!. LOUSY!!!!  The handle design makes the Cuisipro grater extremely difficult to hold.  There is a BIG space between the drum and the hopper and big pieces of cheese fall through. I grate a lot of cheese, and I am sorry I bought THIS grater
Not for the serious minded.. Perhaps the larger model works well. This smaller magnetic set is tragic. The only upside is that if you're working on your grip strength, these will probably help. To get a useable amount of pepper, you'll have to squeeze 15-20 times. They feel cheap and destined for a quick trip to the trash can. Stick with a tried and true twist grinder.
Not so hot...literally. Received this as a gift and I must say I'm very disappointed. At its highest setting it takes forever to toast. The other issue is that if you buy any bread with "non-standard" width (like home-made, gourmet breads) it won't fit into the toaster
Disaster. I agree with Kelly's review.  The surface is smooth and polished.  The handles, lid and container, cannot be grasped even wwith a towel.  Terrible problem when hot
false advertising. Although the &quot;technical data&quot; said this pot is safe for the stovetop, when it arrived, its own literature said very clearly that it is NOT safe for stovetop use. The only reason I ordered it was because I wanted something I could move from stovetop to oven or broiler. THis is very disappointing
poor quality. Around 100 thread count, worst possible quality, not soft, not comfortable. Pattern is ok, but these people think you'd buy a turd if it had a Jedi on it
Invisible killer. After I cracked and ruined my original filter, I purchased a new one that insisted the BioMax inserts were essential to its functionality. Having had my original filter for about 6 years, I decided to follow the instructions about adding BioMax, thinking this was a product upgrade. I was deeply dissapointed. Not only did it create cloudy water, despite my effort to add "clear water" drops to resolve this, but the lifespan of my fish decreased dramatically.  I was losing fish every week.  Once I removed the BioMax insert, the water cleared instantly and my fish started to thrive
Poorly made. After a few uses the wire stretches and then breaks.  It is not repairable.  Too bad, since they make other good products.
No High Marks for This One. I have never really "reviewed" an item, but always read, so here's my donation.  No evengrinding in either mill (one holds salt, the other pepper) without lots of fussing with the screw nob at the top to adjust the opening. Some peppercorns come out broken in half, while others are appropriately "ground".  Peppercorns get caught in the grinding mechanism.  In the case of the salt mill,  again uneven grinding.  It may be because the sea salt I have in there seems a bit more moist than bone dry.  My chief complaint is that when you use the mill, you need to adjust the screw on top with every movement, thus, you get what I mentioned...the case of the uneven grind!
Watch out for lemons -- broke after 2 days. My company bought one of these to replace the similar Capressa 1000 machines which finally broke after N years.After 2 days, the LED readout of the functional information stopped working. The machine continues to operate, but you can't tell what's going on, how much water it will use for your particular cup etc.Very disappointing. We'll see how good the warranty repair is, and report back to you after we experience *that*.
one trick pony doesn't always do the trick. This was a gift that was going to go in the white elephant pile, but after sitting in a closet for a year, I took off the packaging and decided to give it a try. The very first avocado I planned to use it on was smaller than the implement and so it simply could not be used. I tossed it back in the drawer and grabbed my handy paring knife - which was quick and convenient to find and perfectly acceptable. I have never used it again.
Looks good but. I bought this pan and to my suprise I had to assemble the handles on the skillet and the lid.  The handles on the skillet were not bad at all but the lid....   Anyway, after I got it assembled, wash, and dried per the instruction manual I plugged it in a began cooking.  It was amazing-my chicken came out beautiful!  Two days later I was cooking and the thing went out on me!  It became cool to the touch. I left it alone for a while thinking maybe I did something wrong-but I was already cooking at a low temperature.  It did not come back on when I replugged it in.  Hence I had to give it back.  I was so disappointed.  I am just glad it did not happen while cooking the feast I had planned for the following week.  Save your mone
Mine fell apart too - real quick. I had this mug in rotation with two others from different makers. It may have went through the dish washer (top shelf)  three times in about a month and a half. The rubber bottom fell off. The inner cup seperated from the outer liner. I've tried to hot glue it back together with no luck. Definetly not worth the money. Incidently, the two other cups - one was a promotion item from a trade show, the other was a gift from Starbucks that came with a gift card.  I've used the two other mugs, dishwasher and all and they have held up. Incidently. I bought the mug along with a Cuisinart Grind and Brew. now that is a great product
nonstick layer comes off. nonstick layer chipped off even though I have never used metal utensils on it.  the handle is not tightly attached to the pan - it shakes.  very disappointed.
Don't Bother !. The oven came out of the box DEFECTIVE -- it did not heat at all!  The rotisserie turned, the lights came on, but NO HEAT at all!  I removed the chicken and tried plain 'ol baking -- NO HEAT.  Now I have to drag the darn thing back to the store!   No more Hamilton Beach products for me!  If Hamilton Beach's "quality control" does not detect such a major problem, how can they detect smaller ones?
My Pups Just Didn't Get How To Use This Product. I was really hopeful about this product working.  I have four dogs, ages 2 through 8.  I tried and tried to teach them how to use this product, but they just never could make the connection of the bark to pushing the button.  They just ignored the paw and wouldn't ever put their paw on it to even touch it
SMALL KITTIES ONLY. This is not large enough or cuddly enough for a grown cat. I have two cats and purchased two of these beds...they won't have anything to do with the beds. Look at higher side beds and larger for adult kitties
Very Disappointed. After slightly over a year, the liner developed a couple of chips and, upon closer examination, two cracks along the height of the liner. These developed the last time I used it--in one use and for no apparent reason. Though I love the way the cooker looks, I've never used it for anything other than slow cooking so its versatility is useless to me. Even if a replacement liner was available, I would worry this would happen again (with food inside?) so I'm going back to the stoneware style--which lasts many, many years
Doesn't quite fit. It almost fits my Black and Decker HCC100 Home Cafe coffee maker, but severely binds when I try to close the lid.  I am going to try to identify the points of obstruction and make it fit by carefully filing plastic as necessary
Don't throw out the box. It worked for less than a month. I was so excited to take the Shark Sweeper home. It worked great until I needed to charge it. The motor never started again. I could not return it because I threw away the box. What a waste of $40
Royal Albert Rose Cameo Collectible Teacup, Green. This teacup has a beautiful design, but I was very disappointed when I received it.  The cup and saucer were much thicker than I would have expected for a china teacup!  It also had a problem with the scalloped design for the foot of the cup as this caused the cup to rock as it sat on the saucer.  I sent it back as I could not imagine trying to drink tea from this cup
Ordered these pans twice----Still no lids!. THE ONLY REASON I EVER ORDERED THESE PANS IS BECAUSE THEY COME WITH THE LIDS.. !!.. Pans this size are hard to find lids for & for the PRICE aren't WORTH it without LIDS... This pan as decribed is to come with LIDS. But I've ordered them twice 4 pans in all & still no LIDS.. So I'm requesting a Refund this time.. I have purchased many of these pans from this company & they are very nice . Well worth the Price.. TOO BAD THIS PAGE IS MISLEADING.. I'm Ready when they get LIDS!! Reason for only two stars is NO LIDS... The Pan Rocks.
it will RUST and MILDEW. I find it hard to give this even a 1-star. Given the price, I really thought this would perform to the praise of the other reviewers. Here's why I am sorely disappointed:1) the &quot;stainless&quot; steel does in fact rust and corrode2) the rimmed bottom tray has no drains, no openings, so obviously no incline so water just sits and stagnates, and if you live in warm climates will in fact start to mildew3) check your water softness, because if your water is too hard it will leave calcium and other deposits which require DAILY cleaning otherwise it will be very unsightly
Made in China???. I can't believe after buying Rosle tools for years that the whisk I just got yeasterday is not made in Germany but China. On the label on the whisk it says China and yet in the review it says twice "Made in Germany".  Is anything by Rosle made in Germany anymore
I bought the last broken one on earth!. Ordred Feb 25th, recieved a broken one soon after.  I returned it right after and now its the middle of April and it is still not here.  If you live in Wisconsin they are $15.99 at a pick n' save.  I give up!  I have bought several things from Amazon and still have yet to recieve them or find out shipping info.  I have better things to do with my money. I will now shop somewhere else!!!!
Not the Gooses that Laid the Golden Egg. Like the other two people who already commented, my Blue Ridge 2" Baffle Box Feather Bed (Queen Size) looks good and is nicely priced (I purchased it as an Amazon 'Deal of the Day' item), but unless you enjoy feathers poking you all over, you should avoid this product at any cost. I have two sheets, one flannel, covering the product, and I am still being uncomfortably poked
Stemless wine glasses. The price is right, but these stemless wineglasses are so lightweight that one of them broke in my daughter's hand. I was surprised at their thinness since they are made by a company that makes glass coffee and tea pots
Luke Warm. Like everything in the world, this coffee maker is lawyer approved. In other words it does not get hot enough to cause any harm. Unfortunately one minute after poring it is not hot enough to be considered a good cup of coffee.Every day I have to warm my coffee up in the microwave.
Should have listened to the negative reviews............. I would not recommend this coffeemaker to anyone.  The coffee does taste funny and I didn't realize it might be the metal pot.  Also, DO NOT pour the coffee unless your cup is over the sink as one quarter of the coffee spills out.  Just like one of the other reviewers said, the pot does not slide in and out easily.  Not a coffeemaker I would recommend.  The only thing I like about it is the size!!!!!!
It's Disappointing. It's not a slipcover at all, just a quite large rectangle throw. Although the fabric looks pretty good, it's has no use to me
Last Time I Listen to My Mother About a Product. I bought this for my mother a year ago, and I was recently looking for a vacuum myself, so being a person big on checking reviews on items before purchasing, I asked her how she liked it. She said she liked it, and thought it worked well, and loved how light it was (she suffers from rheumatoid arthritis). So... needless to say I went out and purchased it, trusting mother deartest's opinion.I HATE IT!I just moved out of my house, and I had to clean (vacuum) every room in the house. It took three times the amount of time it would ave taken a regular heavy Hoover vacuum to do the job. One sweep for a normal heavy vacuum turns into thirty for this piece of s*** just to pick up some damn crumbs.Also, you have to clean it out every five minutes because the filter gets covered so easily, after only vacuuming about half a room.It WILL NOT suck up hair. Rather, it gets tangled in the wheel, and looks like a thirty year old hairbrush that was never, ever cleaned out. Hence, making it harder and harder to pick things up (not that it does to begin with).It's loud, time-consuming, and the biggest waste of money.The only thing it has going for it is its weight, which is highly overshadowed by how much it sucks anyway.OH... AND I've used this product ONCE. ONCE! One time of use pretty much was all it was worth. IF THAT.I'm taking it back... and throwing it at them.DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS PEOPLE!!
OLD ROOMBA WALL. The picture does not match what I received. The picture shows a virtual wall for the new Roomba models. Instead, I received a wall for the original Roomba model
Just doesn't work well. We've had the same KitchenAid mixer since the 70's, and we love it.  But we thought why not give our little "yellow wonder" to our daughter and buy ourselves a shiny nearly-new one.  Well, it arrive looking great.  But when my husband starting his bread-making ritual he found that the dough hook did not reach the bottom of the bowl as it had on our old one, and the motor did not sound very healthy.  Returning the machine has become a nightmare.  I now have a firm promise that UPS will pick it up in the next three days...this is after several exchanges and having it sit on our enclosed porch for pick-up a month now
Sorry there was not a Zero. If you do not own this DO NOT RUSH OUT TO BUY IT . This is waste of of money!! My tips for you would to be buy your own bottled beer;and be responsible with it. Or donate your money to M.A.D.D. it is tax write off and you will be doing something good to help others, maybe yourself or a family member
problemic coffee maker. This coffee maker is beautiful, however, it has a problem.  The on off switch sticks a lot.  Kitchen Aid replaced the entire system for me a  few times and finally I gave up and bought a cheaper more reliable coffee maker.  All the replacements they sent to me developed the same problem
DO NOT BUY ANY SELF PROPELLED HOOVER VACUUMS. HOOVER HAS A KNOWN PROBLEM WITH THE BELTS STRETCHING OUT ON ALL THE SELF PROPELLED VACUUMS, BUT WIL DO NOTHING FOR CUSTOMERS STUCK WITH THEM! WE MUST REPLACE THE DRIVE AND PROPEL BELTS EVERY COUPLE OF MONTHS. REDICULOUS POOR CUSTOMER SERVIC
Dont bye Amazon products. Never received the product, accoring to amazon it was delivered a week ago. It was actually delivered to Amazon not me! Not even a phone call. I will never buy another thing from them
Not what I expected. Was very disappointed in this comforter. While it is heavy like I had anticipated, it is not soft in any way shape or form, it is like newspaper, it crackles on the bed and makes noise all night long
Buy the disposable mill & pepper in condiment section. It may be good for people with weak hands...as long as they don't really want a lot of pepper.  I found the amount of pepper ground per squeeze minimal.  My hand gets tired before I get an amount ground equivalent to two twists on a $2.59 self-contained pepper with disposable mill from the condiments section of any grocery store. Half of the pepper stays in the ball to fill the grinder teeth and further reduce the output.Although advertised as a one hand pepper mill, it is best used as a two handed device.  The squeezing action tends to broadcast the ground pepper over a wide area. If you wish to concentrate in a bowl or on a food item, one hand has to steady it over your target.Refill is a challenge and equivalent time is spent picking up pepper corns that bounce off the small, almost perfectly hidden fill slot.Again style overrides functionality.
Disappointing. When I saw this advertised I thought what a great idea to make tea cakes for a Mother's Day tea for the young and not so young. After getting one today I decided to just use a mix for a quick trial. I used a lemon poppy seed muffin mix. When I took them out of the pan they just looked like splotchy blobs. They had not browned evenly and the patterns did not show clearly if at all. A very small ice cream scoop made filling easier, if you over fill they really look like complete blobs. Maybe a thinner batter would give better definition of the shapes? I don't know what to do about the browning. I may try one more time, then back it goes. Anyone with any experience with this product
Crock Pot yes, Bbq - No. I was disappointed in this product. I BBQ a great deal and did not achieve the same favor using this pot
Did someone say warm?. Don't waste your money on this. Unless you like your coffee luke warm (I can't imagine it) you will not be satisfied with this product. I am promptly returning mine
Not at all what I expected. This pillow was a disappointment.  It's advertised as 'firm,' but it's not.  It's like sleeping on mush. There's no support at all. Don't buy this if you are looking for a firm pillow
can not replace battery. We've had this for about five years.  The battery went dead but THERE IS NO WAY TO CHANGE THE BATTERY.  The battery is soldered to the circuit board!  They expect you to ship it back to the factory which will probably cost $20 each way!  I opened it up, cut out the old battery, and duct-taped a new battery in there but it just comes loose every few months.  Cooks rice great, though
Patton Fans Suck, not Blow....... I bought a 20" Patton fan in the mid 1980's, used it 24/7 year round, and it lasted 15 years. It was a very well built fan, and the speed control produced major variations between the low, medium, and high settings. The low setting moved copious amounts of air and was VERY QUIET.I just bought this 14" model and it's a cheaply made piece of junk, but what can you expect from something made in China?? The speed control has very little range, and the fan is almost as noisy on low as it is on high. DO NOT purchase this fan for use anywhere you might sleep, or need a quiet source of air movement such as in a TV room, etc. They are best suited for a small shop, or outside while BBQing to keep the mosquitos blown into the neighbor's yard.The Chinese don't use enough padding and filler inside the box to secure the fan during shipment, so be advised the fan has plenty of room to flop around inside the factory box. Add to that the poor packaging Amazon uses to add a second box for shipment to the customer, and you have what amounts to potential shipping damage. Looks like the job some clowns do when shipping items they sell on eBay.To their credit, the fans are inexpensive and move more air than much larger fans.
so very disappointed. we had a heated pad for years that finally played out. it was wonderful. wanting to spend less this time than i did for the first one, i bought this item. i wish i had never put it on the bed so i could have returned it. i was suspect when i opened it. poor quality material. poor bed fit. very very warm on the lowest setting. after 3 sleepless nights of feeling the wires, which are quite large, in my ribs--it had to come off. i had rather be cold and i hate being cold
Commercial is total bull. I have a hefty tortoise-shell Manx who is constantly shedding.  I saw the commercial for this product, and the gobs of hair it removed from the animals, and just had to have one.  Boy, was I ever disappointed!  When I try to brush my cat with it, the teeth just float on top of her hair... they don't even go down into the undercoat.  Maybe it's because she's chubby, I don't know, but it sure doesn't work for her.  I'm left handed, so I had to turn the blade the other way on the handle.  Maybe I'm not using it right.  I'm still very disappointed.  The animals they show on television must have not been brushed in years for them to get that amount of fur off of them
Plastic Taste. No matter how many times this pitcher was washed, it still kept making the drinks taste like plastic. After trying various types of liquids, and always drinking exclusively out of real glass glasses, I finally tossed the pitcher because it kept ruining every drink with that awful plastic stink and taste.Only high-grade plastic won't transfer taste and odor. It's surprising to see a good company like Rubbermaid would use low-grade plastic for a pitcher of all things.
can't assemble table. It was impossible to screw the table legs securely to the table top without stripping the heads on half of the 8 bolts.  They just wouldn't go in far enough.  Nice quality wood, but useless if it can't be assembled following their instructions.
Doesn't last. When it works, this blender does a fine job, and looks great.  However, our first one quit turning the blades in less than a year. We sent it in, after MANY calls to customer service, and they kept the darned thing for 3 months before deciding to send us a replacement.  The replacement lasted only 2 years before the blades broke.  During that 2 years, we figured out that our extra set of blades didn't fit in bottom ring properly, and allowed fluid to pour through the motor.  Great.  I should have save up to buy a vitamix instead
Need size. Crystal D'Arques Longchamp Wine glass has10.25oz, 8.25oz,5.75oz, 4oz, 2oz, 5 different size.They are all look a like and can't tell by picture.I'm looking for my missing set of 5.75oz.I can't buy them without size information.
Horrid. Too small to be of much use, this tea kettle is also too hot to handle.  Using a pot holder on a tea kettle is clumsy and should not be necessary.  Keep searching, there has to be something better out there
Waste of $20. Feels nice fresh from the package, despite the loose threads (poor-quality sewing I'm sure).  After 3 washings, they are starting to pill.  They have also shrunk, and fitting them on the bed is now a very tight squeeze.  Definitely not 400TC, and definitely not Egyptian cotton.  Waste of $20
A Disposable Vacuum!. Wow!  How clever of Euro Pro to make a disposable vacuum!  No other company has ever thought of that before!  They did forget to mention on the box that the vacuum can last up to three months.  This is a plus for people who don't want to purchase a new vacuum every month.  This one lasts so long (THREE WHOLE MONTHS!) that you only have to buy four per year.  At $60.00 apiece, that's only $240 per YEAR.  What a deal!Oh, wait a minute.  My mistake.  It's not supposed to be disposable.  But alas, it is.  Besides, you could take that $240 and go to a vac shop and get a commercial quality vacuum for about $300.  And it would  last for many YEARS, not just three MONTHS.After my first Euro Pro cordless went kaput (after three months), I tried in vain to get support from customer service.  Euro Pro's customer service is worse than bad, it is non-existent.  On a scale of 1 to 10 I would rate it a negative 10!Thinking that perhaps I just had a lemon, I foolishly bought a new Shark.  (I have a bad back, and it is difficult to bend over and plug and unplug a vacuum.)  It lasted three months as well. I thought perhaps it was the belt, and I finally managed to order a belt from the internet, and took the Shark to a vac shop to have the belt replaced.  The vac man said it was a piece of junk, but he swapped out the belt.  The vacuum will now pick up SOME of the dog hair off the carpet, though not much else, but it is useless on hard surface floors.Due to the complete lack of anything even remotely resembling customer service at Euro Pro, I will NEVER buy another Euro Pro product as long as I live.  I sincerely hope that my experience will not be in vain, and that it will help keep others from wasting their hard earned money on this or any other Euro Pro product.
Perhaps a Design Problem. I guess I am a slow learner.  I have bought two now.  Unfortunately, after two or three weeks of use the bottom of the filter begins to bulge and break away.  I use the recommended amount of coffee and a filter.  I do enjoy the coffee it makes when it is working correctly.  I have not found a stronger metal alternative filter for the Black and Decker
broke in 11 months. mine broke in 11 months.  it switches off by itself before the water gets boiled
nightmare on ice. The Amazon product picture makes these trays look like they produce square cubes and will, therefore, rest upon each other without spilling.HOWEVER, the product one actually receives from BIC Superstore are trays that produce longer, comma-shaped ice; and the trays themselves do not rest on each other at all.  The bottom of one tray freezes into the ice of the next, so you get a frozen block of ice and trays, all stuck to each other and impossible to crack apart without hot water.These trays are a big mess.  They don't nest without spilling!  And don't be fooled by the "-" and "+" signs on the end of the trays, no matter how you stack them, they won't stack without spilling!  Also, BIC doesn't share Amazon's helpful return policy, so BUYER BEWARE!!
Holmes 2 cool. Very satisfied in receiving the Holmes fan before the scheduled date.The fan was very easy to put together and take apart.The noise level was too loud.  It does not tilt more than a inch and oscillates only 5" left and right of center.I had to return this item.I do not recommend this fan.
it wasnt delivered. im sure i would have loved it if it only had arrived. Now im just a bit poorer than before
expensive humidifier. This product is very expensive.  It eats filters if you`re on well water.  I have to clean the unit more frequently then is normal--everytime i change the water, and the filters, when they work, need to be changed once a week at $.13.88 a pop.  i bought this to avoid having to buy distilled water,  but  that was a mistake.  It humidifies well, but I know there are better cheaper ones out there
Don't waste your money. All the Littermaid products I have owned are cheaply made & break easily.  This is no exception.  I decided to give them another try- the item looked improved from the original big square version of their litter cover.  The plastic is cheap and breaks easily.  The material is flimsy.  My cat peed on it and I washed it, but didn't dry it- it shrunk!!!  and wouldn't fit in the frame anymore- I had to throw the whole thing out after MUCH MUCH frustration trying to get the thing back together.  Definitely don't waste your money on ANY Littermaid products
Works, but strangely. This things *does* work, although the fan doesn't blow the heated air very far away from the unit.  It is possible to adjust the thermostat knob so that it keeps your room the right temperature, but when it is reaching the temperature that you've set, it switches on and off constantly.  (Like 20 times in 10 seconds -- seriously.)  I'm not sure that this one isn't slightly defective, since most thermostat controls have a non-switching region where they don't change their state as long as the temperature is within a certain range.  For instance, if you set your furnace thermostat to 68, it turns the furnace on at 67, not 67.992 and turns it off at 69, not 68.002.  This apparently doesn't have that feature -- it literally runs for less than 1/10th of a second on a regular basis.  I wonder how long the thermostat relay will last with the constant cycling.
Very Poor Quality. I am very disappointed.  These flowers are worse than what you see at a grocery store.  I ended up paying more from another vendor and getting flowers that she liked.  I buy roses alot, and I know what a fair cost is for good quality.  If you're paying less than $30, beware
Piece of Junk!. This fountain is a piece of junk.  I ordered three of them, and all three had cracks and holes in the top piece.  The top piece is a molded resin that is very thin in places.  The thin regions easily crack, making it unsightly, interfering with the performance, and within days rendering the fountain unusable.  I was very disappointed and ended up buying an entirely different fountain
Doesn't Remove Wrinkles. I am VERY disappointed with this product.  It is not powerful enought to remove the wrinkles from clothing.  The only way I found to get it to do a fairly decent job is to stretch the piece of clothing downward as it hangs, and rub the fabric with the brush on the steamer while steaming, going over and over the same spot.  It's like trying to iron vertically, only with no support behind the article of clothing.  It doesn't remove wrinkles nearly as well as an iron, especially if there are any unwanted creases, and it takes considerably longer than ironing, since you have to steam the same spot over and over again.  I bought the steamer because it uses tap water, and distilled water is a hastle to find when travelling, but tap water eventually causes irons to leave mineral deposits on clothing.   Instead of this product, I recommend a standard iron or travel iron.  It's easier to travel with a travel iron and just use a spray bottle filled with tap water to mist the clothes if you don't have distilled water to fill the iron with.  The Conair GS15 Hand Held Fabric Steamer is a waste of money that doesn't do its job
breaks immediately. As others have commented, very poor workmanship. The first pitter I had lost the pin on its third pitting round. Hammered it back in but didn't last. The next season I needed one quickly but couldn't find a different one, so bought it again. The pin was lost during the first use. I have no idea why all local stores seem to carry just this pitter
Disappointed. Good for a few weeks. Now it starts to make loud girdling noises. Now the water seems to SLOWLY leak. Water ran well when I first got it but after a few weeks (3 weeks) the water seems to stop running (now only leaking drip by drip). The girdling sound is so loud that it scares my cat. I put enough water in this thing but I really do not know why the machine is not pump smoothly and powerfully even at max setting. Waste of money
not for all dogs. I have a very hyper mini schnauzer and i thought that i could control her aggressive barking and yapping.  It is very out of control and this device didnt help at all. I know am purchasing a tritronic no bark shock collar.  A friend has one and recommended it to me.  They are 99 dollars but this is 25 and not worth a dime to me. The dazer does get animals attention for a while but they soon get use to it and then all you can do for it to be effective is to throw it at them.
white on black, not black on white!!!. The photo for this item shows a white napkin with black stripes.  What gets shipped is a black napkin with white stripes.  Since the label on the napkin itself matches the description on this item, I believe it's the photo here that is wrong.Nice quality napkins, though.  Heavier than I expected.  If they had been the right color, I'd have kept them
LEAKS WHEN SHAKEN!. I bought this shaker and found that it leaks when shaken.  I ended up returning it and bought a Boston shaker instead.  The Boston shaker is simple to use and best of all, it never leaks
Overpriced, so-so toast launcher. Smitten by the possibility of having old English craftsmanship preparing my toast after several years of disposable toasters, I ponied up 75 bucks for this baby. When my dog sees this toaster come out, she waits patiently to race me for the slice before it hits the floor.  Results are not much better than a 20 buck Chinese piece of junk.  Fair to good toasting of many bread & English muffin types.  If this toaster lasts, maybe the launching mechanism will wear down a bit after a few years and work properly.
Pump doesn't last. For what this item costs you would think that the pump would last longer than 3 months.  I really like foaming soap because I have three young children who have a tendency of making a huge mess with both bar and liquid soap.  Since there is so little actual soap in foam soap there isn't the big mess to clean.  But I have a fundamental problem with paying for bottles of diluted soap.  I searched high and low for an attractive foaming soap dispenser and Cuisipro was about all I could find.  But within 3 months the pump started to stick and I have to manually move it up and down.  It's cheaper to keep refilling the store bought soap dispensers and just buy a new one when it starts to stick.
A good start, but needs more refinement. When I first heard about the cat genie litter box I ordered one right away as it sounded wonderful to me! Someone had finally figured out how to make the perfect litter box! I gave away my litter maid box that my 4 cats had happily shared (I just made sure to change it daily and we had no problems) and begged my husband to install the cat genie right away. Well, he had more than a few problems hooking the thing up, and I finally had to call a plumber to make the connection to our toilet water supply as our hardware on the toilet was different from the illustration in the directions. That little adventure cost me an extra $100. Then the unit has to be plugged in. Well, who has an outlet near their bathroom toilet? We sure didn't. So we ended up having an electrician come and place a GFC outlet behind the toilet, add another $175 dollars to our investment. Finally, we had it installed and working properly and started trying to acclimate our cats to its use. We followed every suggestion in their guide, yet could not get all 4 cats to use the cat genie. The kittens were the first to accept it, then one of the older cats started using it, but the other older cat flat out refused. We started finding cat poop all over the house. We found some in the bathtub right next to the cat genie (maybe a cat had to go while it was running? each full cycle takes 30 minutes to run, that is a long time to expect a cat to "hold it") and we found cat poop on the floor right in front of the unit. But the killer was finding cat poop on our couch! We cleaned it up of course, but the whole family refused after that to sit on that couch. We finally bought a new couch! Add $1000 to our investment. When we bought the new couch we also gave up on the Cat Genie. I bought old fashioned litter boxes and now that is all the 4 cats will use, they leave the cat genie untouched.  We have found no more instances of inappropriate elimination since going back to traditional boxes. The Cat Genie sits unused in our bathroom still as I debate its fate.In my opinion, the Cat Genie just needs further refinement. It needs to function more like a litter maid and run just a short scooping cycle 10 minutes after it senses a cats has used the unit. The waste then needs to be stored in a hopper that processes and flushes away the waste a few times per day. The hopper needs to close to contain the odor of the waste. As the unit functions now, the waste remains in the open litter bowl in plain sight (and smell!) until the unit cycles, and the maximum number of cycles per day is only 4. Never before had my house smelled of catbox odor until the 3 months we tried to make the Cat Genie work out for us. Due to the high cost of the sanitizing solution, it would be very expensive to try to run it more often anyway. I think being used to a litter maid where the waste is scooped out after each use is what upset the one cat who refused to adjust to the Cat Genie. That cat just would not tolerate the sight and smell of the other cats' waste in the box and would not use it as a result.I know the Cat Genie people would say that the problem was that I needed to run 2 Cat Genies. Maybe that would have helped some of our problems, but I still think there would have been odor issues that would not have been acceptable to us. As things stand now, I'm looking for a new LitterMaid
Don't Buy It !. I bought this vacum at Target nearly six months ago. It has a very strong suction, and runs relatively quiet, but it cost a fortune to maintain! The root cause for this maintainence is that Dirt Devil designed this machine to use the Hepa filter as a vacum bag. All the dirt raps itself around the filter until its completely crapped up, and if you use it beyond that stage it will completely shut-down. I call customer service about it, and they recommended that I clean the filter more frequently. Which I now do, but I still have to replace the filter on average once every 2 months or else I'm force to breath all the fine particles that the Hepa is suppose to protect me from. The cost of each filter is an appauling $30 bucks. My car filter doesn't cost more than $7 dollars. At this rate I've already bought the vacum cleaner within my six months of use. Save yourself the hassel. Don't buy it!
A Waste Of Money. Spend the extra and buy Cuisinart.  I bought the Hamilton Big Mouth in November, just in time to use for all the extra cooking I do through the holidays.  I didn't have the money to spend on a Cuisinart at the time, so I thought I'd give the Hamilton Beach a try, after looking at the reviews here.Now, this is my first time using a Hamilton Beach food processor, as I've worked in professional kitchens and have always used Cuisinarts, and I'm used to them being work horses that can plow through any kind of food you process.  At first, things were going great--it survived through a Thanksgiving for 20, a Christmas for 30, with the last thing made was a large batch of gingerbread dough.I put the machine away, and just brought it out to use for a weekend's worth of cooking, and it's dead.  We've troubleshooted through everything, but to no avail.I guess this product would be fine if you only cooked occasionally, but for the frequent home cook who occasionally also does large meals, I'd seriously suggest getting a better and more sturdy brand.
don't waste your money on this one. This has got to be one of the worst purchases I ever made.  After a few weeks it stopped spraying altogether, and began "dribbling."  Today, after less than 2 months it totally backed up, resulting in olive oil all over the place
Nice lightweight comforter-- not 9.00 lbs. shipping weight. This is a nice quality LIGHTWEIGHT comforter. There is a discrepancy right up front in the 'Product details' that lists it as shipping weight '9.00 lbs.' which is not the case at all. After arrival of two of them, we were shocked. When advised seller they replied after many days, said we needed to read the 'Product description' (scroll further down on item) which was different info from what was listed above. They did not update information on this item for customers on Amazon site for 2 months.. thus the 2 stars. I should have written this review earlier.On the plus side, it is very nice quality, individual pocket stitching to keep fill in place and border piping, ideal for Springtime.
MUI Pepper Grinder. I had to send the grinder back due to not working properly and not having the bottom cover for the grinder.  I was disappointed because this was for a birthday gift and it was not working and missing a part.  I did not order another one
Trying to be nice. Well after buying some of Italy's best pots or cookware...where the inside is a slick finish...not sand coated...(Le Creusant)I was hoping that someone else had come up with a pot as good or a skillet if you may...however I am disappointed in my skillet...yes it has a sandy finish or rough if you will...not what I was looking for ...it however does cook very well or fry...and does clean up easy...hey would spend a few hundred bucks to find the skillet I want ...these guys just don't have it...the wording of the skillet did not indicate a rough inside finish
Picture used and actual color do not match. I ordered these for my Mom who has several different items of the Corelle Coordinates.  When they arrived, the color was no where close to the ones in the picture.  The picture appears to be a bright, almost fire engine red color.  In reality, it is a dull purplish-red color.  My sister also bought the same set for our mother and again the cajun red was the same purplish-red and not the bright red in the picture.  I can say that both sets did arrive undamaged and seemed to be packed well.  The bakeware itself if very nice to use however, I'm rating it one star since the color wasn't even close to what I expected
Not what I expected... I received the "white" pillow a few days ago.  It is completely discolored - mostly beige.  It appears to have been sitting on a shelf for many years.  It is only white in the area that the packaging covered.  It did, however, adhere well to my whirlpool tub after a serious sanitization process (hot water, soap and bleach).I should have spent a few more dollars for the better product
Complete waste of Money. I bought these sheets in confidence after reading all the great reviews, but when I got them they did not feel soft at all so I did like many said and washed them a few times.  They got a little better but now after no more than 8 washes, they are pilling really bad and it feels like I am sleeping on flannel sheets.  I would not recomend these to anyone
piece of junk. I purchased this at Wal Mart and within 6 months it was broken. The plastic is weak and the gismo that turns the frequently get fan gets stuck. The final time trying to straighten it caused a crack and the thing is worthless. Another made in China product gone to the trash
Disappointed. I was so excited to get this item after reading the other reviews.  I was impressed when I did receive it, the quality is very good and it works great.  I followed the directions exactly for getting my two cats used to this new box.  However, ater two weeks of trying, they just refuse to use it and have found a corner to use instead....uggghhhh!!!!!  I think it is just to small inside and they are not overly large cats nor are they timid in any way.  Lots of money for something that should be more accomadating.  So, very disappointed that this did not work for me.  I hope you consider my experience before buying one.
Very poor design. It seems that there is always something crappy in a good design. The pot does a good job perking coffee, but the lid and the glass top are bad and enough to void the use of the pot. I think that Melitta should send out, for nothing the glass top. I am like the other reviews, I would not buy another Melitta product unless they make good on this pot. There is a danger of the top blowing out and Melitta could be in for law suits
disappointed. I returned Eureka 437AZ back to AMAZON. I was very dissapointed when I've tried to vacuum my room. The vacuum is powerful but flow of air comming from the front blower is so strong that it disperses dust all over and prevents proper vacuuming. In the Cosumers Report Eureka 431 green vacuum cleaner is not recommended model and now I know that these two vacuums are practically identical, the only difference being color and HEPA filter. Another downside of this vacuum is that the dust acumulates over the filter which then is difficult to clean.
Don't Buy! Cheap does not pay!. First of all I would give it zero stars if possible.  This is the worst thing we have ever bought.  Our first cup was fine.  It started leaking right after that.  Now it won't even brew the expresso.  It is leaking down the sides.  Spend the money on a good machine.  And yes we got two sets of expresso grounded very fine at Starbucks and it still does not work
Don't buy this!!!. I've never been so disappointed with a product.  The water does not get hot.  The coffee comes out looking and tasting like very weak tea.  You can't get the coffee out of the carafe without entirely removing the lid.  I'm working with the company right now for a refund and it is a long process.  Spend a little more on a Krups or a Cuisinart.  It will be worth the time and hastle
Inconsistent cup of coffee. I have not had any of the spillage or steam problems that  a lot of people seem to have.  My problem with the coffee maker is that it just doesn't always make a good cup of coffee.First of all, when I got the coffee maker I was surprised to find that to make the same strength of coffee I was use to, I had to use DOUBLE the amount of coffee grounds than I did usually.  So I go through coffee a lot more quickly than I did before.I always make coffee the same way, using the same amount of water and the same amount of grounds.  At times the coffee is fine, but at times it is extremely weak... so weak I have to spend extra time to make more coffee (a crucial part of my morning!)  The "strength" selector is completely worthless, I don't notice any difference in my coffee whatsoever.Furthermore, the digital analog clock face, while it may be aesthetically pleasing to some focus group, is REALLY annoying when you are trying to set the timer.  You have a digital clock, put digital numbers on it please.Finally the "coffee temperature" knob is useless unless you plan on drinking coffee at least 15 minutes after you make it.  If you drink the coffee right when it comes off the pot its barely warm
Returned two of them--poor quality control. First one came cracked, second one came chipped.  Gave up
5 STARS for the Product, -3 STARS for the Packaging. I love the SANGO NOVA BROWN dishware and rate it 5 stars. This boxed set of bowls is just not padded enough for the weight. The slightest rough handling by a shipper is going to result in damage as can be seen in the prior reviewer's comments. Mine too arrived broken. Sure seems like Sango would put a bit more padding between those bowls in the box. Amazon could also do a better job of protecting this item when they pack it for shipping. I sure hope Amazon gets credit from Sango for all these broken pieces. Combined score +2
Absolute junk!. I rarely write reviews, but this product was really awful: flimsy; and the levers broke off on first use. The plastic ones I bought at Williams-Sonoma a few years ago were MUCH better, but I couldn't find them anymore, so I thought I'd try these. I'd give them a negative star rating if I could. Do NOT waste your money
Pretty - but small. Love the matching sugar bowl that comes with this butter dish, and the butter dish is very pretty, however it is too small!! or short rather.. you put a standard cube of butter in the dish and it squeezes the top of the butter and gets stuck. The lid does not touch the bottom of the dish  until you have used most of the butter. Also it has to reach room temperature, so it becomes molded to the shape of the lid better, which in turn makes a mess. Really, very unusual and it drives me nuts. I do not recomend the butter dish, sadly
Could be better. I was impressed with all the pieces, & liked the pots with short handles. But, when washing the lids, the handles on top get full of waterand have to be sat up for water to drain out... s l o w l e y, before putting them away. Also the metal on the handles has a tendency to get very warm when you're cooking. But, what do you want for 30 bucks?
This product is evil. This container is way too small to keep any fish in, let alone two. In such a small container, the fishes' wastes will build up quickly, causing eye and skin irritation, sickness, even death. You can try to reduce the waste build up changing the water frequently, but not only is this a lot of work for you, it is stressful for the fish.In addition, if you want to keep bettas in a divided tank, there should be decorations for the fish to hide behind when they need a break from flaring at each other. This tank is too small to allow that, another source of stress.Thirdly, bettas are tropical fish. They need a tank heated to a constant 80F. It is not possible to safely heat a tank that is smaller than 5 gallons.If you want to get bettas, please read some of the excellent websites available and learn all you can about their care. If you cannot afford a proper tank, please don't get a fish
DO NOT BUY. If Zero Stars had been an option, that would have been my rating.I am currently on my THIRD, yes THIRD return of this tank (luckily I got it from a Petstore, otherwise I would not be able to afford the shipping for all of the returns).  Thank God I filled out my warranty card!  On all 3 tanks, the filter STOPPED WORKING, despite my WEEKLY cleanings of the tank, filter and magnetic spinner (as well as changing the filter cartridge as suggested, if not sooner).I will NEVER buy a Marineland Tank again
Not very good at all. I'm trying to replace my trusty 12+ year old DeLonghi that got broken accidently.This Oster 6297 is the THIRD attempt at replacing the DeLonghi. Even DeLonghi isn't the same anymore. They are Chinese made junk.This Oster looks great BUT....the thermostat is NOT accurate...cooking a Stouffers Lasagna for 52 min. @ 350 yields a COLD center of Lasagna.The outside of this oven is DANGEROUS hot.The "convection" is useless, it neither saves time nor cooks better, in fact it DRIES out the food.The ergonomics of putting food in and taking food out is dangerous...it's VERY hard to take out the trays with any kind of weight on them without skinning your knuckles on hot glass.  Stay away from this mess
ice coffee. Definitely buy this if you like your coffee tepid.  The coffee was hot for the first couple of months, but now I have to microwave it before it's warm enough to drink.  I bought this unit because it's one of the few that will fit under my counter space, but I really need to get rid of it.
I wish I liked this baby more. . . but alas, I do not.I got this as a gift, and all I can say is "gimme the gift receipt!"First some pluses:I really (really really really) like the removable water tank that feeds the coffee maker. You can pick up the tank like a basket, take it to the water cooler, and fill it right up.I also like the fact that I can make espresso pretty easily. No major learning curve.Now for the negatives:Within three months of one-pot-a-day use, the coffee maker was spewing water all over the place. And I do mean water. Not coffee. I'd fill the tank with 10 cups of water and only get six. The rest would spill out or evaporate. And while it was spewing and evapping? Oh, yeah--enough noise to startle people passing by in the hallway (I use this coffee maker at work). One other problem is that the coffee had a very plastic taste to it for the first 10 pots or so. Yuk. Also, the espresso maker does a great job with the espresso itself, but if you want cappuccino? Good luck getting the milk the way you like it. Talk about a learning curve. I got every result from watery milk to all-froth-no-liquid, neither of which is my preferred outcome.All in all, I'd much rather have a separate espresso maker of better quality AND my old Melitta coffee maker. Now THAT baby makes some killer coffee
Leaning Tower of Junk. I bought this item at my local Target the weekend I moved into my new apartment. The parts are quality chrome, and the wood top is certainly appealing to the eye.If only the pieces actually fit together to assemble a sturdy piece of furniture.One of the shelves doesn't fit properly over the four legs, and the finished product sways at the slightest touch. Judging by the glowing reviews on this page, at best, this product is a hit-or-miss venture.There's a reason it's priced at 30 dollars.  Buyer beware
Only works well with dull blades. I have nice sharp blades... I sliced veggies, and got all these tiny little plastic "hairs" that the cutting mat gave off as I sliced it up along with my veggies.  Had to toss them.  These mats are fine if you want to use them to knead dough, or any other purpose other than for what they are made for... chopping and slicing with knives or other sharp objects. For the price it was worth testing them out.
Save your money. After reading all of the positive reveiws and only a few negative ones I purchased this humidifier back in Dec. Well here it is early Feb and this thing just plain sucks. I have a digital humidistat sitting right next to it in a med size room (13x13) and it never reaches higher that 29%. In the dry months of winter 29% is unacceptable, and my eyes nose and throat would agree. So don't do what I did, and save your money. Or if you must try it, just be prepared to send it back or donate it to goodwill. Enjoy
Anger Management. Like so many others before me, I too thought this would be the best humidifier - and it was! For about one week. To boot, this is my second one. The first one had the exact same problem - it ran perfectly for a week and then stopped producing any mist. I tried all the troubleshooting tips in the extremely detailed and helpful "manual". I assumed I had broken the very sensitive oscilator and that it was my fault, so like a fool, I purchased a second. HA! Same problem. It took a lot of self control on my part to restrain myself from picking the thing up and throwing it across the room - especially when you have a toddler who has chronic bronchial infections and you just want the darn thing to work. Here is my advice for anyone who has a broken one like me and has missed their window of opportunity to return it because they thought they could fix it:Step one - open trash can.Step two - hurl VENTASonic into it.Step three - slam lid on can
Great - when the unit still works. I've been through FOUR of these expensive units. They work great on my Great Pyrenees dog. At least they work for awhile. Then I end up trying to figure out if the batteries are dead, then if the NEW batteries I put in were dead to begin with, and then I send it back for repair. Once I got back a unit that worked again - for awhile. Then I got back a unit that never worked again.I stopped sending in my broken units after that.So - in desperation, and impending poverty, I switched to a shock collar; it was either that or what my breeder calls a "blue juice special". It also worked - and yes, I tried it on myself and decided that it wasn't cruel at all. But the punchline is this: the shock collars broke at about the same rate as the citronella collar. At least they were cheaper, so I didn't lose as much money
Hoffritz Wine Saver usability. I'm delighted with the functionality of this product. While doing an excellent job in bottles with openings that correspond to the stopper's measurements it is, however, too narrow for bottles with larger openings. A major shortcoming I found is that the black plastic material on the top of the stopper tends to break when closing the lock. Without the top material, the expansion effect of the stopper is decreased and becomes unsusable. Of the four stoppers I purchased, only one is still unbroken.
Lid doesn't fit... The lid on this product doesn't fit the pitcher.  I thought it was b/c the product was new and it had to be broken in but I've been using it and it's still too tight - I have to struggle to put the lid on.  No other issues with the product but it's a bit annoying to struggle to palce the lid on everytime I try to use it.
Useless. The makers of this useless product should be ashamed of themselves. It does absolutely nothing to odors
Not Absorbent. They look nice, but the towels do not absorb much water.  I am very disappointed.  I suspect I'll use them a few times, then give them to Goodwill
Filter Material. Not as addd says its just a sheet of material that comes it must be cut to fit and is not ehat one would maybe want to do!
Jarlesburg, but not cheddar. I have been looking for a good cheese plane, and this one isn't it.  It works fine for rubbery semi-soft cheeses like swiss, but not for harder cheese like cheddar, which tend to crrumble before I can finish a slice.  The problem is that the plane it too thick and rigid.  It should be thin and flexible.Also, don't let the name fool you.  This utensil is made in China, a country which consumes very little cheese
not like they use to be. My mom has has Krups products for year and has been very happy.  This latest purchase was very disapointing.   Case is more plastic and cheaply  made.   Frothing tip  is on the left side which makes it harder to froth.   And the coffee basket would not open without using a knife. (defective)    She returned it for credit and went back to her old combo coffee/expesee maker.    I think Krups should be advised of this review also.
Worst popcorn popper I've tried. This silly item requires expensive "concentrators" that don't work particularly well, leaving behind plenty of unpopped kernels. Don't waste your money
Good concept..... not such a great product. It's great to have flowing water for cats.  My cats love running water from the faucet.  The water in this fountain is not running, though, but flows down a slope, so it's difficult for the cats to even see the water running.  My cats didn't drink from the part where the water was running.  I later bought a different flowing water pet fountain that runs more like a faucet, but we no longer use that one either because it is plastic and our vet recommended that cats should only eat and drink out of glass bowls, not plastic.  Apparently the plastic containers can cause irritations.  One of my cats had a swollen lip and the vet suspected the plastic water dish as the culprit.  Too bad no one has made a glass flowing water fountain
Mislead buyer. Don't buy this product. It leaks water badly. It does not get hot enough to press your clothes the way it advertises. I tried it on a few different types of clothes jeans, sweaters, tee shirts, etc, just to be sure I gave it a fair shot. It just does not simply live up to it's claims. If you can afford it, buy one of the more expensive one's. This is a waste of time and consumer money
These sheets sound and feel like tissue paper. I have never felt / heard sheets that were so scratchy and loud.  I returned both sets that I purchased.  Even after washing with warm water, with softner, nothing worked and again, the sound of these sheets would wake you up as you turned on them
Great idea, bad execution. I ran into this knife when I was actually hoping to find one of those short Japanese sushi knives with the nice little wood sheath.  A nice multi-purpose portable knife.  I have a lot of small pocket knives, but but one of the most common uses I end up needing them for is food.  SO here comes a great idea: a small kitchen knife with a sheath!But there are some problems that could easily be fixed with little or no cost:1. The handle guard hangs down below the blade, while a food knife is usually better if the blade hangs down so it can chop flat onto a plate or board.2. The handle is shorter than the blade, but a short kitchen knife (ie, paring knife) usually gives you a useful handle length with a short blade. To make it worse, some handle length at the back end is wasted with that stylish drop-down bump, which is right where my pinky wants to sit.3. The sheath has no drainage hole. It's basically impossible to give the sheath a good inside cleaning. Plastic sheaths for many hunting or utility knives often have a small hole at the end, so you can flush it out all the way just by holding it under the faucet. It's like trying to clean a cup by slowly filling it with water and pouring it out. Not very sanitary for somthing I want to use for food.4. The plastic is cheap. Oils or alcohols are causing red stains when I wipe them on a paper towell. That means the plastic is not stable. Not only is the sheath difficult to clean, you have to be worried about what you clean it with.5. The steel isn't that great either. It was sharp when new, but that didn't last very long and when it was time to sharpen it the thing just didn't want to get sharp. I have sharpened hundreds of knives and I have a dozen different stones, and this is one of those knives that just doesn't like to get very sharp. It's not an expensive knife, but I had a Victorinox parer I got for 5 bucks that was better.For the price it's still handy to have, but it could be 10 times better and still be cheap
serenity deep seating JUNK. This is probably the worst piece of [...]I have ever purchased. I had to reverse the charges just to stay sane, and then to add insult to injury I had to pay over [...] to return it ... This is a disgrace. The merchandise was supposed to be soft and comfortable and it was as hard and rough as a rock. and They dont tell you that it HAS TO BE ASSEMBLED. They must assume we all have 2 arms and dont feel the need to let us know it comes in boxes. This is a shame for those of us unable to assemble anything, all in all it was a disaster of an experiance.. Paul Silve
Beware!. We have owned this machine for a little over two years. For the first 6 months it worked as expected with clothes coming out slightly damp due to the condensation method of drying. However, since then, it has stopped drying, such that 5 hours of drying (yes, 5 hours) yields wet clothes. This has persisted, despite 4 repairs, replacing almost every part on the machine except the control board, which I assume is next.Prior to this machine we owned an Equator brand washer/dryer combo which was a disaster: that broke after 3 years.Unfortunately, the LG is probably the best of a bunch of mediocre machines (Equator, Asko, Maber and other brands) available in the US..all have shortcomings as dryers as all use the ventless-condensation method which take much longer to dry and almost all are 115V. The Bosch combos available in Europe, but unfortunately not available in the US, are 220V and thus, dry more quickly. This is not a machine for a family, but rather ideal for an apartment or condo for 1 or 2 people at most. When it worked, it worked well. However, no one should invest $1300 to have it break in such a short time. And no one should have to spend over 5 hours to do 1 load of laundry. If you must purchase one of these machines (for reasons of space), buy an extended warranty
Bark stop ... NOT. It appears that the Viatek product (Bark Stop Pro) is related to the Lentek design (PC16 ; ASIN: B0002Q89O6) - they are based on a common design by a Lentek engineer. I have used (tried) the Viatek Bark Stop Pro and it definitely DOES NOT work. My experience was the same as another reviewer of the Lentek PC16 who noted that the unit only works on the "Audible" setting - dogs will at least perk up their ears at the high pitch tone ; they completely ignore whatever is emitted on the "Ultrasonic" setting. Furthermore, it is often activated by extraneous noises like birds, banging doors, wind noise, etc.This really poor functionality is due to either poor design or poor construction / quality. I've tried two different units and they both do NOT work.The negative reenforcement concept could work if only these devices were tuned to the noise environment and could filter out all except the actual barks.
This is a real looser. This blender is not worth the money.  It's not strong enough to crush ice.After a short amount of time the cutter assembly froze up and a new cutter costs almost as much as a new blender. Avoid this dog
I was ripped off and I think knowingly. The tupperware was useless because the top was too small for the bottom. I am left to think that this seller is running a scam.I wish someone had told me before I threw 25 dollars down the drain
no information. I would have bought this item the first time I saw it, if not for the lack of information. Other pages have a list of items included in the package whereas this one has none. Who's to know what you're getting? I suggest that this seller at least place an overview of the items the recipient will be getting when ordered
power dies down after a month. i have found out after the first set of battery's dies out the shocking chargedies down because when i first got it I had it set at 4 now i have to set it at 10 to get the same shock. I tested it on my arm both times so i wouldn'thurt my dog unfairly. I am afraid in another month it will be worthless.
Defective lids. Twice, we have attempted to purchase the 11 inch Swiss Diamond 6428C fry pan with lid from Amazon and had to return each upon delivery.  The pans are shipped from the factory in boxes that are too small and during shipment the knobs on the lid break.  The knobs are made of a brittle plastic and the lids simply are not packed with enough cushioning.These may be good pans but unfortunately have very poor packaging.
Overrated. I don't understand the fascination with All Clad products.  While I like the turner part of this fish turner, it has THE MOST UNCOMFORTABLE HANDLE of any tool in my kitchen.  What is All Clad thinking?  Don't their designers ever use their equipment
The problem of the pill. I ordered a set of these sheets and originally thought they were very comfortable. After 3 nights of sleeping on them, they began to pill so badly and be uncomfortable that we returned them to Amazon. We were sent replacements. After 2 weeks and a couple washings, these also pilled and were terrible. These were the worst quality sheets I have ever owned
Brief Lifespan. Received clock, loved the appearance.  Hung it up, enjoyed it for about two weeks (just long enough for me to discard the packaging), then the thing died.  Tried several new batteries, jiggling, wiggling, it just refuses to work any more.  If you can't resist it's look (it is cute), hang on to your box and receipt just in case
Pretty but too Delitcate. I bought this item as a holiday gift. It is a very beautiful piece and is artisitcally designed well. When we went to set it in its stand, however, the lip of the neck brushed the wire frame and chipped! I was shocked that it broke so easily. It's possible that they connected at just the right point and it was mere coincidence, but I am not getting another one to find out. Beware
Think again. I purchased this set only to find out when it arrived that the bowls are really too small for a realistic sized serving.10-ounces to the brim is an exaggeration, they will hold about half a cup in real life
Save your money. The can has to be 100% dent free for this to work.  If you have even a tiny imperfection in the shape of the can, this thing won't open your product.  A great idea, but this needed a little more refinement.Paper weight in my min
Bad choice!. I love both coffee and espresso but have limited counter space and this looked like the perfect machine. It's been a perfect nightmare. The machine arrived and worked fine, except water poured from it all over the counter. Krups agreed to repair or replace the defective machine. It took two months! The machine was repaired, rather than replaced. I set it up to make espresso and nothing happened: the water never got hot. I tried a second time and it worked fine. The coffeemaker side is great, but for espresso? The good price is not worth the hassle
Does not work. I have to agree with other reviews on here. This is a piece of junk. I just bought this timer... took it out of the package and it did not work!
yup,  it works good but not worth the additional aggravation. The worst part of this purchase was that it was a gift and sent to another persons address. That person now gets a  slew of catalogs at their address with my name on it. (They also get a second copy of the same catalogs with their name on it as well.)   Be prepared to have your name and address sold without permission if you do business with this 3rd party company. Bad business and aggravating
dont buy this item. Not much to say about this item it sucks. very thin and cheap made. Does not seal at all and does not keep the bread freah This is the worst product i have every got from Amazon.
Beware flat surface stoves!. The first time I used it I couldn't even boil water in it on my flat surface stove! A notice that came with it said, "This pot may not work on all stoves, refer to the owners manual." (No owners manual was sent with it.) As soon as the water started to heat, the pot danced and wobbled all over and the water was sloshing out of the top! Nothing in the web site ad referred to the pot not working on a flat surface. It would have been nice to have known before ordering, as I am not a pro cook and have no special knowledge of these details
Furi-ous about this knife. This knife not only came shipped in a flimsy plastic pouch, it arrived with a dull blade! I had to sharpen ii before it could be used. Unfortunately, it needs to be sharpened each and every use. Verydissappointing, because the knife is actually very comfortable to hold.More comfortable than most knives. If the blade is dull, who cares how comfortable the handle is! I'm going to stick with favorite German steel from now on. Total waste of money
Powerful but LOUD. This small fan is quite powerful but extremely loud. As far as moving air, it's great.  But, it's sound is distracting even on the lowest of four speeds and on high it dominates the room.  Also, the remote should include the oscillate function.  Had I been aware of the loudness of the unit I would have looked for a quieter fan
not too disappointed. The machine is less than $40 so my expectations were in line with that (cheap), however it never really seemed to stitch, at least, I thought it would stitch even the simplest items, and I only used it about 5 time sin a year, but it didn't, and it would stick on every job, it was frustrating. It eventually broke, and I was sorry to say it still looked brand new, and that was the shame of it - it was too cheap to fix, and I was forced to throw it away.
Beige Loofa Dog Back-Ordered to Jan 07. Ordered over 10 of these cute little loofa dogs expecting to receive color in photo.  I was sent PINK & PURPLE ones.  Over 6 phone calls to entirely pets and issue still not resolved.  Told by J. at ext. 201 Beige colored dogs are back-order to Jan 07.  Was promise size upgrade and overnight shipping which never happened.  Try to find at your local pat supply store & save yourself the grief
Not designed to last. A year of one time daily use and this coffee maker is already going in the trash.  The swing-out filter "hinges" broke during normal use.  Once broken, the filter now no longer stays in place and falls out when the carafe is removed.  Hence it's ready for the wastebasket.  On closer inspection, the entire filter unit is made of plastic, and the hinges are only a few mm's in diameter. Sturdier design needed!
Yikes!  A hokey POKEY feather bed!. looked good... but the feathers are constantly poking you, even through the flannel sheet!  I'm going to cover it with a mattress pad and then the sheet and hopeully that will correct the problem.
Do not waste your money if you are shelling out 600usd. I have purchased several espresso machines and sampled scores more, francis francis being my first.This machine is better than the 200 coffee maker labelled as "espresso" machines but marginally.If you are a serious espresso drinker you know that the quality and cutting of the bean and the quality of the machine are equally important.Focusing on the machine for a moment. You need a machine which extracts the coffee at just the right pressure without burning the coffee.A truly good espresso is characterized by a thick golden crema on the surface and almost syrup like consistency without a burnt aftertaste.This machine simply does not develop the pressure required to extract that golden crema from the coffee beans.The espresso extracted is thus poor in taste.If you are going to spend 600 usd on a machine shell out another thousand or so and get a good quality commercial machine by faemea or elecktra.You will need to compliment this with a commerical grinder for best results. The cheap pods really limit the different beans one can try and the  cutting of the beans are fixed
Image is Misleading. The image in this product is misleading. It looks like this product contains more than 1 piece, but when I opened it I got only one piece which is very small size and also the quality is inferior
Complete and utter disappointment. I was overcharged a considerable amount of shipping costs due to misrepresentation of the product weight (according to the shipping company AND other websites it weighs 10.3 lbs yet I was charged shipping costs for 22.5 lbs!) Both this site and the supplier's site continue to list the weight as 22.5 lbs. Since both companies are aware of the "discrepancy" it is intentional misrepresentation and I believe many customers are due a considerable refund. As if that weren't enough, I didn't notice at the time I opened the box that the pot had substantial damage to the rim yet the lid didn't, so it appears it was packaged after the damage occurred. I had to hammer-out the dented rim and re-paint all of the resulting chipped-off coating. (After all the aggravation I just couldn't bring myself to send it back and have to communicate with the supplier again)! This must be the worst online purchase I have ever experienced! If the weight represented is not corrected on both websites I will report it the Better Business Bureau.
Avoid Nylon Head!. Just like another reviewer wrote, my black nylon head melted in front of my eyes when frying an egg. The description says this product is heat resistant to 400 degrees but I just don't believe it. I really like the flexible angled handle so I'm going to try the stainless steel head and suggest everyone else do the same!
What a crock!. Don't waste your money or your food by buying and using this so-called "slow cooker." Just like most people have reported, the unit runs VERY HOT! This is an indication of poor manufacturing quality control. After a couple of burnt meals, I went out and bought a different unit with a mechanical temperature control switch. Unfortunately, I had thrown away the carton and receipt so I couldn't return it. As a result of this experience and wasting my good money, I will avoid buying Rival products in the future.
Not too hot. I baked six loaves in this machine.  I have been using various bread machines for the past 12 years and feel comfortable making adjustments when things don't turn out just right.  My big complaint with this machine is the low baking temperatures.  Even on the darkest crust setting and the longest baking time (70 minutes), my loaves were only marginally acceptable - they were not sufficiently baked.  I was using a nearly-whole wheat recipe.  The machine was quiet, strong, and had a lot of bells and whistles, but with only partially baked bread, I had to return it to Amazon.  Amazon shipped it to me in a very poorly packed box which was gaping open when it arrived, but they included return labels which made it a cinch to send back, and were quick enough with the refund
Noisy pump!. I'm sending this back as the pump is very loud--louder than my refrigerator when it's struggling..
Just too delicate for normal kitchen work. When I was incubating yoghurt and or monitoring the temperature of some beer, the thermometer works fine.  Of course, this is for temperatures below 140 degrees Fahrenheit.When I tried to use the thermometer for making beer, it finally gave out.  Having not used it in a few days, it currently reads 160 degrees.  It's busted and I've only had it since January.Some liquid was spilled on it, and the thing completely died.  Ultimately, the battery was replaced, and the device was left to dry.  It managed to recover from that, but it made me nervous.Maybe I'm expecting too much from digital thermometers, but I would expect it could handling boiling water.  I was using the probe to monitor some mash I was preparing for beer.  That is what ultimately killed it.This thermometer also advertises that it can handle candymaking.  This might be true, but I don't consider fudge that tastes like carbon to be "candy." It just lags too much for candymaking, and it didn't accurately display the temperature of the warm, sweet liquid since the probe couldn't be kept completely imersed while I stirred.I have to dig up the warranty and see if there's anything that can be done about this probe.  I'm assuming I'm out of luck.  I'd recommend looking into a more robust thermometer, if you can find one
This product needs to be recalled!. Worked just fine for over a year, then started behaving very oddly.Among the various problems this TOB-30BC unit exhibited, the most dangerous was switching itself on even when the main control was set to off, not switching itself off at the end of a toasting cycle, sending alarms when switched off, not being able to switch the unit off!  This unit neds to be unplugged from the outlet and I consider it to be a fire hazard.  Repeated communications to Cuisinart remain unanswered.
KitchenAid has hit bottom. Gears broke after 4 months. Same thing happened with the last one, after 10 months. Am going to buy a Bosch
The product is fine... ...but it wasn't the same as pictured online.  I haven't returned it because to do so would be too much hassle and expense for something so cheap
Overrated outdated. This machine has plenty of power but the beater attachments leave 1/2" of dough/batter unmixed on the walls of either bowl.  I don't have the blind love for the "idea" of the kitchenaid brand that most of the self-declared gormet buyers have--it flat-out isn't worth it unless you need to be seen using one to fit in with your friends.  It's a great deal in dollars per pound and "old world" charm.  I have actually gone back to using my $60 consumer quality dual-beater mixer.  I think this mixer really shines when you bolt on the saussage-maker or cigarette-roller attachment on the PTO sticking out the front
Another under-delivered promise. Well, may be it's just my over-expectations :)Seriously - I am still chopping vegetables manually.This thing is good to make a mess or puree of anything you have.You can use it sometimes if you cook for yourself only and don't mind the look of results, although even in this case you will arguably spend more time cleaning the chopper.So, honestly, you don't want this. Buy a good knife or a grater.
Singer 7442 80 Stitch Sewing Machine. I liked the price and all the different stitches.  However, I needed a sewing machine that would handle many varied things, such as alterations and heavy sewing.  I'm very disappointed in the lightweight quality of this machine.  The needle threader never worked and on close inspection my husband found that a tiny hook was missing that was supposed to hold the thread.  Also, the food feed stalls, jerks and surges.  This machine has beautiful stitches, but is for lightweight sewing only
Not for lefties. The right-handed folks in my family like this little gadget and manage to get nice, fluffy Parmesan out of it, but my daughter and I are left-handed and find it very awkward to turn the crank.  I wish you could screw it together both ways for lefties and righties.  Also, I think it would be much more durable and work better when the cheese block gets small if it was made of metal parts instead of plastic.
God dag!. I used to make these during "kakelinna" (time in Norway when Christmas baking begins) with my "farmor" (paternal grandmother).  I still have my grandmother's old cast iron krumkake iron and after trying this one, I will never deviate from the traditional iron again.  Christmas baking in Norway isn't about making a lot and saving time, it's about family.  Although the older ones take longer (but taste better), it is a great time to reflect.  If you have the energy to use a traditional one, I recommend it...the cookies are temporary, memories are forever
Customer Service/ replacement parts. Do not buy this product.  It is not supplied with a parts list to order parts that may become broken.  If your call their customer service number, everyone is very courteous, however they want pictures of the Power base, (front-back-top and Bottom)as well as a picture of the menu book.  They want all of this just to order a simple O ring gasket that goes on the the blender blade piece to act as a seal.  They will not sell you this item (package of 4 for $7.95) without all of the above information as well as a receipt. I find that all of this would be unessary if they would just supply a simple parts list.Dyanand
Not the color I needed!!!!. While the product I received was identified as red imagine my surprise to find a white petite casserole. Like the many others who have had this problem I assumed it was just a "freak" accident. No accident. I am still looking for someone who actually got a red one. Very disappointed. Bummer!!!!!!
Not Impressed. Not only was this a pain-in-the-neck to use, but the carafe didn't keep the coffee hot AND it made mediocre to lousy coffee. We returned it within a week or two of receiving it
Not enough instructions. A very short c/d does not give me enough information or instructions as to how different cutting tools perform etc.I guess I'm just to old to be dealing with this at my age I will be sending it back asa
Not that great, No display light for Timer/Clock. I was very happy to see the look & compact microwave from Sharp, but it didn't work for me :-(* As soon I started, I have found that there is no back light display for Timer/Clock which is quite common for any Mocrowave.* And also it doesn't have good hold/support for the tray as it makes some rattling noise when we try to use bigger boxes to heat.* Not worth for 70$, I have seen my friends using 30$ microwave with better results.
Good coffee, but... 2/15/07 - Received coffee maker with minor outside box damage but eveything seemed intact. Made several pots of very good coffee and espresso but after 4 days the main switch and digital readout went crazy and the water heating element for the coffee side refused to turn off. I had to unplug the unit fearing a fire. I am returning the unit to Delonghi. I will review the new unit after I have had it for a while.4/2/07 - I recieved the new unit in good condition and set it up with some trepidation (see earlier review). All the functions work fine and the coffee/espresso maker has been chugging along fine. It has made more than 50 pots of very good coffe and about 30 pots of espresso that even my Cuban colleagues enjoy. Based on my experience with the new unit so far, I would increase my rating to 4 stars, however Amazon will only allow one review per person.
Really disappointed!. I have an older wafflemaker that has the removable plates.  When I got ready to purchase another one for a second home, I found that choices were limited.  I found this wafflemaker and I thought the small size would be convenient for storage.  I tried it today and after 20 minutes and a house full of company, I still didn't have one waffle ready to go.  There is just not enough heat to brown the waffle, no less cook it.  I would take it back if the paperwork had not gotten misplaced.  This morning, I was ready to just throw it out the window
Does an okay job on some things... I was lured by the idea of not having to buy lint roller refills ever again, but it seems that this lint remover is actually very hit-or-miss.  It does pretty well with lint and pet hair on the couch and other solid objects, but taking the cat hair off of my sweaters and jackets it another story...it just doesn't quite get the job done.  If your main concern is upholstery or some other fabric-covered item, this is a fairly good product for that, but traditional sticky lint rollers may give you more bang for your buck
Doesn't live up. I wish I could write a good review of this coffee machine & Capresso in general but unfortunately my experience with the 455 model & Capresso itself has been horrible. I bought my Capresso 455 (Stainless carafe model) in July 2006. I was very impressed with the grinding options & the overall functionality of the machine & the coffee it produced was great. But by September the electronics had failed & the LCD readout was going haywire. I called Capresso & they immediately sent out a brand new machine to replace the faulty unit.The new unit worked perfectly until February 2007 when the drip basket stopped working. It would no longer stay in place when I tried to swing it over under the grinder to start the grind/brew process. I again called Capresso & they told me to pack it up & send it back for repairs. I then got a voice message telling me that they had never received the original unit that I had sent back in September 2006 so they wouldn't perform the repairs on this unit until they received it back. I won't waste your time with all the phone calls that took place about this! Suffice it to say that I HAD sent the machine back & I had never heard a word from Capresso in the 7 months since that time & now they were expecting me to somehow track their UPS return label to prove that the machine had been delivered!!I finally convinced them that there was nothing I could do about it now & they agreed to complete the repairs & return the machine to me but WITHOUT any warranty. The kicker to the story is that when the repaired machine finally arrived, it had brand new internal damage to it (the broken pieces were all over the inside of the water resevoir) & has had to be returned yet again. Naturally I have written to the President of the company about this ridiculous situation & while much of this problem can be written of as a bad customer service experience, the fact is that I have had 2 mechanical failures on this machine within a year as well as additional damage caused by the repair technicians (I'm fairly certain that it was not caused during the shipping - The unit was extremely well packed.My advice is this: If you can find another machine that does the same things as the Capresso 455 give it a shot. While this coffee maker performs superbly when it actually works, 2 failures on different machines within a year is not a good track record. I also found their customer service department to be extremely unhelpful as soon as they had identified me as a "problem customer". I never had a leg to stand on once they said they hadn't received the machine from the return call tag that they had issued. Why in the world would I have wanted to keep a machine that didn't work in the first place???BUY AT YOUR OWN RISK.
Pet Dish. The dish works great. The only issue i find is when you open it to refill the food it takes a few secs to align the top properly, but it is only a minor proble
Great Idea, poor production......be warned. These bags never hold the air out and are constantly reverting back to the original big shape because they can't seem to stay sealed well.  Also, the material is very flimsy and half my bags ripped or got holes from nothing more that regular attempted use.  I sent them back when they weren't sealing and received a new set thinking they have a wonderful 100% Guarantee.  NOT! The new bags had the same issue which leads me to believe this is just an inferior product.  Great idea and it works at first, but if they can fix it to stay sealed AND make it of tougher material, I may consider trying one inthe future.  If not, save your money
So fragile all my sets are broken after 2 month. I got a set of 8 a few months ago. First one package arrived with a broken one, then all of them ended up broken. They break if you fill them with water and try to take them by the side. they break if you set them a little too fast on the table. One of them broke by just holding it. Such poor quality I am extremely disapointed. But I loved the design though
Skating on THIN Plastic. The whole idea is great, but very thin plastic and cheap. It stated for cats up to 10lbs and my cat is 9lbs and the first time she used it, it collapsed. If it was made with some type of stronger material, I think it would of worked fine
did not get. i ordered this item 5 months ago was told by amazon that i would get this item and it was avaliable and then after 5 months they tell me that they cant get it and it is still avaliable on there web site as far as im concerned amazon is not worth shopping if they cant hold there promises and say it is avaliable please take this very seriously when ordering from amazon thank
Looks good, works poorly. We have been using this mill for about 4 months, and it looks great on the table, but that's about it.  It will grind pepper, but adjusting it is very hit-and-miss (mostly miss), and it won't hold an adjustment very well.  On a fine setting, it works OK, but it is nearly impossible to get a coarse grind out of it - it seems to go from fine to medium, and then to too open to grind at all.  We got better results out of a 20-year old no-name pepper mill.  I would not buy this mill again
Poor quality. I bought this fridge two months ago. Now it stop running. I chose this one, because I expected it would be a quiet fridge and do its job. But it's not that quiet either.This is my second Sharper Image item and it will be my last one
Awful!. These canisters are such a disappointment.  They looked beautiful when I first bought them, but the finish has worn off just from sitting on my counter, and now they look terrible.  I finally bought canisters after many years of not having them, and I thought these would last. But they look dreadful
So bad, I had to write another review. Some how my previous review text got a little glitched up.  But suffice it to say the only thing going for these knives is that the probably cut.  The manufacture of these knives is well below the quality I expected ....  It's the first time I;ve been TOTALLY disappointed ....  We're returning the knives because they are not worth the money.  Really, they look great in the picutre, but they are very poor quality.  Why else would a four hundred dollar set be selling for twentysix dollars
Rival RSC200 Fails. On the 3rd use this rice cooker burned the rice because it never went into the 'keep warm' mode. The cooker never worked at all after that. Returned for Refund
Tale of Two Reviews. Yes it is a nice pot. I can understand why it would be perfect for painting designs and whatnot. But, for making tea, I find it to have a fatal flaw. The handle heats up as much as the rest of the pot, and thus, in order to pour boiling water - I need to use a pot holder, which is awkward.So, if you buying this to throw on a shelf, I think it would be fine. If you want to be pouring boiling liquids from it, you might want to look elsewher
Simply dangerous. I have one very similar to this, same design, material, just a different brand.  It's dangerous to use it to crack crab shells as it is nearly impossible to keep a firm grip on the smooth surface.  Also the jaws aren't designed to really clamp around anything and the teeth are rounded and useless.  Since the handles are also so short, it is not possible to really gain any leverage
PowerCup Concentrators. Maybe it's me; but I can only get 2 poppings from each of these wafers.  They burn holes and becaome really thin after one use.  Still looking for the ideal popper
Dont' Buy this Product. this can opener is garbage.  it opened a couple of cans, then quit.  if you pushed it along, i could get it to open maybe half way around.  now i get nothing.  no matter how long you recharge the thing, it does nothing more than make a grinding noise and stops.  doesn't even start to open the can.  don't waste your money
don't buy this model. Bought this model. Would not brew a full cup of coffee no matter what I did. Called customer service and they sent me a new one. This one also did not work. All it did was flash blue lights and never brewed a cup. Tossed it out and bought a different model by Black and Decker. Have had it for months and never had a problem with the new model
Disappointing. Well, I guess I'm in the minority here, but following to the letter its instructions (for the 4 cup Brikka), the coffee always seems to boil in the top chamber, no matter how low a flame I use or how quickly I get it off the stove when coffee starts coming out the top.  If you like strong, burnt tasting coffee, this is the machine for you.I wanted to like the Brikka, but for under 30 bucks, try an Aerobie Aeropress  (recently got one and I love it) and compare espresso results.  For a great cup of strong coffee, it's very hard to beat the french press
Nice, but not END GRAIN quality. The other review for this cutting board is accurate, but fails to mention one important factor...this board is constructed of EDGE grain maple, not END grain maple.  This makes a huge difference when chopping and slicing.  End grain cutting boards and butcher blocks are prefered by home and professional chefs for a number of reasons.  End grain construction does not dull the edges of expensive cutlery the way Edge grain does.  End grain boards also cut easier, have a more varied and figured grain, and a cutting surface that lasts longer.  In the end, it's not worth spending $98.00 (with shipping) on a John Boos Edge grain cutting board from Amazon.com, when for the same price, you can buy a quality End grain cutting board that will perform better, save your knife blades, has a prettier grain, and will last a lifetime.This is a decent cutting board for the average home chef, but simply not worth the money.  Buy an End grain maple butcher block 16" x 20" for $80.95 from theboardsmith.com.  They have a large selection, quality construction, beautiful craftsmanship, and competetive prices.  When you compare the two, the choice is obvious.  And if you still want this John Boos cutting board, metrokitchen.com has them for $51.95 with no tax and FREE shipping!!!  Amazon just doesn't seem to stay price competetive when it comes to their houseware items.  Lastly, whatever board you get, make sure to season it periodically with FDA approved mineral oil.  This will keep the board from bending or cracking and will preserve your knife blade edges and the cutting board itself.
Dissappointed customer. I recently ordered a replacement pitcher.  I ordered the wrong pitcher.  I have e-mailed them twice and have yet to hear from them.  Now I am stuck with a pitcher and now have to find the right one.  It was my firsttime doing business with them and now my last
buyer beware. Terrible machine for embroidery. I have replaced most of the moving parts for the embroidery feature and it still won't work right. Do Not Buy This Machine if you are looking for an embroidery machine
cheap. FIRST OF ALL ADD WAS DECEIVING :Product DescriptionNew! Non-Slip Cascading Hangers Hang up to twelve shirts or blouses, eight skirts, and eight slacks in the same amount of space it takes to fit a single hanger! Store more clothes than ever imagined in your closet and free up essential drawer space. Use separately or hook together. Non-slip coating keeps clothes on the hanger and off the floor. Durable, chrome-plated. 12 Shirt Hangers 8 Skirt Hangers 8 Pant HangersTHE LAST SENTENCE MAKES YOU THINK THAT IS WHAT YOU ARE ORDERING.ALSO, VERY CHEAPLY MADE. 2 WERE BROKEN IN THE BOX, ONE BROKE WHILE HANGING SOMETHING UP. I ENDED UP SUPER GLUING THEM TOGETHER. I DID NOT WANT THE HASTLE OF SENDING THEM BACK. BEWARE OF THIS PRODUCT!!!
Feliway Diffuser Refill. I was told to try the Feliway diffuser by my veterinarian b/c my cat has always suffered from an anti-social, grumpy personality.  He is one of 4 INDOOR cats in our house and had started to urinate on the rug in my entryway.  I put the diffuser in the basement where the litter boxes are to make it a soothing, positive environment for him.  Combining the diffuser with a low dose of Prozac has worked wonders.  We have an office in the basement too and that is where it is plugged in and he spends pretty much most of his time in the office, sleeping, purring and scrounging love off me when I am down there.  He NEVER did that before.  We had only heard him purr maybe 4 times in all his 11 years and only when we practically had our ear near his throat!  I definitely recommend the Feliway diffuser for anyone with a stressed, ornery or over-excited cat.  Keep in mind, not all cats react to the pheromones but the only way to find out is to try the diffuser!  Good luck to anyone needing this review - it is really tough to deal with a problematic cat
Expensive but doesn't last. I had this opener and tried it with about a dozen cans and it lost its sharpness and now it was in the trash can.  It's expensive for such a gadget and didn't work
Faulty design - poor service - unacceptable support. We purchased a Hoover bagless canister in May 2004. After about 6 months the electrical connection between the hose and wand broke due to a very poor design. We took the vacuum to a local service center on 12/31/04. It's now March 15th and we still do not have a working vacuum. The local Houston service center failed to return our calls three times despite repeated promises. We were given the same incorrect part TWICE - once from the local center and again shipped from the central Hoover customer support center. We were told that the parts are back ordered from North Korea!I will say that the central customer support center personnel were helpful and positive, but it's been almost 3 months and still no resolution.We are very disappointed in this product and the support and we will not buy Hoover again. The vaccum is poorly designed and if you repeatedly disconnect the hose from the metal wand to use the accessories, the connection will break. Also, the unit is described as having a HEPA filter, but about 25% of the exhaust gas leaks past the filter out the back of the unit
Norpro 790 Stainless Steel Oil Mister. Junk will not pump after only a few uses
Over a month now - but no show yet. I placed a order on Jan 27th with 2 day shipping for this product. Its 21st Feb now and still it has not arrived. I just hope to see it one day
One word - Mold. Throughout the years I have used and owned many different versions of the Brita Pitcher Water Dispenser. All of these filtered water containers have been great. The only complaint I have ever had with these filters is size. The Brita Ultramax Water Filter Dispenser was supposed to answer this problem. Unfortunately due to bad design, it introduced a multitude of problems that never existed with past Brita products.Pro:Size: This water dispenser can definitely hold a lot of water. (Ironically, this is really a disadvantage; as you will find below.)Con(s):Mold: If you do not let this filter dry within a maximum of two days, you will get mold. This mold will probably make you ill (sore throat) (Conversely if you look at it from another point of view - it will strengthen your immune system). To avoid this problem, the water dispenser should be washed every week at very least (to be safe you should wash it more often). I have never had this problem with Brita's other products (I have friends who never washed their Brita pitchers for months, and there is not even the slightest sign of mold when they do wash it).Left Over Water: Due to the faulty design of the product, there will be left over water both above the filter and below it. Besides turning the product upside down, you cannot dispense all of the water. This is just stupid and hints at the lack of quality assurance testing of this product. Not surprisingly, this helps further contribute to mold growth.Conclusion:Save your money and buy Brita's other well designed pitchers or even Pure's pitchers. (The key word is pitcher.) You will only waste time and possibly your health with this poorly designed product
Not for serious Chinese cook!. I bought this wok 6 months ago. I seasoned it very well and started to use it. But I noticed the seasoning was easily peeled off when I cooked the dish with a lot of sauce. It meant I couldn't use it for steaming. When I made a fried rice, I had a hard time to clean it and re-season it. Most Chinese use a wok to cook everything, so I expected I could do that, too. But I was wrong. This wok is only good when you make a vegitable stir fry. That's all
Bought it, tried it, returned it. One might imagine that the whole concept of vacuuming-flip-mopping is progressive in some way, but it really does not make the job of cleaning the floor easier.  Especially when the product is heavy and hard to maneuver with poor pickup.  I'd much rather go over the floor with a good vacuum, and then follow with a functional, well-designed good mop (like the old SteamMop they discontinued). These things function better as seperate units, which is why there's no washing machine that's also a dryer.The Flip-It is a very loud machine--so loud, that I didn't hear my phone ring in the same room.  This makes it difficult to listen for my 3 children, too.  It's difficult to push and feels like it's gripping to the floor.  It doesn't fit into any tight places or under any low chairs/cabinets with it's big fat part-vacuum head.  And, when you're finished, it's a pain to clean out the nozzle and the filter(which you're supposed to keep dry somehow) so you can look forward to a second job once you've finished the job of cleaning your floors.  And, because of the "flip it" back and forth design, the thing has no equilibrium...it fell to the floor at least 3 times, even when I was so careful to rest it against something...once when this happened, the "dirty water" recovery tank hit the floor, fell off the machine and spilled the dirty water all over my just-cleaned floor.  A true nightmare.  I bought this product because I could no longer buy replacement filters/pads for my Bissell SteamMop, and I thought I had better give the latest and greatest a try, but, sadly, I was disappointed.  I don't review things often, but I felt a responsibility to warn others out there who are shopping for a good mop to keep their homes clean.  This contraption is not your answer.On a side note, I wrote to Bissell to bring back the SteamMop (what an excellent product), so I'm hoping that they will one day
Steamed!. Once in a while the coffee side of the machine will spew steam out the back and I will get a half of a pot of coffee.  The big problem with this piece of junk that the coffee maker was under a cabinet and the steam was ruining the kitchen cabinet.  I say this is $199 down the drain.  I have never had problems with a coffee maker spitting steam out the back and no water dripping into the pot.  Stay away from this garbage.  I am not even interested in contacting Krups for any warranty repair because it is not worth it
Not thrilled. The plates were warped and the color was off from the original set
Broke within the first week. I bought two of these humidifiers. One for work and one for home. They both broke in the first week
Hate it!. I can't believe I spent good money on this vacuum.  I've had to open it with a screw driver countless times to try to figure out a myriad of problems: why it won't vacuum without pushing it with all my might, why it makes an awful noise that terrifies my children, why the filter won't stay in place, and why it SMELLS LIKE BURNED RUBBER every time am forced to use it.  I have replaced every filter and belt.  Now I am going to throw it away.  I'd gladly give it to charity, but I can't in good conscience give it to an unsuspecting victim
FLAT Pillows. I purchased four of these pillows! I really shouldn't have wasted my money. They fluff up as soon as you take them out of the bags but after you sleep on them they are flat and impossible to fluff up, i'd rather sleep without a pillow at all!!
A terrible product. After the first few weeks, the novelty wears off and what you are left with is a toaster that doesn't work very well.  It is a very SLOW toaster that does not accomodate large pieces of bread.While the basic idea of making egg and muffin sandwiches is cool, the implementation is poor.  What you need to know is that the egg is cooked by boiling a measured amount of water.  The steam cooks the egg, but it also condenses all over the egg - leaving you with a soggy sandwich.
So long So Long Stemless. I thought this glass would be of better quality than it is. It took 3 shipments (re cieved and returned) to get my complete order without any breakage. These glasses are too fragile and in practice, impractical. Because of the design, one must live with fingerprints all over the body of the glass. Not too appealing when you are observing the "legs" of your wine.Recommend that you pass these by
Quick-Cup versus Eco-Pad...Winner is Eco-Pad!. I have explored a number of different ways to use my own grind of coffee in the Senseo Coffeemaker.  Folding filter paper didn't work....too much water goes by the filter making a week cup of coffee....The Quick-Cup sounded like a good idea....but it doesn't fit the holder tightly enough and too much water goes around the filter to get a good cup of coffee.  I found that the Eco-Pad fits tightly into the two cup holder and it works well.  The key to any of these re-usable pods is that water cannot be allowed to go around the filter.  The pressurized hot water must be forced through the coffee.The Quick-Cup and the Eco-Pad are essentially the same design but the Eco-Pad fits the holder correctly and the Quick-Cup is slightly small.  Buy the Eco-Pad, it works.  The Quick-Cup would work if you could rig a small rubber band seal between the Quick-Cup and the holder...a gasket, to prevent the water from going around.   Good Luck
Stopped working after 1 yr. We actually had 2 of these. The first one-- the plastic pot cracked after 2 weeks, and we got a replacement as an exchange. The replacement worked great for 14 months, and it died suddenly. We've been taking good care of it, boiling water 2-3 times per day for tea, noodles, etc... The water boiled really fast while it worked
The colors come off after using it for couple of times. Hi,The pieces look real good.However after using it for couple of times, the colors startcoming off. It then looks real drab and I am bit worried ifthe paint is harmful to you since it keeps coming off.I'd not recommend it - irrespective of the price.
OK for the price. My Grandma baked EVERY day and always used a Sunbeam mixer.  That is why I bought this one, but I am disappointed with it.  It is very reasonably priced and the motor has been powerful enough for the baking that I do, but those are the only two good things I can really say about it.  When mixing, ingredients fly out of the bowl all over the counter and me.  When adding flour, no matter how slowly, a cloud of flour dust covers everything within about a 5-foot radius of the mixer.  I have even tried mixing with a towel over the top of the mixer just to help eliminate some of the dust.  Also, I have arthritis and have found the beater realase button extremely hard to push.  I guess this mixer is a good buy for someone who will not use it very often because it is a good price, but a person who will be using it a lot may want to invest in something better
READ THE FEATURES!. I was misled by the picture of 13 bars (a complete set).  I got 5 bars which does me no good.  I want to change them all.  I am sending back and getting a complete set, for $50.
Terrible streaking. I've tried this product many times using different methods and every time I end up with horrible streaks all over my applicances.  I'm not the only one.  Do a search on Google (...) and read a ways.  It seems hardly anyone is satisfied with this product.  Others recommend using Weiman's or Bar Keeper's Friend.  On the plus side, it does seem to clean the stainless steel surfaces well if you don't mind the streaking
Coffee gets cold very quickly. Nice looking mug and No spills but, you better drink your coffee very fast.  Terrible insulation system.  Don't buy it
UNSAFE AND POOR QUALITY TOASTER. Toaster was UNSAFE and defective.  Timer became weak after only a handfull of uses.  Would not go down to 0 time and shut off.  ALMOST BURNED HOUSE DOWN!Overall consrtuction flimsy
parts break easily. When we first got it, we loved the suction and filtering.  Our son has asthma and this is a good choice for keeping high air quality.After the first year, the hose got cracks, then a few more months in, the belt and clutch went.  These are expensive repairs, so you really pay for this vacuum.I thought you pay a high price upfront, you'll be covered with high quality lasting hardware, but nope.  You may as well just get a lower priced, higher performing machine
Poorest Dirt Devil I have ever purchased. The Dirt Devil M08245 Power Reach sounded just great in the advertisements, but has turned out to be a major disappointment. While the product is easy to clean of dust and debris, the roller assembly if worthless. The brush stops in contact with any surface and does not perform at all. Even very light pressure from your fingers will stop the revolving brush. You are simply left with a suction hand vac without the benefit of a brush. I am sorry I bought this product
Two machines one cup of coffee. I ordered this machine for my wife after reading dozens of reviews and and positive feedback. We followed the instructions explicitly and created one cup of coffee. After that the machine said "ventilate". We followed the proceedures for ventilating the machine and it seemed to correct itself. Went to make another cup of coffee and it said "ventilate". This time it would not fix itself. I tried to perform the ventilate process and it would simply spray hot water out into the tray. Turn off the knob and "ventilate" comes back up on the screen. Turn the machine off and turn it back on, "ventilate" came up on the screen.We called Amazon and they sent us a replacement a few days later (thank you Amazon). Unfortunately, this one I did not get cup one out of the machine. It read "ventilate" as soon as I turned it on. The difference is with this one no water would come out at all.Gaggia provides no customer support so you are on your own with this unit
Mine Leaks. Please see my review of the 'Mr. Coffee AR5 4-Cup Switch Coffeemaker, Black'.  We're on our second one and both leaked, badly
Dyson Zorb Carpet Powder. It won't clean any spots but it will freshen the the smell, if any, and awaken the nap...no pun intended.  It refreshes and renews with relatively little effort.  We have 2 dogs and they have had no adverse reactions.  So, in between carpet cleanings this product will give your carpet a pick-me-up.
Two Defective Units. I thought this toaster was great when I forst got it.  It looked sharp and made great toast.   But after two months the chrome on the first unit started to pit and blemish.  Amoazon immediately took it back and sent out a new one.  When the new one was recieved, the lever on it was defective and it would not lift the toast out when pressed.  Amazon was great, as usual, but with a toaster with a price tag like this one should expect better
Butter dish not tall enough. It looks nice but the lid touches the top of the butter and sticks to it
The lids are toooooo TIGHT and don't fit properly!. I recently purshased this set and have had real problems trying to get the lids to 'snap' on.The majority of the lids alMOST fit, which is somewhat frustrating in itself.  I've tried pressing, pushing, popping, and even putting all my weight on the lids without success.  Swearing didn't help the lids fit any better, either.  No surprise...it seldom does.  I even tried pliers to try to snap the lid on the oval piece.  Only succeeded in breaking the lid.  The aforementioned swearing rapidly graduated to cursing, although no hair cuttings, nail clippings, hatpin-stuck small dolls, nor sacrificial small animals were involved.  And, the lid STILL didn't pop onto the cookware.You just have to marvel at how the lids can come sooooo CLOSE to fitting...but, just absolutely refuse to go that extra hair's width to make the seal.NordicWare....WHAT IS THE DEAL WITH THOSE LIDS???!!!!The lid issue aside, I've used the cookware frequently for storing leftovers in the fridge and for microwave reheating of same, and the cookware works fine.  It cleans up well, and it looks nice.There, I've said something positive.But, again...NordicWare....WHAT IS THE DEAL WITH THOSE LIDS???!!!
bark deterent review. The item didn't work at all.  As a matter of fact.  My dog didn't even flinch when I tested it right next to her head.  No, she's not deaf either.  We yell for her to stop barking from across the house and she hears that fine.The item actually melted in the sun (it still worked though).  I was going to return it but it said it had to be in good condition and it was all warped from the sun - oh well - lesson learned.I'm not trying to sound bitter but don't waste your money on this item.  I'm gonna try the shock collar next.  Maybe I'll have better luck.Thanks anyways,Mik
A big dissapointment. I heard about the lids and hoped that they would be a good alternative to plastic wrap. I even bought two for gfts.  But they didn't live up to my expectations.  The large size didn't even fit on standard size bowls and the small one didn't fit on small bowls.  I would return them except that I threw out the original packaging.  I don't recommend this product
This product doesn't suck... that's the problem. I don't get it-  so many honest people struggle to stay in business each day, but these guys are still going. The sad part is, this machine would be good if it actually worked for more than 2 weeks. I want to say it sucks, but that's the whole problem... it doesn't.
Absolutely HORRIBLE. I have used electric skillets for years and years.  I was so excited to get this new one because I thought the removeable pan would be a huge plus.  That idea was a huge plus BUT the pan itself was absolutely awful.  Everything and I mean everything sticks to this surface.  You can actually see while scrubbing lightly that the coating just comes right off.  Although that being said...it's no great loss because it didn't work anyways. I definitely would NOT recommend this!!!
Keep shopping. I have owned this blanket for less than a month so I cannot make any judgment about its longterm durability, but the first (and only) time it was washed it shed like a buffalo in springtime, and the dye used on the "moss" green was not colorfast in warm water and detergent.  I gave it two stars because it is reasonably warm, and has an attractive weave
A Lot of Money for a Very Little. Don't be fooled by the name "Emeril" on this knife. This is a light duty knife at best. The blade is extremely thin and has little or no weight. Spend a few extra dollars and get a knifewith more quality and more weight
Wish We Had Read the Reviews..... This timer worked for approximately two weeks. We noticed it had failed because the appliance did not go on as programmed. After many attempts to reset it, we decided to return it and report is as damaged so that it had to be removed from the merchant's inventory
Don't waste your money on this one. First of all, this is a very attractive machine sitting on the counter, but that is pretty much all.  The water container holds just barely enough to brew four shots before it needs to be refilled.  Speaking of which, refilling is a pain because the container is in the back of the machine, so I actually had to pull the machine out to the edge of the counter to get to it.  With this one, you need as much water as you can possibly get, because it drips water everywhere.  The first pull of the steam handle will give you about 2 oz. of water along with your steam, just what I DO NOT want in my milk.  In the mean time, the brew head will happily drip another 2+ oz. while you're steaming away.  Finally, there is the brew it's self.  Inconsistent doesn't even begin to describe it.  You never know what you're going to get out of that brew head, but you can bet you'll end up with a soupy mess of grounds after.  Let's see, what else... the drip tray is difficult to remove without sloshing a mess of stuff on the counter, the cup warmer is useless, the machine is VERY noisey, and just a piece of junk in general. No, this machine is definately not a keeper.So, before returning it, I did give Espressione a shot at making it right.  I sent an email to the warranty address, as well as copying several others within the Espressione group.  13 days later I got tired of waiting for a response and called.  Apparently there is 1 tech in the US to work on this thing, and he is VERY busy.  Wonder why!  So, I told the lady that I was pretty displeased with the machine, and their warranty service.  She responded that she understood, and another brand might be better suited for me.  Hmmmm... at least she is honest
beautiful but breakable. these are really beautiful glasses, and incredibly light.  we have no dishwashwer, though, and i broke one the first time i washed it (putting the dishsponge down inside) - and i was being careful.  these are really, really delicate.  my husband broke one the next day.  we also got the white wine version of these glasses, and one was broken upon arrival - still wrapped in its bubble wrap.  i have no idea why bodum decided to make these of such incredibly thin glass.  they're really beautiful, and we love using them, but it's ridiculous to have to be this careful with them - i mean, we have other wine glasses that i used to think were delicate, but these bodum ones take the cake.  we also bought the double-walled bodum glasses, and those are beautiful and much sturdier (although they're not for wine.....)
No effect on the dogs. I picked this up after reading the 50/50 reviews.  One of our dogs ran over to it and jumped up to see what it was as it buzzed away.  The other just wandered around and took no notice.  Neither seemed scared/bothered at all.  This product had zero affect on our dogs' barking.  I'm going to return it
I wouldn't know. My Krups FME1-14 12-Cup Coffeemaker developed a terminal leak after 2 months, so it was too late to return it or the 4 extra filters I'd bought for it.  I do hate wasting money
not as pictured. I personally am not happy at all with this item, very small not the same as pictured ( the one I got is bright yellow, really flimsy ) don't think it'll last very long. I'll keep it, not worth sending back, my Corgi seems to like it ~ but its a bit small even for her, I think it's life will be short. (not well made
Not good quality. I followed the instructions carefully, washed only in cold water, tumble dry extra low, etc. but these sheets still shrank. Also terrible pilling after only a few months. I do not recommend. The sheets were wrinkly, but I could live with that, but not the pilling, which makes them uncomfortable to sleep on
Oxo finally messes up. I've bought a number of Oxo kitchen accessories, and found them to be sturdy, remarkably well designed, and easy to use.Unfortunately, this timer is an exception.It has the usual features typical of timers at this price point: clock plus timer, ten number keys for input, memory, etc. But instead of being flat with a magnet on the back so it can fall off the refrigerator like other timers, it's round like a traditional wind-up kitchen timer. It's solid-feeling and has nice non-skid feet on the bottom.The problem is the display. It's horrible. For three reasons:First, the numbers are small -- smaller than any other timer I've seen. They're about 1/4" high, half or less the size of those on comparable timers.Second, the numbers are recessed 1/8" or more beneath a clear plastic cover, not on the surface -- it's dark in there and feels like looking down a well. It desperately needs a backlight, but there is none. Unless the light source is shining directly into the display, there's a large dark shadow covering part of the numbers. But that causes the third problem:The clear plastic cover over the numbers is both curved and highly reflective, and it's virtually impossible to arrange things so that there isn't a reflection shining back into your eyes .The bottom line is that I have to fiddle around to get the timer, the light source, and myself into a position where I can read the small, dark, shadowed, and reflective display. Not what I need when I'm trying to cook.It's just not worth it. Since I have several other timers with displays I don't have to strain to read, I use this one as a paperweight. I'd have to say it works very well.I just don't understand how Oxo managed to let such a flawed design out the door
BEAUTIFUL PRINTS OF THOMAS & FRIENDS BUT MATERIAL SANDPAPER!!. the fitted twin sheet when I used in my boy bed on corner to rip.....is the worse material use for childrens is SANDPAPER .The worse product...the only good thing is that my little sleep better with thomas and friends.I recommend thi sproduct only if your boy  is not easy to put it in bed....with thomas can sleep without mom or dad
Broken glass. The first time I purchased this it came with 3 glasses broken. They quickly sent me another box. Well, in this, my second shipment, 4 glasses were broken. They need to write fragile or something on the box because the post man just throws it on the doorstep
Save Your Money. I have owned a Misto for a while and, as others have, I noticed the way the quality of the spray deteriorated over time so that you would only get a stream of oil, instead of a mist. Well, this morning, my Misto exploded while I was using it to make pancakes (periodically spraying the pan during the process). Luckily, no one was hurt, but there is a dent in my kitchen ceiling where the top hit it, upon being expelled from the base with great force. I would estimate the BANG that accompanied the explosion was 85-90 decibels. I will definitely not buy another Misto based on today's explosion, but even before this, I was rather ho-hum about the product anyway. My advice: save your money
Bad dimensions. It doesn't fit my tub and is too short. I thought it would be standard width/height, but I guess I was wrong
flip it vacuum. The flip it vacuum was a great idea but little did I know thatI would actually have to put my hand in the bin to pull out the dirt and grime after using the wet mop.  When using the wet mop-it will leave water lines where I stop, therefore I have to wipe up the floor with paper towels. When using the vacuum myliquid cleaner drips onto my hardwood floor leaving water marks!I have not recommended this product to anyone. A waste of $100.00
Not As Advertised. I bought this product to replace one that had broken that I really liked. I had to return this product THREE times because it does NOT (as it says in the description) come with the perfect pour carafe which is what I wanted since the standard carafe drips EVERYWHERE. On the third time of returning it, I asked why they kept sending me the wrong carafe and they said that the perfect pour was discontinued in this size. I then mentioned to Amazon that they might want to remove that part of the description, but they have not
DANGEROUS!!. This toaster oven's timer is faulty - we were making toast, next thing we knew there was smoke bellowing out from it and the toast itself was on fire!!!  With today's technology Oster should take more care in providing a toaster oven with an accurate timer.  This oven almost started a house fire.  I would not recommend this oven to anyone
A fan from Mexico. I always buy products from amazon and I never have any complains about any of them. But about this product, I am so disappoint because the lids does'nt fit with the 32 oz. containers. I hope that they fix this problem because is a good way to keep your kitchen organized
Disappointing. I purchased this item after doing a lot of research on AV storage units.  I decided at the end of the day that the size and look of this one was the way I wanted to go.  I received the unit and put the shelves in the way I wanted.  The main problem with this unit, as I soon discovered is that the doors can't really hold any amount of weight.  Even after I switched off the CD's I had in the doors to half CD half DVD, they still are crooked and off kilter.  The weight of the disks causes the doors to scrape the base and not line up correctly when closed.  This makes the unit nearly useless in my opinion, unless you want to make the doors all DVD.  I hate the way it looks damaged and sloppy.  I am kicking myself for choosing this item for pure aesthetics.  I merely assumed I was getting quality as well due to the price for this size unit, but that was not the case.  I wouldn't buy or reccomend this product unless you have low expectations and can't do with any other look for your decor.
Misleading. I am looking for a remote trainer for one of my dogs. Amazon's listing says this Innotek trainer comes with a "lifetime warranty." I've read that batteries can be an issue with remote training collars, so I decided to review the owner's manual to learn more about the warranty.[...]The last page has a section entitled "Lifetime Limited Warranty," which states ". . . INNOTEK brand products will be free from defects in material and workmanship, under normal use, for a period of one year from the date of the original retail purchase."The "lifetime warranty" apparently expires after one year!Further on it says, the company "offers several product exchange options during the warranty period. . . . Costs are dependent on the processing time."This suggests customers will incur fees for warranty repairs even during the one year "lifetime" warranty.The next paragraph says "After one year from date of original retail purchase, we will repair, replace or upgrade your product at afixed rate based on the component."What will these repairs cost?This leaves me with a big question mark about buying a collar from Innotek.  What, if anything, is warranted for a "lifetime?"  If the lifetime warranty is really only for one year, why call it "lifetime?" And finally, what will repairs cost, both during warranty under their "product exchange options" and afterwards under their component-based "fixed rate?"My specific concern is that the collar contains a rechargeable battery. The manual does not indicate that this battery is user-replaceable. Does this mean the user will have to send the collar to Innotek to replace the battery and, if so, what will it cost?I have contacted Innotek through their website and will report back if I get a response. Until I do, I've got to rate this product with only one star because of the warranty.Can anyone comment on warranty claims to Innotek
What a Pain. The machine is tempremental at best - it would not use my preferred pre-ground expresso.  But is worked ok with ground beans a bit more course.  Then, I broke my glass coffee carafe - my fault, I'll buy a replacement ($24). Replacements do not come with lids.  As the lid was attached to the broken glass, I had thrown it away.  Krups will sell a replacement lid ($6, for a total of $30), but won't have it in for a month or so.  Machine does not work without the lid.  I have used Krups machines for 15+ years - never again.  My $30 is going towards a new Mr. Coffee
Cute but no tools. As the title says, this is a super cute vacuum cleaner with a comfortable right-angled handle but it has only a floor cleaning tool and a crevice tool--no tools for cleaning upholstery or curtains. Why on earth not? I'm having to return it because with dogs, I really need those features
feels like paper. This pillow cover is terrible.  It is not made out of fabric but out of paper.  It is unusable unless you like rolling over and feeling/hearing the crinkle of paper
Capresso 114. I have had this machine for about 2 years. I quit using it for a long time because it is almost impossible to get the right grind. The coffee just drips one drip at a time. I have tried my own burr grinder and had 3 coffee shops grind it from a #5 settin to a #8 and nothng works.I started using it again and I found that it will work it I use factory ground Starbucks, but I can't find decaff pre ground. I just ordered a different brand machine and I will junk this one.It has never worked right. I have spent hours experimenting and calling the factory. The want $60 to check it out, but I will put that toward a different machine
metal flakes in your ice cream. This product is very sturdy and seems to be well built, but I wound up returning it for a refund.  Each time I used it, the gearbox above the ice cream container ground LOTS of metal flakes into my ice cream.  I have read reviews of this machine since I returned it that say the same thing.  It is a neat looking product that freezes ice cream well, but unless you like to eat chunks of metal with your ice cream, I would find another machine
Not So Pleased. For the price, you get what you pay for.  They are not the best quality
Absolute piece of expensive JUNK!. I bought one thinking the larger size and villaware name would yield great results. I presently use 2 small cuisinarts to pump out enough waffles to keep the masses happy. I cannot tell you strongly enough what an utter failure this maker is. Just like the previous reviewer, I had it on high for several minutes and the lower parts ended up dry and burnt and the upper uncooked. Uneven, slow and way too underpowered. The top sits down unevenly and the weight allows for little flexibility in top rising. It is a shame as the manufacturing and materials seems to be very high quality, but the design is horrid. Proof is in the pudding, and after 8 minutes in this thing at high, the waffles still looked like pudding. DO NOT BUY THIS!!!!
far too expensive for the quality. I must agree with the negative reviewers that this pan's nonstick coating began coming off almost immediately after I began using it.  I'm not talking about scratches, which often are a result of using the wrong kind of implements for cooking and cleaning.  My pan began pock all over, even up the sides where I rarely touch them.  I hung on to this pan for 3 years, simply because I could not bear to part with it for the expense.  But eventually I had to treat it like my other All-Clad pans (which I LOVE) and use full amounts of oil to cook.  It was no longer worth using.Although the reviewer who loves this pan was "certain" the rest of us who have not liked this pan were not caring for the pan properly, that "certainty" is based on nothing but speculation.  I cared for my pan precisely according to the directions provided by All-Clad.  Of course, I could have asked All-Clad to replace it early on, since it was clear the nonstick coating was coming off on its own accord.  But that would not have changed the fact that the coating on my pan was coming off
A much better product when it was made in Germany. The Chinese version of this kettle is lighter and more flimsy - true, it is cheaper, but sometimes you just don't want cheap.  We had a German one that lasted 10 years - and is still being used by by wife in her office.  The one we recently got just is not the same item.  Bo! on Chef's Choice
deni ice crusher review. I use crushed ice when I have medical problems. I have'nt had any since I purchased the unit. Therefore I have nothing to report.
Not worth it. I own 3 coffee presses, all made by BonJour and I love 2 of them. This one is made with lexan, plastic plunger and a rubber O ring. There is always lots of floating coffee bits to many too scoop out and too many to ignor. Don't get it, but a glass one
Knobs too big for some mugs. Be sure you are planning to use this mug tree with large-handled mugs. Small mugs, like those that come with dinnerware sets, may not fit over the knobs on the ends of the arms. Also, two of the arms did not screw in properly
Don't do it. Listen to everyone on this website. I almost threw this coffee maker across my living on more than one occasion due to it's extremely poor design.  Mr. Coffee really struck out on this one considering they are a company that only makes coffemakers.  First of all, the water filter device failed after a few uses and would no longer allow water to flow freely through it.  This could have been due to the hardness of the tap water in my area but regardless, it's a filter, it's supposed to be able to be subjected to not so perfect water.  So before i figured out the filter wasnt allowing water to flow I would let it brew and the water would never make it out of the resovoir and would basically just steam up and evaporate.  After the entire brewing cycle I would pull the carafe out and there would be NO coffee in the carafe.  After realizing it was the filter that was causing problems i just simply removed it and didnt use it.  The coffee maker worked for a few days but only if you place the paper coffee filter in perfectly.  Otherwise, the dripping water would cause the filter to collapse and then the grains would run out of the filter, clogging the drain and then voila, you get an overflowed grain basket with dirty, grainy water all over your counters.I do not recommend this coffee maker for any reason.  Get the hamilton beach Stay or Go 45234
Great Item, but can't find it anywhere. The water filter for the Braun Flavorselect 12 cup coffee maker Model KF187 is a great design.  I rate it #5 for it's design, but since my original purchase of the coffee maker, I can't find the filter units anywhere
Garbage. I can't get mine to even pierce the can, takes 10 minutes of fiddling around to get it to pierce the can and then maybe it will open it half way.  Save your money
save your money!. I bought this item based on price, how can you go wrong for 10$ for a programable coffee maker? Well, you get what you pay for. after having this coffee pot for only 3 weeks, it just stopped working! Just to ship it back would have been the cost of the item! based on the rest of the reviews, I just threw away and went out and bought a mr. coffee. lesson learned.treehous
Don't even try. I bought this hand mixer based on the quality implied by the Cuisinart name -- I had had their processor for over 20 years.  Huge mistake.  Cuisinart's quality has gone downhill in those 20 years.  This mixer lasted barely a year, diving downward the entire year but not so far as to call in a warrenty claim.  (Besides, I had had to deal with Cuisinart's so-called customer service in getting a worn-down part for the food processor, and didn't have the heart to try that again.  They berate you for "misusing" their products -- even if you're not complaining and it is only a wear issue.  Weird.)  Anyway, this mixer is done for.  It was never able to handle cookie dough, so I never asked it to after a couple of tries.  They offer a dough hook, but that's fiction.  Don't buy it.  Don't try it. Walk the other way.  (PS:  I was so blinded I thought it was just me and not Cuisinart, and replaced the old, worn food processor a few months ago with a new Cuisinart.  Anyway, the new supposedly equivalent processor is a total bust.  Very weak.  I can't believe it.  So Cuisinart has dropped off my list of reliable companies.  Too bad.  That old processor was really good for 20 years of hard use.
Arrived Heavily Damaged. I ordered the bench, the armchair and the coffee table.  The armchair arrived damaged, and the bench arrived so damaged, I couldn't use it.  Beware, you can't return these items to the store; I have to ship the bench back in a heavily damaged box at my own expense as USPS won't take the box it came in.
Poor Choice for a Steamer. The way this Steamer was advertised, I really thought it gave out alot of steam, and lasted a decent amount of time.  I tried it a few times and was very disappointed. I returned the item
not good for an airedale. I recently purchased the clipper--but after arrival discovered it is not designed to use on an Airedale's wire coat...The clipper went through aboout a six inch swatch and wouldn't go through any more. The motor worked okay but it doesn't cut her hair
poorly designed electrical contacts. I used to love this kettle.  I've had this kettle for over four years now and it has developed the same problem as some of the people who gave it one-star reviews.  The electrical contacts have degraded over the past few months and today I couldn't get it to turn on at all no matter how many times I twisted it around on its base.I've cleaned the contacts twice in the past few months to no avail.  Maybe an improvement for all of a day each time.Looking inside the base, I can see why the contacts die -- they don't grip the metal ring & spike at all, but rather the ring and spike just rest on loosely sprung metal.  Wish I'd thought to inspect that before buying it.There's no excuse for such a bad design.  Were they hoping for a repeat buy?  Not going to happen
Big Mistake. This was one of the worst purchases I've ever made.  The problem that I had with mine is the litter pouring out all over the place.  Everytime I went to flip the thing over, the litter came out of the cracks.  Everytime that I went to take out the little drawer that is supposed to hold the waste, more litter came out.  I ended up using it just as a regular litter box.  It was a complete disaster if I tried to use it otherwise.  Plus, the opening of the litter box is so low, that everytime the cat goes in and out, even more litter comes out of it.  I'm getting ready to throw it in the garbage once and for all, but I must admit I've never had any satisfaction from it
I'm a sucker but bought a replacement carafe anyway. All I can say is, the new carafe hasnt exploded yet. What I originally thought was a freak occurance is obviously a serious product design problem. (Why is the inside made of glass?)My original carafe lasted about a year and then randomly exploded during cleaning. I think I put cooler water in the carafe after it recently had hot coffee in it. From reading the other reviews, this is a common issue but I bought another one anyway!
whats the point. I dont recoment you to buy this product. I dont under stand why they made i
Not worth it at ALL. I'm a HUGE All-Clad fan and I thought that this would be the best splatter screen out there.  I was VERY wrong.  This lets so much grease through it's joke.  Sure, it's not as bad as using nothing, but my entire stove is still covered with grease...and the design is very annoying, too.  You can't store it up against the inside wall of a cabinet because of the handle design (which also is dangerous BTW - to lift it off a pan you have to grab it right over the pan - as opposed to a handle extending out - with grease splattering everywhere and steam and heat coming right out.  Plus the handle gets EXTREMELY hot as a result of this design, as well as it's over the same heat as your food.  PLEASE save yourself $$$ and cleaning time and find a screen with smaller holes
It failed to work for me. A collegue of mine raved about it--she has several of the smaller model in her home and brought one in the office.  I tried it for a day, but was not convinced either way.  Then, I bought the largest model, and tried it at home.  I used it exactly as written in the instructions and put it to the "acid test".  I used it in the toilet room, closed the door, and let it sit there for 8 hours.  When I inspected the room, I could still smell what I smelled 8 hours earlier. And I so wanted it to work!  The other thing that bothers me is that it is supposed to make the odors undectable to the human nose, but even the manufacturer does not claim that it actually removes the source of the odor (as does a HEPA air filter)
Keyboard Drawer Inadequate. While very attractive this desk suffers from what so many inexpensive computer desks do an inadequately sized keyboard drawer.   There is enough room for the keyboard but not enough for a mouse.  This results in forcing you to have to reach forward to use the mouse on the top of the desk. I ultimately decided just put he keyboard on top the desk and raise up my chair.  The manufacturer should consider eliminating one of the drawers and extending the keyboard shelf
The plastic stinks. This brand new kettle - after having been cleaned, descaled with vinegar  (at Proctor Silex's suggestion), filled with a solution of water and baking soda (at Proctor-Silex's suggestion) reeks of a chemical, plastic smell, which it imparts to any water boiled in it.We're returning it immediately. Feh
Defective Control Master Heat Control. I bought this frying pan as a gift for my Mother and had it shipped to California where she is taking care of my 99 year old grandfather. The packaging and papers were accidently thrown away. She tried to use the pan for a roast on Jan. 12th. and set the dial to 220 to roast slowly.  When she checked it in a short time, the water was boiling rapidly and could not be reduced to a simmer. No matter what setting, it just plain got scortching hot.There is supposed to be a one year warranty, but Amazon only takes returns in the first 30 days and in original packing. I tried to contact them but can find no contact information on the web. Someone should replace the defective part, but I don't know how to accomplish this
R.I.P. I bought this kettle in February 2006. I liked everything about it until its automatic ON-OFF switch died recently - only two months after the purchase. Now the kettle won't turn on. It wasn't abused in any way, and these kettles usually last for years and years. The last one of similar kind served me well for 12 years until it started to leak and was replaced with this spanking new Proctor Silex K4070.I wonder if my bad experience with this kettle was unique? Has anyone else had one with a short-lived switch, or was I unlucky?
CatGenie-Self Washing, Self Flushing Cat Box. It is a great concept, but mine kept filling with water and then getting an error so my cats never had a chance to use it.  I tried all of the stuff to get the errors to stop but i never had it go a whole cycle without getting an error.  I would definately be worth the money if it would work correctly
Microwave for RV. Our microwave went out and this was the replacement. It is just what we wanted and needed. The company was excellent to deal with
Very Difficult and Unpleasant To Use!. I bought it because the price was right, but this juicer is definitely wrong.  I lack the upper-body strength of a weight-lifter (which is required to turn the crank) and the patience it takes to produce any juice at all.  It makes a terrible mess and is annoying to assemble and disassemble.  I WANT A REFUND (AND SOME BAND-AIDS, PLEASE)
Disappointing dishrack. This dishrack looks much nicer than most you'd see in stores but the quality is not as good as it should be for the price.  The main part of the rack is very similar to wire cake-cooling racks, not very substantial, and the tray underneath is not slanted for water runoff as most dishrack drainers are.In addition to this disappointment, it was delivered in a huge box that looked as if it had been handled by Ace Ventura.  The single rack had banged around in the box that could have accommodated 15 racks, and as a result the stainless steel tray was slightly dented.  Very weird!
Flawed design. I have watched Emeril and perhaps others using this food processor and ending up with liquid all over the counter.  I just dismissed it as part of Emeril's shtick until I bought this machine for myself.  The first time I tried to use it with any liquid ingredients (making mayonnaise), it blew much of the liquid through the joint between the top and the bowl.  The top is just flawed in its design, as it would seem pretty obvious that the part of the top overlapping the side of the bowl should be on the inside rather than the outside of the bowl.  I suppose it had not occurred to me that anyone would design the top in the way that KA did, much less that such a design flaw would be overlooked in so many reviews (e. g. Consumer Reports and Cook's Illustrated).In any case, this machine is pretty much useless for wet ingredients and borderline for dry (they blow through the badly designed joint as well) unless you feel that wiping up a large part of your ingredients from the counter, the outside of the bowl, the bottom of the machine, and any items nearby is a reasonable thing to expect to do.  I will probably get rid of the machine in some way and go back to the Cuisinart I have had for some time as it is a much better design in this regard.
A Bad Buy. After 6 months of use, the LED switch popped out of the coffeemaker's base, which turned the wired plug into an on/off device. I found that Black & Decker no longer services these products and the firm that does doesn't respond to e-mail
YUCK. I agree wholeheartedly with the other reviewers about the smell of this cleaner...it almost made me lose my lunch.  Disgusting, UGH.  I suggest anyone who cannot stand this smell to use the Bissell formulations, either the Wood Floor Solutions or Hard Floor Solutions.  They have a pleasant, fresh, clean scent
Handle won't even move!. I started by lifting the handle to open the machine. I then tried closing it again without anything inside, just to see how it worked. I couldn't push the handle back down. A little frustrated, I thought that perhaps it was a safety device that wouldn't allow you to trap your fingers, so I grabbed a potato to experiment with. Unfortunately, unless you use baby potatoes, they don't fit into the machine anyway. I find it hard to understand how this item can be called a "potato cutter", when it doesn't. I tried all sorts of things in the cutter and nothing would allow me to push the handle back down. I finally used a screwdriver to lever the contraption shut, just to enable me to put it back in the box for a full refund
Product does not work well. I had high hopes for these space bags.  I bought several in advance of our cross-country move.  I think two of them worked, as in, stayed sealed and compressed.  The rest would not stay sealed, no matter what we did.  I would not buy these again.  I wish I had saved the money
Bad Unit. Wish I had heeded the advice of most of the reviewers before I purchased this. I went ahead and purchased this because it was replacing a Braun coffee maker that we had had for 10 - 15 years.  After it got the new plastic taste out of it, it made good coffee. Even without the Brita Filter.  Just like all the reviewers indicated, the carafe leaked and spilled badly unless you poured very slowly and carefully.  Unfortunately, it has quit working after only 2 1/2 months.  The seller, Etronics, is declining to do anything about it saying it is now outside of their 30 return period.  That will be the last thing I buy through them.  Like uhh, since they sell Braun,one would think they would have some recourse through Braun and try to help their customers.  So, here I am between the proverbial rock and a hard place,  try to find a Braun warranty center and wait for it to get repaired or replaced, or just bite the bullet an go buy another. (want to bet it won't be a Braun?) Additionally, what do we do for coffee in the mean time?  Such are the hazards of purchasing an electric appliance on the internet
I wish I were better at returning things. 1. no attachment-so, you can clean a 1 inch circle at once (how convenient is that?)2. It is heavy and smooth and cone shape!  This does not make for a comfortable, secure grip (the other kinds a toddler could use)  I don't get the good reviews!!!!!!!!good for ... cracks in car seat
SAVE YOUR MONEY. I have owned this litter box, I'd say about 3 months now. I have to tell you, this is such a cool concept! However, I would be happier had I just set my money on FIRE. I'd sure be a lot less stressed at least.The first few days, it worked fine. I was so excited. My cats suprisingly used it, and I had no problems at all. I thought I was in heaven. But such is life, all good things must come to an end. It started erroring.. EVERYTIME I used it. Sometimes... for no reason. It would all finished drying the granules and everything would be dandy and BEEP BEEP BEEP.. so then I'd hit the button, and it would start all over again!! To be honest, I think this is a built in scam just so it uses more of that solution and you have to buy more... which btw, I'm pretty certain that solution is nothing more than a gimmick so they can get more of your money. The 300+ bucks just wasn't enough.But anyways. Back to the errors. It would error every time I used it. EVERY time. And it would always be a different error. I'd fix it (which btw, it drains like CRAP)... and then go on about my day. Well one day, I forgot it was running and went over to my neighbors. I was there about... 2 hours ish. When I walked outside her door, to my annoyance, I could of course, hear my "so awesome" cat genie... beeping in error. And to my even WORSE annoyance, apparently the long term beeping kept 2 of my 3 cats, from ever wanted to go near it again. So 1 of them kept trying to go outside to use the bathroom... and she's not an outdoor cat... and the other one just took it upon herself to pop a squat wherever she felt comfortable.Now fast forward about 4 days ago. My cat genie just STOPPED draining. Altogether. Stopped. I walked in and saw that it was about to overflow.. (the one time it doesn't give me an error beep!!) so I frantically turned it off and tried to fix it. It didn't work. I tried again... and tried for about an hour when finally, I accepted defeat and took it apart... and dumped the water. Most of it got on my floor.. which I was ecstatic about since that's what I was trying to prevent in the first place... went to my computer... and e-mailed the company. That was about 4 days ago... and I've not heard back from them since.So I assume they're realizing what a huge peice of crap they're selling and hopefully they either fix said peice of crap, or stop selling it altogether..... because I'm not happy that I spent so much money, on such a huge worthless peice of junk.Like I said, it's a cool concept...... but it just plain doesn't work. And for the people on here that it DID work for... Congrats. But 300+ bucks is too much of a gamble for something that just "might not work".Stick to the regular old litter box for now. That's where I'm back to..
Didn't work for me. This thermometer just didn't work.  I ruined a batch of carmel because the gage wouldn't rise above 220.  I don't know if I just got a "bad" one, but I'm not going to find out by exchanging it.  When I return it, I'm getting a different, more trusted brand.
Dead on Arrival. Machine arrived dead on arrival.  None of the water would force its way though the coffee grounds and would go into the overflow.  Had to send it back and would not reccommend
Very Disappointed. This lamp would be gorgeous if it was made as described - there is nothing bronzelike about it - it is PAINTED a dark yuck brown. Three very obvious sections make up the pole - it reminds me of an old pole lamp!  The &quot;textured&quot; part is occasional comblike scratches in the metal before it was painted the yuck brown. It is a sleazy knock-off of what was probably a high style lamp
Returned asap very poor quality disappointed!. I ordered two of these in King very disappointed very poor quality item cotton is very hard seams coming apart every where loose threading returned asap The abigail quilt I purchased from amazon was excellent.
Form over function. The machine looks great. It sat nicely on our counter-top next to the Kitchen Aid mixer and looked really classy. If that was all I wanted to do with it, then I would have been very happy with it, but I actually wanted to make decent lattes and espressos.Firstly, I found the steamer wand to be awkward to use. It rotates, but has little movement up or down. As a result, I found it pretty impossible to steam milk without spilling some on the counter-top when I was finished. It produced good foam though.Secondly, the indicator lights are so dim I found it difficult to tell whether the machine was ready or not.Finally the espressos I made had no crema at all. I have been making them for 3 years with our current Saeco machine with a delightful crema on each one. After pulling the shot it continued to leak water from the filter holder. The machine was constantly leaking water & steam when it got up to temperature and the design of the drip tray is such that it is awkward to empty it without spilling everywhere.In summary: If you just want a pretty machine to sit on your counter, buy this machine. If you want to make decent espresso-based drinks, don't
Not for dogs that like to chew. I bought this toy from a local Petsmart for my 2 yr. old Boxer.  He had this toy chewed up within 20 minutes.  The rubberband like material broke off into his mouth very easily.  I recommend this toy ONLY if you only want to play fetch with this toy.  Do not let your dog chew on it!
It won't work. This thing doesn't dispense anything.  I looked 9 times for something to remove or something like that, but nothing comes out.  Anyone have a similiar problem
crap - useless crap. not worth the trouble, holds hardly any liquid, seemingly needs to be cleaned after every use.  waste of money.  stay away
As much work as ironing. For the price, it IS amazing that this steamer does anything, which accounts for all the rave reviews.  This little number is not real powerful, so you don't get the effortless, quick steamer results that most of us seek.  The steam output is low, so you go over and over the garment, with little improvement.  Forget about using it on linen.  Even on thin cotton, it creates tiny spider wrinkles.  You have to hold the hose vertically to prevent water from spurting, which is awkward and dangerous, as the hose gets HOT.  You have to have a door near an electrical outlet.  Then the hook doesn't fit over the thickness of the door, nor does the hose reach the item hanging from it.  It is as much work as ironing, but with ironing, you can eventually achieve the desired result.  The steamer is compact, heats quickly and doesn't take up much room.  I returned mine, but there may be a few people who like this steamer
cheese slicer. I am disappointed in this cheese slicer.  I had a similar one manufactured by the same company.  It lasted for about 15 years!  This cheese slicer does not cut all the way through the cheese because the slot in which the wire sits is uneven.
Extreme Disappointment. I am very disappointed with this knife tray.  It is best described as shoddy
Cheap Product. I bought the item, and as soon as I opened the packaged I was wondering if it was going to work and if so, how long it would last.  Needless to say, after about 2  hours of use, the item just stopped working.  I beleive it had something to do with the cheap button used to turn the product on.  Yes, it was a cheap toy to buy price wise, but I guess I got what I paid for
Pretty, but not tough enough... We've had this set for about 3 years and after about a year they began to chip and/or crack.  They are beautiful and affordable, but they just do not last.  I had two plates crack in half in the microwave.  A mug handle break off as I slowly turned it in the dishwasher rack.  It's too bad because I really liked this set
Not Happy. It seems everyone loves this wok, but I didn't have a very good experience with it.  I have cleaned and seasoned carbon steel pans in the past, so I know how to do it.  But, the factory coating that came on this one was impossible to remove completely.  I thought I had it cleaned off, after following the directions and scrubbing and scrubbing.  However, the first time I cooked with it, the places where it simply wouldn't come off burned and turned sticky.  I ended up giving it away
Can't Get Grooves Clean. I did not buy the whole set. My review is for an 8" fry pan. It was one of those "try it" deals. I do not like the grooves in the pan because after, for instance, frying an egg, the grooves retain food and if you don't use a brush to scrub the grooves you'll find that after it has dried there are going to be bits of food caught in the grooves. I can't imagine cleaning a whole set of this cookware. Yikes
to be a fry pan in our house is a true test of any cookware. that said, the All-Clad Stainless 14-Inch Nonstick Fry Pan has clearly failed. the non-stick surface began to deteriorate long before any other non-stick pan we've owned has in the past.we received this pan as part of 10-peice set, and really, it's the only complaint we have about the set in general. the rest of the All-Clad pieces have performed beautifully and withstood all of the rigors of being cookware in a house with two accomplished and passionate chefs.about a year ago we gave up on this pan and purchased the 'Restaurant Fry Pan Set' from Nordic Ware (8" and 10") and they have performed much better than the All-Clad version of the same and held there non-stick surface now four times as long -- at a fraction of the cost! unfortunately this set is not currently available on amazon.Note: I should point out, in response to the "weekend" chef who gave this pan five stars, that both my wife and I are well versed in the care of non-stick pans (plastic and wooden utensils only, let them cool before you wash them, etc.) and the surface still deteriorated. I'm sticking to my guns, (no pun intended) these two other non-stick fry pans have now lasted over four years without a hitch. the All-Clad lasted only six-months with the same love and care
Looks nice... uneven toaster. This is a stylish toaster.  Have you tried finding a decent toaster lately?  I've been through many.  If you like crispy dark toast, this is it - but if you like browned toast, this is uneven and burns one end, and light on the other.  This is the second one of these I had.  The first was bad and so the customer service (which is very good) sent me a replacement.  It's just as bad.  Used to be any cheapo toaster would do a great job.  It's much harder to find one now.  If you look inside when the elements are going, many of the windings of the heating elements are too tight and so don't heat up since they are flush against the insulation so only around 1/2 of the inner elements even glow red, but the outer ones are better, so it's very uneven.  Good luck
desk chairs. were not in stock, order cancelled, no other info. has been received regarding item
Very poor lid construction and unworkable pump. While attractive, the pump works poorly and the top does not screw properly to the bottle. I constantly found one side popped up because the innards of the pour spout are too low, preventing a proper fit when screwing the lid back on. After removing most of the offensive "innards", the top now sits properly and to use it, I just remove the top and POUR my soap. Why? Because it's still attractive sitting on my sink and pouring rather than pumping is no biggi
problems with Bulters Pantry dishes. I received a 12-piece placesetting of these dishes for our wedding. After using the dishes for about six months, cracks have appeared in the glazing and edges have chipped/flaked off bowls and plates. The dishes have not been used extensively, and it appears that even light "everyday" use by two people is too much for them. Lenox recommends using low temperature dishwasher setting and low temperature microwave use. Even following those instructions, our dishes have cracked and chipped. When I called Lenox to complain, they told me they would have to send a formal letter of authroization, at which time I would be asked to mail them the damaged dishes (10 dinner plates, nine bowls and one salad plate). One of their quality control specialists would examine the dishes and call me back I would not recommend this line from Lenox. I am awaiting the authorization letter, but overall, I am very disappointed in this product and the company that buit its reputation on quality and high standards. I would not recommend these dishes.
Takes too long. I haven't had much success with this ice cream maker.  I usually give up after 2 hours of churning, and the mixture is far from ice cream at that point.  I usually have to throw it all in my freezer to get it to solidify into something resembling ice cream.  I saw in another review that it has taken another user 2.5-4 hrs to make ice cream.  That's way too long...seems like the old hand crank ice cream maker my parents used to use was a lot quicker
Disappointed. I ordered this product a month ago and have yet to receive it. What's the problem
not size stated. This hamper is not the size stated in the description.  It is 18 1/2" wide
Waste of money!!!. Please take my advice and buy another coffee maker!  Made excellent coffee...at the beginning.  Within a couple of months, we started spending many mornings wiping up the entire pot of coffee that brewed and dispensed onto the counter.  Then, the grinder started randomly starting itself and not shutting off.  TOTAL WASTE OF MONEY!!!
I wouldn't buy it again. I bought this slicer, to cut my German bread, that I bake myself. The slicer worked good at first and I was pleased, but after 5 1/2 months, I started to have problems with it. The machine started to make noises and the blade would stop spinning. Come to find out, that the gears ( located underneath the blade ) are made out of plastic and the wore out. So if you need this slicer for cutting bread like I do, it's no good.Now I'm on the search for a slicer that has gears out of metal, but it seems like there is none. I've contacted Deni and Waring and their gears are made out of plastic as well. So if anyone out there has a slicer that has metal gears or has a slicer that has lasted more than 1 year in constant use, please let me know. I need a good one for a decent price.
Dissapointed DeLonghi customer. Decided to buy the DeLonghi heater, as recommended by ConsumerReports.  On being powered on, the unit oscillated but neither fan nor heater started up.  I did make sure the 'safety trip' was not activated.  This is located below the unit, designed to switch it off in case it toppled over.  In short, I put in the effort, to make sure I wasn't doing anything stupid, since the unit 'looked' fine - nothing obviously broken.A prior reviewer seems to have had similar problem, but thought Amazon's package handling might be the culprit.  In my case, the packaging on arrival was excellent.Return procedure for Amazon was surprisingly smooth, they even refunded the shipping fee for sending it back.
Not air tight. These containers are a great size and hold exactly what they say they will and save cabinet space.  Unfortunatly my sugar clumped up because of moisture and bugs got into my flour..  I'd suggest Snapware instead..
I sent this knife back. This knife was dull upon receipt.  I sent it back...although I loved the handle shape and color
Good and Bad. I added this Henkels International 5 piece Scissors when I purchased Henkels Pro-S 8inch High Carbon Chef's knife. The price for this 5 piece package was great considering the name value of Henkels. However, the quality of product was not even close to the same scissor I purchased 8 years ago, and surprisingly, within 2 weeks they are getting rusty on hinges.Well --- what you are paying for is what you are going to get
Exquisite product -as long as you don't intend to use it. This stunning slice of kitchen couture is undoubtedly a tactile and aesthetic dream - built with quality materials like real metal (not silvery plastic), and sporting a sophisticated, drop-dead gorgeous retro appeal.  It looks equally as impressive in the hippest New York loft kitchens as it does on the shelves of Williams-Sonoma.However, as is the case when function follows form, this is a horrible blender.  Don't get me wrong - I'm more than willing to forgive a modicum of piss-poor functionality if the design is attractive enough to render the former irrelevant.  But quite frankly, this blender is beyond bad.Most unfortunate is the blender's propensity to splash everywhere - even when the user deliberately reinforces the lid onto the jar by hand.  It seems to make little difference how much or what type of liquid one is mixing; it inevitably overflows with explosive fervor.  I suspect that the unit's quasi-industrial motor may be a contributing factor; it only supports two speeds: off, and jet-cyclonic.  While I admit that the minimalist toggle switch is profoundly chic in its own right, the consequences of omitting ramp-up speeds are overbearing, consistently messy, predictably inconvenient, and potentially dangerous (as liquid tends to flow liberally into the motor housing).  The irregular cloverleaf shaped jar also seems to play a role in splattering liquids upward; and the blender's poorly-sealed lid does little to stop it from overflowing in dramatic fashion.  In fact, this blender splashes so profusely that it's nearly unusable.It's too bad, because superficially, this blender really is quite the objet d'art.  But when it comes to meeting the minimum requirements for acceptable performance, it has a long way to go - even in comparison to a $29 Oster.If I had to summarize this blender as accurately, succinctly, and fairly as possible, I'd distill it down to one word - "regrettable."
Not so great... I have had this sweeper for several months and like others, it's main purpose was to keep my kitchen floor, laundry room, and basement floors clean. Well, it does pick up larger debris best, but when you go for picking up hair, dust and dirt, it blows a lot of it around, not to mention, I noticed that the entire sweeper itself becomes COVERED in dust. Don't buy this sweeper if tou expect it to "suck" things up. It provides NO suction but a motorized brush roll that spins and rolls things up into the dust cup. I recommend this for occasional use for spills like cereal, rice, etc. As far as being a tool to "clean" your floors, you will be quite disappointed. In fact I only use this now to clean my laundry room area and basement floors to pick up debris so it doesn't get tracked in my upstairs
A Great Big Mess all over my Stove and Kitchen floor. We used this fryer a few times and never quite got the food to come out as crispy as we wanted. We attributed that to a learning curve about what oil to use and also the fact the we had never used fryers before.A couple things we were willing to put up with that could be improved were:1. The light turns off when the temperature is reached (wouldn't it be better to have the light go on when the temperature is reached?)2. The light is in a bad viewing position all the way towards the back of the fryer behind a big knob, so unless you're very tall, you have to tippy toe up to look down on it to see when the light is off. We are 5'6" and 5'9"--3. There is not a digital read-out of the current temperature of the oil.But all those points became moot the other day when I made fries. While the fries were enjoyable enough (even though they were a bit soggy) after letting the oil cool in the fryer, I started draining it with the automatic filtration system. I was impressed with the functionality of the drainage system as I watched the oil drain into the bottom tray.Then I got about my other business in the kitchen.Several minutes later I looked over and the oil had leaked all over my stove and floor!!! There must have been at least two cups of oil that seeped all over my stove (luckily not my burners since I have a very wide older electric stove with a space large enough to hold the fryer.) What a @@@@@@@ mess. That kind of disaster does not warrant another chance in my opinion.I'm sending it back
can openers should be easy. i bought this can opener to replace a lessexpensive hamilton beach model that stopped working.  i needed a black one so i took a chance on the same brand, better model.  well, i was wrong.  the can opener never works on the first try.  i have to fiddle around with can placement to get it to work.  it tears and bunches up the label under its cutting blade, it whirrs away, but cut nothing 90% of the.  i feel lucky whenever i get a can opened and down right incredulous if it works on the first try.  do not buy this product.  if i hadn't optmistically thrown out the box, i would have returned it
not as good as the first one I owned. I bought my first Presto Power Pop many, many years ago. I  loved it. Finally, after so many years of use the plastic bowl developed cracks on the bottom. So I ordered a new one. The concentrator base on this new one scorches holes in the paper concentrators after only 2 uses ( with the old popper I could reuse about  12 times.
Cat collar. The idea is good, but the collar too easily slipped off our cat's neck
Holmes HM630-U Tower Humidifier. I'm not happy.  The filter needed changing one day out of the box.  We have soft water so this should have lasted a while.  Difficult to hang on to when filling, have to hold it like a baby.  Does put out the air though and fits about anywhere
NOT Pottery Barn!. If what you're looking for is lush, plush truly thick towels, these are NOT it. If you want Pottery Barn luxe, you'll have to go there. These are a poor substitute. I could not have been more disappointed. I returned them all.
Pleasant Enough. I Purchased a set simply because they came close in design to our everyday flatware.  They come in a nice pine box which has no lid so they do take up space on a drawer or shelf.  The knives themselves are very light weight.  Our set (black and steel) was fine with no obvious flaws.  The handles are lightweight plastic and the rivets are small so there is a question of how long they will hold up. They would have done better to use resin impregnated wood.  The tang does go the length of the grip.  These seem as sharp as any steak knives I have used and are quite comfortable in the hand and do afford good control when triming a steak or a chop close to the bone!  I would say they are of the same level of quality that you might find at a  Woolworths (of sainted memory!) or a K-Mart.  Not something to buy if you are really looking to even come close to the traditional high quality of either Sabatier or Laguiole.  That said I am planning on buying a second set to match the number of place settings of our everyday flatware
Very Puzzled & Disappointed. I purchased this item as a filler. I have two steamers already that are 5+ yrs old. First of all i found this item to be smaller than i expected. Secondly, i washed this item as instructed and left it out to air dry (as i do with my others without any problems), on the second day i noticed some dark blemishes on the underside. These eventually turned into numberous dark spots on the underside on both basket parts of the steamer. I have never experienced this before! They were deep into the bamboo, this item had just been steamed then washed in very hot water and allowed to air dry... i have no idea how this happened? I used one of my others at the same time and it never developed this problem. I returned the item to Amazon.
4 out of 5 items were defective. I really wanted to like this dining set - it looked nice in the picture and the reviews impressed me.However, when the set was put together 3 out of 4 chairs wobbled - 2 moderately and 1 really bad, the difference in leg length was almost an inch. The reason was easily identified - the connection holes in the back of the chair were drilled in a slanted line instead of horisontal. So no tightening the chairs with someone sitting on them would have helped (besides, there is just not that much leeway with metal-to-metal connections).But that was not all - one of the chairs had a warped back (paper thin warped veneer on the backside of the top). You did hear me say "veneer" - make no mistake, the set is NOT made of solid wood (the description does not claim it to be so, this is just a reminder).Compared to the above the "tiny laquer drops" defect on a small area of the table top was minor.I gave the set 2 stars only because it does look pretty good. If you want to give it a chance and are prepared to mess with getting another set to replace possibly defective items you might get good results after all. With 4 items out 5 coming defective I did not bother to test my luck again and simply returned the purchase. It took an hour of 2 people's time to put the set together and then another hour for me to take it apart and try to pack it back in the box (keep the box!) as this was the only way to return the set.
Don't buy refurbished. We had previously bought this same coffee maker new and liked it so much that we wore it out.  When I saw the refurbished for $20.00 I thought it was a great deal.  It would have been if it had come with all the parts and didn't leak!!  It didn't come with seals or with the water purifier.  I tried everything including new seals (that I bought separately).  Eventually we just went out and purchased a new one, because we still like the model.
I don't understand why you are still selling this product. This percolator is not worth the price.  The coffee tastes lousy and it does not stay hot.I returned mine and purchased the Farberware FCP512S 12-Cup Cordless Percolator.  I love it!
Very flimsy!. I purchased two of these and the metal is flimsy.  Both "boxes" are warped and don't sit squarely on the counter (wobble).  There's nothing I like about them!  One was missing a plastic edge piece on the door. VERY DISAPPOINTING
BAD FIT. I purchased this item thinking it would be great for my 5 yr old's room.  He has a 19 inch TV/VCR/DVD combo that will not fit into the space that was designed to hold a "20 inch" TV.  If you have a modern TV with speakers on the side it will not fit!!!!!  I purchased the item directly from STEP2 and they do not want to refund my shipping fees or pay for me to return the item!!!!
Junk. First, the item came with a manual marked by the previous owner.  That can be overlooked, but the grinder was horrible in its grinding ability.  I may have just as well bought a blade grinder in that the grind was dust and chunks, no matter what setting I put it on.Horrible to say the least.  I sent it back and purchased a new one, which I enjoy to this day
DON'T BUY-NO PARTS OR SERVICE!!!. I purchased this for my daughter, and boy is it a cute idea!!! And it even worked okay, that is for just over 1 yr. Yep, just past the limited warranty. So I called Bissell and they informed me that there are no longer parts available for this model and my only option was to BUY a new one.Well, I told them I am not likely to do that, since it only lasted a year!!! We didn't even get to use the handle extentions that come with it. What a nice addition to the landfills!!
Not too hot. I baked six loaves in this machine.  I have been using various bread machines for the past 12 years and feel comfortable making adjustments when things don't turn out just right.  My big complaint with this machine is the low baking temperatures.  Even on the darkest crust setting and the longest baking time (70 minutes), my loaves were only marginally acceptable - they were not sufficiently baked.  I was using a nearly-whole wheat recipe.  The machine was quiet, strong, and had a lot of bells and whistles, but with only partially baked bread, I had to return it to Amazon.  Amazon shipped it to me in a very poorly packed box which was gaping open when it arrived, but they included return labels which made it a cinch to send back, and were quick enough with the refund
Though beautiful, alas, mine rusted too... One shouldn't have to empty water out after every use.  One shouldn't be punished with a rusty teapot for leaving water in the pot once or twice.  That is not a functional teapot, if that may be the case.  Though it is the prettiest teapot around, it is not very practical if you want to keep it around for a while.  Le Creuset products are generally supposed to last a lifetime, but the enamelware can't even touch the quality of the cast-iron cookware.  Fortunately, the company stands by its products and I am sending mine back for a replacement.  See www.lecreuset.com for details..
Holes not as small as advertised. The add said it would seperate small berry seeds.  The holes on the smallest grate are about 1/8".  You could fit 20 seed through one of them.  Very disappointing
Was below-average for a while, then jammed. I received this blender for x-mas last year.  It has some nice design features (good heavy base to prevent tipping, measuring cup built into the cap).  However, I experienced the same problems that others here have -- the blender doesn't do well with anything thick like milkshakes.  It just shoves everything against the sides of the pitcher and spins helplessly, forcing you to stop and manual stir everything back towards the blades and restart.  While it worked OK for a while, the cutter unit mysteriously jammed after about 9 months
My first Amazon return. A few times it worked great, but mostly it brewed uneven. I'm not being a nitpicker here... Literally one cup would overflow and the other would be 3 inches below the brim. There was no pattern to it, sometimes it was  the left one, sometimes the right one, sometimes neither. Filling the reservoir and seeing where the water level falls is challenging... don't mess up because there are holes in the back and the water will pour right out the back and all over your counter! It only took two days before I realized this was not worth the money or the time
POOR CHOICE - STEER CLEAR. I purchased two Digital KCM-515 Steel 10-Cup Coffee maker as Christmas gifts (one for myself and the other for my sister).  Both of these units turned out to be major DUDS and will be returned quicker than Santa can navigate his way back to the North Pole.PROBLEM: The coffee comes out WARM and the carafe DOES NOT retain warmth for more than 10 minutes (and that's stretching it)!  The heating plate is only warm to the touch immediately after brewing.  You have to microwave the coffee almost immediately after it is brewed.COMMENT:  The reviewer who wrote that having to pre-heat the carafe with piping hot water BEFORE brewing a pot of coffee had it right!  That should have been a clue.  I had the same "gut feeling" when I read the instructions.  In my view, a consumer shouldn't have to waste hot water to "pre-heat" a unit with a stiff sticker price!  As for the reviewer who implied that those of us who are dissappointed with this unit need to read the instuctions -- gimme a break
pretty awful... I bought 2 of these dispensers, one for syrup and one for honey. The dispenser is too stiff for children to use, and while the syrup moves quite freely, it takes hours for honey to pour. It makes for a sticky mess. Definitely not worth having
Handle breaks easily. I bought this crock pot because it didn't look like a traditional country style crock pot. Unfortunately the handle broke off with the slightest bump. You can't even buy a new liner on their parts web site. This thing is a flimsy piece of crap.
Do Not Buy This Product. Do not buy this product or any other product with the Perfect Pour Carafe.  The brilliant designers at Black & Decker thought that they would improve on a centuries old design by incorporating a plastic spout on the glass carafe.  The problem is that the coffee flows in between the two and on to the floor or whatever else you are pouring over.  Nice work guys.  One call to their Customer Service line was cut off.  On the next I chose the option to leave a message and be called back--unfortunately the mailbox was full.  I guess the poor product deserves poor customer service
Hole in One Water Globe. Very disappointed when it broke after 15 minutes of handling.  Very thin glass edges.  Will not buy again
Not very happy. The carafe has a plastic insert with a strong smell. There was no instruction how to pull it out (instructions were very general, incomplete and written in not very good English). I did not get any response from the factory, so I did not have a choice and had to return it. Also, for this price the outside of the top should have been plated better
terrible customer service. If you want to get a migraine and be stuck without a mixer for the holidays this would be the company that you would order from. It is now january 18th and i have yet to receive the mixer or refund on the purchase of this product. i have called and called and called jr electronics and to no avail i still havent received a refund for this product
Go back to the cutting board. I bought the Chop Wizard thinking it would save me time in the kitchen, but it hasn't.  Food has to be prepared (destemmed, decored, sliced, etc.) before going in the device to the extent that I might as well do all the work with my knife and cutting board.  Depending on the food, cleanup can be a hassle too.  Last night, I spend ~ 2 minutes using the cleaning comb accessory to get sweet potato out of the plastic grid on the underside of the lid.  I feel guilty for adding to the waste stream with this device that in my opinion is an insult to the tried and true, fast and easy, cheap and simple knife and cutting board
Not worth the money. Its not light as advertised.  Its actually a very cumbersome broom.  I'd rather use a regular broom than this huge thing.  I would not recommend for every day use.  The bristles get bent due to the weight of it, and they don't sweep as well after a month or so
not the colors stated in the description. Yes these are beautiful dishes, however they are not grey and slate blue or two shades of grey.. they are purple!!! so when they arrived at my door I was really disappointed.. purple doesn't go with the color scheme I have... and slate blue/or grey would have done nicely!so the one star is for Amazonz inability to properly describe the item
Don't Bother!. Total rubbish. Wood was scratched on top, corner was smashed, water damage on the shelf, and door was cracked. It is really irritating to spend an hour putting this tv stand together only to find it is too thrashed to use. The holes were not even lined up properly with the dowels making it quite difficult to put together. Extremely shoddy craftsmanship and apparently no quality control. To add salt in the wound, the crumbly styrafoam packaging got all over the living room and I had to spend a good bit of time vacuuming and sweeping so the dog and the baby would not eat it. If you like taking chances and do still want to buy it, it's probably a 50-50 chance that it will be damaged.
Find another blanket. I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.
Flimsy and uncomfortable. We purchased the Lapinator Plus for $30 plus shipping, as well as the jumbo "Microbead" lap desk for half that price ($15.99).  The microbead desk has a much thicker molded plastic top; the microbead filled base pad conforms to your lap much better and is more comfortable; it's 2 inches wider, 1 inch longer, and accomodates my widescreen laptop better; and it has two pencil wells and a clip on one end so it can be used for a lap desk without the computer: Again, all for half the price of the Lapinator.  The Lapinator Plus has a flimsy, light weight piece of vinyl for a top, a stitched edge, and an uncomfortable foam base that puts my legs to sleep. Buyer beware! Check out the microbead lap desk first.
Like a Ferrari: a frustratingly fickle machine. I bought a Capresso 114.01 espresso machine via Amazon in December of 2005. I had selected it in part, because of the high "bar" pressure rating. Upon receiving it, the first shot of espresso took several minutes to make. The coffee just drips out one drop at a time. The manual suggests "using a coarser grind than other espresso machines". I tried progressively coarser grinds until I was at the coarsest setting of my burr gringer...the coffee was getting weaker, and coming out a little faster, but still taking many minutes for one shot of espresso, with a weak and bitter result and no crema. The manual suggests tamping the coffee ever so lightly. Good suggestion, because if you tamp it with more than a feather's weight of pressure, you get no coffee flow at all. I called Capresso technical support numerous times. They suggested disassembling the machine--unscrewing the metal screen on the body of the machine where the water comes through-- and cleaning it. I did this to no avail. Besides, one shouldn't need to service a machine that is less than a month old in this way! After two months of frustrating, hit-and-miss results, I returned the machine to Amazon. Because it's after the 30 day return period, I may not get a full refund, but I'm glad to be rid of that piece of junk. I have since purchased a $180 Krups XP 4000 espresso machine that just works beautifully, with any grind of coffee (even very fine), any tamping pressure (even quite firm), the machine produces 2 shots of espresso in 25 seconds flat with tons of crema. What a relief
The first time a Taylor product has disappointed me. I bought one that didn't always work, and a replacement one was even less reliable.  I upgraded to a higher priced mechanical timer from Taylor and it didn't work at all.  What can have happened to Taylor products?!
This one is a Dud!. I have numerous KA appliances, including the stand mixer and Food Processor.  I was happy to see a nice salad spinner, but was disappointed when I opened to use it for the first time.  The middle plunger which you are to turn counter clockwise to remove will not budge!  I tried, my husband tried and it is impossible to remove, therefore, I am unable to use the store feature since I cannot remove the plunger.  Something as simple as a salad spinner should not be so complicated
A BIG disappointment. I thought this pan would be multi-purpose. It is not.It is also very "tinny" and not so well made.Save your money and get a adonized pan instead
looks quite cheap, not as good from the picture. looks quite cheap, not as good from the pictur
Not all it's cracked up to be. This grater is not a convenience, it's more of a punishment.  I have tried it for hash browns, cheese, chocolate, etc.  I thought at first I was using it incorrectly, but then realized, there really is no wrong way of using this.  Everytime I have used it it has caused me so much pain in my hands that I would rather do it the old fashioned way and just grate the cheese manually.  My fingers and hands ache so bad that I can't even hold a pencil after using this gadget.  I would not recommend this to anyone.  Unfortunately, you have to rate this with 1 being the lowest star, but in reality I give it NO STARS!
Good but unpredictable. I bought this coffee machine in October 2006 from Amazon after reading the reviews on this page, and I knew that some users had problems with the coffee leaking over the sides and onto the hot plate. But I figured that it was only happening to some of the customers and some of the time.This coffee maker makes great coffee and it looks good on our counter.But this coffee machine needs constant supervision because, at least in our case, it will drizzle/drool/leak over the sides and onto the hotplate and frequently in enough volume to also go over the edge of the plate and all over the counter. If we set it up to make a 6 cup pot and go off to have a shower, we frequently come back to a mess on the counter top, because at least a cup of coffee has not made it into the carafe. And as someone noted, it's impossible to figure out how to resolve the problem. We have looked at the "drip stop" mechanism in the basket, and there's nothing obvious here. We've looked at the top of the carafe and there's nothing there either. You can seat and re-seat the carafe and sometimes it will work, and and other times a disaster. Today we are simply staying in the kitchen to watch the entire pot brew, as the leaking can occur at anytime in the brewing cycle, not just at the start. I am now so annoyed that I am writing the company to tell them how annoying this is. And I buying a new coffee maker. I am not sure Amazon will allow me to return the machince, but I will try. Buy something else unless you really like troubleshooting a design that needed a bit more beta testing before it was  ready for production
High Defective Rate. I purchased two of these items through Amazon.  One of the units worked briefly, then quit; the other never worked at all.  Under the vendor's return policy, I returned these items (at my own expense) to the vendor for a refund and ordered two more directly from the vendor.  Only one of these additional two units worked.  That's three out of four defective--a 75% failure rate, and the buyer has to pay the return costs.  Further, this is not the first time I've had problems with "GE SmartHome" products.  An earlier purchase of other items of the same brand from another vendor also produced defective merchandise.  I would give these items ZERO "stars," if that were possible
BROKEN into a 1000 pieces. I rated this product a 1 star, because I was never able to see the product as it was sent to me BROKEN.Amazon has got to get with the packaging program.  I was handed the box by the delivery guy and I heard tiny shards of glass rattling around.  I opened the box to discover PATHETIC PACKAGING, no peanuts or anything just a broken crystal decanter inside of a box. HOW STUPID.  The main box didn't even have glass or fragile written on it-so I'm sure the delivery guys were anything but careful with it (for all they could tell it was a box of fluffy sheets.)However, Amazon says they will pay for my return shipping and replacement.  We'll see how this goes.  I'll keep you posted when I receive the second item.  Wish Amazon luck
Don't buy these!. I registered for these because Henckels has a good reputation, but i am really disappointed. The knives are not recommended for the dishwasher and I have hand washed them all. Despite this after one time of using the chopping knife and hand washing it, it has begun to rust. I wish I would have registered for the more expensive knives. In the long run it would have saved me money
Works, but not for long!. In principle, this should be a great product.  We got one and set it up in a few seconds.  Our dogs responded to it very well, and stopped most of their barking.  (In spite of some false triggers when it was not screened from the wind.)  Then after less than 10 days of use, it went dead.  The vendor responded politely and quickly with a free replacement unit.  That one worked great...for 5 days.  Then it went catatonic, with a click every second or getting stuck in permanently ON mode.  The vendor responded politely and quickly with a refund.That's 2 out of 2 units defective, which tells me there is a major defect in either the design or the quality control at the manufacturer.  Instead of wasting your time, maybe you should look for a different manufacturer
Hate it. My previous coffe pot, a cheapie Black-n-Decker, developed a habit of overflowing; because the cheezy "sneak a cup" mechanism would not function properly, creating the equivalent of a flooding toilet.Well, I spent $$$ right here on Amazon to buy the Braun instead, and guess what? I now have an overpriced flooding coffee toilet.I have owned this unit for around 6 months now, and on a given day, it will..a.) produce the Flooding Coffee Toilet effect, with grounds and coffee everywhere (15% chance)b.) Leak so much coffee during brewing that what started out as a full pot ends up as an 8-cup pot with the remainder on the counter (80% chance). Careful observation indicates this is due to a badly designed "sneak a cup" feature. The coffee creates a surface tension on the base of the basket, and trickles off to the edge of the coffee maker instead of dripping into the carafe.c.) Deliver the expected pot of coffee (5% chance)[note on option b.: I keep the coffee maker on a tray, because I got tired of cleaning up after it]I will -not- buy another Braun. I should have boxed this unit up and returned it to Amazon the first week I had it. I kept saying to myself "It must be good, it was rated the best!"Well guess what? I would rate it a ZERO STAR, but the least Amazon will let me give it is a 1
1 star for A-. mazon. I ordered 4 for xmas dinner, was sent three and they cancelled the 4th one saying the will never get it in.  Thanks Amazon
Started out good, but did not last long. I'm new to making espresso and lattes, so lots of trial and error was required.  Out of the box, the machine performed well and true to other feedback, the frother worked extremely well.  The steam control knob was required to throttle steam flow to achieve micro-froth.  After using every day for 2 months, it now takes 20 minutes to make a latte and there is barely enough steam to froth.  If you're serious about making espresso, pay a little more and get a more robust unit
Don't waste your money!. After using this product twice I would have to say that it does not work.  You are supposed to leave the solution on for 3 minutes before washing items and I did this the 1st time, the 2nd time I left the solution on longer and I still have hard water stains and salt build up.  I honestly get a better clean from using dishsoap
Waste of money. This warmer will NOT keep your coffee hot.  Lukewarm is the best you can hope for and that is only when the cup is almost empty.  Don't waste your money on this.  I'm still looking for one like I used to have that actually kept the coffee steaming hot..
BETTER OFF WITH PAPER FILTERS. Don't buy this product.  It was ill-fitting and incompatible with the coffee maker amazon matched it up with.  I returned mine and went with paper filters, which work so much better and are cleaner
Can a scale be too cranky and indecisive?. I've gotten into bread baking and many of the books recommend measuring ingredients by weight instead of volume so I bought this scale.  It's very affordable and made by what I considered to be a good manufacturer.  I didn't think, though, that I would meet a scale that is so temperamental and indecisive.  I always place the scale on a level, flat surface but when I put something on it to be weighed, the readout fluctuates anywhere from tenths of an ounce to an ounce or two, going up or down and not really settling anywhere.  I have to wait a minute for the scale to make up its mind about EXACTLY how much the object weighs.I probably should have gone to a brick-and-mortar store to check out the actual design of the scale before I placed my order.  Instead of individual on/off and tare buttons, this scale has "on", "off", and "tare" marked on the front edge of the scale and you are supposed to press down on your function of choice and the edge kind of buckles down and activates hidden buttons inside the mechanism:  Bear with me here, this is weird and hard to describe!  And it doesn't work very well either.  Sometimes, pushing down on "tare" turns the scale off.  I don't know why they didn't opt for simple straightforward buttons for the functions, but there you go.The button that switches the scale between pounds/ounces to metric is on the bottom of the scale.  While it doesn't particularly bother me, one time, I did want to weigh something in one system and switch to another (too lazy to bust out the old conversion formula) and I had to remove the item, turn the scale over, flip the switch, and start the weighing process again.I think I should have returned this and bought another model that would have made me happier.  This was a lesson in buying gadgets without physically checking them out--this scale looks good on paper and has a very affordable price tag, but it's not the best digital scale out there.  More than half the time, I don't feel like dealing with this wishy washy scale so I just measure out my ingredients by volume.  Which, indeed, defeats the purpose of why I got this scale in the first place
black and decker food processor. Everything has to be lined up just right for the machine to turn on. Its a safety feature. I can't seem to line it up right and get frustrated. My husband doesn't have this problem. It works for him every time. He prides himself in it. I also think its lightweight and plastic. Its quality is average. If I had to purchase a food processor again, I would look for one that was strong and durable and easier to figure out that its assembly is correct before I turn it on
very poor quality. very bad quality, not worth to buy it.it is not as good as the picture. Don't buy it!!
Cheep product! Did not work!. When I put the batteries in, it did not work! I had to take it apart and solder the spring connection to the PC board.
Sucks great but, sucks. Giving 2 stars on the suction alone. Hepa filter doesn't self-clean/turn after one use. A lot of dirt falls out from the hepa filter when removing the dirt box or collects behind the the dirt box if you don't pay very close attention to aligning it just right. I really liked how much dirt this thing pulls out of the carpet but it's heavy and dirt just falls out, a lot of dirt, when emptying the dirt box. I'm returning and not getting another after reading the other reviews in here that sound just like my experience
Horribly disappointed. This is the most I've spent on a coffee maker. It was delivered right before Christmas of '06 and broke 3 months later.  What a waste of money.It made very good coffee while it worked.  The last time I expected it to function, I was greeted with a flood on my counter and floor.  All 6 cups of water had leaked out. The 'ON' button stopped working. No doubt it somehow shorted itself out from the water.I will NEVER buy this brand again
real junk. Buy something else. First of all, it started out fine - had good suction, etc. There was only one flaw the dusting wand didn't work. It is supposed to charge and clean itself, but that only happens if you can keep the thing together, and I bet you can't. It doesn't take long for the power paw to stop working. Mine rotates so slowly if it touches anything it stops. The cleaner itself loses suction over time. The dust catcher is easy to empty, but don't forget to buy all the filters it needs. This is a poor choice
sharpens but doesn't do a great job . This sharper is cool because it is a magnet that you can stick to the fridge for easy access.  However it is not a good sharpener.  It sharpens knives but not well. Also, it has a limited amount of use before it will go into the trash.  Probably half a year and it will be useless. Spend your money elsewhere for something that sharpens better and will last you more than a year.
Not dry. I purchased this item because it claims to have effective means to prevent the food from getting wet and from clogging.  Sadly, both clogging and wetness occurred.  No user error here and this isn't my first feeder.  I returned to find the food wet and breeding some sort of weevily gnat insect, resulting in *serious* problems in my tank.  To be fair, this did occur in the humid month of August in New York and the strain proved beyond the model's capabilities (still, I was absent for only 3 day).   Maybe splashback from the fish was a problem.  Probably fine with day-to-day feeding in nonhumid climates, but why not just get a cheap, basic model for that
poor coating. I agree with a previous review,coating does not hold up. Comes off if bumped to hard.has been used gently and the metal is already showing. One thing I would like to know is, what is the highest temp this coating will tolerate
Worst Product in Our Wedding Registry. My wife and I put a white Toast-R-Oven from Black & Decker on our wedding registry, thinking it'd make a solid addition to our kitchen. Within the 1-yr warranty, our toaster oven stopped working. The button for making toast had ceased to depress and hold, requiring us to manually push down the button if we wanted to make toast. B&D had us snip the electrical cord and mail it back to them (I suppose to make sure we weren't just asking for another unit while keeping our current one).We received the replacement a few weeks later, but this one also broke. Unfortunately for us, the 1-yr warranty had just expired. This time, the problem was the heating element on the roof of the unit. One of the elements (a rod-like tube that goes lengthwise along the toaster) started giving off sparks and then collapsed. Instead of staying pressed against the top of the unit, one of the rods had partially fallen down, bending at an angle. You might think this was a case of user-error, perhaps by the owner accidentally ramming too big a chunk of food into the toaster and cracking the heating element... but I am positive that neither one of us touched the topside heating element. (We typically used it to toast Eggos and bread; with the pan, we used it to warm up leftover pizza, taco shells, cookies.)The oven no longer works since the topside no longer generates heat. The bottom still gets hot, but a funny smell permeates when the oven is activated, probably because of the broken heating element on top.Overall, this device is of such poor quality that I would not pay a single cent for another. This is the WORST item on our registry -- a piece of junk that causes headaches and frustration. I will NEVER buy another toaster oven from Black & Decker, and I am afraid to try any of their other kitchenware. I just can't trust their workmanship or design
USELESS--VERY ANGRY CUSTOMER. I usually like Oxo products, but this one is a real loser. Not only does it not give accurate readings (which in itself should deem it useless, being that it is a THERMOMETER after all) but there are other features that further enhance its horrible design. First of all, the "handy" (so they claim) spin dial that allows you to set the temperature that you want to reach, is so flimsy that the slightest movement of the thermometer throws the dial off. Useless. Secondly, after only one handwashing, water seeped under the dial face which is impossible to get out. The water then turns to steam which fogs up the display so you can't even read its inaccurate readings. 2 weeks later there is STILL steam under the dial. Useless again. And to pour salt on my already stinging wound, I had emailed Oxo to inquire about how to return this item and get a refund weeks ago, but they have yet to respond to me, even though on the package it states that satisfaction is 100 percent guaranteed. Well, I am NOT a satisfied customer and if my second attempt to reach them proves fruitless once again, then I doubt I will ever purchase another Oxo product again, no matter how good they are. It pains me to even give this product one star, as a product that's utterly useless deserves no star at all. Oxo should be ashamed of themselves. Thanks for allowing me to vent my 2 cents
Fling-it Squirrel. Although the body of the squirrel is still intact, our Pug tore the fur off the tail of the squirrel the first day he had it.  He still plays with the body and there is nothing for him to choke on, but I was disappointed that it fell apart so quickly
Not Blue, and you don't get two. These glasses are clear glass. There is no hint of blue, or any color or variation -- just plain glass. Also, another reviewer said you got two for this price, but that is no longer true. It looks as if they originally came in sets of two, but they have been removed from the sets and repackaged in bubblewrap. (On the outside of each box: "This is a set. Do not separate," but they are separated.)Each holds about 10 ounces
300 - thread-count Egyptian Cotton King Sheet set. The tags on the sheets said to wash before using. I did this and when I put them on the bed the bottom is more like a full or queen size. The top sheet is also rather small. I cannot use this product
tricky switch/short blade. Price was a factor in buying, but I wanted mostly for slicing bread machine bread. The bit at the end of the blades get hung up in my Presto slicing guide as the blades are too short; further, the switch is extremely temperamental and only works if you move your thumb around a lot. I'd return it, if the postage, packaging and trip to post office were worth it + trying to dig up original cash receipt! These people do NOT want return business! (They've been bought by Salton, so they use this brand for junk
Didn't last. The pump broke within 2 weeks and I haven't been able to find a replacement.  It would be under warranty but I threw away the paperwork (my bad) because usually I keep everything and then it just clutters up and I never have a problem.  However, I still think the product should last a little longer than that!  I purchased mine at petsmart and we live too far away to return it although I had tossed the box, etc
returned it due to "electrical issues". I am still waiting for my refund or replacement, as I returned this item immediately as the problem with the electrical (on/off button) were a serious safety issue.  I returned this and have heard nothing from Amazon or the manufacturer.The power switch would give you a slight shock when touching to turn the item on or off, at first I thought it was just me, but after checking it several times my husband and I decided "two-to-go" although very convenient in thought was not worth risking electrical shock, or possible fire due to shortage.It has been nearly a year since the item was returned and I have had no luck from anyone in regards to a refund or replacement.
A Horrible Piece of Crap. Trust me, don't waste your money with this thing! I researched and shopped around for such an item and made the mistake of thinking this was good. Well, here's why it isn't:* The pump gets clogged repeatedly, every few days or so, and it's a pain to clean.* The filters don't last very long and the material of which they're made begins to "shed," so to speak, thereby falling apart enough to have their fibers in the water.* The pump doesn't last long, period. I'm on my second pump--the first one lasted only a couple months--which itself now crapped out after a month.* Mold will build up inside the unit very quickly.* If the water level gets too low, it becomes noisy.Believe me, you'll love this at first but get very frustrated with it soon enough.
Don't waste your money. I purchased these sheets in Feb. I washed them per the manufacturer's instructions before putting them on the bed, they never got that far! One of the pockets on the fitted sheet was torn so badly that it can't be resewn, the stitching on the sheet is very badly done, it looks like it's ready to come apart on the other pockets too. I am sending them back. The reason I rate it 1 star is because it's a beautiful color (blue) and feels very soft & thick
Easy Release.... in Pieces. I'm returning my pans because even though I sprayed them, the cake still stuck in parts and didn't all come out smoothly.  Plus the two layers were all warped and not the same shape.  My cakes still look bad and I'm totally disappointed.  They don't clean any easier than the metal pans.  There were also big airholes in the batter that I normally don't have - and this was a simple box cake
KitchenAid 16 Piece knife set. It looks attractive, but I was markedly disappointed with the lack of sharpness in all the knives.  I find myself reaching for an old set of knives to cut up vegetables.  If the fruit or veggies are nearing ripeness, the kitchenaid knives will not cut through them at all
Piece of crap. What a piece of crap. Just putting this together broke it. And was missing one of the snap parts. Truely a waste of money
